 Where am I? My body hurts. Lin Xuan opened his eyes and found himself in a hall, standing in a crowd. However, the surrounding people did not dare to speak loudly and only whispered. The strange thing was that everyone had a collar on their necks. Outside the crowd, a robust man walked back and forth with two thugs, staring coldly at everyone. “Are these people all part of the BDSM community…?” At this moment, he felt some discomfort in his neck. He looked down and realized that he had one on his neck too. “Oh, I have one too. Then it’s fine.” At this moment, he realized that his body seemed to have gotten smaller. He no longer had an eight-pack and a well-defined strong body from before. Instead, it was a little shriveled and malnourished. He looked ahead and saw three glowing doors. At this moment, Lin Xuan’s mind ached. A large number of memories surged in his mind. Only then did he realize that he had transmigrated. This world was similar to Earth. After the global digitization of the New Era occurred, everyone’s Constitution, Strength, Agility, Spirit, and other attributes could be seen on their personal panels. Everyone also obtained a storage space. This was an independent storage space similar to a small dimension. At the same time as the global digitization occured, doors of light appeared one after another. These doors of light led to mystic realms. The bigger the door of light, the more dangerous the mystic realm. A large number of demon beasts surged out from the doors of light and killed humans, wreaking havoc in this world. The humans were unable to resist these powerful demon beasts and were forced to retreat step by step, their population decreasing. However, people also discovered that they could obtain experience points, general coins, materialized equipment, materials, skill books, and runes after killing these demon beasts. From this, the first batch of martial artists gradually led the humans to counterattack and rushed into some of the mystic realms. Some powerful organizations were even able to completely occupy some mystic realms with low demon strength and privatized the land there. They used it to nurture their own martial artists and obtain various treasures. After many years of exploration, humans discovered that some mystic realms only had level nine Zero Realm demon beasts. Thus, they called these realms Zero Realm mystic realms. This kind of mystic realm was suitable for Zero Realm martial artists to explore. Other mystic realms also only had First Realm demon beasts that were suitable for First Realm martial artists to explore. After these martial artists matured in the Zero Realm, First Realm, and Second Realm mystic realms, they realized that it was time to explore even more dangerous and chaotic mystic realms. Even so, demon beasts would still frequently rush out of the mystic realm, killing the commoners. Many places in the world were still occupied by the demon beasts. The entire world was chaotic and dangerous, and countless people were homeless. Lin Xuan’s previous self was the victim of the demon disaster. His entire family had been eaten by the demon beasts, and he was the only one who had escaped. However, he was only an insignificant level one First Realm martial artist. He could not even be considered an official martial artist. It was very difficult for him to earn a living anywhere. Soon after, the East Lake City he was in was established. This city was controlled by an organization called the “Germinal Organization”. If he wanted to go to the nearest big city, he would have to cross the wilderness where a large number of demon beasts gathered. He had three choices in front of him. His first choice was to enter the mystic realm alone with no items and knowledge. His second choice was to hide in a corner of the city and never increase his strength. One day, he would be eaten by a wandering demon as a snack. His third choice was to sign a slavery contract with the Germinal Organization and sell himself for three years. He could put on a collar and become the lowest-level wasteland reclaimer of the organization. In the end, Lin Xuan’s previous self still chose to become a wasteland reclaimer. After all, the Germinal Organization had a deep foundation and could provide a large amount of information on mystic realms and risk-taking techniques. It was better than going in alone. In the past three years, he had to serve the Germinal Organization and constantly went to the mystic realm controlled by the Germinal Organization to hunt for various treasures. The Germinal Organization assured their safety and distributed a certain number of general coins every week. The collar on their necks would record the entry and exit of items from the wasteland reclaimers’ storage space. Therefore, the wasteland reclaimers were unable to hide their items. At most, they would only be able to secretly transact with the other wasteland reclaimers. However, their bodies would also be searched when they returned to the Germinal Organization. When it came to items of extremely high grade, the Germinal Organization’s selection of items was “prioritized”. Although this was what they said, it was actually mandatory. The robust man was Lin Xuan and the others’ overseer. He was in charge of supervising them and making sure that they completed their missions. If they completed the mission and did more than they were asked to, they would naturally be rewarded. The reward could be a skill book, equipment, or an increase in their status in the Germinal Organization. If they could not complete the mission, they would leave a bad record in the collar. After three bad records, the Germinal Organization could unilaterally terminate the contract, take away all the property of the wasteland reclaimers, and expel them from the organization. Yesterday, Lin Xuan’s previous self had failed to complete the mission and had instead been severely injured. His overseer had not provided any medicine for him. There were many refugees outside. If one of them had died, more people would fight to fill the position. When he was queuing here just now, his previous self was already on the verge of death. If he stood for too long, he would even die. Lin Xuan had just transmigrated into this body. His heart sank to the bottom. This was the start of his transmigration? At this moment, the Overseer shouted through the loudspeaker. “Wasteland reclaimers of District B, immediately use the teleportation gate to travel to the Zero Realm Giant Rock Cave! You have three days. Each of you has to bring back at least ten Zero Realm items from the Giant Rock Cave!” The crowd in front all rushed into the door of light and quickly disappeared, afraid to fall behind at all. The Overseer saw Lin Xuan behind and immediately shouted. “Why are you still dawdling?! You didn’t complete the mission last time! If you don’t want to work, there are many people outside who are willing to work!” Lin Xuan hurriedly stepped through the door of light. The Overseer snorted. “If you don’t complete the mission, watch how I deal with you.” The process of passing through the door of light was not easy. Lin Xuan felt as if he was a dough being kneaded wantonly. His intestines surged and his entire perception began to spin. However, this feeling came and went quickly. Soon, he stepped on the firm ground. Lin Xuan opened his eyes and saw a huge desert. Not far away, there was a huge pit that led downwards. The radius of the pit was more than 500 meters, and it looked like the mouth of a super huge beast. This was one of the many mystic realms controlled by the Germinal Organization. Many wasteland reclaimers walked out of the door of light and entered the huge rock cave in groups of three to five. This scene truly shocked Lin Xuan. He also noticed that most wasteland reclaimers wore collars. Only a small number of people did not have collars. They were lone wolves who insisted on being arrogant. They still had to pay for passing through the door of light and could easily die in a corner of the mystic realm. Lin Xuan sighed and mixed into the crowd, preparing to enter the giant rock cave. At the same time, he opened his data panel. … Name: Lin Xuan Level: level one Zero Realm Experience: 820 / 1000 Attributes: Constitution 8, Strength 7, Spirit 8, Agility 3 (average adult value is 10) Skill: Sneak Attack, Oily Feet, Mining Equipment: wasteland reclaimer’s Collar, Iron Dagger, Barbaric Bull Breastplate Item: 2 pieces of flavored compressed biscuits, a bottle of mineral water … Lin Xuan smiled helplessly. Then, memories related to the Giant Rock Cave began to appear in his mind. The Giant Rock Cave was 1,000 meters deep and had a floor every 100 meters. In the first floor, there were level one Zero Realm demon beasts. In the second floor, there were level two Zero Realm demon beasts, and so on. On the tenth floor lived the “mystic realm kings”. Although these were level nine Zero Realm demon beasts, they were far stronger than ordinary level nine Zero Realm demon beasts. Level nine Zero Realm martial artists had to team up to challenge it. “The level of this body is too low. It’s very dangerous to enter the mystic realm. This is not a game. If I die, I’ll really die.” At this moment, he suddenly heard a commotion in front of him. “Why is there a Gold Swallowing Lizard’s corpse here? How unlucky!” Immediately after, a half-meter-long lizard was thrown into the distance. Lin Xuan glanced over and discovered that the lizard was covered in green light and was bleeding from all seven apertures. Its death was extremely tragic. “Gold Swallowing Lizard?” Lin Xuan immediately recalled. The Gold Swallowing Lizards liked to eat all kinds of metals, so they had very durable scales. Although they were only Zero Realm demon beasts, many demon beasts that were several levels higher than them were unable to do anything to them. Even if they could be killed, their scales still could not be obtained. Therefore, many people decided to not waste time with them. Martial artists also did not like this kind of demon beast. This was because not only did the Gold Swallowing Lizards have rough skin and thick flesh, but they also liked to provoke others. They were also known as Big Brother Flathead from the Giant Rock Cave. When martial artists encountered them, they hurriedly avoided them. The few wasteland reclaimers naturally did not have a good expression when they saw the golden lizard corpse. Lin Xuan was about to circle around when a voice sounded in his mind. [Dead target detected, analysis in progress…] [Gold Swallowing Lizard, level one Zero Realm demon beast. Attributes: Constitution 15, Strength 13, Agility 5, Spirit 1. Skills: Ground Digging, Gold Swallowing, Armor.] [Cause of death: Poisoned.] [Currently, you have an extra avatar slot. Do you want to possess the Gold Swallowing Lizard and use it as a training avatar?] [Remarks: This dead target will immediately be revived with full health.] Lin Xuan was stunned. Other martial artists did not have such avatars. This was probably his cheat code. Joy immediately rose on his face as he immediately muttered, “Yes.” In an instant, he felt that he had a reaction to the golden lizard. The Gold Swallowing Lizard suddenly rolled over and got up, its eyes rolling. “Damn!” The surrounding wasteland reclaimers were shocked and subconsciously punched and kicked. The Gold Swallowing Lizard crawled clumsily. The wasteland reclaimers’ attacks did not hurt it at all. Soon, the Gold Swallowing Lizard used a skill to dig through the rocks and quickly disappeared in front of the many martial artists. “What’s going on? The poison has spread all over its body, but it is still alive and kicking?” “How would I know? It might not be dead.” After a short moment of surprise, the wasteland reclaimers no longer cared about this matter and continued to enter the huge rock cave. Lin Xuan was pleasantly surprised. Two first-person point of views appeared in front of him. One of them was the view of his main body, and the other was the view of the Gold Swallowing Lizard. Then, Lin Xuan discovered that there were also training options in his side view. These options included attack and defense, active attack, and passive defense. “Let’s go with attack and defense.” Lin Xuan casually tapped one. [You have set up a training strategy. Do you want to start training?] Lin Xuan seemed to understand and muttered, “Yes.” Then, he saw two lines appear from the bottom right of the Gold Swallowing Lizard’s side view. [Current Area: Giant Rock Cave First floor (1 general coin / minute, 5 experience points / minute)] [The Gold Swallowing Lizard has been training for 1 minute and has received 1 general coin and 5 experience points. Do you wish to collect?] As time passed, his gains continued to increase. Lin Xuan was overjoyed. Wasn’t this the kind of hacker game that he had seen before he transmigrated? He understood. He completely understood. He did not need to take the risk of entering the mystic realm at all. All he needed to do was collect the gains from his avatars’ training periodically. He muttered the word”collect.” Then, as if a strange space had been opened in his mind, with a capacity of 10 cubic meters, a general coin and five light spots immediately appeared. The latter was the experience points. At the edge of the consciousness space, there was a strange furnace that was currently in a gray state. Lin Xuan immediately had relevant information in his mind. [Consciousness Space: Level 1] Capacity: 10 cubic meters [Smelting Table: Locked] Seeing this, Lin Xuan was pleasantly surprised. The Wasteland Reclaimer Collar would record everything he obtained from his storage bag. However, the gains from the avatar’s training would appear in his consciousness space. In this way, he could avoid the record of the wasteland reclaimer Collar. He identified the direction and walked straight to the safety station. The safety station was set up by the experts of the Germinal Organization. There was also a safety station on every floor of the Giant Rock Cave. It was said that in the mystic realms that were not controlled by the Germinal Organization, the experts of the other organizations would also set up safety stations. However, it was unknown if this was true. The safety station had runes set up by powerful martial artists that could disperse and resist demon beasts. Moreover, the safety stand did not allow martial artists to fight each other. It was extremely safe. Lin Xuan entered the safety station and found a corner to sit down and rest. It was too dangerous to enter a dungeon and take risks. Staying at the safety station and receiving training rewards was the way to go. “I’ll set a small goal. I’ll advance to the level nine Zero Realm first before leaving the mountain.” Lin Xuan nodded slightly and leaned against the wall. This body had not recovered from the injuries it suffered yesterday. Moreover, he had just transmigrated and had received so much information at once. It indeed made him feel somewhat exhausted both physically and mentally. Soon, he fell asleep. … After waking up, Lin Xuan stretched his back, his bones popping. He immediately checked his gains. [The Gold Swallowing Lizard has been training for 3 hours and has reached the upper limit of its training time. You have received 180 general coins, 900 experience points, 1 Zero Realm skill book, 1 Zero Realm equipment, 25 iron ores, and 6 bronze mines. Do you wish to collect?] Lin Xuan muttered to himself. Indeed, there was a time limit for training. Then, he began to mutter the word “collect”. Crash. A large number of items appeared in the consciousness space. Naturally, the experience points were the most important. Experience points were the most important resource for martial artists to become stronger. Warriors could obtain experience points through combat, production, and reading. After investing in the experience, he could level up. Not only could he level up his cultivation, but he could also level up his skills. Lin Xuan immediately extracted all the experience points and used them to increase his cultivation level Splash. His experience bar soared and immediately increased from level one to level two of Zero Realm. At the same time, he obtained two attribute points. A Zero Realm martial artist could obtain 2 attribute points per level. A First Realm martial artist could obtain 3 attribute points per level, and so on. “I’ll open the skill book and take a look.” Lin Xuan opened the skill book and looked at a ring. … Name: Iron Wall Level: level one Zero Realm Grade: Ordinary White Learning Requirements: Constitution 8, Spirit 5 Effect: Consumes 30% of magic power, causing constitution to increase by 2 and physical resistance to increase by 10% for 3 minutes. … Name: Protection Ring Level: level one Zero Realm Grade: Uncommon Green Equipment Requirement: None Effect: Constitution+1, Physical Resistance+5%. … Lin Xuan was overjoyed. These were all good stuff. Since he did not need to enter the dungeon, he did not need any attack power. All he needed to do was defend. Defense was reflected in one’s Constitution. The higher one’s Constitution was, the higher the damage reduction rate for physical and magic attack. It also increased one’s life recovery speed. He immediately learned [Iron Wall] and even wore the Protection Ring on his pinky. When he returned to the Germinal Organization, he only needed to take off the ring and place it in his consciousness. “Two attribute points. I might as well add it to my Constitution.” His constitution directly increased from 8 to 10. With the addition of the Protection Ring, his body immediately felt much stronger. If he used the Iron Wall again, his Constitution would directly increase to 13 points. He nodded in satisfaction and immediately had hope for his future life. “How can I increase the upper limit of the training period?” Lin Xuan tried to increase his strength and immediately saw a notification. [Do you want to spend 1,000 general coins to increase the training time limit to 4 hours?] “1,000 general coins. Fortunately, it’s not a lot. I’ll just keep hacking.” Lin Xuan nodded slightly and decided to just stroll around the safety station. After walking around, he discovered that there were not many martial artists in the safety station. There were only a few logisticians who were in charge of medical care, food, and transactions. At this moment, they were working meticulously. As a martial artist who fell asleep in the corner, he was actually an exception. In order to hide his embarrassment, Lin Xuan began to chat with a logistician who was forging equipment. These types of martial artists were not good at combat, but they had skills such as planting, cooking, and forging. Thus, they were hired to work as logisticians at the safety station. Their treatment in the Germinal Organization was much better than Lin Xuan and the other wasteland reclaimers. “Brother, why aren’t there many people here?” “It’s not night yet. When night falls, more wasteland reclaimers will appear. At that time, we will also get busy.” Lin Xuan nodded repeatedly. When the other party mentioned this, he recalled. Although day and night were no different in the Giant Rock Cave, for some reason, every time night arrived in the outside world, the demon beasts would all go berserk and their desire to attack would increase. Countless martial artists had used their lives as the price to learn a crucial lesson. When exploring the Giant Rock Cave, they had to pay attention to the time. Once night fell, they had to obediently lie down at a safe station and not attempt to test the situation near the demon beasts during their rampage. At this moment, Lin Xuan’s heart skipped a beat. He might as well sell off the ores on his body for money. “Brother, do you buy iron ores and copper ores here?” he asked in a low voice. The blacksmith uncle coughed lightly. “According to the rules, that won’t do. Have your ores… been recorded by your collar?” The wasteland reclaimer collars recorded the entry and exit of any items in the storage bag. However, the wasteland reclaimers had also thought of a way to deal with it. Since the collars only recorded any items that went inside the storage bag, it would be fine as long as they did not put the items in the storage bag! As a result, such private transactions were formed over time. The higher-ups of the Germinal Organization also knew about this, but they did not punish them severely and only turned a blind eye. To them, if the wasteland reclaimers traded these things, it would ultimately increase the strength of the wasteland reclaimers. In other words, it was equivalent to increasing the overall strength of the Germinal Organization. Lin Xuan also smiled knowingly. “Of course not. I placed them somewhere safe outside the safety station.” The middle-aged man nodded. “Sure.” Lin Xuan walked out of the safety station and found a deserted place nearby. He took out an iron ore from his consciousness space and returned to the safety station. “What’s the price for this?” The blacksmith uncle looked carefully and said in surprise, “This iron ore is very pure. It’s rare at this depth. I can buy it for 30 general coins.” With that said, he said seriously, “If you have more of this iron ore, I can increase the purchase price a little.” Lin Xuan was overjoyed when he heard this. As expected, the purity of the iron ores and copper ores the Gold Swallowing Lizard had dug up was very high. The reason was actually very simple. In the mines that martial artists often went to, the high grade ores had already been dug up completely. As for the Gold Swallowing Lizards, they never took the ordinary path. They only relied on digging. They went to places that martial artists did not often go, so they could naturally obtain many high grade ores. Lin Xuan immediately nodded. “Wait.” He did as he was told and walked out of the safety station. He took out 25 iron ores and 6 bronze ores from his consciousness space and placed them in front of him before returning to the blacksmith uncle. Uncle blacksmith said enviously, “You must have found a small mine.” Lin Xuan smiled and did not say anything. “The purity of these iron ores and copper ores is above 40%. How about this? I’ll give you 38 general coins for each iron ore and 58 general coins for each copper ore! Consider it as the price for our friendship!” The blacksmith uncle said seriously. Lin Xuan nodded repeatedly and directly placed the general coins he obtained from the transaction into his consciousness space without going through the storage space. In this way, it would not be recorded by the wasteland reclaimer collars. In this way, his general coin balance immediately increased to 1478, which was enough to increase the upper limit of his training time. After increasing the training limit to 4 hours, Lin Xuan spent a few more general coins to buy some food from the safety station to eat. At this moment, it was also nighttime. Thinking about it, it was almost time for the wasteland reclaimers to flood into the safety station. At this moment, Lin Xuan suddenly felt his feet shake violently, as if the entire Giant Rock Cave was trembling. A deep and majestic dragon roar sounded from the distant ground. The logisticians at the safety station were immediately alarmed. “The Earth Dragon King on the tenth floor is starting to get restless again. Every time it gets restless, it will cause the demon beasts in the Giant Rock Cave to go berserk in advance.” “Quickly release a warning and get the wasteland reclaimers to return early. We can’t stay outside!” Soon, the announcement for the safety station sounded. “Restless Earth Dragon King! Restless Earth Dragon King! All wasteland reclaimers, please pay attention and return to the safety station immediately! Return to the safety station immediately!” The alarm echoed in the huge rock cave. As long as one was not deaf, they would be able to hear this ear-piercing sound from hundreds of meters below the ground. Lin Xuan shrugged. There were ten mystic realm kings living on the tenth level. The tenth floor’s mystic realm kings were transformed from level nine Zero Realm demon beasts on the ninth floor. After transforming, they would obtain a 15% increase in all their attributes and also receive a random precious purple skill bestowed by the Giant Rock Cave. Of course, even so, as long as the wasteland reclaimers formed a team, they could still kill the mystic realm kings. The other nine mystic realm kings would quickly be killed and replaced by new ones. Only the Earth Dragon King was extremely difficult to kill. In the past half a year, no one had been able to slay it and it had stayed on the tenth floor. In this half a year, countless wasteland reclaimers had died under the Earth Dragon King’s claws. Because of this, the Earth Dragon King was given a new title by the Giant Rock Cave: “experienced mystic realm king”. In other words, it was a mystic realm king who had experienced many battles. After obtaining this title, the Earth Dragon King’s attributes increased by 15%. It also obtained two more precious purple skills, making it extremely difficult to kill. It was precisely because of this that the Earth Dragon King had simply become the overlord of the Giant Rock Cave. Its slight movement could cause a huge change. Lin Xuan had also encountered the restless Earth Dragon King several times. However, he was very vigilant and would always run back to the safety station ahead of time. At this moment, noisy footsteps sounded from the entrance of the safety station. A large number of martial artists surged in. “Damn, we were about to kill that bull. Why did we suddenly encounter the Earth Dragon King? How unlucky!” “You guys should be happy. Last time, more than 30 wasteland reclaimers did not manage to escape to the safety station in time and were drowned in the violent beast tide. It’s not bad for us to come back early this time!” The wasteland reclaimers had helpless and relieved expressions. They could only gather in small groups and chat. Lin Xuan looked at these people and suddenly thought of something. The Earth Dragon King’s body was huge, and every time it stirred, the rocks would collapse. Naturally, it would bring out many new ores, and the chances of those high grade ores appearing would also increase. At this moment, he heard a notification. [Information about the Giant Rock Cave: Under the influence of the Earth Dragon King’s restlessness, a deep mineral might has appeared and will remain in the first few floors for 28 hours.] Lin Xuan was overjoyed. Indeed! Now, most of the wasteland reclaimers had returned to the safety station because of the warning. Almost no one would be able to see those high grade ores. In the end, they would all be harvested by the Gold Swallowing Lizard! Lin Xuan switched to the side view of the Gold Swallowing Lizard and saw that the latter was indeed eating heartily. It ate various rare ores happily. In the first floor of the Giant Rock Cave, most places only had level one Zero Realm minerals, and few people could find level two Zero Realm minerals. However, the restlessness of the Earth Dragon King had also caused many level two Zero Realm minerals in the second floor of the Giant Rock Cave to be flipped to this first floor. In this short period of time, the Gold Swallowing Lizard had already dug up a lot of level two Zero Realm minerals. The experience provided by a level two Zero Realm mineral was even greater. After eating a few pieces, the Gold Swallowing Lizard’s level had already increased from level one to level two of Zero Realm. “Perfect, I can already go to the second floor to train. This Earth Dragon King’s restlessness is actually a good opportunity for me. I should strive to increase the Gold Swallowing Lizard to level three Zero Realm.” Lin Xuan was very happy. He simply ordered a lamb stew and watched the golden lizard eat. Battling, mining, eating ores, battling again, excreting, mining, mating, eating ores… Eh? Why did it feel like something was wrong? Four hours later, Lin Xuan immediately looked at his gains. [Current Area: Giant Rock Cave’s second floor (2 general coins / minute, 10 experience points / minute)] [The Gold Swallowing Lizard has been training for 4 hours and has already reached the upper limit of its training time. Obtained 480 general coins, 2400 experience points, 2 Level 0 skill books, 1 Black Scaled Snake Gall, 1 Rock Belly Fruit, 2 Barbaric Bull Horn, 1 Soul Nurturing Flower, 66 iron ores, 25 bronze ore, 8 cloud iron, and 3 mountain copper. Do you wish to collect?] He was overjoyed. The Black Scaled Snake Gall, Rock Belly Fruit, Barbaric Bull Horn, and Soul Nurturing Flower were called “attribute items.” As the name implied, they could permanently increase one’s attributes. They could respectively increase 1 point of Agility, Constitution, Strength, and Spirit. However, he could only eat 10 of these things at most. It would be useless for him to eat any more. Moreover, if a Fourth Realm martial artist had not eaten ten before, it would be useless for him to eat any in the future. Therefore, martial artists would try their best to gather these rare items before becoming a Fourth Realm martial artist. As for the cloud iron and mountain copper, they were Zero Realm minerals. He muttered the word “collect”. Hualala, another batch of items appeared in the consciousness space. The two Level 0 Skill Books were both [Weaken]. … Name: Weaken Level: level one Zero Realm Grade: Ordinary White Learning Requirement: Spirit 7 Effect: Consumes 15% of one’s magic power, temporarily reduces cultivation by one level and five attribute points, reduces one’s presence, and lasts for 5 minutes. … Lin Xuan slapped his thigh happily. “This is the skill I want!” He now had a lot of experience and something like the Black Scale Snake Gall that permanently increased his attributes. However, he could not level up too quickly, let alone increase his attributes. This was because the Overseer could clearly see his level and attributes through the wasteland reclaimer’s collar! Weaken was relatively useless to other martial artists. It could only be used in times of despair. When facing those demonic demon beasts that were far superior, one would use Weaken to make a Hail Mary effort to make the other party treat them as trash. However, to Lin Xuan, this was the best skill he could have! “I’ll leave the ore for the Gold Swallowing Lizard to eat. Once it gets stronger, it can go to even deeper places to train.” “As for the Black Scale Snake Gall, I’ll eat it all.” Three days passed in a flash. [Current Area: Giant Rock Cave Third Floor (3 general coin / minute, 15 experience points / minute)] [The Gold Swallowing Lizard has been training for 5 hours and has already reached the upper limit of its training time. Obtained 900 general coins, 4500 experience points, 8 Zero Realm skill books, 11 Zero Realm equipment, 16 Black Scale Snake Gall, 20 Barbaric Bull Horns… 189 iron ores, 78 bronze ore, 28 cloud iron ore, 13 bronze ore… Do you wish to collect?] Lin Xuan muttered the word “collect”. Seeing the space in his consciousness filled with items, and then looking at his more than 10,000 general coins, he felt endless satisfaction. No wonder everyone liked to cheat. This feeling of harvest was too comfortable. In the past three days, he had obtained a large number of the same skill books, such as the [Endless Life] that accelerated the recovery of one’s life force, the passive skill [Steel Body] that increased one’s physical defense, the passive skill [Thorn Body] that increased one’s reflective damage, the [Observer] that identified the attributes of demon beasts and warriors, the [Concealment] Skill that concealed one’s attributes to prevent them from being peeked at… Five similar white skill books could be combined into one green skill book, five identical green ones could be combined into one blue, five identical blue ones into one purple, and so on. Therefore, Lin Xuan’s Weaken, Oily Feet, Iron Wall, Sneak Attack, Endless Life, and Thorn Body had all been upgraded to rare blue grades. In particular, Lin Xuan had invested a large number of experience points into Weaken, allowing it to reach level nine Zero Realm. … Name: Weaken Level: Level nine Zero Realm Grade: Rare Blue Learning Requirement: Spirit 7 Effect: Consumes 5% magic power, temporarily reduces one’s cultivation by six levels and 20 attribute points, reduces one’s sense of existence, can be casually interrupted and recovers one’s cultivation to its original state. … With this skill, Lin Xuan could level up without fear, eat rare items like the Black Scaled Snake Gall, and learn various skills without having to worry about being discovered by the Germinal Organization and being captured for research. Seeing his experience bar increase rapidly, Lin Xuan felt incomparably comfortable. A moment later, his attributes were as follows. … Name: Lin Xuan Level: Level nine Zero Realm Experience: 2388 / 9000 Attributes: 35 Constitution, 17 Strength, 18 Spirit, 13 Agility Skill: Weaken, Iron Wall, Sneak Attack, Oily Feet, Endless Life, Thorn Body… Equipment: Wasteland Reclaimer Collar, Iron Dagger, Barbaric Bull Breastplate, Protection Ring … After leveling up from level one of the Zero Realm to the level nine, he obtained a total of 18 attribute points. Lin Xuan did not hesitate to invest all of this into his Constitution. “To advance from level nine Zero Realm to level one First Realm, you need the materials for advancement. You have to go to the ninth floor of the Giant Rock Cave to challenge the mystic realm king.” Lin Xuan was smug. “Next, I’ll increase my consciousness space.” After consuming 1,000 general coins, the initial level 1 consciousness space instantly became a level 2 consciousness space, expanding from 10 cubic meters to 20 cubic meters. The smelting table that was originally in a gray state opened by itself and immediately appeared in front of Lin Xuan. [The smelting table can smelt equipment, minerals, runes, and so on. Please set the items on the smelting table.] Lin Xuan had adjusted the item setting to “minerals” and had set a filter condition that only allowed the smelting of iron ores. “Then what if I want to smelt other things?” Lin Xuanxin thought for a moment and saw another notification. [Using 5,000 general coins to unlock the second smelting table. Using 10,000 general coins to unlock the third smelting table…] Lin Xuan smacked his lips. Damn, you’re a money-grubber. “Then I’ll unlock the second smelting table to smelt the equipment.” Clang! Another smelting table appeared out of thin air. Lin Xuanwei’s smelting table had been set to smelting equipment. He had already obtained nearly a hundred pieces of equipment in the past three days. However, most of them were of ordinary white grade. He only had the Protection Ring that he had obtained at the beginning. There was too much white equipment and low value ores, which occupied a lot of space, so they had to be used. The smelting table was the best way. The two smelting tables immediately began to work and quickly produced items. Smelted iron ores from the first smelting table could be directly used to forge iron ingots. The second smelting table smelted white equipment, which produced white grade equipment essence and could be used to increase the level of the equipment. “This is too convenient. If other martial artists want to obtain iron ingots, they can only buy them or learn the smelting skills to make them themselves.” “In order to obtain the equipment essence, you still have to learn the smelting technique and the basics of smelting. That’s not something that can be done in a day or two.” Lin Xuan had inherited these memories from his previous self. Unlike combat skills, life skills could be gained by killing demon beasts. It had to be learned by oneself and cost ten times more experience than combat skills. Some life skills also required a lot of materials to be learned, such as pharmaceutical skills and cooking skills. This led to very few people being interested in life skills. At this moment, Lin Xuan saw a new set of equipment in a gray state. This equipment was a combination of a bellows, anvil, and a pool. It looked like a forging place. [First forging table can be unlocked for free after upgrading the consciousness space to level 3.] [Consuming 10,000 general coins can increase a level 2 consciousness space to a level 3 consciousness space.] Lin Xuan was overjoyed. This hack was too omnipotent. He could even forge his own weapons. However, now that he had used up a lot of general coins, he did not plan to upgrade his consciousness space to level 3 for the time being. “The three days are over. It’s time to return.” Lin Xuan was satisfied. He returned to the ground of the Giant Rock Cave and walked towards the door of light. After another intense feeling of discomfort, Lin Xuan had already stepped through the door of light and returned to the Germinal Organization’s base. He used his Weaken skill to suppress his level from level nine Zero Realm to level three Zero Realm, and his attributes were also suppressed by 20 points. In front of him, many wasteland reclaimers had already lined up and were handing in their items. There were many items that could be obtained in the Giant Rock Cave. Including the minerals and demon body parts, the mission requirement of taking back ten items was not considered high or low. If one was unlucky, one might not be able to complete the mission. For example, this time, the Earth Dragon King had been restless for a total of 28 hours, causing many people to be unable to find items for an entire day. Lin Xuan swept his gaze over and discovered that many of the wasteland reclaimers were dejected and anxious. Clearly, they had not completed their mission. At this moment, District B’s Overseer, Yang Wei, was berating. “Liu Jia! Seven materials. You failed to complete the mission!” “Zhang San, six materials! Your mission has not been completed!” “Zhao Yong, 19 materials and even obtained a Black Scale Snake Gall. Very good!” Zhao Yong smiled obsequiously. “It’s all thanks to Brother Yang’s good guidance. I especially gave this snake gallbladder to Brother Yang!” The Overseer named Yang Wei laughed loudly and said, “This uncommon green sword is yours!” The other wasteland reclaimers revealed envious expressions. Consuming the Black Scale Snake Gall could permanently increase one’s agility. Such an item that could permanently increase one’s attribute points was rare. No wonder Yang Wei was so happy. “A Black Scaled Snake Gall?” Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. He still had 13 Black Scaled Snake Gall in his consciousness space and had already eaten 10. Yang Wei patted Zhao Yong’s shoulder in satisfaction and signaled for the next wasteland reclaimer to go forward. Seeing the materials the other party handed over, Yang Wei immediately turned hostile and was furious. “Li Qiang, there are actually only three materials. What are you doing?! This is already the third time you failed to complete the mission!” Yang Wei went forward and kicked the wasteland reclaimer called Li Qiang directly. The latter’s face was very painful, and his back was arched like a cooked shrimp. However, even so, he still forced himself to get up and hug the overseer, Yang Wei’s leg, “Brother Yang, I…” “Get lost! You failed three times in a row. The organization can unilaterally cancel the contract. Get lost!” Yang Wei had a disgusted expression and kicked the latter far away. “Brother Yang, I beg you to give me a chance. I still have a child to support. I can’t lose…” Li Qiang forced himself to get up again. However, this time, he did not even manage to touch Yang Wei’s feet before he was held back by the two thugs beside him and directly thrown out. “Do you see this? This is the outcome of not completing the mission!” “There are many refugees waiting to eat outside. Since you haven’t completed the mission, someone will naturally replace you!” “It’s your blessing that the organization signed a contract with you. Don’t be ignorant!” Yang Wei looked around and berated sternly. All the wasteland reclaimers who were swept by his gaze lowered their heads nervously, not daring to show any displeasure. To the wasteland reclaimers, the overseers were their absolute superiors and could not be defied. Lin Xuan sighed. He was also quite unlucky to have an overseer like Yang Wei. Just now, Zhao Yong had given him a Black Scale Snake Gall, and Yang Wei had only given him an uncommon green sword. Even if he also handed in a few snake gallbladders, he would probably not be rewarded much by this strict overseer, let alone improve his living environment, identity, and status. If only he could get a different overseer. Soon, it was Lin Xuan’s turn. Lin Xuan also made a nervous appearance, not being too high-profile. Yang Wei saw that it was him and sneered, “You are the same as Li Qiang. You have also failed two missions. If you don’t complete the mission this time, the organization can also unilaterally cancel the contract with you.” After saying that, Yang Wei took out a scanner and prepared to scan Lin Xuan’s collar. At this moment, footsteps sounded from the other side of the hall. “Yang Wei, do you have the Black Scaled Snake Gall? Give me seven.” A clear voice interrupted Yang Wei. Immediately after, a cute and cold loli with a high ponytail and a small suit entered his sight. She seemed to be only 13 or 14 years old. Lin Xuan was stunned. He knew this person’s identity. This little loli’s name was Lu Luo. She looked harmless, but she was actually the overseer of District C and was on the same level as Yang Wei. He also heard that Lu Luo originally did not have this young appearance, but she had encountered an accident and ended up like this. However, from Lu Luo’s tone, it was obvious that she was not being polite with Yang Wei. She opened her mouth and said, “Give them to me.” She wanted Yang Wei to give her seven Black Scaled Snake Galls for free. Even if Yang Wei had it, he would definitely not be willing to give it up. Yang Wei’s expression darkened. “Lu Luo, you manage your District C and I manage my District B. If you want the Black Scale Snake Gall, get your wasteland reclaimers to hand it over. Why should I give mine to you?” Lu Luo walked coldly towards Yang Wei. Then, she grabbed the latter’s arm with one hand and swung it. Bang! Yang Wei’s head smashed onto the ground, and blood instantly seeped out from his nose. “This is why,” Lu Luo said indifferently. Yang Wei rolled over and looked at her in shock and anger, “You’re already at the level nine Third Realm?” Lu Luo frowned. “No sh*t. Otherwise, why would I go around looking for these items to increase my attributes?” Lin Xuan was enlightened. One had to eat 10 rare Zero Realm items like the Black Scaled Snake Gall and the Barbaric Bull Horn before one reached the Fourth Realm. This Lu Luo was already at the level nine Third Realm and was clearly prepared to advance to the Fourth Realm. No wonder she was in a hurry to find the Black Scaled Snake Gall. Yang Wei gritted his teeth and could only say, “…I’m not afraid of you. I just don’t want to hurt the friendship between colleagues… I’ll give you one for free… How about you guys! Do any of you have the Black Scale Snake Gall? Take it out!” The wasteland reclaimers curled their lips secretly. If he wanted to admit defeat, so be it. Why did he have to put up a front? The wasteland reclaimers were silent and looked down. “Nothing?” Yang Wei turned to Lu Luo. “Look, they also don’t have it.” Lu Luo frowned. “I know that you must have hidden a few of them to show filial piety to Yang Wei. I’ll give you a condition. As long as you take out a Black Scaled Snake gallbladder, you can join my District C and I can even remove the bad record on your collar.” As soon as he said this, the wasteland reclaimers in District B immediately thought of something. Lin Xuan was the same. He was about to change his overseer and now seemed to be a good opportunity. Yang Wei also sensed their thoughts and immediately glared fiercely at these wasteland reclaimers. The threat in his eyes was self-evident. After all, despite not being able to deal with Lu Luo, he could still deal with them. The wasteland reclaimers flinched at his glare. Even if they ran from District B to District C, Yang Wei would still be their superior. If he caused them any trouble, they would definitely be unable to bear the consequences. Yang Wei sneered and was proud of himself. Those who could obtain the Black Scale Snake Galls in the Giant Rock Cave were at least level four Zero Realm. Previously, Yang Wei said that there were many refugees outside. He only meant that there were many martial artists with cultivation from level one to level three Zero Realm. However, after advancing to level four Zero Realm, one could already be considered a relatively powerful Zero Realm martial artist. Lu Luo was blatantly trying to poach his people. This was intolerable! At this moment, Lu Luo glanced at him. “Are you itching for a beating?” Yang Wei’s hair stood on end as he turned his head away and muttered in his heart, A man can choose to submit or retreat. He convinced himself to not lower to the level of a little girl. In this oppressive atmosphere, Lin Xuan raised his hand. “I have the Black Scaled Snake Gall.” Lin Xuan’s voice made everyone’s eyes gather on him. Yang Wei was the most shocked. As the overseer, he knew best what kind of strength Lin Xuan had. Three days ago, he was still at level one of the Zero Realm. After failing twice in a row, he definitely could not complete the mission this time. If not for Lu Luo’s sudden appearance, Yang Wei would have also kicked Lin Xuan away. “You? Stop joking,” Yang Wei said in a strange tone. “Lu Luo hates it when others lie to her. If you lie about the gallbladder, the consequences will be very tragic.” Lin Xuan ignored Yang Wei’s words and walked closer to Lu Luo. “Do you really have it?” Lu Luo glanced at the young man. She hated being deceived. The last person who had deceived her was the overseer of District D, and she had directly cut off his arm. Their superior “manager” had no choice but to step forward to mediate this matter. In the end, it was left unsettled. Lin Xuan directly took out six Black Scaled Snake Galls. The six snake gallbladders emitted a delicate fragrance, as if they had just been taken out of the snake’s body. Lu Luo’s eyes lit up. “How did you get so many snake gallbladders?” Lin Xuan had long thought of an excuse. He pretended to be anxious and said, “I was lucky and found a black-scaled snake lair. Those black-scaled snakes were fighting the Demon Poison Toad and both sides were injured. I poured oil and set fire to all of them.” The Black Scaled Snake and the Demon Poison Toad were natural enemies. The two sides were irreconcilable. Both sides’ flame resistance was very low and it was very easy for them to be severely injured by the flames. Of course, it was impossible for everyone to believe this excuse. At most, everyone was only doubtful. Lu Luo nodded. “Very good, our agreement is valid. From now on, you will leave District B and join District C.” The wasteland reclaimers’ eyes widened. Damn! How did this brat get six!? It was actually six! Zhao Yong, who had just offered a snake gallbladder to Yang Wei, was also very shocked. The Black Scale Snake was a level three Zero Realm demon beast, but it was very difficult to catch up to because it was highly toxic and agile. He was also very lucky to have encountered an injured Black Scale Snake. It took him quite a lot of effort to kill it. How did Lin Xuan do this? Wasn’t he still at the level one of the Zero Realm three days ago? Yang Wei’s eyes turned red. Six snake gallbladders! He did not eat all ten snake gallbladders. He also wanted this thing! “Lin Xuan… you still have a chance. Give me those six snake gallbladders and I’ll let you be my lackey! You don’t have to risk your life in the mystic realm anymore!” Yang Wei shouted. Lin Xuan shook his head firmly. What a joke. If he did not go to the mystic realm, there would be no way to explain how he obtained so many items. Yang Wei was furious. The strength of a level four Third Realm martial artist erupted, and in an instant, it was about to appear in front of Lin Xuan and grab his throat. However, Lu Luo’s body flashed and she blocked in front of Lin Xuan. She grabbed Yang Wei’s arm with one hand and threw him far away again as if he was trash. “From today onwards, this Lin… Lin Xuan will be working under me. Other than me, no one can touch him.” Lu Luo stared coldly at Yang Wei. Although she almost forgot Lin Xuan’s name, this did not reduce the threat in her voice. Yang Wei crawled up from the ground and squeezed out a word from the gap of his teeth, “Alright…” Lin Xuan quickly packed his things and followed Lu Luo to District C. Lu Luo led him to a dormitory. This dormitory had 12 beds. She pointed at an empty bed. “This is your new dormitory. According to the rules, you should rest for a day after being in the mystic realm for three days. I saw that there are already two bad records in your collar. According to the agreement, I should only have gotten rid of one, but you gave me six snake gallbladders. I’ll help you get rid of all of them.” Lu Luo picked up her scanner and swept her gaze over Lin Xuan’s collar. As she removed the “bad records”, she also looked at Lin Xuan’s level, attributes, and equipment. There was nothing special. “In addition, I’ll give you a chance to get an uncommon green equipment from the Equipment Department.” “Yang Wei will definitely be dissatisfied with you. In the future, go to District B less and be more careful when you encounter the wasteland reclaimers in District B.” Lu Luo reminded again. “Yes.” Lin Xuan hurriedly nodded. Although this overseer appeared very cold, the feeling he gave off was already much better than Yang Wei. “However, I don’t want to rest. I still want to go to the mystic realm,” Lin Xuan said. Lu Luo looked at him curiously and waved her hand. “It’s your problem if you want to rest. I won’t interfere, but you have to hand over ten pieces every three days. That’s the bottom line.” Lin Xuan nodded and watched as Lu Luo left. “With a different overseer, I can finally become stronger and not have to worry about being obstructed.” After resting for a moment, he directly went to the Equipment Department and received an equipment. The equipment he chose was an uncommon green shield. This shield would be displayed to others in the future. … Name: Desire Shield Level: Level Three Zero Realm Grade: Uncommon Green Equipment Requirement: Constitution 10 Effect: Constitution+1. Effect 2: The general coin obtained from battle+2%. … After obtaining the Desire Shield, Lin Xuan rushed through the door of light and headed straight for the Giant Rock Cave. Today was a rest day, and most of the wasteland reclaimer of the Germinal Organization were resting. Lin Xuan’s actions immediately attracted the attention of the others. “Damn, this guy doesn’t care about his life.” “Sigh, he’s also a bitter person. Let’s not say anything else.” “I hope he can come back alive. In such a high level mystic realm, it’s very easy to leave behind hidden injuries.” The wasteland reclaimers of District C looked at his back pitifully. The wasteland reclaimers in District B also saw Lin Xuan’s figure and turned around to report to Yang Wei. “You rushed to fawn on Lu Luo as soon as you arrived at District C, how despicable.” Yang Wei sneered, but everyone could hear the jealousy in his voice. “Boss, should we teach him a lesson?” asked a wasteland reclaimer. “Don’t do anything for the time being,” Yang Wei said indifferently, “If he gets beaten up as soon as he enters District C, others will definitely say that I’m not magnanimous.” The wasteland reclaimers hurriedly nodded in a flattering manner. When he heard them praise him with the words “benevolent, magnanimous,” and “noble”, Yang Wei was very happy. His ears even turned soft. Of course, the wasteland reclaimers were very open-minded. They knew that it was because Yang Wei was afraid of offending that cold-faced violent loli. … Ten days later. During this period of time, Lin Xuan completed his missions obediently. Every time, he would hand in one or two more items. This way, it wouldn’t be too conspicuous. Moreover, it would also make the Overseer happy. His level in the Germinal Organization had also increased from the previous one-star wasteland reclaimer to a two-star wasteland reclaimer. His treatment had improved greatly, and he was given 20 general coins every week. These things were naturally better than nothing to him. However, it was only equivalent to a fraction of his gains from his training. On the ninth floor of the Giant Rock Cave. This time, Lin Xuan did not stay at the safety station. Instead, he found a natural cave. Since he had been staying at the safety station, there were definitely people who could recognize him. This made him feel strange, and it even made him more suspicious. How did a wasteland reclaimer who always stayed at the safety station complete the mission given by the Germinal Organization? In these ten days, Lin Xuan had obtained a large number of general coins and had his consciousness space increase from level 2 to level 3. After upgrading to a level 3 consciousness space, he automatically unlocked the first forging table. The forging table could be used to forge equipment and runes. However, forging equipment required blueprints. Lin Xuan did not have any blueprints at the moment. [Current Area: Level 9 of the Giant Rock Cave (9 general coin / minute, 45 experience points / minute)] [The Gold Swallowing Lizard has been training for 5 hours and has reached the upper limit of its training time. You have received 2700 general coins, 13,500 experience points, 15 Zero Realm skill books, 26 Zero Realm equipment… Do you wish to collect?] “Yes.” A large number of items immediately appeared in his consciousness space. The two smelting tables immediately began to work, producing a large number of iron ingots, copper ingots, cloud iron ingots, mountain bronze ingots, In turn, this would produce white grade and green grade equipment essence. That’s right. Lin Xuan did not even care about uncommon green equipment anymore. All he wanted was equipment above green. “Eh, there’s a precious purple equipment blueprint?” Lin Xuan was immediately overjoyed. This was the first time he had obtained a blueprint. “Let me see. I need 50 cloud iron ingots, 35 mountain copper ingots, and three mithril ingots… I have all of them. I can forge them immediately.” Lin Xuan was overjoyed. He happened to have all the materials needed for this blueprint. The mithril ingots were refined from a mithril mine that only appeared below the seventh floor of the Giant Rock Cave and were relatively rare. If it was traded at a safe station, a single mithril ingot would fetch 1,000 general coins. After receiving the order, the forging table immediately began to forge. Clang! Clang! Clang! The furnace melted the metal and the hammer moved by itself. After being tempered a thousand times, a huge black and heavy shield with an uneven surface that was enough to protect the entire body came into view. … Name: Dragon Hunter Shield Level: Level nine Zero Realm Quality: Precious Purple Equipment Requirements: Constitution 20, Strength 18 Effect 1: Constitution+4, Constitution+5%. Effect 2: Physical Resistance+45%, Magic Resistance+25%, Lightning Resistance+40%, Energy Recovery Speed -10%. Effect 3: Any attack will reflect 50 True Damage and give the target a “severely injured” state for 5 seconds. (Note: In a heavily injured state, the target is unable to recover health naturally. The target can only recover through medicine, but the recovery effect will be – 50%.) Description: A huge shield specially made for hunting dragons. However, most of the time, it is used to deal with a certain nameless king. Thus, it has the name of Nameless Hunter Shield … Lin Xuan was overjoyed. With this huge shield, the sense of security immediately rose. He held the shield with both hands and tested it. He discovered that with his attribute points, he could use the Dragon Hunter Shield with one hand. “How powerful am I now? Why don’t I give the tenth floor a try?” Lin Xuan had already tried it once. With his strength, he could move freely on the ninth floor of the Giant Rock Cave. All the demon beasts there were unable to break through his defense. Now, he planned to go to the tenth floor. There were ten mystic realm kings on the tenth floor. Lin Xuan decided to choose a simple challenge first. He wore an evil ghost mask to block his face and arrived at the entrance to the tenth floor. However, he helplessly discovered that all the mystic realm kings were currently being challenged. These teams were challenging them at their caves. There was a special rule on the tenth floor of the mystic realm. When a team was challenging a mystic realm king, the other teams would be blocked by a special force. They had to wait for the previous team to complete the challenge, which was similar to the Boss Room in computer games. There was a queue in front of every cave. There were at least five teams lining up in front of every cave. This included the cave of the Fire Toad King, Flame Snake King, and Stone Lizard King… Only the Earth Dragon King’s cave was empty. Lin Xuan also heard those wasteland reclaimers in the queue talking about the team that was challenging the Earth Dragon King. “Which bold team dares to challenge the Earth Dragon King?” “Who else could it be? It’s Zhou Feng’s Cloud Shadow Team. They’ve long announced that they want to attack the Dragon King.” “No one has been able to successfully challenge it for half a year. To be honest, they’re a little arrogant for thinking that they can challenge it.” “The team that challenges the Earth Dragon King will either die or be injured. It will be difficult for everyone in the Cloud Shadow Team to survive later.” “It’s none of our business. That guy has a good father as a manager. Aren’t the other three wasteland reclaimers in the Cloud Shadow Team just playing along with him? It’s none of our business.” Zhou Feng? Lin Xuan recalled and had an impression. This person was also from the Germinal Organization, but he was not a wasteland reclaimer. Instead, he was the son of a manager. The hierarchy of the Germinal Organization was divided into high-level managers, mid-level overseers, and low-level wasteland reclaimers. The managers were definitely the big shots of the Germinal Organization. Their strength, money, and status were all extremely high. After sighing about the other party’s background, Lin Xuan did not think further. The Earth Dragon King was infamous outside. Lin Xuan did not know how powerful it was and did not want to directly challenge the Earth Dragon King. A few minutes later, the Fire Toad King’s cave throbbed, and a team walked out with injuries but happy expressions. Before Lin Xuan could walk over, another team that had been waiting rushed in. The surrounding martial artists did not manage to squeeze in and immediately cursed. Lin Xuan smacked his lips. He seemed to have realized something. He could not beat these people! It was just as he had expected. As soon as the current team finished attacking, those teams that were long prepared would rush in. Lin Xuan could not squeeze in at all. “Wait, let’s continue waiting…” he said helplessly. At this moment, an intense battle was being carried out in the Earth Dragon King’s cave. A team of four people consisting of shield bearer, swordsman, archer, and medic was challenging the Earth Dragon King. The Earth Dragon King’s ten-meter-long and eight-meter-tall huge body rampaged. To martial artists, it was simply like a small moving hill. Its thick skin was even more terrifying. When the bow and sword struck it, only single-digit damage was dealt. Even when those people used their skills, it would only be able to increase their damage output by a few folds. It was simply infuriating. Roar! The Earth Dragon King let out a deafening roar. The consecutive skills that the Archer was about to use were interrupted and he had to cover his ears. The Earth Dragon King took the opportunity to charge again. The martial artist holding the shield at the front of the team was directly sent flying far away. He spat out blood in the air and his chest collapsed. The Earth Dragon King raised its front foot high and stomped down fiercely. The swordsman beside him was sharp and agile. He grabbed the shield-wielding martial artist and rushed out. However, even so, the shield-wielding martial artist’s right foot was still stepped on by the Earth Dragon King, and it was turned into meat paste on the spot. “Damn, heal me! What, you can’t? Did you forget to bring back the magic potion again? I’ll kill you!” The swordsman berated in exasperation. “Brother Zhou, it’s not that I don’t have potions. I brought five large bottles of medicinal water and fifteen small bottles this time. I’ve used them all!” The medic at the back of the group who had been using his recovery skill all along had a sullen expression, feeling very aggrieved. “Damn…!” Brother Zhou cursed angrily. “Retreat, retreat, retreat. We can’t fight this Earth Dragon King!” He took out a smelly object from the storage compartment, threw it behind, and ran with the shield-bearer. The Earth Dragon King smelled this smelly thing and acted as if it was facing a great enemy. It no longer paid attention to the four martial artists and immediately attacked the smelly thing. Only then did the four of them escape and return to the ninth floor of the Giant Rock Cave. “Fortunately, there’s a pile of feces made from the ant queen’s excrement. Otherwise, we wouldn’t have been able to escape alive.” Zhou Ge sighed. That pile of shit was something formed by the excrement of the First Realm ant queen of the mystic realm demon ant nest. The wasteland reclaimers discovered that this thing had a certain effect on demon beasts below the Second Realm and could immediately divert their attention. That swordsman was Zhou Feng, and the other three were wasteland reclaimers from the Germinal Organization. Because of their similar personalities, they had gathered together and formed a team called Cloud Shadow Team, The ant queen excrement was given to him by his father. An ordinary martial artist would not be able to get this. “Little Liu’s injuries are too serious. We can only return to the safety station.” The medic fed the shield bearer a bottle of Blood Recovery Potion, but the latter was still in a coma. Zhou Feng nodded. “Let’s go back first. We’ll come back after his injuries recover. Don’t care what others say.” The three of them carried their shield bearer and walked out of the Earth Dragon King’s cave. Swish! Swish! Swish! A large number of wasteland reclaimers gathered over. Many of them had gloating smiles, but because of Zhou Feng’s status, they did not dare to say anything and only whispered secretly. “Are mystic realm kings that easy to challenge? Some people are too ambitious.” “All attributes+30%, and three precious purple skills. You’re really brave to challenge a mystic realm king like this.” “There’s someone there with a big shield. Perhaps you guys can form a team with that guy.” Zhou Feng’s face was ashen and he was furious. However, when he heard that there was another shield-bearer, he could not help but look over. A martial artist wearing a black demon mask and holding a big shield entered his sight. The huge exaggerated shield gave people a heavy sense of security just by looking at it. Zhou Feng could not help but be somewhat curious about this person. Martial artists without teams usually had high strength, high sensitivity, or high speed. This person clearly did not have a team, but he insisted on using a shield. Could it be that he planned to slowly grind the demon to death? Zhou Feng hesitated for a moment and asked, “Brother, are you willing to join us?” Lin Xuan decisively refused. What a joke. Why would he team up if he could farm alone? After joining the team, the spoils of war had to be divided. Lin Xuan did not want to divide them. He only wanted to keep them for himself. Moreover, aside from the Earth Dragon King, he was confident that he could kill the other mystic realm kings alone. It had to be known that he had eaten up all the items in the Giant Rock Cave that could permanently increase his attributes. All his skills were at level nine of Zero Realm and were all of precious purple grade. No martial artist had enough resources to do this. Being rejected, Zhou Feng could not stand it. However, he could not say anything. “Then forget it. If fate wills it, let’s work together next time.” Zhou Feng and the other two quickly disappeared with the heavily injured shield-bearer and rushed to the safety station. Lin Xuan was silent as he waited in line. Finally, it was his turn. At first, the other wasteland reclaimers thought that Lin Xuan was waiting for his teammates or had formed a random team. However, when they saw Lin Xuan walk into the cave alone, they were immediately thrown into chaos. “What the hell? Fighting a mystic realm king alone?” “…And he’s even a shield bearer. How does he plan to fight alone? Is he going to use his eyes to glare the enemy to death?” “Recently, there have been a lot of people that don’t know the immensity of the heavens and the earth. After the Cloud Shadow Team challenged the Earth Dragon King, another Shield Specialist came to challenge the mystic realm king alone.” After a short moment of surprise, the martial artists shook their heads and ignored him. Since he was destined to die, why should they care? When Lin Xuan entered the cave, there were still no demon beasts ahead. After a few minutes, an earthen yellow light enveloped him, and only then did a mystic realm king appear. The types of mystic realm kings were all random. While Lin Xuan was waiting, another team was fighting a Flame Snake King. After it was killed, it was replaced by a Stone Lizard King. Any martial artist who came to challenge the Stone Lizard King could see the information of the Stone Lizard King. … Name: Stone Lizard King Title: Mystic Realm King Level: Level nine Zero Realm Attributes: 29 Constitution, 25 Strength, 6 Spirit, 16 Agility Skill: Rock Thrust (Precious Purple), High Speed Movement, Petrification Skin, Low-level Regeneration … Lin Xuan looked at the attributes and immediately nodded in satisfaction. These attributes were much weaker than his. With just 25 points of strength, it was even unable to break through his physical defense. “Looks like an ordinary mystic realm king is only so-so.” Lin Xuan placed the Dragon Hunter Shield in front of him and allowed the Stone Lizard King to rampage. Bang bang bang! In the cave on the tenth floor, the sound of metal colliding sounded incessantly. However, the Stone Lizard King’s head was bleeding. Lin Xuan did not even move. Lin Xuan smiled and said, “Normal attacks can’t break through my defense. Use your skills.” As if sensing the contempt in the other party’s voice, the Stone Lizard King was furious. It accumulated magic power and used its strongest skill, Rock Thrust. Its head was instantly enveloped by a majestic earthen yellow light, and it was like a heavy and hard spear that stabbed fiercely at Lin Xuan. Clang! The Stone Lizard King was sent flying far away by the recoil. Its head was buzzing. Lin Xuan remained motionless, only losing a single digit of his health. However, his health recovery speed was very fast, and his health recovered fully. The Stone Lizard King’s move was completely useless to him. “It’s just that it’s a little slow. I still have to wait for a while.” Lin Xuan used the two active skills Iron Wall and Endless Life. He also had the two passive skills Steel Body and Thorn Body on him as he sat casually. The Stone Lizard King also seemed to be furious and wanted to use its head to smash the Dragon Hunter Shield. Every time it collided, the Dragon Hunter Shield would deal 50 reflective damage to the Stone Lizard King. At the same time, it would also cause the Stone Lizard King to be unable to recover for 5 seconds. In addition, there was the 20% reflective damage from Thorn Body. The Stone Lizard King stubbornly knocked for more than half an hour before finally wailing and collapsing to the ground. Its body quickly turned into points of light and dissipated, turning into rewards on the ground. They included general coins, experience points, skill books, equipment… Of course, there were also the most important advancement materials. … Name: Stone Lizard King’s Claw Level: Level nine Zero Realm Quality: Precious Purple Effect 1: Helps a martial artist advance from level nine Zero Realm to level one First Realm. Effect 2: After advancing, all attributes+1. Description: The Mystic Realm King Protection Association has expressed strong condemnation. Stop the atrocities of humans and save the mystic realm kings! … After killing the Stone Lizard King, he obtained a total of three sharp claws. Usually, the advancement materials that dropped were between one and five. The number of drops depended on luck. A Zero Realm martial artist needed at least one advancement material to advance to a First Realm martial artist. At most, five advancement materials could be used. If one racked their brains and could only obtain 1 advancement material to advance, all their attributes would only increase by 1 point after becoming a First Realm martial artist. If one used five advancement materials to advance, after becoming a First Realm martial artist, all of their attributes would increase by 5 points! This was a difference of 16 attribute points. Moreover, he had heard that the advancement materials dropped by experienced mystic realm kings would be even better. After advancing, the increase in all attributes would be even greater. However, Lin Xuan had never seen this before and was not sure. Outside Lin Xuan’s cave, there were four teams lining up. They could see the situation inside from the images that were displayed above the cave. Just now, the Stone Lizard King’s profile picture had always been there, indicating that the Stone Lizard King was still alive. A few seconds ago, the profile picture of the Stone Lizard King had disappeared, indicating that the Stone Lizard King had been killed. The four teams were somewhat dumbfounded. They had seen that big shield martial artist walk in alone! The martial artists queuing in front of the other caves also reacted and said in disbelief, “Damn? Did that guy kill the Stone Lizard King by himself?” “Am I dreaming? Can a big shield martial artist defeat a mystic realm king alone?” “Could it be a hidden big shot?” “Could this guy be an especially powerful lone wolf?” No matter how hard they racked their brains, they could not imagine how someone who used a shield could defeat a mystic realm king alone. “Wait… that guy’s not planning to come out. Is he going to kill another one?” After not seeing the big shield martial artist appear for a long time, the martial artists of the four teams cried out involuntarily. This time, they were even more confused. Was it not enough for him to solo a mystic realm king? Why did he have to do it again and again? “Under usual circumstances, a team of four will need to consume more than ten bottles of medicinal water to kill a mystic realm king. Moreover, the four of them would all have varying degrees of injuries, so it’s very difficult for them to keep killing,” an old-looking martial artist said solemnly. “This is really a big shot…” The other martial artists sighed. Lin Xuan did not have to wait for long before a new mystic realm king appeared in front of him. It was a huge purple mushroom. There was a hole in the mushroom head that was emitting purple gas. Big Mushroom King! The Big Mushroom King was not difficult to kill, but the purple poison gas that it spat out had an extremely negative effect. It could reduce one’s strength and agility. Moreover, the effects could even be superimposed. After being infected by the purple poisonous gas, one’s attacks would be ineffective for at least 5 minutes. As a result, the mushroom king became one of the mystic realm kings that many martial artists hated to challenge the most. The martial artists outside saw the Big Mushroom King’s huge profile picture appear. All of them swallowed a mouthful of saliva. “Our team has fought this before. It’s difficult to explain.” A team stood out and sighed. “My attributes have been reduced by three levels, and I couldn’t deal any damage at all. I was so angry!” “This Big Mushroom King is simply a nightmare for high-sensitivity and powerful martial artists. I personally think that the Earth Dragon King and the Big Mushroom King are two mystic realm kings that definitely shouldn’t be challenged!” “This big shot won’t be able to kill it alone. He’s about to come out.” The martial artists all sighed. At this moment, Lin Xuan had a nonchalant expression in the cave . What were Strength and Agility attributes? He had no need for them at all. Moreover, as he stood in the purple poison gas with the Dragon Hunter Shield, the speed at which he reflected the true damage was much faster than when he fought the Stone Lizard King previously! Fifteen minutes later, the Big Mushroom King’s life points were exhausted and it exploded into light. … Name: Big Mushroom King Level: Level nine Zero Realm Quality: Precious Purple Effect 1: Helps a martial artist advance from level nine Zero Realm to level one First Realm. Effect 2: After advancing, all attributes+1. Description: The experience points are free. One day, everyone will be fond of the Big Mushroom King … This time, he was lucky to have gotten four mushroom nozzles. With the three sharp claws from before, it was already enough. At this moment, there was a symbol of an arrow pointing up behind his level on the data panel, indicating that he could advance to the First Realm at any time. Moreover, he had to use five advancement materials to advance. However, he was not like most martial artists who risked their lives to obtain one. It had to be known that the others had to form a four-man team to challenge a mystic realm king. Even then, they might not even be able to succeed. Every time a mystic realm king was killed, there would be one to five advancement materials. With an average of three, a four-man team would usually be able to each get one. In that case, if they each wanted to obtain a total of five advancement materials, they would have to kill at least six mystic realm kings! Naturally, this number would not include the failed challenges. Some even died in the process of the challenge. It was precisely because of this that many martial artists obtained two or three advancement materials, they would quickly advance and not dare to delay. “I can advance to the First Realm at any time now… However, if a First Realm martial artist continues to kill mystic realm kings on the tenth floor of the Giant Rock Cave, there will be punishments. I will only be able to obtain 1 general coin and experience point. Moreover, my probability of getting various items will greatly decrease.” “Why don’t I challenge the Earth Dragon King before I advance? I heard that the experienced mystic realm kings might drop even rarer items.” Lin Xuan started to desire challenging the Earth Dragon King. Thinking of this, Lin Xuan strode out of the cave. As soon as he came out, he saw a large number of martial artists looking at him in shock. “?” Lin Xuan was puzzled. “Big Shot, you’re so impressive! You were actually able to kill multiple mystic realm kings all by yourself! Please accept my apologies!” A wasteland reclaimer said excitedly, “Big Shot, are you short of leg accessories? If there’s really no other way, I can even be your crotch accessory!” “Good brother, our Big Bird Rotation Team is lacking a reliable shieldman! Are you willing to join our team?” Admiration and recruitment sounded from everywhere. Among them, some of the praises even came from famous wasteland reclaimers teams. Lin Xuan waved his hand. It was impossible for him to cooperate. After all, he was the only one who could challenge such a difficult mystic realm king. Even after teaming up, all the hardships would be borne by him alone! Lin Xuan turned a corner and directly walked into the Earth Dragon King’s cave. Everyone was instantly petrified. “No, this… is…” a wasteland reclaimer stammered. Another wasteland reclaimer could not help but ask, “Did the big shot become arrogant after killing multiple mystic realm kings alone?” “I don’t understand, I really don’t understand.” At this moment, Lin Xuan was already standing in front of the Earth Dragon King. The latter was really like a moving mountain. Just one glance and it already gave off an extremely powerful suppression. Compared to it, the Stone Lizard King was like a little brother. Lin Xuan hurriedly looked at the latter’s data panel. … Name: Earth Dragon King Title: Experienced Mystic Realm King Level: Level nine Zero Realm Attributes: 39 Constitution, 28 Strength, 9 Mind, 20 Agility Skill: Violent Rush (Precious Purple), Magic Armor (Precious Purple), Advanced Regeneration (Precious Purple), Rock Breathing, Triple Strike … Seeing these attributes, Lin Xuan heaved a sigh of relief. This was good! However, he still could not help but say, “As expected of an experienced mystic realm king. These attributes are one level higher than the Stone Lizard King’s attributes.” “And these three precious purple skills are all very impressive. No wonder everyone says that the Earth Dragon King is a boss with high attack, defense, and HP. It is simply impossible to beat.” “But…” Lin Xuan patted his Dragon Hunter Shield and smiled. “You’re countered by my Dragon Hunter Shield!” The Earth Dragon King snorted and looked down at this human martial artist in disdain. The difference between Lin Xuan and it was like the difference between an ant and an elephant. For half a year, countless insignificant humans had wanted to challenge it, but they were all defeated and fled in a panic. Almost a third of the unlucky ones died under the claws and were buried in its stomach. This human martial artist was even more ridiculous. He actually came alone to challenge. The four of the members from the other teams could not do anything to it. Did this guy come alone to feed it? The Earth Dragon King raised its head and directly spat out a rock! Bang! The earthen yellow light smashed into the Dragon Hunter Shield. Lin Xuan did not move at all, and the recoil was completely dispelled. On the other hand, the Earth Dragon King had suffered many true damage injuries. The Earth Dragon King was shocked and furious. It had actually been injured! It roared and rushed over. It charged violently! Seeing this, Lin Xuan used Iron Wall. The huge body smashed fiercely into the Dragon Hunter Shield, but was directly reflected back. Lin Xuan still did not move. After forcefully receiving the Earth Dragon King’s strongest attack without being injured at all, Lin Xuan finally relaxed. He could have fun! Bang bang bang! The Earth Dragon King stubbornly attacked again and again and was blasted away again and again. The Earth Dragon King successfully killed itself after suffering 45 minutes of continuous collisions and reflective damage. Its small mountain-like body fell with a wail, and then it turned into light that filled the sky and dissipated. “You received 1,000 general coins and 5,000 experience points.” “You have obtained the rare blue skill [Magic Armor].” “You obtained the precious purple blueprint [Earth Dragon King’s Hammer Shield Blueprint].” “You obtained five peerless golden advancement materials [Earth Dragon King’s War Dragon Scale].” The skill [Magic Armor] could help him reduce his magic damage. The attributes of [Earth Dragon King’s Hammer Shield Blueprint] could only be seen after forging. As for the final peerless golden advancement material, his eyes immediately lit up after seeing it. … Name: Experienced Dragon Scale of the Earth Dragon King Level: Level nine Zero Realm Quality: Peerless Golden Effect 1: Helps a martial artist advance from level nine Zero Realm to level one First Realm. Effect 2: After advancing, all attributes+3. Effect 3: Obtains the passive skill [Experienced Mystic Realm King Might]. The target’s highest attribute is -8%. Description: Only the strongest martial artist is worthy of obtaining the Experienced Dragon Scale! … Lin Xuan’s eyes widened. The upgrade material dropped by the Earth Dragon King even gave him a free passive skill! Moreover, it was such a practical passive skill! Most importantly, he had gotten five advancement materials! He could directly use them to advance! “My luck is really good today. I’ve already gotten numb to the feeling of winning.” Lin Xuan grinned. “Let’s go back and advance to the First Realm!” He quickly walked out of the cave and passed by the dumbfounded martial artists. Then, he found a quiet place to change his equipment. After changing into his regular equipment, he returned to the Germinal Organization. At the same time, at the ninth floor’s safety station. Zhou Feng and the other two hurriedly placed their shield-bearer on the medical table. The staff in charge of the medical treatment immediately used their medical skills. These medics were mostly physicians in the past. After the global digitization, they directly obtained rare blue grade medical skills. Some big shots in the medical field could even directly obtain precious purple grade medical skills. If nothing unexpected happened, these people would become logisticians at the safety station. They did not learn combat skills and were only in charge of saving the injured. Of course, there were also logisticians who could not stand the loneliness and wanted to go out and fight. However, they knew their combat strength very well. They would all join the team and not enter the mystic realm alone. Seeing the various negative statuses on the shield-bearer slowly disappear and his health points slowly increase, Zhou Feng and the other two finally heaved a sigh of relief. They arrived at the food area and bought some food before sitting down to wait. As they chatted, they talked about the Earth Dragon King again. Zhou Feng was still unwilling and immediately suggested another strategy. “The Earth Dragon King’s physical resistance and magic resistance are very high, but its resistance to other elements is not high. We can try to use poison!” The team’s archer said helplessly, “Brother Zhou, I’m a pure physical archer and don’t have any elemental skills. You think too highly of me.” The medic also sighed. “I did learn a poison-related skill, but…” Zhou Feng’s eyes lit up. “What is it?” The medic coughed lightly. “I only know poison removal” Zhou Feng: “You…!” “Brother Zhou, do you really want to challenge the Earth Dragon King that much? We were lucky to escape this time. What about next time? Next time…” the medic advised earnestly. However, before he could finish, the radio in the safety station sounded. “The experienced mystic realm king, the Earth Dragon King, has been killed! The experienced mystic realm king, the Earth Dragon King, has been killed!” Ordinary mystic realm kings were killed every day and would not be broadcasted. However, the experienced mystic realm kings would not be killed for at least half a year. Every time they were killed, the news would be immediately broadcasted by the safety station. All the martial artists in the safety station were shocked. “Which team killed the Earth Dragon King? Awesome!” “Let’s go, let’s quickly go to the tenth floor to see who these big shots are!” “Strange, I don’t think the teams I am familiar with are challenging the Dragon King today.” “The last experienced mystic realm king seemed to have been killed three years ago. I didn’t expect us to be able to witness history today.” “Let’s go and take a look.” Hearing this broadcast, the hands of Zhou Feng and the others who were drinking immediately froze in the air. The expression on the medic’s face froze. “Next time… There won’t be a next time.” The archer stammered, “Brother Zhou, the Earth Dragon King is gone.” Zhou Feng did not know whether to laugh or cry. “I know, I know.” “However, I’m very curious. Which team did it? Was it the Wind-Chasing Team, the Flying Peng Team, or the Big Bird Rotation Team?” “Let’s go and take a look too. Perhaps the team that killed the Earth Dragon King is still there,” the medic hurriedly said. “Alright, you guard Little Liu here. The two of us will go and take a look.” Zhou Feng instructed the archer to stay behind to observe the shield-bearer’s situation and rushed to the tenth floor with the medic. When they arrived, a large group of noisy martial artists had already gathered. Everyone wanted to see what the team that had killed the experienced mystic realm king looked like. Zhou Feng subconsciously swept his gaze over the Earth Dragon King’s cave. The big picture above had already changed from the Earth Dragon King to a Fire Beetle King. “Half a year… looks like it really did get killed.” He sighed. Killing an experienced mystic realm king had always been his dream. This was the honor of a martial artist. He did not expect others to have done it before him. However, after looking around, he did not see any signs of that team. “Hey, hey, hey, where are the big shots? I want to see.” “Stop pushing, stop pushing. My large chest muscles are about to be squeezed into steel plates.” “…Large chest muscles? Yeah right!” After looking around, he only saw a group of headless flies. Zhou Feng was very puzzled. “Stop looking. The big shot has already left!” an arrogant man with chest hair suddenly jumped onto a rock and shouted. Zhou Feng was stunned. Wasn’t this person the captain of the Big Bird Rotation Team? “The one who killed the experienced mystic realm king was not the Wind-Chasing Team, the Flying Peng Team, or our Big Bird Rotation Team. Instead, it was a martial artist wearing an evil spirit mask and holding a black shield in one hand!” The leader of the Big Bird Rotation Team shouted. All the martial artists who had gathered after hearing the broadcast fell into a daze. What the hell? He had killed an experienced mystic realm king by himself? Zhou Feng’s eyes widened. He suddenly recalled something! It was the martial artist who had rejected him! The medic gasped. “Brother Zhou, no wonder he rejected us. He’s actually so powerful!” Zhou Feng’s mouth was filled with bitterness. Why was the difference between people so huge? The four of them challenged the Earth Dragon King and were even severely injured. They had to rely on the Ant Queen’s feces to escape. The other party could even defeat the Dragon King alone with a huge shield! This realization was indeed numbing. The medic suddenly said, “Brother Zhou, is that shield martial artist a wasteland reclaimer? If he is, you can recruit him into our team!” Zhou Feng clapped his hands. “That’s right!” Items dropped by mystic realm kings were not important. However, the items dropped by experienced mystic realm kings were too precious and had to be handed over. It was impossible for them to be hidden. However, after asking his father to use his managerial status to investigate, Zhou Feng discovered that not a single wasteland reclaimer in the Germinal Organization had handed in the items of the Earth Dragon King, and there were no records of the items being stored in anyone’s collars. Then, there was only one answer. This shield warrior was not a wasteland reclaimer of the Germinal Organization… but a lone wolf! Zhou Feng was even more impressed. This person did not need the information and combat techniques provided by the Germinal Organization to become so powerful! Zhou Feng secretly swore in his heart that he would also become a figure like a big shield martial artist! At the same time, the “big shot” they were talking about had already returned to the Germinal Organization and his 12-man dormitory. During this period, his roommates were constantly being replaced. Most of them were unfamiliar faces and acquaintances. He nodded at these unfamiliar roommates and returned to his bed to take a nap. In fact, he had already focused his attention and opened the data panel. “Advance!” Lin Xuan tapped the arrow symbol next to his level status. In an instant, the five Earth Dragon Kings’ dragon scales transformed into light and were absorbed by his body. A force seemed to surge out of nowhere and quickly spread throughout his limbs. Lin Xuan looked at his own attributes and discovered that his entire attributes had increased by 15 points. In other words, his total attributes had increased by 60 points! The difference between him and the other martial artists had instantly widened! His level and all his skills could continue to increase. At most, he could increase the level to level nine First Realm, and his equipment could also be increased to level nine First Realm. His current attributes were as follows. … Name: Lin Xuan Level: Level one First Realm Experience: 0 / 10000 Attributes: 51 Constitution, 32 Strength, 33 Spirit, 28 Agility Skill: Weaken, Iron Wall, Sneak Attack, Oily Feet, Endless Life, Thorn Body, Steel Body, Endless Life, Magic Armor, Experienced Mystic Realm King Might … Equipment: Wasteland Reclaimer Collar, Iron Dagger, Barbaric Bull Breastplate, Protection Ring, Desire Shield Item: 1948 General Coin, 8 pieces of flavored compressed biscuits, 5 cans of Coca-Cola… … These were the only items in the storage compartment. He placed more items in the consciousness space. Seeing the huge increase in the data panel, Lin Xuan nodded repeatedly. Then, he saw a notification. “By the way, I also obtained a blueprint.” Lin Xuan looked into his consciousness space and used the blueprint on the forging table. The furnace melted the metal and the hammer forged the steel. After hundreds or thousands of tempering, a new equipment appeared. It was 1.5 meters tall. When placed beside the Dragon Hunter Shield, they simply looked like two doors. As the name suggested, this equipment could be switched seamlessly from shield to hammer. The appearance of the huge hammer was rather similar to the Earth Dragon King’s tail. It was also an extremely thick earthen-yellow color. At the same time, the data of the Earth Dragon King Hammer Shield … Name: Earth Dragon King Hammer Shield Level: Level nine Zero Realm Quality: Precious Purple Equipment Requirements: Constitution: 18, Strength: 25 Effect 1: Strength+5, Constitution+5. Effect 2: When in shield form, physical resistance+35%, magic resistance+40%, Energy Recovery Speed -10%. Effect 3: When in hammer form, physical damage+40%, Energy Recovery Speed -15%. Effect: -10% damage from any enemy within 10 meters. Description: The Earth Dragon King likes to use its tail to smash his overconfident enemies into meat sauce. After killing 10 targets, the effect will increase by 4. … Lin Xuan was pleasantly surprised. Damn, this equipment even had a small mission? At night, in the dorms of District C. In a flash, another half a month passed. During this period, a legend about someone called the “Shield Ghost” suddenly spread in the Giant Rock Cave. It was a powerful martial artist wearing an evil ghost mask and holding a big shield in one hand. He had killed two mystic realm kings in a row alone. In the end, he still felt that it was not enough and even killed the experienced mystic realm king. In the end, he waved his hand and left coolly. Moreover, many wasteland reclaimers guessed that this person was probably a lone wolf and not a wasteland reclaimer from the Germinal Organization. This was because if Shield Ghost was a wasteland reclaimer, the items obtained from killing the Earth Dragon King would definitely be handed over. The Germinal Organization would also reward him internally and inform all the wasteland reclaimers to learn from him. However, so far, nothing of the sort had happened. Countless martial artists wanted to know the true identity of Shield Ghost. The Flying Peng Team, the Wind-Chasing Team, and the Big Bird Rotation Team had all posted announcements at the safety station, hoping that this Shield Ghost would join their team. The captain of the Cloud Shadow Team and the son of the manager, Zhou Feng, even took out 100,000 general coins to reward Shield Ghost, hoping to talk to this powerful martial artist in person. However, Shield Ghost was never found, and no one knew where he was. However, this reward had always existed, and it had become the topic of discussion for many wasteland reclaimers. The nickname they had spread by word of mouth also reached Lin Xuan’s ears. He was immediately at a loss whether to laugh or cry. What a stupid name! Lin Xuan sat on the bed and smiled helplessly. “Let’s think about how to obtain experience first.” During this period of time, through the training of the Gold Swallowing Lizard, he had successfully increased his Weaken from precious purple to peerless golden. The effect of Weaken also changed drastically after it was upgraded to the peerless golden level. … Name: Weaken Level: Level one First Realm Quality: Peerless Golden Learning Requirement: Spirit 7 Effect: It does not consume magic power to reduce one’s level and attributes. It also reduces one’s sense of existence. Its duration is limitless and can be activated at will. … Lin Xuan smiled and said, “Ordinary martial artists rarely waste their energy on skill books, much less invest experience points to level up. Even if they know the effect of this skill, very few people would specialize in it.” Other than that, Endless Life, Iron Wall, Thorn Body, Steel Body, Observer, and Concealment Technique had also advanced to the peerless gold grade after Lin Xuan collected enough skill books. Then, he also increased his martial artist level from level one to level four First Realm. Then, he used up all his experience. “As a First Realm martial artist, I need at least 10,000 units each time I want to level up. I’m consuming my points too quickly.” Lin Xuan required 10,000 experience points to get to level two, 20,000 experience points to get to level three, and 30,000 experience points to get to level four. The Gold Swallowing Lizard kept hacking on the ninth floor of the Giant Rock Cave, but it was still unable to obtain enough experience. At this moment, an urgent alarm sounded from within the Germinal Organization. “Warning! Demon beasts have surged out of the first floor’s Mystic Realm Demon Ant Nest and have currently occupied the hall. Some of the demon beasts have rushed out of the hall and are attacking District B and C!” “All wasteland reclaimers and Overseers in District A. B, C, and D, please resist the attack of the demon beasts immediately!” Lin Xuan’s face flashed with surprise. These demon beasts had always reproduced a large number of offspring, causing them to constantly surge out of the door of light and attack various parts of the Earth. It was not like this had never happened before. However, Lin Xuan had never encountered such a thing. After being slightly surprised, Lin Xuan seemed to have thought of something and was suddenly overjoyed. Wasn’t this Demon Ant Nest attack on the Germinal Organization the perfect opportunity for his avatar to train? Then, he heard his superior, District C Overseer Lu Luo, give a calm order. “All wasteland reclaimers in District C, come out and face the enemy!” Crash. The wasteland reclaimers in Lin Xuan’s dorm were originally sleeping soundly. When they heard the alarm, they immediately woke up, put on their clothes, and rushed outside. Lin Xuan also made the same expression as he mixed into the crowd and ran out of the dormitory. As soon as he came out, he saw a large group of huge black ants crazily attacking a cold-faced loli in a small suit. Every ant was the size of a calf, and their sharp jaws flickered with a cold light. They could cut off an ordinary person’s limbs with a single bite. Lu Luo still looked 13 or 14 years old, but the aura on her body was even stronger. She had probably eaten many items that permanently increased her attributes. Lu Luo’s back was facing them as she waved a huge sickle in one hand. The sickle emitted a dense death aura. Just looking at it made one feel as if they were trapped. With every swing of the sickle, a large number of black ants would be cut into two. The black ants were unable to resist at all and their body seemed as weak as tofu. However, Lin Xuan knew that these ants were called Steel Ants. They were a type of demon beast with extremely high defensive strength in the Demon Ant Nest. The attacks of the other First Realm martial artists landed on their bodies, probably only able to cause a few light injuries. Lu Luo did not turn around. Instead, she waved the huge sickle and spoke calmly. “Whoever performs well in this battle against the demon beasts will be directly promoted to a higher level in the organization. Moreover, they will be rewarded with a blue equipment or a blue skill book.” “Did you hear that?!” Lu Luo shouted. The wasteland reclaimers were originally not very energetic. After all, what did fighting the demon beasts have to do with them? However, when they heard this, their eyes immediately lit up. There was a reward! Lin Xuan nodded slightly. He did not need any rare blue equipment or rare blue skill books. What he needed was to increase his level in the organization. After more than half a month of advancement, he was already a three-star wasteland reclaimer. As long as he advanced further and became a four-star wasteland reclaimer, he would be able to enjoy a single dormitory without having to live with others. “Let the battle begin. First Realm martial artists, you will deal with First Realm demon beasts. Zero Realm martial artists, you will team up and deal with a single demon beast together. I’ll deal with the stronger First Realm demon beasts.” With that said, Lu Luo rushed into the ant swarm with the huge sickle in hand. The huge sickle waved, instantly killing a path of blood. No matter how many First Realm Steel Ants there were, they could not stop the footsteps of a Fourth Realm martial artist. Lin Xuan looked at the corpses on the ground, deep in thought. After he advanced to the First Realm, he obtained a second avatar slot, but he had never used it. This was because even if he used it, he would only be able to possess the demon beasts of the Giant Rock Cave. No matter how hard he tried, the experience points he obtained could no longer keep up with the speed of consumption. He hoped to Possess a First Realm demon beast and let it train in the Demon Ant Nest. In this way, the first avatar, the Gold Swallowing Lizard, could focus on obtaining various minerals in the Giant Rock Cave. This second avatar could obtain experience points in the Demon Ant Nest to facilitate his rapid growth. [Dead target detected, analysis in progress…] [Steel Worker Ant, a First Realm Demon Beast. Attributes: Constitution 23, Strength 17, Agility 9, Spirit 8. Skills: Gathering, Cut, Steel Armor.] [Cause of death: Split into two by a giant sickle.] [Currently, you have an extra avatar slot. Do you want to take over the body of the Steel Worker Ant and use it as a training avatar?] [Remarks: This dead target will immediately be revived with full health.] Lin Xuan pondered for a moment and shook his head slightly. He could not get a new avatar right now. Lu Luo was nearby. After this Steel Worker Ant was possessed and revived, it would be casually killed by Lu Luo. Moreover, Lin Xuan knew that the worker ants were only at the bottom of the food chain of the Demon Ant Nest. There were also soldier ants, breeding ants, and the ant queen. The worker ants were too weak. If it accidentally died, he would have no choice but to possess another avatar. At that time, things would be difficult. After all, he had chanced upon this demon invasion by luck. He did not know when the next time would be. Soon, the worker ants in the corridor were all killed. The wasteland reclaimers in District C followed Lu Luo to the hall. The situation in the hall became even worse. Many wasteland reclaimers had already gathered here, forming a defensive line to resist the demon beasts. The overseers of the other districts also dealt with the stronger demon beasts like Lu Luo and left the weaker ones to the wasteland reclaimers. Lin Xuan immediately saw the Overseer of District B, Yang Wei. He was different from the other overseers. He did not move at all, as if this matter had nothing to do with him. The wasteland reclaimers in District B were dying, but he pretended not to see it. Lin Xuan shook his head. Fortunately, he had left District B, or else he might not have been able to resist his explosive temper and would have grabbed Yang Wei and beaten him up. Lin Xuan swept his gaze around and discovered that the people in the hall were all Steel Soldier Ants. Other than Steel Soldier Ants, there were even bigger Steel Soldier Ants with sharper double jaws. These Steel Soldier Ants were at least level three First Realm. Just now, a huge Steel Soldier Ant had taken the opportunity to bite a wasteland reclaimer. The giant jaw bit him into two. The unlucky wasteland reclaimer died in an extremely tragic manner. “Kill! If you want to obtain a reward, work hard and kill!” Lu Luo shouted. Under the incentive of the rewards, the wasteland reclaimers in District C and the wasteland reclaimers in the other districts were clearly different. All of them rushed forward one by one. The other wasteland reclaimers did the bare minimum and did not contribute as much as possible, afraid that they would fall into danger. Lu Luo looked very cold, but when her subordinates were in danger, she would save them in time. Then, she shouted with a cold expression, “Retreat if you don’t have the strength!” After dozens of minutes, the wasteland reclaimers in District C were at most severely injured. In comparison, many more wasteland reclaimers in the other districts had died. On the surface, Lin Xuan was also killing Demon Ants. He also took the opportunity to work with the other wasteland reclaimers to kill many worker ants and soldier ants. He even received praise from Lu Luo. In fact, he was busy scanning the many soldier ants, choosing the one with the best attributes. A few minutes later, he found the soldier ant with the best attributes, but it was alive. “I can’t kill it myself. I have to rely on others…” Lin Xuan stared at Lu Luo’s back as she waved the huge sickle around, and a plan appeared in his mind. Lin Xuan began to move. His footsteps were very light and his movements were very small. Ordinary people could not tell. After a short walk, he was closer to Lu Luo. If he was in danger, Lu Luo could save him immediately. Lu Luo’s behavior just now made him realize that this overseer was not as cold-blooded as the other overseers. She looked cold on the surface, but she was actually quite protective. Lin Xuan began to wait for the opportunity. He watched as wave after wave of Steel Ants were killed and were about to be sent to the door of light. At this moment, the opportunity arrived. There was a wasteland reclaimer beside Lin Xuan who was standing too close to the front. At this moment, he was killing to his heart’s content and was gradually separating from the main group of wasteland reclaimers. The Steel Soldier Ant that had used its huge jaw to consecutively cut down multiple wasteland reclaimers approached quickly. It was the one with the highest attributes Lin Xuan had seen! Hiss! Hiss! The Steel Soldier Ant pounced over like a bullet, and the huge jaw was about to cut the wasteland reclaimer in half. The wasteland reclaimer did not realize that he was about to die. The surrounding wasteland reclaimers gasped and shouted, “Get out of the way!” Lin Xuan’s movements were even faster. He resolutely pushed away this wasteland reclaimer. “Be careful!” His expression and actions were impeccable. He seemed as if he was doing it subconsciously and instinctively. Thump. The wasteland reclaimer was pushed away by Lin Xuan and escaped from the attack range of the Steel Soldier Ant’s huge jaw. In his place was Lin Xuan. Lin Xuan made a frightened expression and subconsciously raised his arm to block. Some of the surrounding wasteland reclaimers had already begun to sigh and feel pity. Some people could not bear to look anymore and covered their eyes. District B overseer, Yang Wei, also noticed this scene. He was first stunned before laughing coldly, “Foolish, in order to save others, you lost your life…” Before he could finish speaking, the Steel Soldier Ant was hit by the huge sickle and broke into two. The huge kinetic energy even sent the two halves of the Steel Soldier Ant flying, almost approaching the door of light. “If you don’t have the ability, don’t bother saving other people!” Lu Luo glared at Lin Xuan, but her eyes revealed a hint of admiration. Most wasteland reclaimers were the type who would rather let others die than to risk their own. However, this Lin… what was his name again? He was quite special. Lin Xuan hurriedly crawled up and hid behind Lu Luo, his face filled with fear. “Thank you, Sister Lu! Heavens, I actually survived!” In that instant just now, he had already quickly touched the Steel Soldier Ant’s corpse and successfully possessed it. The wasteland reclaimer who had survived because of Lin Xuan’s push was crying as he looked at Lin Xuan gratefully. “Little brother, I don’t even know you, but you’re actually willing to save me. I’m really touched!” Lin Xuan scratched his head. “Big Brother, I only reacted subconsciously. I felt that I couldn’t just watch you die.” The wasteland reclaimers in District C were happy and harmonious. Yang Wei, who was not far away, felt like he had phlegm stuck in his neck and was unable to speak. “Damn, he survived?!” Yang Wei cursed. “Oh?” Lu Luo looked up. The Steel Soldier Ant that she had slashed into two actually pieced itself together and rushed into the door of light like a black lightning! “Strange, it should have been killed by me.” Lu Luo frowned. “Am I seeing things? Or did the sickle just now not kill it completely?” It was common sense that demon beasts would die if they were killed. After careful consideration, Lu Luo believed that her attack just now was simply not powerful enough to instantly kill the other party. Without any more soldier ants, the remaining Steel Worker Ants were unable to resist the ferocious attack of a large group of wasteland reclaimers. Some died and some escaped. After leaving behind a large number of corpses, they completely escaped back into the door of light. Lu Luo pointed at a few wasteland reclaimers and said, “You, you, the few of you did well. You’ve all improved your status one star. If you want equipment or skill books, choose yourselves.” When her white finger swept past Lin Xuan, she also pointed at him. Although Lin Xuan’s performance was inferior to the stronger wasteland reclaimers, Lu Luo still had a good impression of him for sacrificing his life to save another. Lu Luo waved her hand and left alone, returning to her single dormitory. “Clean the battlefield. Go and rest after you’re done. I’ll give you the rewards tomorrow.” Lin Xuan and the wasteland reclaimers in District C cleaned up the chaotic environment and then returned to their beds. The others quickly fell asleep due to exhaustion. Lin Xuan also looked like he was sleeping on his back, but in fact, he was very energetic and had been looking at the Steel Soldier Ant’s point of view. Now, he had three point of view. One was his main body, the other was the Gold Swallowing Lizard, and the other was the Steel Soldier Ant. Lin Xuan felt that looking at the point of view of his training avatar felt like he was watching a movie. For example, now, the Steel Soldier Ant was currently following the winding path into the ant nest. All the Steel Soldier Ants it encountered along the way and the Steel Soldier Ants that were smaller than him would touch it with their antennas to express their reverence. A few minutes later, the Steel Soldier Ant led the other soldier ants to attack other ant nests and began to fight the other Demon Ants in another Demon Ant Nest. That’s right. There were more than one type of Demon Ant in the Demon Ant Nest. These few different Demon Ants fought each other to the death every day, wishing to completely destroy the other party. Lin Xuan looked at it with interest and fell asleep. After waking up, he hurriedly checked his gains from his avatar’s training. [Current Area: Demon Ant Nest—Red Fire Ant Nest’s outer layer (50 general coins per minute, 250 experience points per minute)] [Steel Soldier Ant has been training for 8 hours and has obtained 24,000 general coins, 120,000 experience points, 4 Flame Flowers, 6 fluorescent mushrooms, 9 First Realm skill books, 14 First Realm equipment, 4 First Realm runes… Do you wish to collect?] Lin Xuan muttered the word “collect”. Splash. A large number of items appeared in the consciousness space. Among the nine Skill Books, four were [Basic Fire Resistance] and five were [Inferior Fireball]. Flame flowers were a specialty of the Red Fire Ant Nest and could permanently increase fire damage by 1%. Fluorescent mushrooms were a specialty of the Steel Ant Nest’s control area. They could permanently increase the recovery speed of 1%. These two items were similar to the Black Scaled Snake Gall and Soul Nurturing Flower in the Giant Rock Cave. One could only consume a maximum of 10. Moreover, they were useless after advancing to the Fourth Realm. Lin Xuan was very satisfied. He directly used these items, increasing the damage of flames by a total of 4%. He also increased his health regeneration by 6%. Although he could not use flames for the time being, it was still better than nothing. As for runes, they were a special item that could be embedded in equipment to obtain new attachments. Runes could be refined and broken down into rune fragments. After smelting an ordinary white rune, one could obtain 10 rune fragments. However, to forge an ordinary white rune, one needed 20 rune fragments. After smelting uncommon green runes, one could obtain 20 rune fragments. Similarly, forging uncommon green runes required 40 rune fragments. After smelting rare blue, precious purple, and peerless golden runes, one could obtain 50, 150, and 500 rune fragments respectively. To forge them again, one would need 100, 300, and 1,000 rune fragments respectively. Smelting and forging repeatedly would only cause the number of rune fragments to decrease. Both processes required the help of a rune blacksmith. Runes could be embedded in equipment to increase the equipment attachments. Of course, the embedding work also had to be done by a rune blacksmith. However, Lin Xuan did not need a rune blacksmith because he had a consciousness space. [Consciousness Space: Level 3] Capacity: 40 cubic meters [Smelting Table: Table 1 (currently smelting ores), Table 2 (currently smelting equipment), Table 3 (requires 10,000 general coins to unlock)] [Forging table: Forging Table 1 (Unused), Forging Table 2 (requires 10,000 general coins to unlock), Forging Table 3 (requires 50,000 general coins to unlock)] 10,000 general coins was nothing to Lin Xuan. He directly unlocked Smelting Table 3 and Forging Table 2, which were specially used to smelt runes and forge runes. “Smelting Table 3 has been set to smelt runes below the peerless golden grade.” “Forging table 2 has been set to only be used to forge peerless golden grade runes.” After setting up these traps, Lin Xuan nodded in satisfaction. He did not need any ordinary white, green, blue, or purple runes. Since he could create peerless golden runes, he would make those. After all, those were the best! The next day, Lu Luo arrived at District C and gave out rewards to those who had performed well in the battle against the Demon Ants last night. The big brother who had been saved by Lin Xuan was called Sun Zhiguo and had also received a reward. As for Lin Xuan, his level in the Germinal Organization had increased from a three-star wasteland reclaimer to a four-star wasteland reclaimer. He could leave the 12-man dormitory and choose a small one-man dormitory. Of course, this small dormitory was pitifully small like a prison cell, only ten square meters. If he wanted to change to a bigger dormitory, he would have to continue increasing his star level. In the blink of an eye, another half a month passed. During this period of time, the Steel Ant had been crazily attacking the Red Fire Ant, the Purple Thunder Ant, the Poison Water Ant, and the Frost Ant. Because of this, Lin Xuan’s training avatar had also obtained a large number of attribute items and skill books. This was especially true for the skill books. Skill books that could be dropped from the worker ants, soldier ants, and reproduction ants had all already appeared. Now, Lin Xuan kept getting the same ones. The Red Fire Ants dropped [Basic Fire Resistance] and [Inferior Fireball]. The Purple Thunder Ants dropped [Basic Lightning Resistance] and [Lightning Chain]. The Poison Water Ants dropped [Basic Poison Resistance] and [Acid Ball]. The Frost Ants dropped [Basic Ice Resistance] and [Icicle Technique]. Lin Xuan had already obtained multiple passive skills that increased elemental resistance as well as a large number of elemental spells. However, his spirit was not too high, and these elemental spells were destined to be useless. On the surface, Lin Xuan’s cultivation had also slowly grown to level six First Realm. Among the many wasteland reclaimers in District C, he could be considered as one of the stronger ones. On this day, he was about to enter the mystic realm under normal circumstances when he suddenly saw a notification appear in front of him. [News from Giant Rock Cave: Due to the influence of the Earth Vein Tide, the Rock Belly Fruit and Soul Nurturing Flower will grow faster for the next 72 hours.] Lin Xuan was stunned. Earth Vein Tide? He had heard that this kind of thing only happened once in seven or eight years, but he had actually encountered it? Could it be that because of his legendary protagonist body, he was always able to encounter such a rare event? At the same time, a radio suddenly sounded in the hall. “An Earth Vein Tide has appeared in the Giant Rock Cave, and various plants are growing faster. Manager Number One has ordered that each district must at least over 300 attribute-increasing items for this mystic realm mission.” “In this mystic realm mission, the district that hands in the most items will receive a reward. Each wasteland reclaimer in that district will receive 10,000 general coins. The overseer will also receive an additional 150,000 general coins and can also choose two precious purple items.” “Those who fail to meet the quota for this mystic realm mission will be severely punished. All wasteland reclaimers will not receive any general coins for the next month. Everyone’s star level will decrease by one level, and the overseer will be punished severely!” Lin Xuan was shocked when he heard this. Looks like the manager was planning to take advantage of this rare Earth Vein Tide to accumulate a large number of items to increase his attributes. This reward and punishment was clearly forcing the wasteland reclaimers to work quickly and not slack off. In this way, it was also possible for the wasteland reclaimers to fight each other in various areas. However, Lin Xuan smiled as he looked at the more than 600 Rock Belly Fruits and Soul Nurturing Flowers in his consciousness space. The overseers’ eyes also lit up. Two precious purple items! These were good items! Lu Luo also took a few deep breaths before calming down. She also needed these two precious purple items! Lu Luo waved her hand and watched them pass the door of light. “Do your best to complete the mission. Don’t disappoint me.” Lin Xuan stepped through the door of light and arrived at the Giant Rock Cave. After circling around, he arrived at a cave on the sixth floor of the Giant Rock Cave. This cave was specially made for him by the Gold Swallowing Lizard. It was extremely hidden and was covered in warm fur. It was also very comfortable to lie in. He had stayed here for two days. When he had nothing to do, he would look at the point of view of the Gold Swallowing Lizard and the Steel Soldier Ant. It was as if he was watching a movie and had no intention of leaving at all. “Not bad. I’ve forged five peerless golden runes recently. However, there are only two that are suitable for me.” … Name: Impregnable Gold (1/2) Level: Level one First Realm Quality: Peerless Golden Set Requirements: Shield above level one First Realm Effect 1: Health Points+10%. Effect 2: Any attack that lands on this equipment will have a critical hit chance of -50%. Effect 3: (Locked) Any attack that lands on this equipment will cause the user of the equipment to recover 20 health points. … “Impregnable Gold is a peerless golden rune set. Fortunately, I’ve already obtained two. I’m still short of a third.” Lin Xuan was very satisfied and immediately spent his general coins to set the two runes on the Dragon Hunter Shield. The current Dragon Hunter Shield already had enough equipment essence to advance to First Realm. It had completely met the requirement for these two runes. At this moment, Lin Xuan suddenly saw two wasteland reclaimers advancing from the Gold Swallowing Lizard’s perspective. He knew these two people. They were the trusted aides of District B’s Overseer, Yang Wei. One of them was called Zhao Yong. Zhao Yong roared with laughter. “I led a few others to tail those stupid bastards from District C. When they found the Soul Nurturing Flower and were caught off guard, I rushed over and beat them up, forcing them to hand over everything! Didn’t you see their tragic expressions? I’m dying of laughter.” “Hehe, our Overseer’s plan is really effective. I also intercepted several idiots from District C. They definitely won’t be able to complete the mission. Lu Luo might even be punished,” another wasteland reclaimer said with a smug smile. Zhao Yong said smugly, “I just calculated that the wasteland reclaimers in our District B have already obtained more than 600 attribute items. I also heard that District A and District D might only have obtained 500 attribute items. We’re very likely to be first place!” “Alright, alright, alright. Then we’ll all be rewarded!” “Let’s go. Our people have found another place that has many Rock Belly Fruits. Hurry up and pick them!” The two of them chatted excitedly in low voices, unaware that a Gold Swallowing Lizard was following closely behind. Lin Xuan was stunned before shaking his head with a smile. Helping District C get first place did not do him much good. He only hoped that they would not be last. However, if this continued, District C would really be last place. All the wasteland reclaimers, including him, would be collectively punished. “I originally did not want to make a move, but unfortunately, a despicable person is causing trouble.” Lin Xuan left this cave and quickly found the other martial artists in District C. Sun Zhiguo was so furious that he drank his wine gloomily. The dozen or so District C martial artists beside him were also dejected. This time, they had found at least 200 Rock Belly Fruits and Soul Nurturing Flowers in the Giant Rock Cave. All of them had been snatched away by Zhao Yong and the others. “Brother Sun, brothers, good news! I overheard Zhao Yong and the others discover a place that has a large number of Rock Belly Fruits. Should we return the favor?!” Lin Xuan said with an indignant expression. Sun Zhiguo stood up immediately and said excitedly, “Really?” He trusted Lin Xuan very much. If not for Lin Xuan pushing him back then, he would have long died under the mouth of the Steel Soldier Ant. The other wasteland reclaimers in District C also became excited. They had always been beaten up. Now, they finally had a chance to retaliate! “If everyone trusts me, follow me! It’s time for revenge!” Lin Xuan shouted. Sun Zhiguo patted his shoulder heavily. “Alright! I believe you!” The others were also very confident in Lin Xuan’s character. They immediately followed. As Lin Xuan led Sun Zhiguo and the others to chase after them, he changed the training strategy of the Gold Swallowing Lizard from “attack and defense” to “take the initiative to attack”. “Now, all I have to do is watch a good show!” Lin Xuan chuckled in his heart. The current Gold Swallowing Lizard was no longer the same as before. By eating ores, it had managed to increase its Constitution to 30 and its Strength to 25. Ordinary mystic realm kings would not be able to do anything to it. At the very least, it would have to be an experienced mystic realm king. However, ever since Lin Xuan had killed the Earth Dragon King, no new experienced mystic realm king had appeared. It could be said that the Gold Swallowing Lizard was the invisible overlord of the Giant Rock Cave! At this moment, Zhao Yong and the other eight wasteland reclaimers in District B were squatting down excitedly to pick the Rock Belly Fruits. This was a cave with a rock wall. No one usually came here, so a large number of Rock Belly Fruits had grown here without being discovered. The wasteland reclaimer in District B had only discovered it by accident. “Hahaha, I made a killing! There are at least a hundred Rock Belly Fruits here!” “Our District B is safe this time! We’ll definitely get number one!” Zhao Yong and the others were overjoyed. He was overjoyed at the thought of obtaining 10,000 general coins and 30,000 experience points after the mission ended. At this moment, the Gold Swallowing Lizard appeared silently behind them. Zhao Yong frowned in anger after being nudged by the Gold Swallowing Lizard. “Who the hell touched my butt?! My sexual orientation is very normal. I only like tentacles and animals.” He turned around and saw a golden lizard. He immediately sneered. “Oh? So it’s a Gold…” Before he could finish speaking, the Gold Swallowing Lizard pounced forward. Bang! Zhao Yong seemed to have been struck in the butt by a cannonball as his entire body was smashed into the rock wall. His chest collapsed, and blood sprayed from his mouth while blood dripped from his pants. The surrounding wasteland reclaimers were incomparably shocked when they saw the attributes of the Gold Swallowing Lizard. “Damn! What’s going on? A level nine Zero Realm demon beast!” “Damn! Constitution 30 and Strength 25. No wonder Brother Zhao was sent flying. Its attributes are too abnormal. Run, run!” These wasteland reclaimers wanted to run, but they were instantly sent flying by the Gold Swallowing Lizard’s claw. They spat out blood like Zhao Yong and had frightened expressions. In just a few minutes, these people were all seriously injured and could not even move a finger. At this moment, Lin Xuan and Sun Zhiguo arrived! Sun Zhiguo immediately laughed smugly when he saw Zhao Yong and the others fall to the ground. “Zhao Yong, to think that this day would come for you! Brothers, follow me! Beat them up!” Under Lin Xuan’s arrangements, the Gold Swallowing Lizard had already quietly left. The wasteland reclaimers in District C rushed forward and punched and kicked, immediately venting their anger. “Give me all the things you stole!” Sun Zhiguo said fiercely. Zhao Yong said with a long face, “Old Sun, no, Brother Sun! Grandpa Sun! Can we keep half? If we can’t complete the mission, we’ll be demoted.” Sun Zhiguo sneered, “Only now do you know that doing something like this will lead to demotion. You should have thought of that when you were snatching them away from us!” Zhao Yong stammered and was speechless. “Give it up! Otherwise I’ll beat you up until you’re left with a trace of blood and then throw you here to feed the demon beasts!” Sun Zhiguo said impatiently. He was not stupid enough to kill Zhao Yong and the others himself. The wasteland reclaimers’ collars would have records. Fighting among the wasteland reclaimers was prohibited on the surface, but there were many sneak attacks and interceptions in the dark. There were also wasteland reclaimers who were harmed by the other wasteland reclaimers and were only left with a trace of blood to be thrown into the mystic realm to feed the demon beasts. Zhao Yong and the others gritted their teeth and could only take out all the items from the storage compartment. Sun Zhiguo’s eyes lit up. “We’re rich! Everyone, empty the space in the storage compartment!” Everyone beamed as they picked up their items and stuffed them into the storage compartment. After doing this, they also put some of the Rock Belly Fruits into their pockets. Lin Xuan calculated. This time, they had directly obtained more than 700 items that could increase their attributes! Sun Zhiguo smiled and said, “I have another question. How did you guys get beat up?” Zhao Yong was currently filled with bitter water and could not help but say. With that said, he could not help but snort. “You guys were a step late. If you were a little earlier, you would have been beaten up by that Gold Swallowing Lizard!” “Gold Swallowing Lizard?” Sun Zhiguo and the others looked at each other. Lin Xuan sneered, “Liar! The Gold Swallowing Lizard can at most grow to the level of level six Zero Realm. You guys must have been beaten up by other martial artists or even people from other organizations. You guys are too embarrassed to say it out loud, so you ended up blaming the Gold Swallowing Lizard. How embarrassing!” Zhao Yong almost vomited blood. “You, you, you…!” Lin Xuan kicked him and turned to leave. “Hmph, those who lie don’t deserve to point at me!” Sun Zhiguo was so happy that he could not close his legs. “Lin Xuan, it’s all thanks to you overhearing that Zhao Yong and the others were coming here. We just happened to be there in time to reap the benefits.” The others nodded repeatedly. Lin Xuan had gotten all the credit this time. Lin Xuan smirked and blinked. “It’s also thanks to that Gold Swallowing Lizard that we were able to beat up Zhao Yong and the others. We don’t even have to do anything.” Sun Zhiguo laughed heartily, tears flowing out. “I’m dying of laughter. Zhao Yong and the others said that the Gold Swallowing Lizard is ridiculously powerful. They even said that it was at level nine of the Zero Realm and its Constitution has reached 30 points and its Strength has reached 25 points. Those who don’t know might even think that it was a mystic realm king. They’re really lying without thinking.” “Ai, let’s go, let’s go. Hurry up and return to complete the mission! I can’t wait!” The wasteland reclaimers also cheered with burning eyes. In the hall of the Germinal Organization. The overseers of the four districts were already standing in front of the door of light. High above was a refined middle-aged man. He was clearly standing at the edge of the hall, but he seemed to be standing in the center of the hall. No one seemed to dare to defy his orders. He had a gold medal on his chest with a huge number “Two” on it. He was the Manager Number Two of the Germinal Organization. “It’s almost time,” Manager Number Two suddenly said. District B Overseer Yang Wei had a proud expression. He had long made a plan for his wasteland reclaimers to behave themselves in the past two days and not get into conflict with anyone. This would lower the vigilance of the wasteland reclaimers in the other three districts. On the third day, he had told them to start targeting others fiercely. This way, it would be faster than if they had searched for the Soul Nurturing Flowers and the Rock Belly Fruit themselves. A few hours ago, Zhao Yong had even sent him a message through the wasteland reclaimer’s collar. He said that the plan had progressed smoothly. They had obtained at least 600 items. On the other hand, Aea A and D had 500 items each. There were even fewer items in District C. They had robbed them too many times, and they did not even have 100 items left. Thinking that Lu Luo would be punished soon and that all the wasteland reclaimers in District C, including that despicable Lin Xuan, would be demoted, Yang Wei felt indescribable comfort. “Little girl, you hit me so hard back then. I’ll make sure you suffer later!” Yang Wei sneered and swept his gaze past Lu Luo. Lu Luo looked at him curiously and pointed at him from afar. “What are you laughing at? Are you itching for a beating?” Yang Wei immediately smiled awkwardly, “I just remembered something happy. My wife gave birth.” At this moment, the first wasteland reclaimer walked out of the door of light. More and more wasteland reclaimers returned to the Germinal Organization. Yang Wei waited expectantly, but Zhao Yong did not appear. “Zhao Yong, Zhao Yong, where are you?” He was filled with joy. Soon, Zhao Yong appeared. His footsteps were as heavy as lead, and he did not dare to look up and meet Yang Wei’s eyes. It was not only him. The wasteland reclaimers in District B did not dare to look up. All of them shrank their necks. Yang Wei’s heart skipped a beat. Could it be… He said softly, “Zhao Yong, what happened?” Zhao Yong shrunk his neck. Just thinking of bearing Yang Wei’s anger, he did not dare to say anything. However, there were still more than 50 wasteland reclaimers in District B, and only seven of them had been robbed. Zhao Yong felt that the others should also be able to obtain enough items. After careful consideration, he decided not to say anything. “Don’t worry, Brother Yang. It’s fine,” Zhao Yong said solemnly. Yang Wei felt strange, but he still nodded. He still trusted Zhao Yong. Soon, the other wasteland reclaimers from District B also returned. Their expressions were also a little strange. Zhao Yong and the others looked at each other and nodded repeatedly. Everything was said without saying. Seeing the other party, they all felt confident. Soon, including Lin Xuan, all the wasteland reclaimers in the four districts returned to the Germinal Organization. “Everyone is here. Let’s start checking the items.” Under Manager Number Two’s order, all the wasteland reclaimers took out the items from their storage compartments. A column image appeared on the big screen, and the data of the four districts was rising quickly. District A and District D rose very quickly, and they immediately passed the 300 red line. This meant that they had completed the basic requirement of the mission and would not be punished. The wasteland reclaimers in these two districts heaved a sigh of relief. The speed of the rise of District B and District C was relatively slow. Especially when Yang Wei saw that Zhao Yong and the six wasteland reclaimers beside him had only taken out a few dozen Soul Nurturing Flowers, he was shocked. “What the hell is going on with you?” Yang Wei gritted his teeth, and every word seemed to come out from the gaps in his teeth. “Didn’t you say that you stole at least 600?” Zhao Yong could not help but say, “In the beginning, we did rob others, but later… we were robbed. We barely obtained these Soul Nurturing Flowers after working hard…” Yang Wei was instantly furious, “Trash! Fool!” Zhao Yong said in a low voice, “We were originally very lucky and really obtained more than 600. However, we encountered a Gold Swallowing Lizard and got beat up. After beating us up, it ran away. In the end, Sun Zhiguo and the others happened to appear and snatched us away.” “Brother Yang, believe me. That Gold Swallowing Lizard is really impressive. It’s at level nine Zero Realm and its attributes are comparable to a King Realm expert…” Yang Wei was so furious that he slapped Zhao Yong, making him almost spin 360 degrees on the spot. “Bullsh*t! The Gold Swallowing Lizard can at most grow to the level six Zero Realm. You’re at level nine Zero Realm. Even if the Gold Swallowing Lizard is difficult to kill, you can still chase it away! How can you think of such a lie?! Do you think I’m stupid?!” Zhao Yong covered his face and was speechless. He also felt that this was impossible. However, that Gold Swallowing Lizard was really at the level nine level of the zero level. Its attributes were even more impressive than those of a mystic realm king. “Hahahaha! Yang Wei, this wasteland reclaimer under you sure knows how to joke.” Manager Number Two could not help but laugh. Yang Wei turned around and smiled apologetically, “Sir, I’m sorry for embarrassing you.” Number Two was done laughing. “I don’t care if this is the truth or a lie. If you can’t complete the mission, everyone from District B, including you, will have to be punished.” Yang Wei hurriedly nodded and said, “Don’t worry, other than Zhao Yong and the others, I still have other wasteland reclaimers. They definitely have enough!” Zhao Yong also hurriedly said, “That’s right, that’s right. I believe that they will definitely be able to complete the mission. The way they looked at me just now was very confident! Brother Yang, don’t be anxious.” The wasteland reclaimers were immediately anxious. “Zhao Yong! We saw the confidence in your eyes just now and thought that you had obtained enough!” Yang Wei’s heart skipped a beat, and he was so furious that he almost fainted. He roared, “Take it out, take it all out!” These wasteland reclaimers could only hand over the items obediently. Yang Wei counted and realized that the total number of items obtained by all the wasteland reclaimers under his command was only 205! They were far from meeting the requirements! He was so furious that his entire body trembled. “You! What problem did you encounter again?!” The wasteland reclaimers looked at each other. Finally, someone could not help but say, “Brother Yang, it was all because of a Gold Swallowing Lizard…” Zhao Yong was dumbfounded. “Ah? You guys encountered it too?” Yang Wei slapped that wasteland reclaimer away. “Idiots! You should at least come up with a different lie! Do you really think I’m stupid?!” Manager Number Two exclaimed softly, “It’s the Gold Swallowing Lizard again. Could it be true?” Seeing Yang Wei’s furious expression multiple times, Lin Xuan finally could not help but laugh. After the Gold Swallowing Lizard beat up Zhao Yong and the others, it immediately attacked the other wasteland reclaimers in District B under Lin Xuan’s special control. It beat them up until they cried for their parents. They were unable to obtain anything after that. “Stop laughing, stop laughing!” Yang Wei berated. Lu Luo flashed and appeared in front of Lin Xuan and the others. She frowned and said, “Looks like your skin is really itchy. Let’s go to the martial arts arena and fight later. I guarantee that your skin itchiness will be relieved.” Yang Wei was so furious that his face and neck turned red, “…I’m scolding myself! Can’t I!” Manager Number Two smiled playfully. “Looks like District B will be punished for not completing the mission.” Yang Wei gritted his teeth. Number Two looked at the pillar map on the big screen again. The inventory of all the wasteland reclaimers in District A and D had been calculated. District A had 558, and District D had 538. Only District C had not been completely calculated. However, currently, they only had 100. Including Lin Xuan and Sun Zhiguo, there were only 11 people left who had not handed in their items. Under normal circumstances, the chances were slim. Lu Luo did not have much emotion on her face, but her pale fingers that were clenched tightly revealed her inner turmoil. Lin Xuan noticed this and smiled. “Sister Lu, don’t worry. The first place for this mystic realm mission belongs to our District C. No one can take it away.” Lu Luo was stunned. This guy was called Lin… Lin what? How could he be so bold? Yang Wei also had a puzzled expression, but he was very cautious and did not say anything to ridicule. What if he got slapped in the face? He had already been slapped twice today. If he was slapped again, he would not be able to handle it. Lin Xuan, Sun Zhiguo, and the others looked at each other and took out the items on their bodies. Crash. In the pillar map, the pillars in District C soared crazily, instantly surpassing District A and District D and reaching an astonishing 748. Lu Luo was pleasantly surprised and took a long time to calm down. “How did you guys get this?” Sun Zhiguo glanced at the livid Zhao Yong and the others and smiled. “Sister Lu, we were first robbed by Zhao Yong and the others, but we ended up robbing them instead.” “Lin Xuan overheard the conversation of Zhao Yong and the others and knew that they were going to a place where many Rock Belly Fruits grow. We followed behind and successfully reaped the benefits.” The other martial artists also nodded. “Yes, Lin Xuan is definitely the best. Otherwise, our District C might very well be the last place.” This time, Lu Luo finally looked at Lin Xuan seriously. “Lin Xuan, I’ve remembered you. Not bad.” Lin Xuan smiled. He had finally obtained the approval of the Overseer. In this way, he could find Lu Luo for help in the future. Manager Number Two also looked at Lin Xuan with interest. “I didn’t expect District C to get first place in the end. Very good!” “The rewards will be given to you in at most an hour. As for Lu Luo, you can choose two precious purple equipment from the Equipment Department.” Lu Luo nodded slightly at Manager Number Two. “Yes.” The mystic realm mission ended with District C obtaining the first place, and District B becoming the last place. As a result, the wasteland reclaimers and the overseer were demoted and punished. Lin Xuan’s star level in the Germinal Organization had increased from a four-star wasteland reclaimer to a five-star wasteland reclaimer. … After a month of fun, Lin Xuan had obtained a lot of experience points through the Steel Soldier Ants in the Demon Ant Nest and had successfully increased his martial artist’s level from level four to level nine of First Realm. A First Realm martial artist could obtain three attribute points every time they leveled up. Thus, he naturally invested all of it into his Constitution. In this way, his Constitution increased by 27 points! His Constitution attribute increased from 51 to 78 points! During this period of training, he had even obtained a set directly. This set was called the “Steel Shield Set”. It was made of four parts of the head, upper body, belt, and arm. It was dropped after a Steel Soldier Ant died. The effect of the four-piece set was that any attack that landed on one’s body would increase their physical resistance by 5%. At most, the effects could be stacked for 5 minutes. This set of equipment was upgraded to level nine First Realm by Lin Xuan in a single breath. In any case, he had a lot of equipment essence to spare. His Dragon Hunter Shield and Earth Dragon King Hammer Shield had also consumed a lot of equipment essence to advance to the level nine of the First Realm Also, he had consumed a lot of experience points to advance to level nine First Realm. Lastly, he obtained many attribute items in the Demon Ant Nest. Flame Flower ,+1% Fire Damage. Lightning Flower ,+1% Lightning Damage. Poison Bag Fruit ,+1% poison damage. Frost Grass Seed ,+1% Cold Ice Damage. Fluorescent Mushroom ,+1% health recovery speed. Needle-Eye Fruit ,+0.2% critical attack. Explosion Fruit ,+1% critical damage. Moonlight Grass ,+1% maximum magic power. Flickering Root ,+1% maximum health. Lin Xuan had already eaten all of these attribute items, but even so, he had still accumulated a lot of them in his consciousness space. “It’s time to challenge the mystic realm king of the Demon Ant Nest.” Lin Xuan was satisfied. He changed into the equipment worn by the “Shield Ghost” and headed to the Giant Rock Cave. He then arrived at the Demon Ant Nest through the teleportation gate of the Giant Rock Cave. “Dad, give me another 100,000 General Coins.” In the Germinal Organization’s Manager Number Two office, Zhou Feng stood in front of his father. Manager Number Two was helpless. “Shield Ghost doesn’t even care about you. Why do you still have to suck up to him?” Zhou Feng smiled smugly. “So what if my idol ignores me?” After a pause, he continued, “Moreover, he’s a lone wolf who doesn’t rely on anyone! He defeated two mystic realm kings alone and killed many mystic realm kings without stopping. I admire such a person! What’s wrong? Are you against this?” Manager Number Two was speechless. “Alright, alright, alright, I’ll give you another 100,000 general coins. Go and post your announcement.” At this moment, excited screams sounded from outside the office. “Brother Zhou! Shield Ghost has appeared at the Demon Ant Nest’s Steel Ant core safety station. Come quickly!” Zhou Feng was overjoyed. He pushed open the door and ran out. “Idol, idol, idol!” Manager Number Two shook his head repeatedly and continued to review the documents. After a while, he said, “What level is your Observer skill at?” There was clearly no one in the corner of the room, but a voice sounded. “Level nine Sixth Realm, precious purple grade.” “Go and see if that so-called Shield Ghost is a scammer or a true expert,” Manager Number Two said without even raising his head. The shadow in the corner of the room swayed and disappeared. … When Shield Ghost appeared at the Demon Ant Nest’s steel core safety station, the warriors stood up in shock. They had more or less heard of the ferocious battle results of Shield Ghost. Be it veteran martial artists who had been famous for a long time or martial artists who had only recently advanced, they could not help but feel admiration. “That set on him should be the Steel Shield Set from the Demon Ant Nest’s Steel Soldier Ant. He’s really hard working. I spent more than two months to obtain two parts!” “It’s been a while since we last met, and Shield Ghost has become much stronger. Strange, I don’t usually see him anywhere in the Demon Ant Nest.” “What’s his current martial artist level and various attributes? I really want to know.” Lin Xuan had originally come here to sell the attribute items on his body. However, before he could sit down, he was stopped by a young man. “Shield Ghost, Shield Ghost, I, I, I… I’m your idol!” Zhou Feng was so happy that his face was red as he shouted. Lin Xuan: “?” “Ah, no, you’re my fan! Pfft, pfft, pfft, I’m your fan! I’ve been looking for you for a long time!” Zhou Feng was so excited that he was incoherent. He had not been able to find any traces of Shield Ghost during this period of time. However, he admired Shield Ghost even more. Lin Xuan replied with a hoarse voice, “What are you looking for me for? If you’re going to ask me to join your battle team, don’t bother. I like to be alone.” Zhou Feng shook his head repeatedly. “No, no, idol, I’m here to give you money!” Lin Xuan slowly sent out a question mark. The next moment, he saw Zhou Feng transfer 200,000 general coins to him. “Idol, are you here to challenge the Steel Ant Queen this time? Good luck! I’ll try my best to catch up to you!” After Zhou Feng finished speaking, he bowed deeply to Lin Xuan and turned around to leave. He also wanted to become stronger, to become as powerful as Shield Ghost! Lin Xuan scratched his head. This child’s thinking was a little too forward. He found it difficult to understand. However, he could not refuse the money that was given for free. He put it all away in his consciousness space. At this moment, he suddenly noticed a strange gaze looking over from the corner of the safety station. It was Zhou Feng, who was staring at him with a burning gaze. Lin Xuan :”…” Then, he noticed another gaze. The gaze was filled with aggression, wanting to pry into his attributes. “My attributes are not something that anyone can look at just because you want to.” Lin Xuan ignored that person and turned around to walk out of the safety station. Zhou Feng also followed excitedly, but he maintained a distance. The black-clothed martial artist in the corner exclaimed, “Even with my Observer skill, I still can’t see through his attributes? He’s completely immune.” “Either his level is higher than mine, causing me to be unable to observe him, or… he has a corresponding skill that can completely cover his attributes. Moreover, the level or grade of this skill is higher than my Observer.” The black-clothed martial artist drank a cup of Wusu Beer. “He should be going to challenge the mystic realm king. I’ll go and take a look too.” Every Demon Ant Nest’s nest was divided into the outer, middle, inner, and core areas. The core nest was naturally where the Ant Queen and the breeding ants lived. The Ant Queen and those especially powerful breeding ants were all mystic realm kings. As the Ant Queen’s attributes and skills were stronger, it was often difficult for her to be killed for a long time. It was very easy for the Demon Ant Nest to give her the title of “experienced mystic realm king”. “It’s similar to the Giant Rock Cave. Almost no team has the time to challenge the experienced mystic realm king. As for the other mystic realm kings, they can only queue for dozens of meters.” Seeing this familiar scene, Lin Xuan smiled. He raised his head and strode directly into the Steel Ant Queen’s cave. The martial artists on both sides watched as Lin Xuan walked in, still in a daze. “Damn? Someone just walked in alone? Is he crazy?” “That person is Shield Ghost. He was the one who consecutively defeated the mystic realm kings and experienced mystic realm king of the Giant Rock Cave. “However, the Steel Ant Queen is different from the Earth Dragon King. The Earth Dragon King has not been killed for half a year, but the Steel Ant Queen has not been killed for ten months!” Not far behind these people, the black-clothed martial artist was still drinking his beer happily. “Interesting, he really went in alone.” He wiped the beer from the corner of his mouth and nodded slightly. Zhou Feng’s eyes lit up. “My idol is so domineering. He doesn’t even bat an eye when he walks into the Steel Ant Queen’s cave.” In the cave, Lin Xuan was facing the massive Steel Ant Queen. The Steel Ant Queen was eight meters long, and its head and waist were only a meter long. The rest of its body was its butt. Its entire body was covered in a carapace that emitted a metallic luster. Even its butt was no exception. At this moment, the huge butt was spitting out ant eggs. A large number of ant eggs were casually piled up behind the Steel Ant Queen. Seeing the martial artist enter, the Steel Ant Queen let out a cry and directly pounced over. … Name: Steel Ant Queen Title: Experienced Mystic Realm King Level: Level One First Realm Attributes: 55 Constitution, 41 Strength, 19 Spirit, 31 Agility Skill: Metal Bone Armor (Precious Purple), Spitting Acid (Precious Purple), Summoning Soldier Ant (Precious Purple), Egg Growth, Big Swing, Earthquake. … “Its strength hasn’t even surpassed my constitution, but it’s already at this level?” Lin Xuan nodded slightly and steadied himself. He sat directly cross-legged. He used the Dragon Hunter Shield in his left hand and the Earth Dragon King Hammer Shield in his right. His body was covered in skills such as [Body of Thorns], [Steel Body], [Iron Wall], and [Magic Armor]. No matter how crazily the Steel Ant Queen attacked, she was unable to break through Lin Xuan’s defense. 25 minutes 39 seconds later, the Steel Ant Queen fell to the ground with a wail. It exploded into light that filled the sky, condensing into equipment, blueprints, runes, and skill books in front of Lin Xuan. “You received 5,000 general coins and 25,000 experience points.” “You have obtained the precious purple equipment [Shield Emblem Ring].” “You have obtained the precious purple equipment [Steel Skull].” “You have obtained the rare blue rune [Earth Protection (2)].” “You have obtained the rare blue Skill Book [Metal Bone Armor].” “You have obtained a peerless golden item [Experienced Ant Queen War Shell].” Lin Xuan rubbed his hands happily. “Good, good, good! They’re all good stuff.” “The Shield Emblem Ring’s effect is very powerful. It increases physical resistance when you have full HP.” “The Steel Skull is a set that dropped after killing the Steel Ant Queen. I heard that the drop rate is very low. I didn’t expect it to drop so easily. It’s very suitable.” … Name: Shield Emblem Ring Level: Level One First Realm Quality: Precious Purple Equipment Requirement: Constitution: 30 Effect: Constitution+5, Constitution+1%. Effect 2: At full health, physical resistance will increase by 30%. … Name: Steel Skull Level: Level One First Realm Quality: Precious Purple Equipment Requirements: Constitution: 35, Strength: 23 Effect: Constitution+4, Strength+9 Effect 2: Damage reflection+15%. Set effect: All resistance+30%. Set Effect 2: (Unlocked after obtaining the second part of the “Overlord” Set) Set Effect 3: (Unlocked after obtaining the third part of the “Overlord” Set) Set Effect 4: (Unlocked after obtaining the fourth part of the Overlord Set) Set Effect: (Unlocked after obtaining the fifth part of the “Overlord” Set) … “The other four items were dropped after killing the Red Fire Ant, the Purple Thunder Ant Queen, the Poison Water Ant Queen, and the Frost Ant Queen. This Overlord Set should be the strongest set in the Demon Ant Nest.” Lin Xuan’s eyes lit up. If he wore this set of equipment, coupled with his attributes and skills, even if he was still a level nine First Realm martial artist, he would still be able to fight evenly with a martial artist below level seven Second Realm. Moreover, he was about to obtain enough advancement materials to advance to the Second Realm. At this moment, a report sounded from all the safety stations in the Demon Ant Nest. “The experienced mystic realm king, the Steel Ant Queen, has been killed! The Steel Ant Queen has been killed!” The many martial artists who were eating, resting, and chatting immediately stood up. “Damn, the Ant Queen was killed? I was thinking of going to the challenge tomorrow to try.” “Forget it. You’re only saying that because it’s dead. Who doesn’t know that your team went in arrogantly last time and escaped in disgrace?” “Let’s go and take a look over there. Which big shot killed them?” The warriors ran and quickly arrived in front of the Steel Ant Queen’s cave. The black-clothed martial artist was still sitting here. Beside him was a pile of crushed can of beer. However, the moment the Steel Ant Queen’s announcement sounded, he stopped drinking. “He really defeated a Concealed Realm expert alone… This guy is not a scammer. He’s an expert!” The black-clothed martial artist was shocked. The announcement of the safety station would only be heard when a martial artist killed an experienced mystic realm king of the same level. If any Second Realm or Third Realm martial artist ran over and killed the Steel Ant Queen, the announcement would not have sounded at all. Therefore, he could now determine that Shield Ghost must be a level nine First Realm warrior with extremely high attributes, powerful skills, and excellent equipment. Otherwise, it was impossible for him to deal with the Steel Ant Queen alone. The black-clothed martial artist smiled and shook his head. He took out the communicator developed by the Germinal Organization and sent a short message to Manager Number Two. “Even I couldn’t do this when I was still a level nine First Realm martial artist. That brat Zhou Feng has really found a good example.” “An expert.” Manager number two saw this message and raised his eyebrows. He and the black-clothed martial artist were good friends. This good friend of his had always had very high standards. He did not expect that his friend would really use the word “expert” to describe a martial artist. “Is it possible to reel him in?” he replied. “Difficult,” the black-clothed martial artist replied. “Can’t you include more words in your response?” “It’s difficult.” Manager Number Two :”…” He put away the communicator, stood up, and looked out the window with his hands behind his back. “It’s fine even if he’s a lone wolf. There are too few people around me who are capable. It would be good if I could get this Shield Ghost to work under me.” However, no matter how powerful and fast Shield Ghost is, he’s far from reaching the standard to break the balance. He can only be nurtured as a potential trump card. What I need is immediate combat strength… … After killing the Steel Ant Queen, Lin Xuan strode out of the cave. Under the admiring gazes of the many martial artists, he quickly left and headed straight for the Red Fire Ant Nest. The distance between the Steel Ant Nest and the Red Fire Ant Nest was rather far, in which there was a dry and cracked barren land in between. Lin Xuan ran over without stopping at all. Zhou Feng followed behind, panting, and was in danger. Lin Xuan glanced at him with a helpless expression. Was this what the other party meant by catching up to him? He was going to catch up to him physically? Lin Xuan did not want to have too much interaction with this guy. He shook him off from afar and directly arrived at the cave of the Red Fire Ant Queen. Just like how there was no one in front of the Steel Ant Queen’s cave, there was no one lined up here. Many martial artists were lining up in front of the other breeding ant caves. The Steel Ant Queen’s defense was extremely high and difficult to kill. The Red Fire Ant Queen had many fire techniques. Therefore, without an extremely high resistance to flames, one would not dare to casually challenge it. Only when Lin Xuan walked in did the many martial artists react in confusion. “Is that Shield Ghost?” “Damn, he just killed the Steel Ant Queen and directly came over to kill the Red Fire Ant Queen?” “What? He was the one who killed the Steel Ant Queen?” “That’s right. I have a good friend who is currently in the Steel Ant Nest. He saw Shield Ghost enter the cave and challenge the Steel Ant Queen with his own eyes and also saw Shield Ghost walk out.” “Damn.” The martial artists were filled with admiration and envy. If only they were as powerful as Shield Ghost. Behind these martial artists, the black-clothed martial artist appeared again. This time, he was holding a Beijing Beer. The black-clothed martial artist laughed heartily. After saying this, he sighed and said, “Looks like Shield Ghost is a very ambitious person. Does he plan on obtaining the Overlord Set?” “Unfortunately, the damn drop rate is too low. I tried to obtain it six times in the past but failed. I wonder if this guy can do it.” After a while, Zhou Feng ran over and panted heavily. “Damn… my idol actually didn’t rest and directly challenged the Red Fire Ant Queen. How awesome…” In the cave. Lin Xuan had changed into another set of equipment and was currently fighting a huge Red Fire Ant Queen. The temperature of the cave behind the Red Fire Ant Queen was terrifyingly high. Even just by standing here, one would lose health points. As for the Red Fire Ant Queen, it also had a fire halo that constantly burned its challenger. Without high fire resistance provided by equipment or skills, it is very easy for one to quickly lose health points and ultimately die. Of course, that was only possible for ordinary martial artists. Lin Xuan could easily obtain equipment with extremely high fire resistance. When his second training avatar, the Steel Soldier Ant, attacked the Red Fire Ant Nest, it had killed a large number of them and accumulated a lot of equipment. There was a small chance that the Red Fire Soldier Ant would drop the “Fire Shield” Set. The four parts of that set could provide a fire resistance of up to 60%, but resistance to other elements were negative. An ordinary martial artist would need at least three to five months to obtain this set of equipment. After putting on the Fire Shield Set and adding on his attributes and skills, [Basic Fire Resistance], Lin Xuan stood in the sea of flames created by the Red Fire Ant Queen and felt warm and comfortable. However, every time the flames burned Lin Xuan, they would reflect 50 True Damage back. The health points of the Red Fire Ant Queen simply dropped like melting ice. 11 minutes and 49 seconds later, the Red Fire Ant Queen died! The entire Demon Ant Nest’s safety station sounded again. “The experienced mystic realm king, the Red Fire Ant Queen, has been killed!” The cultivators, who had just calmed down, stood up again. “Damn! The Steel Ant Queen and the Red Fire Ant Queen both disappeared?” “Could it be that Shield Ghost? I’ll ask my friend who’s at the Red Fire Ant Nest.” “Stop asking. It’s Shield Ghost! He’s still killing by himself like before! This person is too freaking powerful!” The martial artists of the Flying Peng Team, the Wind-Chasing Team, and the Big Bird Rotation Team were even more dumbfounded. They were currently training in the outer layer of the Purple Lightning Ant Nest, working hard to kill the Purple Lightning Worker Ants and the Purple Lightning Soldier Ants. In the end, the Steel Ant Queen and the Red Fire Ant Queen were both killed by Shield Ghost. “The highest level among us is only level three First Realm. The other party is already strong enough to kill the Ant Queen!” The captain of the Flying Peng team sighed repeatedly. “How ridiculous! You’re off the charts!” The Wind-Chasing Team was helpless. The captain of the Big Bird Rotation Team touched his sexy chest hair and smacked his lips. “Do you think Shield Ghost likes men? I’m so handsome. If I go and beg him to be my sugar daddy, will he agree?” The three team members rolled their eyes crazily. The Chest Hair Captain shook his head regretfully. “Forget it. I better find a rich woman to be my sugar mommy. Men are all pigs. I don’t trust them one bit.” At this moment, a figure covered in armor ran past them at high speed, sending a large number of Purple Thunder Worker Ants and Purple Thunder Soldier Ants flying along the way. When these Demon Ants collided with his body, they seemed to have collided with a chopping board and were instantly shattered into pieces. The team leader exclaimed, “Strange, this guy’s back looks a little familiar.” The three team members blinked. “That looks like Shield Ghost.” The team leader’s eyes widened. “Is he planning to challenge the Purple Thunder Ant Queen at the Purple Thunder Ant Nest?” The three team members looked at each other, at a loss. Didn’t this Shield Ghost need to rest? Ten minutes later, Zhou Feng also ran past them in large strides. “Idol, wait for me!” Soon, Lin Xuan strode into the Purple Thunder Ant Queen’s cave. A queen that was as ugly as the Steel Ant Queen and the Red Fire Ant Queen appeared. Lin Xuan also changed into a new set of equipment. It was similar to the “Fire Shield” set that the Red Fire Soldier Ants had dropped. This “Thunder Shield” set was dropped by the Purple Thunder Weapon Ants and provided 60% lightning resistance. The entire challenge process was as boring as the one after the Red Fire Ant Queen challenge. Soon, the Purple Lightning Ant Queen fell with a wail. However, he was not so lucky this time. The Purple Thunder Ant Queen did not drop the part of the Overlord Set that he wanted. “My luck is not good. Then I’ll grind a few more times.” Lin Xuan waved his hand indifferently and sat down. A few minutes later, a breeding ant was chosen to become the Purple Lightning Ant Queen and appeared in the cave. Lin Xuan swept his gaze over and discovered that its attributes had shrunk by a level compared to the previous one. Killing it was even easier. After killing five Purple Thunder Ant Queens in a row, it finally dropped. “The Steel Ant Queen dropped the Steel Skull, the Red Fire Ant Queen dropped the Blazing Fire Cloak, and the Purple Thunder Ant Queen dropped the Purple Thunder Pauldron. I’m still missing the parts from the Poison Water Ant Queen and the Frost Ant Queen.” Lin Xuan nodded in satisfaction. Under the shocked gazes of the many martial artists, he quickly left the Purple Thunder Ant Nest and headed straight for the Poison Water Ant Nest. After killing the Poison Water Ant Queen 19 times and the Frost Ant Queen 35 times, he obtained the Venomous Belt and the Frost Plackart respectively. In this way, he finally gathered a complete set of the “Overlord” Set. “Too ferocious. No wonder this legend has been circulating among martial artists. With this Overlord Set, you can immediately transform into a super powerful tank and stand at the front of the team. The martial artists behind you will also be able to attack without worry!” Lin Xuan sighed. The effect of this set was: 1. Resistance of all elements increased by 30%. 2. All negative status resistance increased by 50%. 3. Hatred Points increase by 100%. 4. Healing effect by 100%. 5. Gain the equipment skill [Demon Ant Squad]. You can summon five soldier ants that inherit 50% of your attributes at any time. The soldier ants will activate a cooldown after dying and will be revived again after 5 minutes. Moreover, this was only the effect of the set. Each of the five parts had two additional effects. After putting on this Overlord Set, Lin Xuan felt as if he had become a true overlord that was as immovable as a mountain. After all, even without doing anything, he would still be extremely strong. Compared to the excited Lin Xuan, the many martial artists at the Demon Ant Nest’s safety station were currently dumbfounded. At the very least, they were all shocked. The captain of the Flying Peng team gulped and said loudly, “Brothers, I’ve calculated it. Shield Ghost killed a total of 1 Steel Ant Queen, 5 Purple Thunder Ant Queen, 19 Poison Water Ant Queen, and 35 Frost Ant Queen. Among them were 5 experienced mystic realm kings, and 46 mystic realm kings. Moreover… he fought alone the entire time and almost did not rest.” There was dead silence in the safety station. “Isn’t he basically a superhuman?” “Shield Ghost, take me away. I’m your number one fan!” “Is this a real person? Could he be an alien that sneaked into Earth?” “Why am I like a pig compared to Shield Ghost? The four of us only challenged a single ordinary mystic realm king but we still got beaten up!” After a short silence, the martial artists completely erupted. They felt that Shield Ghost had appeared in this world to humiliate them. The black-clothed martial artist no longer drank. He sent a message to Manager Number Two seriously. The content was surprisingly long. “…This is the data. In my eyes, he’s no longer an expert. Instead, he’s a trump card that’s worth nurturing and pouring in resources. Moreover, with his growth speed, it won’t be a problem for him to become a Fourth Realm martial artist in three years.” Manager Number Two was very surprised. He was not only shocked by Shield Ghost’s battle results and his son’s good judgment, he was also surprised that the black-clothed martial artist had said so much in a single message. “I understand the situation. Get in touch with Shield Ghost first. Don’t state your intentions. Just give me the money and establish a good communication pathway.” “Also, why are you suddenly so talkative? You’re not usually like this.” The black-clothed martial artist replied, “None of your business.” Manager Number Two :”…” As Lin Xuan walked out of the Frost Ant Queen’s cave, the black-clothed martial artist approached. “Hello, Shield Ghost.” Lin Xuan was stunned. Wasn’t this person the one who had tried to probe his attributes in the Steel Ant Nest? “What’s the matter? I don’t want to form a team.” The black-clothed martial artist shook his head. “Here, money.” Lin Xuan was even more stunned. What was going on today? Why was there always people sending him money? Did their money grow on trees? “In any case, it’s free. Do you want it?” the black-clothed martial artist said calmly. “Yes.” Lin Xuan immediately received the 150,000 General Coins the black-clothed martial artist had transferred over. “Take it. We’ll meet again in the future.” After the black-clothed martial artist finished speaking, he quickly left. He still had to quickly save Zhou Feng, who had been surrounded by a large number of Frost Ants. That brat had only cared about chasing after Shield Ghost and had exhausted too much energy. Now, he had already attracted a large number of demon beasts to attack. Of course, he would not die. He would probably have to lie low in the hospital bed for a while. Lin Xuan watched as this person left. He kept feeling that this person was very mysterious, but he could not be bothered to investigate the other party. As long as he was strong enough, he could destroy everything. All schemes and plots were useless. Lin Xuan left under the envious and admiring gazes of many martial artists and arrived at the secret cave on the sixth floor of Giant Rock Cave. “It’s time. It’s time to advance to the Second Realm!” Lin Xuan placed the many advancement materials in front of him. After killing the experienced mystic realm king, one would definitely obtain at least one advancement material. After killing five Ant Queens, he had obtained five advancement materials. The effects of these five materials were all the same. After advancing, all his attributes+3 and he would also obtain the passive skill [Experienced Mystic Realm King Might]. If one already had this skill, the effect of the skill would increase. If Lin Xuan used these five advancement materials to advance, his total attributes would increase by 15 points! “Begin advancement.” Lin Xuan tapped on the arrow symbol on the data panel. His body automatically absorbed the five advancement materials in front of him. Surging energy surged into his body and fused into his limbs, bones, and organs. His muscles were roaring and his blood was surging! After a short period of comfort, Lin Xuan’s entire body calmed down. Now, his basic attributes had changed: Physique 93, Strength 47, Spirit 48, Agility 43. Passive skill [Experienced Mystic Realm King Might]. Its effect changed from the previous -8% to -15%. “I’m feeling good. I also have some strength now. Now, I can somewhat survive in this dangerous world where demon beasts roam freely.” Lin Xuan heaved a long sigh. “Next, it’s time to go to the next mystic realm to find a new training avatar.” As soon as dawn arrived, Lin Xuan changed into a new set of equipment and prepared to enter the Giant Rock Cave through the door of light. His plan was to use the door of light in the Giant Rock Cave to go to the Second Realm mystic realm, the Tree King Sea. The Tree King Sea was also a mystic realm under the complete control of the Germinal Organization. The highest level demon beasts there were only level nine Second Realm. However, just as he was about to enter the door of light, he saw Lu Luo also rush through the door of light and enter the mystic realm. She was also going to the Second Realm mystic realm, Tree King Sea. After thinking for a moment, Lin Xuan reacted. Lu Luo wanted to eat up all the attribute items provided in the Zero Realm, First Realm, Second Realm, and Third Realm mystic realms before she became a First Realm martial artist. However, currently, there were only three Second Realm martial artists in District C’s wasteland reclaimers. However, it was obvious that their gains during this period of time had not been good. Lu Luo was already unable to endure and planned to take things into her own hands. A Third Realm martial artist like Lu Luo would still have the same item drop rate when killing ordinary demon beasts in a Second Realm mystic realm. However, the drop rate of obtaining general coins and experience points would be decreased to 1. Moreover, if she challenged a mystic realm king or an experienced mystic realm king, nothing would be dropped. This was a special rule of the mystic realm. Powerful martial artists were not allowed to stay in relatively weak mystic realms to compete with weak martial artists. Lin Xuan shrugged. First, he arrived at the Giant Rock Cave with his identity. In an empty place, he changed into Shield Ghost and headed straight for the Tree King Sea. Second Realm mystic realm, Tree King Sea. This was a verdant mystic realm. It was divided into nine ring-shaped regions from the outside to the inside, and the danger level increased from one to nine. Of course, it was not as natural and peaceful as it seemed. The demon beasts here were called “ferocious trees”. As the name implied, they were all kinds of trees. If one of them discovered an enemy within a certain range, they would let out a sharp whistle to attract the other ferocious trees. There was the Artillery Tree that shot out fireballs, the Plasma Tree that released lightning, the Poison Bag Tree that spat out poison, and the Shrouding Frost Tree that had a frost shell. There were also less dangerous Fruit Trees and Ivy Trees… All kinds of dangerous trees formed a vast and boundless sea of trees. “The most important thing about the training avatar is that it can’t die easily. In that case, it’s clearly the most suitable for Shrouding Frost Tree.” Lin Xuan nodded slightly. After identifying the direction, he began to search for the Shrouding Frost Tree. Soon, he found a suitable Shrouding Frost Tree. The latter sensed the aura of a human and immediately pulled out its tree root from the soil. The tree leaf twisted towards Lin Xuan as a large number of tiny ice awls shot over. Clang! Clang! Clang! The ice awl smashed into Lin Xuan’s body, but not a single drop of blood fell. Lin Xuan approached as if nothing had happened and raised the Earth Dragon King Hammer to smash it. Soon, the Shrouding Frost Tree was killed. At this moment, a voice immediately sounded in his mind. [Dead target detected, analysis in progress…] [Shrouding Frost Tree, a level two Second Realm demon beast. Attributes: 41 Constitution, 38 Strength, 16 Agility, 9 Spirit. Skills: Overturning Frost, Ice Awl] [Cause of death: Violently smashed to death..] [Currently, you have an extra avatar slot. Do you want to possess Shrouding Frost Tree and make it the third training avatar?] [Remarks: This dead target will immediately be revived with full health.] Lin Xuan muttered “yes”. In an instant, the Shrouding Frost Tree stood up suddenly. After adjusting his training strategy to “attack and defend at the same time”, Lin Xuan watched as the Shrouding Frost Tree left. Soon, he began fighting with the Artillery Tree not far away. [Current Area: Tree King Sea First Region (300 general coin per minute, 1,500 experience points per minute)] [Shrouding Frost Tree has been training for 1 minute. Do you wish to collect?] Lin Xuan placed his gaze into his consciousness space again. His current general coins had already exceeded 8 million, but as his equipment level and rune level increased, the cost of enhancements had increased greatly. “Let’s upgrade the consciousness space to level 4. I wonder what it will unlock? I’m looking forward to it.” Lin Xuan checked and found that the level 3 consciousness space had been upgraded to level 4. It required 50,000 general coins, and the capacity would become 100 cubic meters. The level 4 consciousness space needed 500,000 general coins to increase to level 5. After being upgraded, its capacity had increased to 200 cubic meters. The level 5 consciousness space needed 5 million general coins to increase to level 6. Its capacity would then be increased to 400 cubic meters. “I’ll upgrade to the level 5 consciousness space first.” After consuming 550,000 general coins and upgrading his consciousness space from level 3 to level 5 in one go, he discovered that new workstations had appeared in his consciousness space. The synthesis table could fuse several low-level peerless golden grade skills into high-level peerless golden grade skills. It could also fuse similar sets into stronger sets. Lin Xuan unlocked the first synthesis table and saw a bright synthesis list. On the list, two lines lit up. The first line was “Basic Elemental Resistance = Basic Fire Resistance+Basic Lightning Resistance+Basic Poison Resistance+Basic Ice Resistance.” A single Basic Fire Resistance could only increase one’s fire resistance by 20%. On the other hand, Basic Elemental Resistance increased it by 30%. “Synthesis requires 100,000 general coins… This is starting to get expensive.” Lin Xuan laughed angrily. After all, he had a lot of money and did not lack this bit of money. He clicked on Synthesis and the four skills left his consciousness space on their own. They turned into points of light and spread out, then quickly gathered together, turning into a new skill book, Basic Elemental Resistance. The second line of the list was “Giant Shield Set = Steel Shield Set+Fire Shield Set+Thunder Shield Set+Ice Shield Set+Poison Shield Set”. “You can even synthesize a set? This is even more meaningful!” Lin Xuan immediately spent 500,000 general coins and clicked on Synthesis. The five sets flew out of his consciousness space on their own. Just like the previous skills, they quickly scattered and gathered again, forming a new set in the blink of an eye. Peerless golden grade! Giant Shield Set! Effect 1: Physical resistance increases by 50%, resistance to all elements increases by 60%. Effect 2: You are immune to fatal damage. To save your life, the set will shatter. The two effects were simple but ridiculously powerful. “Although the previous Fire Shield Set has increased fire resistance by 60%, all the other elemental resistances were negative. On the other hand, this set is very good. Its resistance to all elements is 60%!” “As for this immunity to fatal damage, I don’t really need it. After all, when I fight demon beasts, my health doesn’t drop much. However, I might be able to use it in the future.” Lin Xuan nodded in satisfaction and placed the Giant Shield back into his consciousness. In the future, the Giant Shield Set and the Overlord Set would be his two most frequently used sets. “There’s also a medicinal table. I should be able to make medicinal potions with this, right?” Lin Xuan took a look and immediately saw a dense array of medicinal formulas. “Primary Agility Potion, 1 serving of Black Scaled Snake Gall and 3 servings of rare water.” “Primary Strength Potion, 1 serving of Bullhorn, 3 servings of rare water.” “...;” “Primary Fire Wound Medicine, 1 Flame Flower, 3 rare water.” He nodded slightly. These potions were consumable items and could provide a large number of attributes and status enhancements for a short period of time. They were also quite useful. “I remember unlocking something else…” Lin Xuan searched again and indeed, he found it. He could now use general coins to strengthen the smelting table, forging table, synthesis table, and medicinal table. These workstations were all at level 1. After consuming 100,000 General Coins to upgrade to level 2, their efficiency would increase by 20%. After consuming 1 million general coins to upgrade to level 3, the work productivity will increase by 40%. After consuming 10 million general coins to upgrade to level 4, the work efficiency will increase by 100%, and there will be an additional 10% chance of smelting, forging, and synthesizing high grade items. Lin Xuan looked at the declining number of his balance and smiled helplessly. “I once thought that my wealth was comparable to a country. I didn’t expect to immediately spend all the money I have in my consciousness space.” After obtaining the third training avatar, Lin Xuan found a safe place to rest. Eight hours later. [Current Area: Tree King Sea First Region (300 general coin per minute, 1,500 experience points per minute)] [Shrouding Frost Tree has been training for 8 hours and has reached the upper limit of its training time. Obtained 480,000 general coins, 2,400,000 experience points, 17 Second Realm equipment, 12 skill books, 5 runes, 2 Shriek Fruits, 3 Fire Demon Cores, 1 Poison Demon Core, and 1 Thunder Demon Core. Do you wish to collect?] Lin Xuan muttered the word “collect” and a large pile of items appeared in his consciousness space. The 17 Second Realm equipment were all white ordinary grade and could be directly smelted. In the 12 skill books, 4 was an intermediate-level Fire Resistance, 3 was an intermediate-level Lightning Resistance, and the remaining 5 were rare blue grade Shrouding Frost Wall. Shrouding Frost Wall was a defensive skill similar to Iron Wall, but it provided high physical resistance and frost resistance. This was very useful for Lin Xuan. He immediately learned it and upgraded it. The five runes were all of white ordinary grade and could be smelted. Lastly, there were the Shriek Fruits, Fire Demon Cores, Lightning Demon Cores, and Poison Demon Cores. These were the attribute items of the Tree King’s Sea. They could increase one’s dodging ability by 1%, fire resistance by 1%, lightning resistance by 1%, and poison resistance by 1%. These four items had all been dropped after the corresponding ferocious tree died. Of course, the drop rate was not high. Even with Lin Xuan’s training avatar, he had only obtained this much after 8 hours. However, his greatest advantage was that he did not need to rest and could train continuously. It was already not bad for ordinary wasteland reclaimers to be able to rest after working for four to five hours. After all, this was a mystic realm filled with danger. The wasteland reclaimers had to be tense at all times and could easily feel tired. Just like that, two days later. After two days of battle, his training avatar, Shrouding Frost Tree, had advanced from the level two to level three of the Second Realm. The five attribute items: the Shriek Fruit, the Fire Demon Core, the Thunder Demon Core, the Poison Demon Core, and the Ice Demon Core were all swiped clean by Lin Xuan. He had already eaten 10 of them, and there were even more than 10 more in his consciousness space. “Shush, it’s time to return to the Germinal Organization to rest. It’s quite tiring to hang out here every day.” Lin Xuan stretched his back and walked out of this region. As soon as he came out, he bumped into a figure. The other party was dressed in a smart suit with a high ponytail and some baby fat on her face. It was the overseer of District C of the Germinal Organization, Lu Luo. Lin Xuan almost shouted out Sister Lu subconsciously, but he immediately reacted. His current identity was “Shield Ghost”. “Shield Ghost?” Lu Luo was very surprised. Many people were looking for this Shield Ghost. Ever since people heard about the news of Shield Ghost’s battle record, he had started to become a legend. After all, he had consecutively defeated experienced mystic realm kings and mystic realm kings by himself. In the past few months, the name “Shield Ghost” had become increasingly popular in East Lake City. What was even more exciting was that Shield Ghost was not a wasteland reclaimer of the Germinal Organization, but a true lone wolf! He did not rely on the information and risk-taking techniques provided by the Germinal Organization and completely relied on himself to defeat a large number of mystic realm kings. This made countless people ashamed! However, from this point of view, Shield Ghost’s lone wolf dentity had also triggered some people in the Germinal Organization. To be precise, Manager Number Three was dissatisfied. If even a lone wolf was so powerful, didn’t that prove how useless the Germinal Organization was? The Germinal Organization had so many resources and resources, but there had never been a wasteland reclaimer as powerful as Shield Ghost. Wasn’t this shameful? Lu Luo had a good impression of self-reliant people like Shield Ghost. However, she did not like to reveal her true feelings. The two of them met and brushed past each other. With her back facing him, Lu Luo said calmly, “You’re not enemies with the Germinal Organization, but some of the wasteland reclaimers in the Germinal Organization are already prepared to find trouble with you.” “They want to capture you and expose your true identity or force you to join the Germinal Organization. Be careful.” With that said, Lu Luo continued to kill the ferocious trees and search for attribute items. Lin Xuan was stunned and chuckled. From the looks of it, Lu Luo and the Germinal Organization were not on the same page. She actually gave friendly advice to this “lone wolf”. “Catch me? They’re overestimating themselves.” Lin Xuan looked at his attributes, skills, and equipment and was filled with confidence. Although he was only at level one of the Second Realm now, he could already compete with a level one Third Realm martial artist. Among the wasteland reclaimers of the Germinal Organization, there were even pitifully few Second Realm martial artists. Even Third Realm martial artists could be overseers. How could these people lower themselves and try to catch him personally? At the same time, at the safety station of the ninth region of the King Tree Sea. Three rank two wasteland reclaimers from District D arrived together. District D’s Overseer had received Manager Number Three’s order to mobilize his men to attack and suppress the so-called legendary Shield Ghost. The stronger Shield Ghost was, the more useless the Germinal Organization would seem. He would either join the Germinal Organization or… die! The tall and thin wasteland reclaimer said, “Two days ago, someone saw Shield Ghost appear at the safe station in the ninth region of the Tree King Sea. After that, he hasn’t returned to the safe station.” The fat wasteland reclaimer said, “We don’t have to go out and search. As long as we wait here, he will definitely return to the safety station.” The one-eyed wasteland reclaimer said, “The three of us are enough to capture him alive.” Soon, a fully-armored figure appeared in their eyes. The ghost mask, the large black shield, and the full-body armor were all the same. Although he had changed a few pieces of equipment, their auras were still the same as before. Ordinary martial artists were completely unable to emit his aura. The wasteland reclaimer expert said, “That’s him. We can’t let him enter the safety station.” The three of them immediately rushed out and blocked Lin Xuan’s path. The atmosphere instantly became tense. The wasteland reclaimers in the safety station suddenly stood up and stretched their necks to look outside. “I remember those three. They’re the wasteland reclaimers from District D. Do they have a conflict with Shield Ghost?” “I’m afraid it’s not a conflict, but… an order from the higher-ups.” “Sigh, lone wolves are always being suppressed. This isn’t the first time. Shield Ghost is a true black horse that had suddenly appeared. In the end, he still has to submit to a big organization like the Germinal Organization.” Further away, Lu Luo was also about to return to the safety station. Her luck was not good. This time, she only obtained two Shriek Fruits and did not obtain any other attribute items. As soon as she arrived at the entrance of the safety station, she saw a tense scene. Lu Luo shook her head. “He still bumped into them… Wait, no, they should have been waiting for Shield Ghost here long ago.” She despised such behavior. She had always believed that the Germinal Organization should increase the benefits of the wasteland reclaimers and attract more lone wolf members instead of suppressing these lone wolves who relied on their own efforts. However, the order was given by Manager Number Three. As an Overseer, she could not say anything. “I can’t help him much. However, if the three wasteland reclaimers in District D still refuse to let him off after defeating Shield Ghost and force him to join the Germinal Organization, I will have to stop them.” Lu Luo thought to herself. District D’s overseer was backed by Manager Number Three. However, she was also backed by Manager Number Two. Manager Number Two shared her view and had always disliked violence. At that time, even if the overseer of District D complained, Manager Number Two would still be able to protect her. Lin Xuan sized up the three wasteland reclaimers and activated his Observer skill. His Observer skill was currently at level three Second Realm and was of the peerless gold grade. He could clearly see the levels, attributes, skills, and equipment of cultivators of the same level. After taking a look, Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. What were these attributes? The three of them developed in similar directions. Two of them focused on strength, and one on agility. However, they did not dare to invest all the free attribute points they had obtained into their bodies like Lin Xuan had. Instead, they decided to only invest a bit of their points into the rest of their attributes. The highest attributes of the three of them reached 54, 56, and 51, respectively, but Lin Xuan’s constitution had already reached 85. These were only his basic attributes. After adding the attributes provided by his equipment and skills, the difference between him and them would be even greater. “I didn’t expect to unknowingly pull away from ordinary martial artists. I’m very satisfied.” Lin Xuan smiled happily. The tall and thin wasteland reclaimer said, “You’re about to die and you’re still laughing?” The fat wasteland reclaimer said, “Shield Ghost, we’ve been waiting for you for a long time.” The one-eyed wasteland reclaimer said, “We’ll give you two choices. One, you fight the three of us alone. Two, join…” Lin Xuan interrupted, “I’ll go with the first one.” With that said, he stood rooted to the ground with the Dragon Hunter Shield in his left hand and the Earth Dragon King Hammer Shield in his right. The three wasteland reclaimers laughed in anger. The tall and thin wasteland reclaimer said, “Shield Ghost, you’re more arrogant than I thought.” The wasteland reclaimers in the safety station sighed in unison. “This is bad. Has Shield Ghost become arrogant after challenging so many mystic realm kings ?” “Unless Shield Ghost has an overwhelming combat strength, he can at most fight two alone. It’s impossible to fight three alone.” “He’s still standing there with two shields! Does he really think two shields can resist the attacks of three people?” At this moment, footsteps sounded. Zhou Feng was originally exploring the First Realm mystic realm Demon Ant Nest when he heard the news of Shield Ghost appearing. He watched as the three wasteland reclaimers surrounded his idol. What could he do?! He immediately wanted to shout and stop them. However, a hand pulled him back. The black-clothed martial artist pulled him to the side and said, “Don’t make a sound. Watch first.” Zhou Feng was stunned. He knew this person. This person had always been by his father’s side and rarely appeared. “Do you plan to attack only after he’s in danger?” Zhou Feng immediately reacted. The black-clothed martial artist nodded. “Understood, but you have to promise that you won’t let my idol get injured. He was just taking a risk in the Tree King Sea and didn’t provoke anyone, but these three wasteland reclaimers jumped out to cause trouble,” Zhou Feng muttered. The black-clothed martial artist chuckled and said in an undetectable voice, “From the moment he rose up, he had already provoked the Germinal Organization.” Almost everyone did not have hope that Shield Ghost could win. They believed that with the strength of Shield Ghost, it was 90% likely that he could win if he was fighting one-on-one. He could also maintain his invincibility against two people. However, one against three? Stop joking. Go home and wash up to sleep. Only Third Realm martial artists could easily defeat three Second Realm martial artists. It was impossible for martial artists of the same level to have such a huge difference. However, this battle surprised them from the beginning. Shield Ghost stood on the spot. The attacks of the three wasteland reclaimers landed on him as if they did not exist and were completely blocked by the huge shield. Not only that, but the three wasteland reclaimers were also injured by the rebound, and their health points decreased very quickly. “Damn, it’s true damage!” the tall and thin wasteland reclaimer cursed. What is this equipment? Or is it a skill effect? The fat wasteland reclaimer muttered in his heart. “My attack can’t break through his defense?” The one-eyed wasteland reclaimer was even more shocked. Lu Luo was originally prepared to go and stop the fight, but she saw that Shield Ghost was safe and sound. Instead, the three people who started the fight were sweating and their health points were dropping crazily. “This Shield Ghost is stronger than I thought.” Her interest was piqued, and her high ponytail swayed up and down as she stared at the strange battle attentively. Eight minutes passed. Lin Xuan looked at his health bar. Yes, it was still full. Looking at the other three, they were all about to die. They were both mentally and physically exhausted by the effect of the Dragon Hunter Shield. It could reflect true damage and also cause serious injuries. They could not recover their health naturally and could only rely on potions to recover. However, potions were not easy to obtain. Only those martial artists with the “pharmaceutical” skill could make them. This also meant that the output of the medicinal potions was relatively low, and it could only be provided to those with high cultivation levels. The three of them also had medicinal potions, but they were all trump cards that could save their lives. How could they be used here? “You still want to fight?” Lin Xuan asked lazily. The three wasteland reclaimers wanted to cry. They had never seen such high defense in my life. Even ten Earth Dragon Kings would not be able to resist him, right? “No… Brother Shield Ghost, the three of us will pretend as if we did not encounter you today.” The tall and thin wasteland reclaimer stopped and hurriedly retreated. If they continued fighting, the true damage from the rebound would kill them. They would probably become the first to “commit suicide”. The wasteland reclaimers who were watching the commotion gloated as they watched the three of them escape with their tails between their legs. After today, Shield Ghost’s status in their hearts had increased again. “Shield Ghost is awesome!” “Shield Ghost, don’t join the Germinal Organization! You’re the hero in our hearts!” “So what if you’re a lone wolf. A lone wolf can also rely on his own efforts to surpass the large organizations!” Zhou Feng’s eyes were about to flicker with stars. “Damn, isn’t my idol too capable?” The black-clothed martial artist was somewhat depressed. He was still waiting to step out and help when Shield Ghost was in danger and obtain a good impression. However, he did not have this chance at all. Lu Luo was beaming and could not help but clench her fists. “Alright!” After defeating these three, Lin Xuan left under the admiring gazes of the many wasteland reclaimers. As usual, he changed his appearance and returned to the Germinal Organization. … Half a month later, Lin Xuan’s avatar began to train in the fourth region of the Tree King Sea. “This skill is not bad.” Lin Xuan looked at a skill book called “Avatar Technique” and his interest was piqued. The effect of this skill was to create an avatar that only had 20% of its attributes. The avatar could last for 30 minutes, and the main body could control the avatar. “I learned it! Perhaps I’ll be able to use it someday.” In addition, Lin Xuan also steadily increased his public strength to level nine of the Zero Realm. After teaming up with Sun Zhiguo and the others to challenge the mystic realm king of the Giant Rock Cave, he had “advanced” to the First Realm. Moreover, his level in the organization had also been increased to six stars. During this period of time, wave after wave of wasteland reclaimers from District C around Lin Xuan had died in the mystic realm. However, Lin Xuan had survived all this time. Not only did he survive, but he even advanced to the First Realm. This example also inspired many wasteland reclaimers. District B Overseer Yang Wei’s face became darker and darker. It was not the first time that he had secretly gotten his subordinates to find trouble with Lin Xuan. However, these wasteland reclaimers either could not find Lin Xuan at all, or they would be attacked by a Gold Swallowing Lizard for no reason. “I’m so angry. As an overseer, I can’t even do anything to a wasteland reclaimer.” Yang Wei was furious. At this moment, the alarm suddenly sounded. A dazzling red warning light flashed crazily in the dormitory, hall, and many other places. Manager Number One’s calm voice sounded from the radio. “A demon beast group is currently moving towards East Lake City. It is estimated that they will arrive at the east side of East Lake City in seven hours. All overseers and wasteland reclaimers, immediately rush to the east wall of East Lake City according to the plan!” The moment they stepped out of the entrance of the Germinal Organization’s base, they were greeted by a dilapidated scene. East Lake City used to be an extremely famous tourist city in the country. Now, it was only one of the many ruined cities in the world. If not for the door of light that led to the mysterious realm appearing here, even the Germinal Organization would not have entered East Lake City. “This seems to be the first time I’ve walked out of the Germinal Organization’s base and witnessed this abandoned world.” Lin Xuan sighed. In his previous life, he had lived in a thriving peaceful country. It was very difficult for him to imagine such a scene. There was a bus that collapsed on the road, covered in vines. The tall buildings were mottled and the glass shattered. A large group of refugees gathered outside the Germinal Organization base, built shacks, and struggled to live. Every day, wasteland reclaimers would die and refugees would be chosen to join the Germinal Organization and take their place. Seeing another group of wasteland reclaimers walk out, the refugees thought that they were here to sign more slavery contracts. They used all their strength to shout, “choose me, choose me!” Most of East Lake City had already been abandoned. This so-called “eastern wall” was actually built 5,000 meters away from the Germinal Organization base. It was the first line of defense to stop the demon beasts. Soon, everyone arrived. Lin Xuan saw the eight-meter-tall city wall and the machine gun towers, fire-breathing towers, and cannon towers standing on the wall. There were also many iron wires and bloody and rotten demon beast corpses under the city wall. These defensive towers did not need to be manually controlled. Any demon that appeared in the attack range would be killed automatically. As for the items that fell after killing the demon beasts, they would be picked up and handed over by the wasteland reclaimers guarding the city wall. As far as Lin Xuan could remember, East Lake City had only experienced this once. In other words, this was the first time the demon horde had appeared ever since that time. Therefore, guarding the four walls of the city had always been an idle job. The wasteland reclaimers from the four districts took turns to draw lots. However, Lin Xuan’s luck was bad and he had never drawn the lucky lot to guard the wall. A refined middle-aged man stood on a high ground and said loudly, “Everyone, I’m Manager Number Two of the Germinal Organization and the commander of this defensive operation.” “Manager Number One has already investigated. The total number of demon beasts attacking the east wall of East Lake City this time is about 50,000. There are 40,000 Zero Realm demon beasts, 8,000 First Realm demon beasts, 2,000 Second Realm demon beasts, and more than 50 Third Realm demon beasts.” As soon as he finished speaking, the expressions of the wasteland reclaimers changed. Fifty thousand demon beasts? So many? Moreover, there were even Third Realm demon beasts! Manager Number Two pressed his hands together. “Don’t worry. With the overseers holding the fort, the demon beasts won’t break through the city wall. All you have to do is stand on the city wall and use your long-range skills to attack these demon beasts.” “Manager Number One also provided additional information. These demons are all from Drowning City, so I recommend you use fire and lightning-type skills.” Lin Xuan was deep in thought. He had heard of Drowning City. He had heard that it was one of the few most dangerous and chaotic mystic realms in the world. It was located in the ocean, and the demon beasts inside were mostly the type that could move freely in the water. Many factions had previously thought of conquering Drowning City, but most of them had returned empty-handed. The name Drowning City was brought out by a team that had successfully attacked the mystic realm and escaped unscathed. They said that place was depressing and terrifying like a city that had been drowned. In addition, he also had some guesses about Manager Number One. Manager Number One rarely appeared, but he could easily find information on demon beasts dozens of kilometers away. Could it be that he had a long-range detection skill? “Get ready to stop the demon beasts.” Manager Number Two waved his hand and stood with his hands behind his back, looking at the desolate horizon in the distance. Sun Zhiguo leaned over to Lin Xuan. “If there’s any danger later, hide behind me. I don’t have much ability, but I have high resistance.” Lin Xuan’s heart warmed. Ever since he saved this Brother Sun, he had always been grateful and was determined to repay this favor. However, did he really have high resistance? Lin Xuan chuckled in his heart. There was no martial artist at the same level who could beat him in resistance. Several hours passed. Lin Xuan suddenly felt the ground tremble. He immediately perked up and stared at the horizon. The many wasteland reclaimers were originally very talkative, but now, they were getting nervous. Everyone knew that the demon beasts had arrived! A blue, thick, squirming line suddenly appeared on the horizon and quickly approached as time passed. On careful look, those were not thick lines at all. They were clearly a large group of blue-skinned demon beasts! There were fish demon beasts with fish heads and human bodies, prawns with human bodies, huge turtles more than three meters tall, and octopus demon beasts on the turtle’s back. All kinds of demon beasts entered their sight. Their ferocious aura made people tremble. The turret with the farthest attack range detected the approach of the demon and attacked first. Bang! A cannonball landed on the turtle’s back but was sent flying far away by the turtle shell. “What a powerful defense!” Sun Zhiguo exclaimed. “Begin!” District C Overseer Lu Luo shouted. All the wasteland reclaimers in District C hurriedly threw out their long-range skills. Those who did not have long-range skills could only pick up the machine guns on the city wall and shoot at the demon beasts. However, the outer skin of these demon beasts was very tough. It was very difficult to penetrate the outer skin with just this kind of kinetic weapon. It was best to use flames to deal with demon beasts from Drowning City. Lin Xuan had a long range skill. Inner Fireball. He casually threw out a small fireball. The fireball landed on the head of a fish demon beast, burning it until it cried out and its head was immediately charred. Seeing this, Sun Zhiguo and the other wasteland reclaimers immediately used their long-range skills on the fish demon beasts and quickly killed them. “I didn’t expect you to have fire skills. Good!” Sun Zhiguo laughed happily. The battle had reached its climax from the beginning. The demon beasts pounced over fearlessly, as if it hated everything in East Lake City. If not for the city wall and the advantage of the high ground attack, many of the wasteland reclaimers would have died. Lin Xuan was now slacking off. He still had Weaken on him, and his attributes had been weakened by a lot. Even so, he was still a First Realm martial artist on the surface. With a few fireballs, he could still kill a Zero Realm demon beast. If there are no accidents, then I’ll just have to slack off. Just as this thought appeared in Lin Xuan’s mind, the radio beside him suddenly sounded. “The western city wall has been attacked by demon beasts! There are more than 100,000 demon beasts, and the highest is a Seventh Realm demon beast! Manager Number Two and all the overseers on the eastern city wall, please proceed to the western city wall!” Manager Number One’s voice immediately sounded. His voice was still as magnetic and deep as before. However, Lin Xuan could tell that Manager Number One’s tone had lost its calmness from last time. Manager Number Two’s expression changed slightly and he immediately ran towards the west wall. Lu Luo and the other overseers immediately followed. Only the wasteland reclaimers were left on the east wall. “Damn… I didn’t expect these demon beasts to be so strategic!” “The overseers all left, but there are still many Third Realm demon beasts here. Can we guard them?” Sun Zhiguo was worried. Lin Xuan also sighed. He knew things wouldn’t go so smoothly. To the west of East Lake City was the East Lake. The East Lake merged into the Azure River and finally surged into the East Sea. The western city wall of East Lake City was built beside the lake and was rarely attacked by demon beasts. However, this time, a large number of demon beasts appeared in the East Lake. These demon beasts were much higher in level than the demon beasts that attacked the east wall. The lowest level demon beasts that appeared here were at the First Realm, and the highest level demon beasts even reached the Seventh Realm. It was the demon beast leader’s skill that blocked Manager Number One’s detection, allowing the hundred thousand demons to quietly approach within a thousand meters of the western city wall. When they were less than a thousand meters away, Manager Number One finally sensed them and hurriedly radioed for Manager Number Two and the three overseers guarding the eastern wall to rush to the western city wall. The Germinal Organization also immediately sent out news to get those martial artists who were exploring Third Realm and Fourth Realm mystic realms to return quickly. After reaching the Third Realm, they were already the elites of the Germinal Organization. If they wanted to be overseers, they could get on the job after passing the assessment. If they did not want to, they would have to take on the role of a “fighter” and explore the mystic realm. This time, too many demon beasts appeared on the western city wall. A portion of the Third Realm and Fourth Realm martial artists had to be mobilized to defend. Otherwise, there was a risk of the western city wall collapsing. Lu Luo, Yang Wei, and the other overseers followed Manager Number Two and rushed to the western city wall. When they saw the surging wave on the lake, their expressions froze. At this moment, Lu Luo remembered that the wasteland reclaimers in the four districts were currently attacking more than 50,000 demon beasts on the east wall. There were dozens of Third Realm demon beasts among them! However, there were no Third Realm martial artists among the wasteland reclaimers. Lu Luo asked, “Sir, what about the east wall?” Before Manager Number Two could speak, Yang Wei smiled in disdain and said, “Tell the refugees to block it themselves! They have to block it no matter what. If they can’t, they have to block it even if it takes their lives!” “Also, hasn’t Shield Ghost been very arrogant recently? Isn’t his reputation very powerful? Let him go!” Lu Luo instinctively wanted to punch him. Yang Wei hurriedly hid behind Manager Number Two. Manager number two pulled her back. “Don’t fight in such a time.” With that said, Manager Number Two sighed and said, “You have to take the overall situation into consideration. The west wall is more important. If we can’t handle it on our side, it’s useless even if we guard the east wall.” “On the other hand, if we guard the west wall, we can immediately return to defend even if they fail to guard it.” At this moment, another announcement sounded. This time, the voice was different from before. It was not Manager Number One. “The higher-ups of the organization need to guard the western city wall. All refugees are invited to the eastern city wall to help the wasteland reclaimers resist the demon beasts. After defeating the demon beasts, every refugee can receive a Zero Realm skill book, a Zero Realm equipment, and a three-day rations for an adult man. The outstanding contributors can directly become two-star wasteland reclaimers of the Germinal Organization.” Yang Wei smiled strangely. “Did you hear that? Manager Number Three is very decisive. As long as we give them some benefits, the refugees will immediately do what we tell them to.” “The refugees exist because of the Germinal Organization. If the Germinal Organization is gone, the refugees won’t be able to survive either.” Lu Luo kicked him, making Yang Wei cry out. “You’re right,” she said indifferently. Yang Wei cursed, “How dare you hit me when you know that I’m right? Sir, look!” Lu Luo snorted. “I just felt like hitting you.” “Alright, resisting the demon beasts is more important. Let the wasteland reclaimers and refugees resist the east wall. Whoever survives or dies… everything will be up to fate.” Manager Number Two shook his head and placed his attention on the demon beast that was quickly approaching. It was a five-meter-tall purple-black octopus. The patterns on its body were like flowing blood. It stood up and stretched its head into the window of the second floor. This Seventh Realm demon beast quickly locked onto the strongest expert in the crowd on the city wall. The man and the beast looked at each other, their eyes flickering with sparks. Hua. The black-clothed martial artist quietly appeared beside him. “Stop looking. You can’t beat it.” Manager Number Two :”…” He leaned closer to the black-clothed martial artist and whispered, “In the future, can you not ruin my reputation in public?” The black-clothed martial artist also whispered, “Alright.” Then, he shouted, “Hide behind me. Watch how I deal with that Demon Blood Octopus.” Manager number two: “…Didn’t you say that you won’t embarrass me?” The black-clothed martial artist whispered, “I said I won’t embarrass you in the future. We’re still in the present.” “Damn.” The refined Manager Number Two finally cursed. Lu Luo looked at the black-clothed martial artist curiously. She knew that Manager Number Two had always had an extremely powerful guard beside him. Manager Number Two had brought him in when he joined the Germinal Organization, but she had never seen the black-clothed martial artist take action. At this moment, the Demon Blood Octopus’s body suddenly expanded, and a huge amount of lake water was absorbed into its body. The next moment, the lake water was wrapped in the Demon Blood Octopus and shot over. It was like a violent water dragon that covered the heavens and the earth. The black-clothed martial artist suddenly pulled out an ice-blue broadsword from the storage compartment. The broad sword was ridiculously large. It was 1.8 meters long and 20 centimeters wide. It was difficult to imagine how the black-clothed martial artist was capable of waving this weapon. The black-clothed martial artist suddenly slashed downwards. The silver-white frost power blasted out and collided with the water dragon. In an instant, the water dragon froze, and the sun shone brightly. The Demon Blood Octopus’s bell-like eyes flashed with human-like shock and anger. The black-clothed martial artist put away his sword and calmly said, “I’ll keep an eye on the Demon Blood Octopus. You don’t have to worry about it for now. Worry about dealing with the other demon beasts.” With the encouragement of the black-clothed martial artist, Lu Luo, Yang Wei, and the other overseers immediately became motivated and unleashed skills of various grades. At the same time, on the eastern city wall. A large group of refugees rushed up the city wall noisily, picked up their machine guns, and started shooting randomly. It seemed that there were more people now, but Lin Xuan had to admit that a group of untrained refugees was… useless. Instead, they made things worse. In the chaos, many refugees had already lost their footing and fell down from the city wall. In an instant, they were drowned by the demon beasts, and not a single piece of flesh was left. Before Lu Luo and the others left, they had killed more than ten Third Realm demon beasts. Even so, there were still more than thirty Third Realm demon beasts left on the east wall. These Third Realm demon beasts were a huge hidden danger. From time to time, they could attack from afar and kill the wasteland reclaimers on the city wall. A huge toad swept a wasteland reclaimer away with its tongue. A bullet painted fish spat out mud bullets from its mouth, and its powerful kinetic energy directly shattered the heads of a group of refugees. The deaths of a large number of people had already made the wasteland reclaimers and refugees fearful. If the casualty rate increased even more, it would touch the red line in people’s hearts and cause a large-scale escape. At that time, the east wall would definitely collapse. Even if Lin Xuan’s identity was exposed, he still wouldn’t be able to resist tens of thousands of demon beasts alone. After failing the mission, he might even be expelled from the Germinal Organization. The wilderness was too dangerous. The level of the wandering demon beasts was unknown. Who knew if a Seventh Realm, Eighth Realm, or Ninth Realm demon beast would kill him tomorrow? “Shield Ghost, where’s Shield Ghost? He’s so powerful, why won’t he help us!?” “That’s right. Shield Ghost is also a resident of this city. If the eastern wall is gone, everyone will die. He should also understand this principle.” “Who knows Shield Ghost? Shout!” Lin Xuan took a deep breath and shouted, “I have a relationship with Shield Ghost. I’ll go get him!” With that said, he ran and entered the row of shack outside the Germinal base. “Damn, could he have run away ahead of time?” “We can’t guard this east wall anymore. Let’s retreat too.” The wasteland reclaimers and refugees were anxious and did not dare to continue. If they continued to fight, they would definitely become food for the demon beasts. If they ran now and returned to the vicinity of the Germinal base, they might even be able to survive. Everyone could tell the difference between dying on the spot and dying later. At this moment, two figures suddenly appeared. “Shield Ghost is here!” one of them shouted. Lin Xuan, who was covered in armor, felt a strange feeling rise in his heart. “I feel that it’s strange for me to use myself as a backup.” He had just run into the shack and found a deserted place and used his skill Avatar Technique to create an avatar. Now, the one wearing the equipment was his main body, and the one shouting was his avatar. Everyone instinctively turned around and indeed saw a familiar figure. Demon mask, black shield, and full-body armor. This immediately made people feel extremely safe. Wasn’t this the rising star, Shield Ghost!? Sun Zhiguo’s eyes widened. “Damn, Lin Xuan, you actually know Shield Ghost! You didn’t even tell me!” “That’s right, that’s right. I didn’t expect you to be hiding something! Tell me, how did you get involved with Shield Ghost?” The wasteland reclaimer beside him immediately leaned over and said excitedly, “Hey, hey, hey, can you get an autograph from Shield Ghost for me? I always worship him!” Lin Xuan strode up the city wall and punched the big toad’s tongue away. He berated, “Is this really the time to talk about this?!” The other party’s face was filled with shame. “Sorry, sorry. I was just too excited.” Lin Xuan shouted, “Protect me!” With that said, Shield Ghost jumped down from the eight-meter high city wall and into the demon beast crowd! “Hiss…” Sun Zhiguo widened his eyes and gasped. “Brother Shield Ghost, don’t commit suicide!” “Damn, how is he going to survive?” The wasteland reclaimers were also shocked. In order to resist the demon beasts, Shield Ghost had actually jumped in directly. How noble was this? “Ai… Shield Ghost seems to be very good…” One of the wasteland reclaimers suddenly realized that Shield Ghost was not instantly torn to pieces like they had expected. In contrast, Shield Ghost was now standing calmly on the spot. The two huge shields were like solid city walls, firm and unmoving. Not only that, but as soon as the Zero Realm demon beasts pounced over and collided with the huge shield, their bodies exploded as if they had collided with a sharp wall. A First Realm demon could at most collide with it three or four times before its entire body exploded. In just a few breaths, more than twenty demon beasts had collapsed beside Shield Ghost! Lin Xuan was also a little worried at the beginning and wondered if they could break through his defense. After all, there were so many of them. However, he quickly realized that his worry was unnecessary. Although there were many demon beasts, their attributes were very low. Moreover, the attributes of the demon beasts were relatively average. They couldn’t compare to him at all. After all, he had spent most of his free attribute points on Constitution. In the end, many Zero Realm, First Realm, and Second Realm demon beasts could not break through his defense. However, his own reflective damage and the Dragon Hunter Shield’s reflective damage could quickly kill the demon beasts. Moreover, Lin Xuan had already obtained two out of three “Impregnable Gold” rune parts in the past. During this period of time, the forging table in his consciousness space had been working all along. He finally obtained the third Impregnable Gold rune part. … Name: Impregnable Gold (1/2/3) Level: Level Nine Second Realm Quality: Peerless Golden Set Requirements: Shield above Second Realm Effect 1: Health Points+12%. Effect 2: Any attack that lands on this equipment will have a critical hit chance of -80%. Effect 3: Any attack that lands on this equipment will cause the user to recover 25 health points. … To add the rune enhancement, he would need to spend experience points. In order to strengthen his equipment, He would also need to consume equipment essence. After becoming a Second Realm martial artist, Lin Xuan quickly increased his skills, equipment, and runes to the Second Realm. Now, the entire Impregnable Gold rune group was embedded into the Dragon Hunter Shield. The effect of the Impregnable Gold rune group was the best when facing a large number of demon beasts. The attacks of a large number of First Realm demon beasts were unable to injure Lin Xuan. Instead, they would make him recover his health. Lin Xuan was incomparably happy. “Awesome!” “I can directly fight those Third Realm demon beasts!” He wielded the Earth Dragon King Hammer and casually smashed the demon beasts in front of him into meat paste before charging towards the huge toad. He had already used the Observer skill to take a look just now. The big toad was only a Third Realm demon beast. Its attributes were 31 Constitution, 41 Strength, 33 Spirit, and 25 Agility. Moreover, the other party’s attribute would also be suppressed by Lin Xuan’s skill, “Experienced Mystic Realm King Might”. The other party’s attributes could not compare to his own attributes. The big toad was shocked and furious when it saw a human martial artist actually dare to enter the demon beast group alone. Its saliva-covered tongue immediately stirred up a strong wind as it tore through the air and directly sent it into Lin Xuan’s mouth. Lin Xuan sneered and actually did not stop at all as he directly walked over. Clang! The huge tongue collided with the Dragon Hunter Shield. Not only was the shield not tied up, but the frog’s tongue even cracked as blood crazily surged. The big toad was about to retract it in pain when Lin Xuan grabbed the other party’s big tongue and used the other party’s retraction to quickly approach. Then, he raised the Earth Dragon King Hammer and smashed it fiercely! Bang! The big toad’s skin and flesh were lacerated as blood spurted from its body! It let out a tragic cry. The surrounding Third Realm demon beasts quickly supported. In the blink of an eye, Lin Xuan was surrounded by more than a dozen Third Realm demon beasts. More Third Realm demon beasts were rushing over. Lin Xuan activated his skills and also used his Overlord Set equipment skills to summon five soldier ants. These soldier ants’ attributes were 50% of his attributes. In other words, their Constitution was 42, Strength was 20, Spirit was 20, and Agility was 18. This attribute was only slightly weaker than a Third Realm demon, but much stronger than a Second Realm demon. Moreover, Lin Xuan could casually change the types of these soldier ants. Now, he had changed the five of them to Red Fire Soldier Ants. The Red Fire Ant’s acidity was very effective against these demon beasts from the Drowning City mystic realm. The many wasteland reclaimers and refugees on the city wall stood on high and saw an extremely spectacular scene. Countless demon beasts attacked Shield Ghost like a tide, but Shield Ghost was like a standing reef. No matter how fierce and anxious the tide was, it remained firm! “How awesome… Can a lone wolf really be this powerful?” Sun Zhiguo was shocked and amazed. “I’ve decided. I’ll leave the Germinal Organization tomorrow and become a lone wolf!” “Me too, me too! I don’t want to stay here anymore!” Lin Xuan’s avatar heard all of their words and sent them back to his main body. Lin Xuan, who was in the middle of the demon beast horde, could not help but laugh when he heard these words. If these wasteland reclaimers became lone wolves, they would probably be dead in three to five days. On the western city wall. In the early stages of the battle, the Germinal Organization was at a disadvantage. Although Lu Luo was only a level nine Third Realm martial artist, she had displayed strength that even a Fourth Realm martial artist might not be able to reach and forcefully repelled the attack of a large number of Fourth Realm demon beasts. A huge black sickle waved like a windmill, shattering the carapace and sending flesh and blood flying everywhere. Yang Wei and the other three overseers were shocked. They were clearly all level nine Third Realm. Why did it seem like she was on steroids and was ridiculously powerful? After the Germinal Organization’s fighters retreated from the mystic realm and joined the battle on the western city wall, the scales of the battle quickly tilted towards the Germinal Organization. Moreover, the black-clothed martial artist made the huge octopus demon beast feel fear. It never dared to enter the battle. In the end, the two sides did not fight to the death. The Seventh Realm demon beast roared angrily and dived into the lake. The many demon beasts also seemed to have lost their backbone and disappeared into the water. Lu Luo was covered in blood and her face was cold as she looked into the distance. She saw the waves fluctuate as before finally disappearing in the distance, heading towards the Azure River. Those demon beasts had clearly entered the Azure River from the East Lake. In the end, they would return to the Drowning City mystic realm in the East Sea. Manager Number Two heaved a sigh of relief. “We did it… return to the east wall immediately!” Lu Luo also reacted and put the huge sickle into her storage bag. She was the first to run towards the east wall. In comparison, Yang Wei and the other two overseers were not so anxious. They only slowly walked over. As for the fighters, they also did not care about the life and death of the wasteland reclaimers. Their mission had always been to explore the mystic realm. Therefore, after the battle on the western city wall ended, they immediately returned to the mystic realm. “Why are you running so quickly? There’s still no news of the east wall being lost. It must have been defended.” Yang Wei glanced at Lu Luo’s back and smiled in disdain. “I hope that there won’t be too many casualties…” Lu Luo was nervous. However, when she arrived, she saw an extremely shocking scene. A figure stood proudly on the corpses of a group of Third Realm demon beasts. The sunlight fell, but it was all swallowed by the black armor. At this moment, he was like a black guardian god. Without these Third Realm demon beasts as the leaders, the remaining Second Realm, First Realm, and weakest Zero Realm demons were naturally not enough. They had long died after being attacked by the defensive towers,wasteland reclaimer, and refugees. The wasteland reclaimers and refugees cheered for him. “Long live Shield Ghost!” At this moment, he seemed to have become the pillar of support for all the low-level members of society. Shield Ghost! Lu Luo sighed softly. She did not know if her sigh was out of admiration for Shield Ghost or helplessness towards the Germinal Organization. “This guy is really not bad. I wonder if my coin scattering strategy will work.” Manager Number Two’s voice sounded beside her. “Pay up.” The black-clothed martial artist had also arrived beside Manager Number Two at some point in time. Manager number two: “…What’s with that tone…” The black-clothed martial artist shook his head. “I was agreeing to what you were saying.” Lu Luo could not help but laugh. Soon, they obtained the specific situation of the eastern wall from the wasteland reclaimers. Lin Xuan was the one who got Shield Ghost to help. In the entire battle, everyone basically relied on Shield Ghost to win. He dared to jump into the center of the demon beasts alone! He dared to solo more than a dozen Third Realm demon beasts! The guards on the east wall were almost at the point of collapse. It was because of the addition of Shield Ghost that they were able to turn the tide. Lu Luo could not help but ask, “Sir, can the organization reward Shield Ghost?” Manager Number Two’s expression could not be seen. “I’ll mention it, but it’s most likely going to be rejected by Number Three.” Lu Luo smiled helplessly and thought of another person. “What about Lin Xuan? He called for Shield Ghost. We should be able to reward him, right?” Manager Number Two pondered. According to the descriptions of the other wasteland reclaimers, Lin Xuan’s performance in this battle had been ordinary. His only major contribution had been to use his friendship with Shield Ghost to call for Shield Ghost. Could it be that this person had a deep relationship with Shield Ghost? Manager Number Two immediately became interested in Lin Xuan. Shield Ghost was unmoved by force or persuasion. Perhaps he could persuade him with Lin Xuan’s help. “That shouldn’t be difficult. Don’t worry, the reward will come in a day at most.” Manager Number Two nodded. This battle between the east and the west city walls had happened very suddenly and ended very abruptly. However, among many wasteland reclaimers and refugees, someone had already spread the news widely. Shield Ghost! When the overseers and managers abandoned the eastern wall and rushed to the western wall, Shield Ghost stood forward and helped everyone guard the eastern wall! A few days later. The rewards for the battle were given. The wasteland reclaimers on the east wall all had their star rating raised by one level. Those who made outstanding contributions received an additional star. As for equipment, skill books, and runes, these were all included in the rewards. Lin Xuan’s rewards were relatively rich. His level in the organization had increased by another two stars and he went from a six-star wasteland reclaimer to an eight-star wasteland reclaimer. His single room had changed from a ten-square-meter small room to a twenty-square-meter small room. Although it was still small, it was much bigger than before. In addition, he obtained a rare blue equipment and a rare blue skill book. Sun Zhiguo and the other wasteland reclaimers were very envious. They had not been able to obtain rare blue-level equipment and skill books even after being in the mystic realm for a long time. Of course, these things were not very valuable in Lin Xuan’s eyes. He had no other use for them aside from smelting them at the smelting table. Only Shield Ghost had a rather interesting reward. “The refugee Shield Ghost has contributed greatly to the battle on the east wall. He is specially permitted to directly join the Germinal Organization and can directly obtain the status of a ten-star wasteland reclaimer. In addition, he will also receive two rare blue equipment and two rare blue skill books.” When this announcement sounded, the many wasteland reclaimers and refugees in East Lake City were in an uproar. Shield Ghost had made such a huge contribution and he was only worthy of being a ten-star wasteland reclaimer? If he could kill so many Third Realm demon beasts alone, shouldn’t he be directly promoted to a “fighter”?! The entire broadcast was even carried out with a lofty tone. It was as if they were saying: “Come! We don’t care.” Hearing this broadcast, Lu Luo frowned. She thought for a moment and knew that this was definitely done by Manager Number Three. It was still the same thing. The stronger Shield Ghost was, the more useless they seemed. As for Shield Ghost’s contribution? Killing a large number of Third Realm demon beasts alone? There were many sprouts of Third Realm martial artists in the Germinal Organization. There was no lack of them. Even if your Shield Ghost is very powerful, how many Third Realm martial artists can you beat? Three, four, five? Zhou Feng was also furious as he paced around his father’s office. He cursed Manager Number Three ten thousand times in his heart. As expected, Shield Ghost refused. He did not only reject the status of a ten-star wasteland reclaimer, he also rejected the rare blue equipment and skill books. The Germinal Organization acted high and mighty and gave out a poor offer. However, Shield Ghost was also unwilling to accept such an offer. Lin Xuan did not care about the attitude of the Germinal Organization. He only wanted to live a safe life in the Germinal Organization. When he became a Seventh Realm martial artist and could wander freely in the wilderness, he would be able to leave the Germinal Organization. Half a month later. [Current Area: Tree King Sea Ninth Region (1100 general coin per minute, 5,500 experience points per minute)] [Third training avatar, Shrouding Frost Tree, has been training for 10 hours and has already reached the upper limit of the training time. Obtained 660,000 general coins, 3300,000 experience points, 34 second-grade skill books, 59 second-grade equipment, 66 runes, 33 Shriek Fruits, 48 Fire Magic Cores, 40 Thunder Magic Cores, 32 Poison Demon Cores, 27 Ice Magic Cores. Do you wish to collect?] “Collect!” A large number of items landed in the consciousness space. However, Lin Xuan’s consciousness space had already reached level 5. The capacity of 200 cubic meters was enough for him to put everything in. Moreover, the consciousness space also had its own classification function. As long as Lin Xuan recited the word “sort”, it would automatically arrange the items according to their type and grade. This made Lin Xuan, who had a slight OCD but was too lazy to sort it out, feel rather comfortable. “I have a lot of experience points! I’ll level up!” Lin Xuan placed all his experience points into leveling up. Swoosh! Swoosh! Swoosh! His martial artist’s level quickly reached level nine of the Second Realm. Then, he invested his experience points into skills and runes and used his equipment essence to enhance his equipment. In this way, his martial artist level reached level nine Second Realm. All his skills, runes, and equipment also reached level nine Second Realm. A Second Realm martial artist could obtain 4 free attribute points per level. From level one to level nine of the second Realm, he could obtain a total of 36 free attribute points. As usual, Lin Xuan poured all of his attribute points into his Constitution. In this way, his basic attributes became 129 Constitution, 47 Strength, 48 Spirit, 43 Agility. Seeing these 129 points, Lin Xuan immediately felt a deep sense of security. “It’s time to challenge the mystic realm kings.” Lin Xuan found a deserted place and changed into Shield Ghost’s equipment. Then, he strode into the Second Realm mystic realm Tree King Sea. Every time a non-Germinal organization member entered the mystic realm controlled by the Germinal Organization, they had to pay an entrance fee. Moreover, they could only stay for three days, which was double the entrance fee for every day. Lin Xuan had to pay 20,000 general coins to enter the Tree King Sea. The wasteland reclaimers saw his figure and said in surprise, “Big Brother Shield Ghost, are you prepared to attack?” “He’s probably going to challenge a mystic realm king! I’m afraid it won’t be long before we can see Shield Ghost become a Third Realm martial artist!” Sun Zhiguo also saw this scene and praised, “As expected of Shield Ghost, his growth speed is too fast.” Zhao Yong, the wasteland reclaimer from District B, saw the back of Shield Ghost enter the door of light and pondered. He, who was about to enter the Demon Ant Nest, suddenly turned around and ran to the Overseer of District B, Yang Wei. “Brother Yang, Shield Ghost has gone to the Second Realm mystic realm. I think he’s probably preparing the materials for advancement.” Yang Wei smiled strangely, “That’s good, let’s go and block the door.” Zhao Yong found it somewhat difficult to say, “Brother Yang, we can’t beat Shield Ghost…” The battle on the eastern city wall had made Zhao Yong completely realize the strength of Shield Ghost. If a Second Realm martial artist could beat up a Third Realm demon beast, wouldn’t that mean that he could easily beat up a few hundred First Realm chickens like him? Yang Wei waved his hand. “I’ll do it myself!” Zhao Yong’s eyes lit up. “You’re already a Fourth Realm martial artist?” Yang Wei said, “Of course! Sir Number Three also rewarded me with many good items. He also gave me a few precious purple equipment and skills!” Zhao Yong had an envious expression. It was good to be valued by the manager. Yang Wei said proudly, “Lord Number Three has long disliked Shield Ghost, but it’s not appropriate for him to say so. And as Lord Number Three’s loyal supporter, I naturally have to resolve his problems!” “The moment Shield Ghost walked out of the mystic realm king’s cave will be the moment of his first failure! I’ll say it again: either join the Germinal Organization or die in the mystic realm! No lone wolf is allowed to grow in East Lake City!” After saying this, Yang Wei’s mind was already filled with thoughts. If he could force Shield Ghost to join the Germinal Organization or drive the other party out of East Lake City, he would definitely be recognized and valued by Manager Number Three! At the same time, in the ninth region of the Second Realm mystic realm Tree King Sea. There were eight caves here, and many martial artists had gathered in seven of them. Of course, there weren’t as many wasteland reclaimers in a Third Realm mystic realm as there were in the First Realm and Zero Realm mystic realms. Lin Xuan swept his gaze over and only saw twenty or so second-level wasteland reclaimers. “Shield Ghost is here!” “He’s indeed walking straight towards the cave of the experienced mystic realm king.” “As expected of Shield Ghost. He doesn’t even care about mystic realm kings.” Lin Xuan quickly walked into the cave. A huge tree with a circumference of five people appeared in front of him. The huge tree was blue in color, and there were fruits flowing with lightning on its branches. The fruits rippled gently, as if electricity was flowing in them. It was an experienced mystic realm king, Plasma Tree King! … Name: Plasma Tree King Title: Experienced Mystic Realm King Level: Level Nine Second Realm Attributes: Constitution: 45, Strength: 50, Spirit: 82, Agility: 4 Skill: Ancient Tree Skin (Precious Purple), Plasma Bomb (Precious Purple), Ground roots (Precious Purple), Earthquake Double Strike, Plasma Lightning Landmine … Seeing the attributes, Lin Xuan nodded confidently. At this moment, he was wearing the Giant Shield Set. His physical resistance had increased by 50%, and his resistance to all elements had increased by 60%. He also had a passive skill, Basic Elemental Resistance, which provided him with another 30% resistance to all elements. In addition, the Metal Bone Armor, Flame Bone Armor, Lightning Bone Armor, Poison Bone Armor, and Frost Bone Armor had also been dropped when he killed the ant queens in the Demon Ant Nest. After killing the ant queens, Lin Xuan synthesized the skill “Omnipotent Bone Armor” on the synthesis table. The activation of the skill provided another 30% elemental resistance and 20% physical resistance. With the superimposition of these resistances, a complicated formula was involved. Lin Xuan could not see this formula, but he knew that the percentage of resistance was based on the basic resistance value provided by his “Constitution” attribute. If the stacked resistance value exceeds the attack value of the target on the user, he would be able to completely resist the damage. If the resistance value was lower than the attack value, he would naturally be injured. “Quickly whip me. Quickly let me endure the baptism of the storm.” Lin Xuan took out his Dragon Hunter Shield and Earth Dragon King Hammer Shield and stood rooted to the ground with a look of enjoyment. The Plasma Tree King shook its crown in anger as a large number of electric berry plasma smashed towards Lin Xuan. Bang bang bang. The purple-blue electric berry plasma exploded, dying Lin Xuan’s surroundings completely purple-blue. Lin Xuan suffered very little damage and would soon be filled with life force again because of his shocking recovery speed. On the other hand, the Plasma Tree King would be injured by the reflective damage of the Dragon Hunter Shield, and its health points would quickly decrease. 20 minutes and 48 seconds later, the battle ended. The Plasma Tree King wailed and exploded, transforming into light that filled the sky. “You received 50,000 General Coins and 250,000 experience points.” “You obtained the rare blue equipment [Dragon Emblem Ring].” “You obtained the rare blue equipment [Withered Berry Plasma Fruit Core].” “You have obtained the peerless golden rune [Lightning Shattering the Darkness (1)].” “You have obtained an uncommon green Skill Book [Earthquake Double Strike].” “You obtained five peerless golden advancement materials [Plasma Tree King’s Battle Tree Root].” The effect of the Dragon Emblem ring was to increase the strength of magic skills. Magic skills were different from elemental skills. The Dragon Emblem ring only increased the strength of magic skills by 20%. The effect of the Withered Berry Plasma Fruit Core was to increase the power of lightning skills and reduce the magic power consumed by lightning skills. As for the “Lightning Shattering the Darkness” rune, it was also a rune that increased the strength of lightning skills. Needless to say, this was a very simple physical attack. Lin Xuan was half surprised and half helpless. “They’re all useless, but the other party actually dropped five advancement materials!” “However, I can keep this peerless golden rune. Perhaps I can also think about becoming a lightning user in the future.” “I didn’t get the thing I wanted the most. No, I have to get it.” What Lin Xuan wanted the most was the skill “Ancient Tree Bark”. This skill also provided defense. As a martial artist who was still on the rise, survival was naturally the most important. He needed to prioritize his defense! “I’ll wait for the second mystic realm king.” Lin Xuan waited for a few minutes before the second mystic realm king appeared. However, this time, it was a Shrouding Frost Tree. “Shrouding Frost Tree King, let me see your skill… Damn, not a single Ancient Tree Bark skill?” Lin Xuan shook his head repeatedly. After killing this mystic realm king, he continued to wait. Immediately after, the Shrieking Tree King appeared. After using Observer to check the information, he discovered that this one did have an ancient tree bark skill. However, this skill would not be dropped after it was killed. “I don’t believe that I won’t be able to get it!” Lin Xuan was determined to get this skill. This was because if he could not get it now, it would be even more impossible for him to get it in the future when his level was higher. Although his training avatar was powerful, he could not use it to challenge a mystic realm king. After all, with so many wasteland reclaimers watching, he couldn’t exactly send his avatar into the cave of a mystic realm king. It would definitely be caught and cut into pieces for research. Lin Xuan continued to wait. “I’ll continue to grind. It’s not very tiring anyway.” Outside the cave, Yang Wei, who had been sitting here for more than an hour, had a stiff expression. The bosses in the cave had already changed several times. From the Plasma Tree King to the Shrouding Frost Tree King, and then to the Shrieking Tree King! Why was Shield Ghost still not out?! As he waited, complicated emotions rose in Yang Wei’s heart. Shield Ghost was indeed worthy of his name. This person was too powerful. This was a Second Realm mystic realm. However, Shield Ghost had first killed the experienced mystic realm king before killing two more. Moreover, he had been killing them alone the entire time. Now, he actually did not have the slightest intention of resting. He just waited in the cave for the mystic realm kings to respawn. If such combat strength was really absorbed by the Germinal Organization and he became a fighter, he would definitely be a top-notch elite. Yang Wei continued to wait. Lin Xuan continued to grind mystic realm kings. Finally, he obtained the Ancient Tree Bark skill book. “There are also enough materials for advancement. Why don’t I advance to a Third Realm martial artist here?” Lin Xuan chuckled. As long as he pierced the two shields into the ground, even the mystic realm kings would not be able to break through his defense. “Advance!” Lin Xuan tapped the arrow on the data panel. The five experienced mystic realm king advancement materials turned into streams of light and entered his body at the same time. Just like before, the experienced mystic realm king advancement materials all had+3 attributes. All of this added up to a total of+15 all attributes. In just a few minutes, Lin Xuan had advanced from a level nine Second Realm martial artist to a level nine Third Realm martial artist. At this moment, his basic attributes were: Constitution 144, Strength 62, Spirit 63, and Agility 58. “The feeling of becoming stronger is really good. It’s time to go back and rest.” Lin Xuan turned around and walked out of the cave. At this moment, outside the cave, Yang Wei had been sitting for the entire time. His butt had even stiffened, and he could not help but stand up and rub his butt. At this moment, Lin Xuan walked out with a smile and looked at Yang Wei, who was rubbing his butt. Their eyes were filled with embarrassment. As expected of an overseer, Yang Wei immediately suppressed the embarrassment in his heart and said, “Shield Ghost! I came today to give you an ultimatum. You either join the Germinal Organization or leave East Lake City!” The surrounding wasteland reclaimers who were queuing in front of the cave also stopped queuing at this moment and stretched their necks to look fiercely. Some of the wasteland reclaimers respected Shield Ghost, some were more willing to serve the Germinal Organization, and some simply wanted to watch the show. Seeing this, a wasteland reclaimer from District C immediately ran to tell Lu Luo about this. Lu Luo, who was searching for attribute items in the Tree King Sea, immediately rushed over when she heard the news. However, after hearing Yang Wei’s words, Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. Even if the high and mighty manager had a bad impression of him, he would not be willing to personally step forward. Presumably, Yang Wei planned to use this opportunity to win the favor of Manager Number Three. However… he was simply not qualified for this job. Lin Xuan used his Observer skill and immediately saw through Yang Wei’s attributes. He was a level one Fourth Realm martial artist and had 35 Constitution, 25 Strength, 79 Spirit, and 25 Agility. His equipment was also not very impressive. He had two precious purple items and the rest were rare blue items. His skills were even worse. He only had one precious purple skill and the rest were all rare blue. Lin Xuan secretly swept his gaze over the runes on his equipment. Damn, not a single one was precious purple. They were all rare blue. Moreover, all the equipment, skills, and runes did not have additional equipment essence and experience points to level up at all. The highest was only at level seven Third Realm and had not advanced to the Fourth Realm. Looking at his attributes again, Lin Xuan was satisfied. He was clearly only at level one Third Realm, but he was already comparable to Yang Wei, a level one Fourth Realm martial artist. Even if he did not advance, the difference between them was not huge. At this moment, Lu Luo had already arrived at the cave from afar and saw the figures of Shield Ghost and Yang Wei. Her face was cold as she tried to approach. However, she had only taken a few steps when she caught a glimpse of the black-clothed martial artist sitting casually on the stone bench and drinking Tsingdao Beer. “Why don’t you stop them?” Lu Luo asked softly. The black-clothed martial artist chuckled. “This Shield Ghost is stronger than you think. You have to have confidence in him.” “Moreover, I actually hope that Yang Wei can suppress Shield Ghost. That way, I will have the chance to save him. In this way, I can increase the favorability of Shield Ghost.” Lu Luo :”…” “They’re starting, they’re starting.” The black-clothed martial artist handed over three different brands of beer. “Take whatever you like.” Lu Luo took a bottle of Xuehua Beer and took a few gulps before focusing on the battle. “Big Fireball!” “Acid corrosion!” “Five consecutive lightning whips!” “Icicle Technique!” Yang Wei’s voice sounded continuously. All kinds of skills were used as he attacked Shield Ghost. Red flames, blue lightning, green poison, white frost… It had to be said that Yang Wei’s elemental skills were very varied and he had dabbled in all four elements. However, after using a skill, Yang Wei’s magic power had been exhausted by three-quarters, but Shield Ghost was still motionless. The Dragon Hunter Shield and the Earth Dragon King Hammer Shield were as thick as before. The black armor on his body seemed to be able to absorb all attacks. “Oh? Are you waiting for the cooldown to end? Do you want me to wait for you?” Shield Ghost’s hoarse voice sounded from under the armor. Yang Wei was so furious that his face and neck turned red. Lin Xuan transformed the Earth Dragon King Hammer Shield into its hammer form and smashed it down. Bang! Yang Wei was sent flying like a rag doll. His previous attack on Lin Xuan had already caused him to suffer a lot of reflective damage and lose a lot of his health points. Lin Xuan’s attack directly injured Yang Wei. When Yang Wei flew out, the wasteland reclaimers were all dumbfounded. Yang Wei was a Fourth Realm martial artist, but he was actually sent flying by a single hammer smash from Shield Ghost. Could it be that Shield Ghost was also a Fourth Realm martial artist? That’s not right. Why would a Fourth Realm martial artist come and grind for advancement materials? What was the level of Shield Ghost…? Yang Wei spat out blood as he stared at the figure in full armor in fear. In the past, he had secretly mocked Shield Ghost for wearing the evil ghost mask to deliberately make the enemy feel fear. Now, as Shield Ghost walked towards him step by step, he really felt fear. An evil ghost! It was really an evil ghost! Then, Shield Ghost walked past him and did not continue to attack. Lin Xuan knew very well that injuring Yang Wei and killing Yang Wei would bring definitely two different consequences. Once the Overseer was killed, this matter would immediately affect the Germinal Organization’s reputation. The managers would probably immediately order for him to be arrested. Even if Manager Number Two had a good impression of him, it would be difficult for him to intervene in this matter. At that time, Lin Xuan would probably be caught. He believed that he still did not have the strength to resist a Sixth Realm manager. Moreover, who knew if there were even stronger martial artists hidden in the Germinal Organization? The fear in Yang Wei’s heart gradually disappeared as Shield Ghost left. “Fortunately, thankfully, I’m still alive…” Yang Wei’s heart was still palpitating.” Shield Ghost is too powerful. If he had more time to grow, I probably wouldn’t have been able to last a single round in his hands. ” “Shield Ghost, wait.” Lu Luo suddenly said. Lin Xuan stopped. Even the Overseer of District C wanted to stop him? “I’m still short of four Fire Demon Cores and one Lightning Demon Core. Do you have any? Yang Wei and I have a personal grudge to resolve. I can help you beat Yang Wei up again,” Lu Luo said calmly. Yang Wei: “…Lu Luo, no, Sister Lu, we’re colleagues. Do you have to be so ruthless?” Lin Xuan directly took out these attribute items from his consciousness space and threw them over. “I accept your deal.” With that said, he directly left the Tree King Sea. Lu Luo accepted these items and took out a long whip. This long whip was only of ordinary white grade and its damage was also very low. It was most suitable for beating people. Crackle! Crackle! Lu Luo waved her whip repeatedly and whipped Yang Wei’s butt fiercely. “Ouch! Ouch, ouch, ouch!” With every whip, Yang Wei would wail miserably. The surrounding wasteland reclaimers stared at him and laughed crazily in their hearts. A few of them could not help but laugh. “Hey! What are you laughing at! Stop looking, all of you get lost!” Yang Wei cursed as he groaned. On the other hand, Lin Xuan had already changed his equipment and returned to his single dormitory. He knew why Lu Luo had made the deal. After Shield Ghost attacked the Overseer of District B, the matter could be seen as a lone wolf attacking the overseer of the Germinal Organization. The other overseers might find trouble with Shield Ghost. Even if Shield Ghost only counterattacked passively, they still believed that this matter had damaged the Germinal Organization’s reputation and wanted to get back at him. However, now that Lu Luo had gotten involved and said that she had a personal grudge with Yang Wei, the situation immediately changed. It became a matter between an overseer and another overseer. The tension immediately disappeared. Even if some managers wanted to use this matter to make a fuss, they had to blame both Lu Luo and Shield Ghost. However, Lu Luo was not an ordinary overseer. She was only at level nine of the Third Realm but was able to suppress many Fourth Realm martial artists. Moreover, she had also made outstanding contributions to the western city wall’s defensive battle not long ago. At this moment, her reputation was at its peak. Who would suppress such a person? They would rather rope her in. In the end, this matter would probably be left unsettled. The truth was just as Lin Xuan had guessed. The matter had really been left unsettled. However, it still became a joke that the wasteland reclaimers told each other. Next, I have to think about how to enter a Third Realm mystic realm. After all, wasteland reclaimers can’t enter. Lin Xuan paced back and forth in his small dorm, thinking hard. Only the highest-level administrators knew how many mystic realms the Germinal Organization had in total. At this moment, Lin Xuan only knew that the Germinal Organization had mastered the Zero Realm mystic realm Giant Rock Cave, the First Realm mystic realm Demon Ant Nest, the Second Realm mystic realm Tree King Sea, and the Third Realm mystic realm Poison Mosquito Swamp. There were also the Fourth Realm mystic realm Coiling Thread Cave and the Fifth Realm mystic realm inferior Demon Mountain. Poison Mosquito Swamp, Coiling Thread Cave, and Inferior Demon Mountain were mystic realms that only overseers and fighters could enter. Once the wasteland reclaimers grew to become Third Realm martial artists, they would naturally be absorbed by the Germinal Organization. They would either become overseers and supervise the other wasteland reclaimers or become fighters who entered stronger mystic realms. These three mystic realms were also what Lin Xuan and Sun Zhiguo had talked about. “I’m afraid I can only seek help.” Lin Xuan thought of the black-clothed martial artist. The black-clothed martial artist came and went like the wind. However, every time he went to the mystic realm as Shield Ghost, he would always see the black-clothed martial artist drinking different brands of beer at the edge of the crowd. Lin Xuan thought for a moment and suddenly heard a deep rumbling sound from somewhere. “I wonder which mystic realm it’s coming from?” Lin Xuan shrugged. Since there was no news from his side, it was clearly a mystic realm he had never been to. At this moment, someone knocked on the door. He opened it and saw that it was Lu Luo. “Someone wants to see you. Follow me.” With that said, Lu Luo immediately led him out. Lin Xuan nodded and followed. Lu Luo was a protective person. It was not likely for her to harm him. After walking for a while, they arrived at a ruined house outside the Germinal base. Lin Xuan saw the black-clothed martial artist here. Just like before, his entire body was hidden under his black clothes, and his face could not be seen clearly. This time, he was still drinking his beer. He was drinking Baiwei Beer this time. Seeing Lin Xuan arrive, he burped and smiled. “Young man, don’t be afraid. I’m Manager Number Two’s guard. I heard that you have a deep relationship with Shield Ghost. I need your help to pass a message.” Lin Xuan said, “Please tell me.” The black-clothed martial artist said, “Shield Ghost should have just advanced to the Third Realm, right? He can’t enter the Third Realm mystic realm, but Number Two can help him enter.” “Now, there’s a small problem with the Poison Mosquito Swamp in the Third Realm mystic realm. The water in the swamp has worsened, causing a large number of Poison Mosquitoes to reproduce. If the Poison Mosquitoes reproduce too much, it will result in difficulty for the Untainted Lotus, Clear leaf, and other attribute items to grow. We now need a large number of Third Realm fighters to enter the Poison Mosquito Swamp and destroy the overly expanded Poison Mosquito nest to kill a large number of Poison Mosquitoes.” After the black-clothed martial artist finished speaking, he smiled and said, “Shield Ghost definitely won’t refuse this invitation.” Lin Xuan was overjoyed. It was as if someone had given him a pillow just as he was about to doze off. How wonderful! However, he did not show much joy on his face. Instead, he nodded in confusion. “I’m not too sure about the thing regarding the Poison Mosquito. Moreover, I’m only friends with Shield Ghost. He only trusts me more than other people. Why don’t I get Shield Ghost to come over personally tonight and let him talk to you in person?” The black-clothed martial artist said, “Alright.” At night. Lin Xuan changed into Shield Ghost’s equipment and arrived at the ruined house that day. Just like before, the black-clothed martial artist had long been waiting here while drinking. “I’m here.” A hoarse voice sounded from under the black armor. The black-clothed martial artist chuckled. “I said that we would meet again.” “I still don’t know your name.” “Black.” “Alright.” The black-clothed martial artist smiled and said, “Lin Xuan should have told you the specific situation already. Number Two is currently short of people. We can let you enter the Poison Mosquito Swamp with a special identity. We won’t take any of the items you obtain. How about that?” Fighters and overseers were different from wasteland reclaimers. They did not have to wear collars and would not be monitored by the Germinal Organization. However, they still had to complete a fixed number of missions every time they entered the mystic realm. Moreover, if the wasteland reclaimers obtained rare blue and precious purple items, they would definitely be forcefully bought by the Germinal Organization. However, the fighters and overseers did not need to do so. They only needed to complete the fixed number of missions. They could keep those as long as they completed their missions. “Condition?” Lin Xuan said calmly. There was no such thing as a free lunch in the world. The other party had not requested for him to hand anything in. Based on this, he could already guess that the other party had hidden conditions. Black smiled and said, “Manager Number Two and Manager Number Three have always been in a competitive state. Since Manager Number Two joined the Germinal Organization halfway, his faction is much weaker than Manager Number Three.” “If the faction is weak, the number of subordinates will decrease. If the number of subordinates is small, the benefits will decrease. If the benefits are small, it will naturally be difficult for more people to join. More and more fighters are leaning towards joining Number Three’s faction.” “There are four overseers, and three of them are on Number Three’s side.” At this point, Black stopped talking and looked at him quietly. Lin Xuan immediately understood the meaning of his words. The battle in the Poison Mosquito Swamp was actually a battle between Number Two and Number Three. Number Two wanted to use this battle to showcase the strength of his side. Number Three wanted to use this battle to continue consolidating his advantage. Although this was only a battle with little influence, no matter which side won, it would make the other party seem useless. When the fighters choose their superiors, they would naturally take this into consideration. “I have a condition,” Lin Xuan said. “Please tell me.” “If I kill the most Poison Mosquitoes this time, I want the qualification to enter the Third Realm, Fourth Realm, and Fifth Realm for an extended period of time.” Black looked at Lin Xuan with interest. “I agree.” Lin Xuan was puzzled. “You can represent Manager Number Two?” Black Lang smiled and said, “I’m his bodyguard. If he doesn’t listen to me, I won’t protect him.” Lin Xuan :”…” Did this employer and bodyguard have a reversed relationship? Lin Xuan asked, “Time?” Black. “Eight o’clock tomorrow morning at the base hall.” Lin Xuan nodded and turned to leave. Black looked at his back and clicked his tongue in wonder. “This guy is filled with ambition. He has only just become a Third Realm martial artist, but he’s already thinking about the Fifth Realm and Fourth Realm mystic realm.” … The next morning, at 8 AM, Lin Xuan arrived at the hall in time. The wasteland reclaimers passed him in surprise. Didn’t they hear that Shield Ghost and the Germinal Organization had fallen out? Why would he still dare to stand casually in the Germinal Organization hall? Soon, a group of Third Realm fighters also arrived and chatted in small groups. Their high-spirited appearance made the wasteland reclaimers yearn to become them. If only we could also advance to the Third Realm and become a fighter. Unfortunately, most wasteland reclaimers couldn’t even advance to the Second Realm, let alone the Third Realm. These fighters were very surprised to see Shield Ghost. Why was a lone wolf standing here? A white-clothed fighter suddenly said, “I have some impression of this person. His nickname is Shield Ghost. Previously, he completely defeated Yang Wei in the Tree King Sea.” “Yang Wei? Didn’t he advance to the Fourth Realm? How was he defeated by a lone wolf?” The other fighters said in surprise. “We also know what level Yang Wei is at. Although he had barely gathered five advancement materials, none of them were dropped by the experienced mystic realm king. Although he is only at level one First Realm, his attributes are still much inferior to mine, a level seven Third Realm expert.” The white-clothed fighter chuckled and said, “However, since Shield Ghost can defeat Yang Wei, he still has some strength. In a while, when we enter the Poison Mosquito Swamp, we have to pay attention to him.” “I see. Mo Yuan, do you mean that Shield Ghost will enter the Poison Mosquito Swamp with us?” The other fighters were deep in thought. “Why else would he be standing here at this time? As expected, Manager Number Two has invited him,” said Mo Yuan with a smile. Indeed, soon, Manager Number Two and Manager Number Three arrived together. This was the first time Lin Xuan had seen Manager Number Two. He was unexpectedly young. Based on his appearance, he seemed like he was younger than thirty years old. His face was terrifyingly pale, as if he had never seen sunlight before. Manager Number Three was very handsome, thin, and appeared to be very cold. He could easily capture a young girl’s heart with a charming smile. Number Two smiled at Number Three, and Number Three also nodded lightly. The two of them did not seem to have any conflict on the surface. “Do you want to speak first or should I?” Manager Number Two was the first to speak. Manager Number Three said, “Go on. I don’t like to talk too much.” Number Two nodded and turned to the many fighters. “You should also know the specific information. The water in the Poison Mosquito Swamp has worsened, and the poison mosquitoes have multiplied in large numbers. As a result, this has suppressed the growth space of the Unstained Lotus and other attribute items. What you need to do is to eliminate the poison mosquitoes and destroy the nest.” “In order to show the competitive nature of the organization, I’ll give everyone a bracelet this time. The bracelet will record how many poison mosquitoes you’ve killed and how many nests you’ve destroyed. Don’t worry, the bracelet is different from the collar. It won’t monitor the storage compartment.” The last sentence was only brought up so that Shield Ghost could rest assured. Manager Number Two said, “Since there are a lot of Poison Mosquitoes this time and considering that there are fewer Third Realm martial artists in the organization, I have specially invited Shield Ghost to join this operation. Everyone, please welcome him.” Clap, clap, clap. The fighters applauded. “Let’s go. I don’t want to waste any time,” Manager Number Three interrupted. Mo Yuan was the first to enter the door of light. The many fighters followed closely behind. Lin Xuan was the last to enter the mystic realm. As soon as he entered the Poison Mosquito Swamp, Lin Xuan could smell an extremely unpleasant stench. “Damn, I haven’t been here for a day, but the swamp water has gotten so bad.” “No wonder the higher-ups hurriedly organized people to clean up the poison mosquitoes. At this rate, those attribute items like the Unstained Lotus won’t be able to last for long.” “Time to work!” The many fighters immediately scattered. Although there was no reward on the surface, everyone knew that the person who eventually eliminated the most number of Poison Mosquitoes would definitely be recognized by the manager. In this way, they naturally had to split up and not let others snatch the credit. Lin Xuan glanced at them and discovered that most of the fighters were cautiously advancing along the edge of the Poison Mosquito Swamp, not daring to directly enter. He had already looked around with his Observer skill and discovered that most of these fighters were below level three and level four of the Third Realm. Only the few in the lead were at level six or level seven Third Realm. There wasn’t anyone who had a cultivation level higher than level seven Third Realm. The higher-level ones carefully entered the Poison Mosquito Swamp, but they did not go too deep. Lin Xuan shrugged and strode into the depths of the Poison Mosquito Swamp. The poison mosquitoes outside were not enough. He planned to find poison mosquitoes with higher attributes in the depths so that he could have a stronger avatar. Mo Yuan and the other fighters killed the poison mosquitoes all the way to the sixth region of the Poison Mosquito Swamp. Only then did they stop. The Poison Mosquito Swamp was divided into nine regions. The first three regions only had ordinary Poison Mosquitoes, and the fourth, fifth, and sixth regions had Venomous Poison Mosquitoes. On the other hand, the last three regions had Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes. Mo Yuan had often come to the Poison Mosquito Swamp and had long known how terrifying these poison mosquitoes were. Once someone was targeted by more than a hundred poison mosquitoes, it was very easy for them to be superimposed with the state of being poisoned. One could easily go from being poisoned by ordinary poison to being poisoned by venomous poison and ferocious poison! The Venomous Poison Mosquito was also very life-threatening. Its speed of stacking poison was many times faster than ordinary Poison Mosquitoes. After suffering a few bites, one would directly be poisoned by venomous poison. As for the Ferocious Poison Mosquito, there was even less of a need to mention it. It could poison one with venomous poison just with one bite and poison one with ferocious poison with just three bites. After being bit, one’s health points would fall like a waterfall. There were not many antidotes on Mo Yuan. He had to use them sparingly. “It’s because I didn’t get the two skill books, Venomous Poison Resistance and Ferocious Poison Resistance. Moreover, my poison resistance is also not high. Otherwise, I would have been able to explore the seventh region.” Mo Yuan sighed. As long as he could stack the poison resistance effects, there was nothing to be afraid of. “I’ll cleanse the poison mosquitoes in the sixth region and destroy the nest. It shouldn’t be difficult for me to get first place.” Mo Yuan nodded slightly and prepared to start searching for the nest. At this moment, he saw a figure in full armor walk past him without any intention of stopping. Mo Yuan was stunned. Shield ghost? He actually did not stop in the first region and walked all the way here? “If I remember correctly, this guy should have just advanced to the Third Realm, right? He dares to casually walk around here?” Mo Yuan could not figure it out no matter how he thought about it. He could not help but say, “Shield Ghost, stop moving forward. There will be Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes ahead. The poison is very powerful.” The pitch black armor paused for a moment, and a hoarse voice sounded from within. “Thank you for the warning.” Then, Shield Ghost continued forward without stopping. Mo Yuan: “…If you don’t listen to the good guys, you’ll be at a disadvantage.” He shook his head and ignored it. It was true that one would obtain more benefits by killing the Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes and destroying their nests. However, that would only be the case if one could remain alive. In his opinion, Shield Ghost was too ambitious. After defeating a Fourth Realm martial artist, it seemed that the other party had completely overestimated his own strength. … In the seventh region of the Poison Mosquito Swamp. Bang! A fist-sized poison mosquito collided with Lin Xuan’s large shield and was instantly blasted into a bloody mist. “Strange, my poison resistance seems to be very poor against the Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes. Could it be that the poison of the Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes is not ordinary poison?” Lin Xuan discovered that he had lost more than ten health points. Although he recovered in a second, he was still puzzled. To be cautious, he did not enter deeper and stopped in the seventh region. He looked around and quickly found a Ferocious Poison Mosquito with the highest attributes. “You’re the one!” Lin Xuan stepped forward and killed the other party in a few moves. [Dead target detected, analysis in progress…] [Ferocious Poison Mosquito, level seven Third Realm demon beast. Attributes: Constitution 35, Strength 26, Agility 59, Spirit 54. Skills: High Speed Flight, Silent Flight, Ferocious Poison, Life-Steal.] [Cause of death: Bashed to death by the Earth Dragon King Hammer] [Currently, you have an extra avatar slot. Do you wish to possess the Ferocious Poison Mosquito and turn it into the fourth training avatar?] [Remarks: This dead target will immediately be revived with full health.] “Yes.” The corpse of the Ferocious Poison Mosquito that had been smashed into pieces by the Earth Dragon King Hammer immediately expanded like it was being blown by air. It was instantly lifelike, no different from before. “Begin the training.” [Current Area: Poison Mosquito Seventh Region (1800 general coin per minute, 9,000 experience points per minute)] [Poison Mosquito Message: The water in the swamp is getting worse. poison mosquitoes are reproducing in large numbers. Duration: 96 hours.] “10,000 experience points per minute. This is already pretty good.” “I’m currently a level one Third Realm martial artist. To advance to level two Third Realm, I need 1 million experience points. From level two to level three, I need 2 million experience points. In other words, to become a level nine Third Realm martial artist, I need 45 million experience points. In other words… 4500 minutes, or 75 hours.” Lin Xuan smacked his lips. “Other than that, I also have a set of skills to upgrade… the path to leveling up is still long.” Leaving the Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes to train, Lin Xuan turned around and left the seventh region. On the way back, he also looked down at his bracelet. The bracelet was an uncommon green equipment. It should be made by a manager of the Germinal Organization. Lin Xuan guessed that it might be Manager Number One. The effect of the bracelet was very simple. It could detect the poison mosquitoes and nests that the equipment owner had killed and display one’s points and points ranking. “An ordinary poison mosquito will get 1 point, a venomous poison mosquito will get 5 points, and a Ferocious Poison Mosquito will get 10 points.” “1,000 points for clearing the ordinary Poison Mosquito Nest, 5,000 points for clearing the Venomous Poison Mosquito Nest, and 10,000 points for clearing the Ferocious Poison Mosquito Nest.” “My current kill point is 25, and my ranking… is 49.” “There’s no rush. I’ll return to the first region to rest and wait for the gains from my avatar.” A moment later, Mo Yuan saw Shield Ghost walk past him calmly again with a dumbfounded expression. “Yes, the Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes are indeed very dangerous. I think I’ll go to the first region.” As he passed by, Lin Xuan chuckled with a hoarse voice. Mo Yuan scratched his head. He thought that Shield Ghost would be attacked by many Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes and die in the seventh region. “He’s a person who knows his own limitations and is not stupid.” Mo Yuanxin thought to himself. Lin Xuan quickly returned to the first region and found a place with fewer poison mosquitoes to sit and rest. His line of sight was fixed on the Ferocious Poison Mosquito’s point of view, and he watched his avatar train happily. … Ten hours later. Lin Xuan looked at the points list on his bracelet. The first was Mo Yuan. His points were 43,891, far surpassing the second place’s 32,833. The third place was even fewer, only around 10,000. His points were the same as before. They did not change at all and had been lying in the last place for ten hours. Even the second last place had more than 4,000 points. “Let’s see what we got. I’m looking forward to what good stuff the poison mosquito Swamp will get me.” [Current Area: Poison Mosquito Swamp Ninth Region(2000 general coin per minute, 10,000 experience points per minute)] [Number four training avatar, the Ferocious Poison Mosquito, has been training for 10 hours. Maximum training time has been reached. Received 1.2 million general coins, 6 million experience points, 21 Third Realm skill books, 37 Third Realm equipment, 43 Third Realm runes, 8 Poison Crystals, 4 Venomous Poison Crystals, 13 Ferocious Poison Crystals, 4 unstained lotus flowers, and 3 Clear Leaves. Do you wish to collect?] “Collect!” Lin Xuan looked at these attribute items first. The Ferocious Poison Crystal provided Ferocious Poison Resistance, the Venomous Poison Crystal provided Venomous Poison Resistance, and the Poison Crystal provided ordinary Poison Resistance. They all increased Poison Resistance by 1%. “No wonder the Ferocious Poison Mosquito can still injure me. It turns out that their poison is different from ordinary poison.” Lin Xuan was enlightened. Previously, when he walked directly from the first region to the seventh region, he had discovered on the way that ordinary poison mosquitoes were unable to break through his poison resistance. The venomous poison mosquitoes could cause him 1 to 5 damage, and the Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes could cause 10 to 50 damage to him. Moreover, they could also stack the poison effect. “The effect of the poison resistance will be greatly reduced when dealing with the venomous poison. The effect will be even worse when dealing with the ferocious poison.” Lin Xuan nodded repeatedly and looked at Unstained Lotus and Clear Leaves. These two items could increase experience points drop and 1% common currency drop, respectively. “No wonder the higher-ups of the Germinal Organization are in a hurry to chase the fighters in and eliminate the poison mosquitoes. Be it experience points or general coins, they are all things that martial artists need urgently.” Lin Xuan used all the attribute items he had obtained and looked at the skill book and equipment he had obtained. “6 Venomous Poison Resistance, 5 Ferocious Poison Resistance, 1 Venomous Poison Arrow, 5 Venomous Poison Weapons, 1 Acid Erosion Art, and 3 Mosquitoes Summoning. They’re all here.” In these 10 hours, all the skill books that could be dropped from the Poison Mosquito had been dropped. They were all lying quietly in Lin Xuan’s consciousness space. “Venomous Poison Arrow is for bows and weapons. Venomous Poison Weapon is for melee weapons. Acid Erosion Art is for staff weapons. Summoning Poison Mosquitoes Summoning should be used for summoning, right? None of this has anything to do with me. I just want Venomous Poison Resistance and Ferocious Poison Resistance.” Lin Xuan immediately learned these two passive skills. … Name: Venomous Poison Resistance Level: First Level Third Realm Grade: Rare Blue Learning Requirement: 40 Constitution Effect: Venomous poison resistance+20%. … Name: Ferocious Poison Resistance Level: First Level Third Realm Quality: Precious Purple Learning Requirement: Constitution: 45 Effect :+20% Ferocious poison resistance. … Seeing the effects of these two passive skills, Lin Xuan was very satisfied. Passive skills meant that they did not need to be used with magic power and always worked. Then came the equipment and runes. Lin Xuan carefully browsed through and discovered that there was not a single rare blue item in the equipment. The grade of the items dropped was rather poor, so he decided to smelt them. As for the runes, something good had appeared. … Name: Fatal Spirit Medicine (1) Level: First Level Third Realm Quality: Peerless Golden Set Requirements: Armor above level one Third Realm Effect 1: Health Recovery speed+70%. Effect 2: (Locked) Any venomous poison or ferocious poison attack that lands on this equipment will be converted to Health Points to treat oneself. Effect 3: (Locked) Any venomous poison or ferocious poison attack that lands on this equipment will cause the attacker to obtain a “violent poison state”. … “This rune set is perfect! I’ll quickly embed it.” Lin Xuan immediately embedded it into his huge shield. He believed that it would not be long before the consciousness space forging table could be used to forge the other two runes of the Fatal Spirit Medicine rune group. Or perhaps, his training avatar could obtain the other two runes through training. No matter what, this was a good thing for Lin Xuan. “Let’s start earning points!” Lin Xuan smiled and strode towards the seventh region. He did not fancy ordinary poison mosquitoes, Venomous Poison Mosquitoes, and their nests. Since he wanted to earn points and become the number one expert, he had to eliminate the Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes and destroy their nests. That way, he would be able to earn points faster. At the same time, in the hall of the Germinal base. Manager Number Two and Manager Number Three stood in front of a large screen. Black sat on the table and drank happily with Lu Luo, not caring about Manager Number Two’s unhappy expression. Manager Number Three said indifferently, “Number Two, the external help you invited doesn’t seem to have made a move.” He was naturally talking about Shield Ghost. At this moment, Shield Ghost’s name was ranked last among the 68 third-level fighters. Moreover, it had not changed for the past 10 hours, as if he was dead. However, Shield Ghost was clearly not dead. If he was dead, the bracelet would capture the death signal and remove his name from the ranking. Manager Number Two was a little embarrassed. He had high hopes for Shield Ghost. A person who could defeat a Fourth Realm martial artist after just advancing to the Third Realm was definitely not an ordinary person. However, Shield Ghost’s action was a ruthless slap to his face. “Don’t be anxious. Perhaps Shield Ghost is resting. In any case, we don’t have a time limit this time.” Black finished a can of beer and flattened it. He burped and chuckled. “Lu Luo, don’t you think so?” Lu Luo burped cutely. “I think… burp… you’re right.” Number Three frowned slightly. He wanted to kick Black out. However, Black had previously intimidated a Seventh Realm demon beast and forced it to not dare to act rashly, making a huge contribution. Before this, he had never known that Number Two’s bodyguard was actually so powerful. Manager Number Two coughed lightly and was about to say something when he suddenly saw the points behind Shield Ghost begin to change. His eyes lit up. “Look, he’s already starting to make a move.” Before he could finish speaking, the number behind Shield Ghost began to increase at a terrifying speed. Less than a second ago it did not even reach 100. A second later, it increased to 2,000. In a minute, he reached 20,000 and quickly surpassed the second last place. Manager Number Three’s eyes widened slightly. Could it be that this Shield Ghost had been hiding his strength all along? Number Two was somewhat smug as he smiled. “Not bad, not bad. He’s starting to work.” … Lin Xuan glanced at the scoreboard and said with a smile, “After destroying a Ferocious Poison Mosquito nest, my points increased by more than 20,000. Not bad.” Three minutes ago, he had found the first Ferocious Poison Mosquito nest in the seventh region. The Ferocious Poison Mosquito nest was built on a dry tree. It was similar to a beehive, but its entire body was dark green and looked rather terrifying. A large number of Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes lingered near the nest.They were like black clouds. Seeing Lin Xuan approach, they immediately approached like small bombers. Lin Xuan’s response strategy was ridiculously simple: erect a shield and daydream. He was wearing the Giant Shield Set. He also had Basic Elemental Resistance, Venomous Poison Resistance, and Ferocious Poison Resistance. Coupled with his 129 Constitution, the attack of the Ferocious Poison Mosquito was unable to break through his poison defense. Moreover, as the Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes had high attack and low HP, it was very easy for them to be killed by true damage. His killing efficiency could be said to be shocking. In less than ten minutes, all the Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes in this nest rushed out like moths to a flame and committed suicide. All of them ended up dying. Lin Xuan transformed the Earth Dragon King Hammer Shield into its hammer form and smashed it randomly. Soon, he destroyed the nest of the Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes. “There are almost a thousand mosquitoes in a Ferocious Poison Mosquito nest. Not bad.” Lin Xuan smiled and began to search for a second nest. After finding it, he did the same thing and dealt with it calmly. With the help of his poison resistance skill and those attribute items that permanently increased his Ferocious Poison Resistance, his Ferocious Poison Resistance was already relatively powerful. Even if the Ferocious Poison Mosquito could cause him some insignificant damage, he would still recover quickly at an extremely high speed. A few minutes later, the second Ferocious Poison Mosquito nest was destroyed, and Shield Ghost’s points increased by more than 20,000. “The density of the nests in the seventh region is a little low. I’ll go deeper.” Lin Xuan strode towards the eighth region and casually resolved the nest of the Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes he encountered. Everywhere he passed, the nests would collapse and the Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes would die. At the same time, on the other side, Mo Yuan found a relatively small venomous poison mosquito nest. He spent a lot of effort and even used a bottle of antidote. It took him more than 40 minutes to destroy it. He wiped the sweat from his forehead and heaved a sigh of relief. “In that case, my number one advantage should have been completely stabilized. I can rest for a few hours and slow down.” Mo Yuan smiled in satisfaction. In the past, destroying the nest required a team of up to four people. It also took more than 30 minutes. It was not bad for him to spend 40 minutes alone. However, when he opened the scoreboard, he was dumbfounded. He was only in second place. The first place was Shield Ghost. The other party’s points had shockingly reached more than 80,000! Moreover, the number was still rising quickly. And he only had 50,000! The other fighters were also dumbfounded when they saw the scoreboard. For the past 10 hours, Shield Ghost had always been in the last place. Why had he suddenly soared to the first place and even pulled the gap between it and the second place Mo Yuan by more than 30,000? After all, it was too ridiculous. “Could it be that there’s a mistake with the points ranking?” Manager Number Three stared at the scoreboard with a solemn expression. Manager Number Two was smiling so widely that the corners of his mouth almost reached his ears. “Do you dare to doubt the ability of Number One to forge equipment?” Number Three was speechless. Manager Number One’s forging ability was indeed unique. The collars worn by the Germinal Organization’s wasteland reclaimers were all made by Number One. After all these years, nothing had gone wrong. Since he could even forge a collar that could record points, how could a mere bracelet that recorded points be faulty? “But why are the points increasing so quickly?” Manager Number Three still frowned. At this moment, Black placed his legs on the table in an ungentlemanly manner and his body comfortably embedded into the sofa. “Do you even need to think? Shield Ghost must have destroyed four nests in the seventh region or even deeper. In that case, it would also mean that he had killed more than 80,000 Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes.” “Seriously, if you can’t even figure this out as a manager, why don’t you give me your seat?” The veins on Manager Number Three’s forehead throbbed. In region nine of the Poison Mosquito Swamp. Lin Xuan had already cleared all the nests on his way here. Since the swamp water of the Poison Mosquito Swamp originated from region nine, this was also the place with the worst swamp water. The density of the nest of the Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes was even more ridiculous. On average, he would encounter a small nest every 100 steps and a large nest every 500 steps. There were at least 1000 Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes in the small nest, and more than 3000 in the large nests. Lin Xuan was extremely satisfied as he killed them. He was very efficient in dealing with this kind of demon with high attack and low HP. As long as he raised his shield, he could wait for them to commit suicide. “I didn’t realize it before. Just raising my shield is tiring. What? I’ve already worked for almost 40 minutes? It’s time to rest.” Lin Xuan rubbed his arm that was not sore. Seeing that he had a huge advantage and had already pulled away from second place by more than 80,000 points, he was very satisfied. He quickly found a relatively clean place to sit and doze. Mo Yuan had a pleasantly surprised expression. He, who had been paying attention to the scoreboard, suddenly realized that the number behind Shield Ghost had stopped increasing. “Is Shield Ghost being chased by a large number of poison mosquitoes and not daring to turn around to kill it?” “Or has he been chased to the point of hiding somewhere to avoid the search of the poison mosquitoes?” No matter what it was, Mo Yuan was very happy. This meant that he could fight back! “Shield Ghost! You shouldn’t have given me this chance!” “I could have rested, but I won’t! I want to surpass you!” Mo Yuan was secretly happy. He took advantage of the fact that Shield Ghost’s points had not increased and hurriedly searched for the venomous poison mosquito nest. Even if he was a little tired, he did not stop. He could not slack off at all! It was not only him. The third, fourth, fifth, and other fighters on the leaderboard all stood up as if they had been injected with chicken blood and hurriedly went to eliminate the poison mosquitoes. Originally, they had all given up. The huge difference made them despair. “Kill, kill, kill! I want to get first!” Mo Yuan killed fiercely. After being poisoned, he was not stingy with the antidote and immediately used it. “If I don’t force myself, I won’t even know how powerful I am! At this speed, as long as I don’t rest, I have a chance of surpassing Shield Ghost in five hours!” Mo Yuan was surprised to see that his efficiency in eliminating the poison mosquitoes was much higher than before. Ten hours later, Mo Yuan’s eyes were red and bloodshot, and his entire body was covered in different degrees of injuries. His elegant white robe had been shattered into pieces. It was very difficult to find a few good pieces of flesh on his entire body. Almost every part of his body had been bitten by the poison mosquitoes. Even so, he was very happy. This was because he had surpassed Shield Ghost! Moreover, he had surpassed it greatly! Now, he had already obtained 100,000 points and was ranked first on the leaderboard. The original third place also seemed to be ruthless, surpassing Shield Ghost and arriving at second place. Joy and satisfaction surged from his heart. Mo Yuan sat on the ground happily. “I’m too tired. I should rest…” Before closing his eyes to take a short rest, he could not help but look at the scoreboard again. Then… he stood up suddenly. This was because the first place had been occupied by Shield Ghost again. The other party had a total of 105,000 points! “It’s only been half a minute since I last saw the scoreboard…” Mo Yuan choked speechlessly. He was the strongest among the Third Realm martial artists of the Germinal Organization. Back then, Manager Number Two and Manager Number Three had given him rather generous terms, hoping that he would join their respective factions. The other fighters did not have such treatment. However, now, when facing Shield Ghost, a mere lone wolf, he felt deeply helpless. “Did the heavens send this person to punish me? Since he can take the lead, don’t give me a chance. Don’t let me see any hope of surpassing you!” Mo Yuan really wanted to rush in front of Shield Ghost and ask fiercely why he was being toyed with! On the other side, Lin Xuan continued to advance with his shield raised as he checked the harvests of the Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes. Needless to say, the efficiency of eliminating the poison mosquitoes was rather high. “Venomous Poison Crystals and Ferocious Poison Crystals. They’re all at full capacity.” “I’m still short of one Untainted Lotus and two Clear Leaves. I should be able to get them all in the next training.” Lin Xuan’s face was filled with happiness. “Eh, this equipment is not bad. It’s even one of the sets!” He suddenly discovered that he had obtained a precious purple equipment that could increase his poison resistance. … Name: Poison Medic Bird Mask Level: Level Seven Third Realm Quality: Precious Purple Equipment Requirements: Constitution: 46, Spirit: 29 Effect: Constitution+3. Effect 2 :+5% Ferocious Poison Resistance. Set Effect 1: Recovers 10 Health Points from any poison attack. Set Effect 2: (Locked) When attacked by any poison, the attacker will be put in a negative state. Set Effect 3: (Locked) Reflect 20% more damage when attacked by any kind of poison. … “The other two items of the Poison Medic Set are the Poison Medic Leather Top Hat and the Poison Medic Linen Robe. These two items should not be difficult to obtain. I’ll just have to train more.” Lin Xuan was very satisfied. After filling up this Poison Medic Set and increasing his level of cultivation, skills, equipment, and runes, he would be able to challenge the experienced mystic realm king. Although he could still challenge the other party with his current strength, it might be risky. Since there was still room for improvement, Lin Xuan was more willing to increase his strength to the limit before killing the Boss. Days passed. Lin Xuan’s pace never changed. After resting for 10 hours and working for 10 minutes, he could still be considered to be working diligently! With his extremely high killing efficiency, his points directly exceeded 500,000 on the last day. This meant that he had destroyed 25 Ferocious Poison Mosquito nests and killed 25,000 Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes alone. As for the second place Mo Yuan, he worked extremely hard to slightly exceed 120,000 points. After that, he could not increase it no matter what. Seeing the terrifying number of Shield Ghost’s ranking, the fighters were all numb and could not help but have the urge to compete. “Oh? The stench that has been lingering in the air has disappeared. Looks like the swamp water is no longer deteriorating.” Lin Xuan suddenly felt the stench that had been lingering in his nose disappear. At this moment, his bracelet trembled slightly. “The poison mosquito swamp water has stopped deteriorating. Please return to the base hall.” A line of text appeared at the top of the leaderboard. “It’s time to go back.” Lin Xuan nodded slightly. In the past few days, he had already obtained all three parts of the Poison Medic Set. During this time, the forging table had been constantly forging runes and had also forged the other two runes of the Fatal Spirit Medicine rune group. He had basically obtained all the possible gains from the Poison Mosquito Swamp. All he lacked now was experience. As long as he increased his cultivation level, the next time he came, it would be the time to challenge the experienced mystic realm king. Lin Xuan stepped through the door of light and returned to the hall of the Germinal base. Before him, many fighters had already returned. When Mo Yuan saw the familiar figure enveloped in the black armor, he could not help but feel a wave of fear surge from the bottom of his heart. Damn, this guy was no different from a hacker! Lin Xuan swept his gaze around and discovered that many of the fighters were dejected and dispirited. Moreover, compared to the 68 people who entered, only 59 people returned. Clearly, some of them had died in the Poison Mosquito Swamp. Perhaps they had bitten off more than they could chew and had rushed into an area that they shouldn’t have entered. Perhaps because they had attracted the hatred of too many poison mosquitoes. In any case, no matter how they died, Lin Xuan would never be able to go through what they did in his entire lifetime. From this, it could be seen that Lin Xuan was quite envious of them. “I wonder what it’s like to be surrounded and attacked by countless poison mosquitoes? It must be very exciting. Unfortunately, I’ve never encountered such a situation before.” Lin Xuan smacked his lips in anticipation. Manager Number Two and Manager Number Three arrived together. Number Number Two could not hide the smile on her face. The corners of his mouth were about to reach his ears. Number Three still had a cold expression on his face, but it was even colder and uglier than before. Black whispered, “Image.” Only then did Manager Number Two cough lightly and recover his usual refined appearance. He smiled and said, “All the fighters have done very well. During the deterioration of the swamp water, a large number of poison mosquitoes were wiped out and many nests were destroyed. The organization is very satisfied.” “Especially with Shield Ghost!” With that said, he pointed at the figure enveloped in the black armor. “He single-handedly destroyed more than 25 Ferocious Poison Mosquito nests and killed more than 25,000 Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes! Everyone, give him a round of applause!” Manager Number Two was the first to applaud and was very enthusiastic. Applause also sounded from the fighters. “Considering the contributions Shield Ghost has made to the Germinal Organization this time, after discussion between the three of us managers, we have decided to give Shield Ghost the identity of an ‘honorary fighter’. He can enter and leave the Poison Mosquito Swamp, the Coiling Thread Cave, and the Inferior Demon Mountain like the other fighters,” Manager Number Two said loudly. The fighters were stunned. Mo Yuan could not even speak. As a lone wolf, Shield Ghost had actually obtained the identity to enter the mystic realm freely like them. Manager Number Three slowly said, “Of course, Shield Ghost is not an official fighter of the Germinal Organization. Every time he enters and leaves the mystic realm, the mission requirements assigned to him will be multiplied by 1.5. Moreover, Shield Ghost is also unable to obtain the general coin rewards the Germinal Organization gives to the fighters every week.” Only then did Mo Yuan and the others heave a sigh of relief. This was more like it. If Shield Ghost’s mission was the same as theirs, and he could freely enter and exit the mystic realm and also obtain general coins as rewards, then he would be no different from official fighters. Lin Xuan also nodded. This was the qualification he wanted. He did not need the other rewards. Manager Number Two followed closely and said, “Since Shield Ghost contributed greatly this time, we have decided to reward him with the right to choose any precious purple item. It can be any equipment, skill books, or runes.” The surroundings were in an uproar. Mo Yuan’s eyes were filled with envy. A precious purple item! Until now, he had only received one. It was given to him by Manager Number Three when he first joined. As for the other Third Realm fighters, there was even less of a need to mention them. They were simply unable to obtain the precious purple items. There were only two ways to obtain precious purple items. One was to stay in the mystic realm for a long time to keep killing demon beasts in hopes that the drop rate of 0.01% would favor them. Otherwise, they would have to accumulate general coins and exchange them in the Germinal Organization’s logistics department. Compared to the former, the latter was clearly easier to achieve. The fighters were frugal because they wanted to exchange for a precious purple equipment, a precious purple skill book, or a precious purple rune. Once they obtained it, it would increase their strength greatly! Lu Luo was also present. She was slightly moved when she heard this news. Manager Number Two really valued Shield Ghost. Hearing this reward, Lin Xuan did not have much of a reaction. It’s just a precious purple item. What’s the big deal? He had plenty of them in my consciousness. It was only after a while that he reacted. To other martial artists, precious purple items were extremely rare. Only then did he cough lightly and respond in a hoarse voice, “Yes, thank you.” Mo Yuan simply wanted to go crazy. Damn! That was a precious purple item! This guy did not seem to care at all! Seeing Shield Ghost’s humble appearance, Manager Number Two was even more satisfied. Alright! This is how someone he valued should behave! It was only a precious purple item. What was there to be excited about? If it was a peerless golden item, he would still be excited. The battle of the Poison Mosquito Swamp ended here. The fighters split up in twos and threes and lowered their heads to discuss a name. The shocking battle record of Shield Ghost in the Poison Mosquito Swamp was quickly spread among the wasteland reclaimers and even the refugees. At this moment, this “Shield Ghost” that they had been talking about had already arrived at the logistics department of the Germinal base with Manager Number Two. With Manager Number Two accompanying him, no one would be able to stop them. Lin Xuan was able to wander around the equipment, skills, rune, and attribute items areas under the logistics department. His horizons had been broadened. There was only one word to describe the Germinal Organization’s logistic reserves: abundant! There were all kinds of items of various grades. As long as he had enough general coins, he could buy anything. However, because the drop rate of certain attribute items was extremely low, the price of these attribute items was also relatively high. As for the advancement materials dropped by the experienced mystic realm kings, because they were all of peerless gold grade, the number was pitifully small. Manager Number Two noticed his gaze and said with a smile, “Everyone wants this kind of thing. Usually, after it’s placed in the attribute item area, it will be quickly exchanged for.” Lin Xuan nodded slightly and did not stop here. Manager Number Two was very surprised. The advanced materials for experienced mystic realm kings were actually not attractive to Shield Ghost? He acknowledged Shield Ghost even more. Lin Xuan paced back and forth a few times before finally stopping in the rune area. “Let’s do this.” He picked up an Earth Protection rune. Manager Number Two nodded slightly. “Alright, take it.” Given Shield Ghost’s equipment, it was obvious that it had high defense and high HP. Moreover, the Earth Protection Rune also provided high physical resistance and HP, which was suitable for him. After taking this, Lin Xuan turned around and prepared to leave the logistics department. Manager Number Two suddenly said, “What’s the relationship between you and that Lin Xuan in District C?” Lin Xuan’s heart trembled. Could it be that Number Two has guessed his true identity? However, thinking about it again, he realized that he had never revealed any flaws. No one would link a new rising star to the mediocre Lin Xuan from District C. After a short moment of thought, a hoarse voice sounded from the black armor. “You want to use him to control me?” Manager number two laughed. “No, no, you’re mistaken.” “If Lin Xuan and you have a deep relationship, I can take care of him for your sake.” The hoarse voice continued, “I just find Lin Xuan more pleasing to the eye. Of course, there aren’t many people in the entire Germinal Organization that I like.” Manager Number Two smiled and nodded. “I understand.” Lin Xuan continued forward. This time, Manager Number Two did not say anything to stop him. “Looks like we can indeed start with Lin Xuan. As long as I get into Lin Xuan’s good graces, the chances of me getting into Shield Ghost’s good graces will naturally increase.” Manager Number Two chuckled. “You usually have the image of a refined middle-aged uncle outside. However, when no one is around, you laugh so wretchedly.” A voice suddenly sounded from behind him. Manager Number Two’s expression froze. He turned around and saw that the other party was indeed Black, who was drinking beer excitedly. “What’s your Agility? Why do you walk like a ghost?” Number Two said awkwardly. Black said in a strange tone, “Have you ever thought that it’s because your Agility is too low?” Number Two was speechless. … Time quietly passed. In the blink of an eye, two weeks passed. Lin Xuan was also quietly becoming stronger. “I’ve already obtained everything from the Giant Rock Cave, the Demon Ant Nest, and the Tree King Sea. All the skills, equipment, and runes that can be dropped have already been dropped. Moreover, they have all been upgraded to peerless golden grade. It’s useless for me to use those avatars now. After I advance to the First Realm, I’ll remove these training avatars from the slots and then possess more avatars in the First Realm mystic realm.” “That’s not right. The training avatar of the Giant Rock Cave is still useful. I still need the minerals from the Giant Rock Cave to forge my equipment. Unless I find a mystic realm that can provide better minerals, I can’t remove that training avatar for the time being.” Lin Xuan had already made a plan in his mind. “Now, his martial artist’s level, equipment level, skill level, and runes level have all reached level nine Third Realm. It’s time for him to challenge the experienced mystic realm king of the Poison Mosquito Swamp. Lin Xuan looked around for a place to change his equipment. First, he wore the Poison Medic Set. which included a top hat, a bird beak mask, and a linen robe. Then, he also equipped the Giant Shield Set. Only he could do this because his constitution was high and he could carry enough weight. Lin Xuan arrived at the main hall of the base. Because Manager Number Two had already informed them, no one stopped him. He successfully entered the Poison Mosquito Swamp. After arriving here, he rushed straight to region nine and arrived at the mystic realm king caves. There were ten king caves in the Poison Mosquito Swamp. However, because the combat strength of the Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes was too powerful, martial artists did not have enough poison resistance to resist the ordinary poison, venomous poison, and ferocious poison. Or perhaps because they did not bring enough antidote with them, the fighters did not dare to easily enter. In this way, a happy situation appeared in Poison Mosquito Swamp. Among the ten caves, five were experienced mystic realm king caves… Lin Xuan was very happy. Finally, he was able to kill multiple experienced mystic realm kings in one go! When he arrived, he happened to see a small figure in front of the cave. Dressed in a small suit, the figure had a ponytail and plump cheeks. It was Lu Luo. “Lu Luo, Sister Lu, it’s not that I don’t want to be on your team. I am in a long term team.” “Sister Lu, you’re very powerful, but we can’t cooperate. Forget it.” The fighters all rejected Lu Luo, but they did not dare to offend her. They only smiled and declined. Lu Luo’s name had long spread among them. This woman was famous for being difficult to cooperate with. She often rushed to the front. The medic could not heal her, and the shield-bearers could not catch up to her. A team challenging the experienced mystic realm king cave consisted of four people. Therefore, they had to cooperate well. Lu Luo’s open combat style was fine when dealing with the other experienced mystic realm kings, but not when it came to the Ferocious Poison Mosquito King. The Ferocious Poison Mosquito King knew how to recruit a whole bunch of lackeys. Moreover, it was able to recruit more and more lackeys. No matter how ferocious a person was, they would still die if they were surrounded by a large number of Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes. Of course, with Lu Luo’s combat strength, it was very likely that she would not die even after being separated from her other three teammates… For the sake of their lives, they had to reject Lu Luo. Lu Luo frowned angrily. At this moment, she noticed a figure in black armor, and her small face immediately flashed with happiness. “Shield Ghost! Join my team. I’m just short of a single experienced mystic realm king advancement material.” “No.” Lin Xuan’s first reaction was to refuse. What a joke! How could the experienced mystic realm king advancement materials be shared with others? They had to be monopolized by him! Ptui! He had to suffer alone! However, he quickly reacted. There were a total of five mystic realm kings in the Poison Mosquito Swamp. Even if he calculated all of them according to the lowest drop rates, he would be able to gather the five advancement materials he needed. Lu Luo wrinkled her nose. She also understood that Shield Ghost had been extremely outstanding in the previous battles against the Poison Mosquitoes. Moreover, it must have increased his resistance to poison. Without the help of outsiders, he should also have a high chance of killing the experienced mystic realm kings alone. Lu Luo gritted her teeth. “I previously obtained a blueprint for a peerless golden ring, but I need a lot of materials. Moreover, I don’t have the…” Lin Xuan said, “I agree.” Lu Luo :”…” All the fighters :”…” His attitude had changed really quickly. However, it seemed a little wasteful for Lu Luo to exchange for the peerless golden blueprint. Especially since it was a ring blueprint. In many games, one could only wear one ring or necklace. However, the global dataization was very realistic. With ten fingers, one could wear ten rings! If one was born with six fingers on both hands, they could even wear twelve! He heard that some people were even craftier and wore rings on their toes. Of course, wearing so many rings would naturally affect the feeling of the hand and feet. To some martial artists who needed to be precise in their operation, it was quite an impact. Therefore, very few people would wear so many rings. Lu Luo said, “You have to pay for the materials forging and the cost of hiring a blacksmith yourself. Don’t ask me for help.” The Third Realm peerless golden ring required a lot of materials to forge and required at least 300,000 general coins. Lin Xuan nodded perfunctorily. Why hire a blacksmith? After all, he had his own forging table. Lu Luo stuck her head out and asked, “Shall we come up with a plan to attack the Ferocious Poison Mosquito king?” Lin Xuan said, “My plan is to go in, fight, and come out. Three simple and easy steps.” Lu Luo: “…What a detailed plan.” Lin Xuan and Lu Luo walked into the experienced mystic realm king cave at the same time. What appeared in front of them was a big-bellied Ferocious Poison Mosquito the size of a human head. The color of its body was very deep. It was clearly dark green, but it was somewhat similar to black. This meant that there was a lot of poison in its body! Lin Xuan used his Observer skill as usual. His observation technique was now of the peerless gold grade. It was at level nine Third Realm. He could see 100% of the information of any martial artist or demon beast below the same level. If the other party’s level was higher, he could still see 70 to 80% of the information. Of course, in the face of a target with a huge difference in level, it was still very difficult for the Observer skill to be effective. For example, he could not see Manager Number Two and Black’s data panel with Observer. He estimated that he would have to increase his Observer skill to at least level nine Fifth Realm to be able to see part of the information regarding Number Two and Black. … Name: Ferocious Poison Mosquito King Title: Experienced Mystic Realm King Level: Level Nine Third Realm Attributes: 43 Constitution, 26 Strength, 92 Spirit, 99 Agility Skill: Ultra Speed Flying (Precious Purple), Summoning of the Ferocious Poison Mosquito (Precious Purple), Ferocious Poison Halo (Precious Purple), Critical Hit Halo, Evasion Halo. … Lin Xuan was shocked. The attributes of this Ferocious Poison Mosquito King were within his expectations. However, the other party’s skills were simply perfect. The Ferocious Poison Halo was a precious purple grade item that could increase the poison attack of all allies within a 50-meter radius. The Critical Hit Halo could increase the critical hit chance of all allies within a 20-meter radius. The dodging halo could increase the dodging rate of all allies within a 20-meter radius. This Ferocious Poison Mosquito King’s combat strength was not powerful, but it could provide a huge enhancement to the underlings it summoned! Lu Luo frowned and said, “I can’t see the complete information with my Observer skill. I only saw the two skills, Ultrafast Flight and Evasion Halo.” Lin Xuan deliberately paused for a moment, as if he could not see much information himself. “I can’t see everything either. I only see the two skills, the Berserk Poison Halo and the Critical Hit Halo.” Lu Luo nodded. “Then, let’s start.” She took out a huge black sickle from the storage compartment and instantly seemed to have become a different person. The cold-faced loli waved the huge black sickle and quickly approached the Ferocious Poison Mosquito King like a windmill. The Ferocious Poison Mosquito King was rather fast. With a super-speed flying, it immediately threw Lu Luo off by a huge distance. Then, mosquito eggs immediately shot out from the fat abdomen of the Ferocious Poison Mosquito King. The mosquito eggs quickly hatched, and twenty Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes appeared instantly. Splash. The huge black sickle slashed fiercely, killing the dozens of Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes in one hit. However, the Ferocious Poison Mosquito King’s speed of summoning its underlings was even faster. Just as she killed more than ten of the mosquitoes, forty of them had already been summoned. Lin Xuan could not help but throw an Observer skill at Lu Luo. He discovered that Lu Luo’s basic attributes were 40 Constitution, 84 Strength, 39 Spirit, and 81 Agility. This value was much stronger than many level nine Third Realm martial artists. It was also stronger than that level one Fourth Realm martial artist, Yang Wei, who Lin Xuan had previously beaten up. Lin Xuan estimated that the materials Lu Luo used to advance in the past few times should mostly be materials dropped by experienced mystic realm kings. Otherwise, she wouldn’t have her current attributes. Moreover, he discovered that Lu Luo’s equipment and skills were also rather good. Most of the equipment was precious purple, and there were only a few rare blue ones. The huge black sickle was even of peerless gold grade and had a powerful effect. It had a 0.1% chance of directly killing a demon beast with cultivation below or equal to herself. Most of her skills were rare blue. There were also precious purple ones, but they were relatively few. There were few runes, most of them were rare blue, and only one precious purple. Overall, Lu Luo was indeed worthy of being called “Sister Lu” by many Third Realm fighters. This strength was indeed powerful. “Don’t you slack off!!! Quickly go and disturb the Ferocious Poison Mosquito King. Don’t let it keep recruiting lackeys!” At this moment, Lu Luo had already fallen into the siege of nearly a hundred Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes. Seeing that Shield Ghost was still not moving, she shouted anxiously. If this continued, she would fail again. She had also tried to kill the experienced mystic realm king alone previously, but she realized that the speed at which she killed the Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes was inferior to the speed at which the Ferocious Poison Mosquito King recruited its underlings. She could only give up. Lin Xuan did not make a sound. Instead, he directly raised his two shields and rushed over. A large number of Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes directly collided with the Dragon Hunter Shield and the Earth Dragon King Hammer Shield. After at most four collisions, they exploded into clouds of blood mist. In less than three minutes, Lin Xuan’s feet were filled with the corpses of Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes. Lu Luo’s eyes widened. Wasn’t Shield Ghost’s reflective damage… too high? Moreover, with so many Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes, they should have at least stacked more than ten layers of poison effect on Shield Ghost. Why did he not react at all as if he was not injured? “What are you waiting for?” Lin Xuan’s deliberately hoarse voice sounded from the black armor. “Uh… oh!” Lu Luo hurriedly picked up the black sickle and rushed towards the Ferocious Poison Mosquito King. Now, the Ferocious Poison Mosquito King no longer had any subordinates to protect it. It could be said that it was without a commander. The huge black sickle slashed violently and killed the Ferocious Poison Mosquito King in a few moments. Its body turned into a light that filled the sky and exploded. Lin Xuan quickly heard a pleasant voice. “You received 60,000 general coins and 300,000 experience points.” “You have obtained the rare blue skill book [Evasion Halo].” “You obtained the rare blue blueprint [Poison Bite Ring].” “You have obtained three peerless golden advancement materials, the [Ferocious Poison Mosquito King War Wings].” Lin Xuan shook his head. “There aren’t many drops.” Lu Luo also smiled helplessly. “We only got three… Why don’t we continue to attack the next experienced mystic realm king?” Lin Xuan nodded. “Of course. We have to kill five experienced mystic realm kings. It would be a waste if we didn’t take away all the benefits.” With that said, he traded for the promised item with the advancement material. “I’ll work alone from now on. The team is dismissed.” With that said, he strode out of the cave. Lin Xuan was not stupid. If he could farm alone, why would he team up? The reason why they formed a team just now was only for the peerless golden ring blueprint. Lu Luo was stunned. “Eh?” She walked out of the cave and saw that the black-armored figure had already entered the next cave. “Sister Lu, you’re impressive. You killed an experienced mystic realm king so quickly?” “Impressive, impressive. As expected of Sister Lu.” “Eh, why aren’t you guys teaming up?” The surrounding fighters had long heard the broadcast and hurriedly congratulated them. A fighter noticed that Shield Ghost and Lu Luo did not continue to team up and was somewhat puzzled. Lu Luo: “…I’m being despised.” She did not expect that the reason why she was despised by Shield Ghost this time was because the other party was worried that she would get a share of the profits. “There’s strength in numbers. You might not have a 100% chance of winning alone. Seriously, what’s wrong with having me on your team…” Lu Luo muttered a few words. Before she could finish speaking, the “Ferocious Poison Mosquito King” sticker above the cave suddenly disappeared. At the same time, a report sounded from the safety station. “Damn, what speed!” “Shield Ghost killed another experienced mystic realm king alone.” “Did you notice that the speed of Shield Ghost is even faster this time, compared to when he was working with Sister Lu…” Lu Luo sat in the corner and frowned. She could not help but draw circles. She didn’t expect to one day become a burden? She could not stand it! Standing in the corner were three other fighters. Seeing that Shield Ghost was already challenging the second experienced mystic realm king, they were somewhat uneasy. “Could he be planning to kill all the experienced mystic realm kings?” “I don’t think so. How could he have that kind of energy.” “Wait, when Brother Mo comes later, we’ll hurry in and challenge the cave.” Mo Yuan took a deep breath, wore a large fur hat, a bird beak mask, and a linen robe, and walked out of his single dormitory. He had already accumulated enough experience points during this period of time. Not only did he increase his cultivation to level nine Third Realm, but he also increased his most commonly used skills and equipment to level nine Third Realm. In this way, his combat strength had obtained a huge increase. Today, he was going to challenge the experienced mystic realm king to obtain the materials for his advancement. He had been waiting for this day for a long time! He walked out of his single room, walked through the hall, and passed through the door of light. He arrived at the Poison Mosquito Swamp and quickly arrived at the experienced mystic realm king cave. As usual, there were still many fighters lining up. He looked at the edge and indeed, his three companions were waiting here. These three people were three friends who had teamed up with him for a long time. They had a much better understanding of each other than the other teams. Mo Yuan laughed heartily and walked over. “Brothers! I’m here!” His voice was very loud, but the three of them did not react as if they did not hear him. Mo Yuan coughed lightly and turned to the other fighters. He announced solemnly, “Today, we will challenge the experienced mystic realm king!” As soon as he finished speaking, the fighters that lined up to challenge the boss turned to him, their eyes filled with shock. This made Mo Yuan feel rather comfortable. Because this was the emotion he was hoping for. He also saw a cold-faced loli in a small suit not far away looking at him with the same expression. Lu Luo! Mo Yuan was even more excited. Lu Luo had long been able to advance to a Fourth Realm martial artist, but she had always been gathering attribute items and vowed to eat them all. In fact, Lu Luo’s combat strength far surpassed all the Third Realm martial artists. Even some Fourth Realm martial artists might not be her match, such as District B Overseer Yang Wei. To be able to see such emotions in Lu Luo’s eyes, Mo Yuan felt like he had been recognized! Mo Yuan waved his hand. “We exchanged for the Ferocious Poison Crystal and increased our poison resistance. We’ve been farming equipment for more than half a month and finally gathered a Poison Medic Set. All for today!” “The three of you, follow me into the cave!” He strode towards the cave where no one was waiting in line. The three of them stopped him at the same time. “Brother Mo…” Before he could finish speaking, the announcement from the safety station sounded throughout the entire Poison Mosquito Swamp. “The experienced mystic realm king, Ferocious Poison Mosquito King, has been killed!” The next moment, a figure in black armor walked out with his head held high. Mo Yuan was first stunned before he smiled and said, “What? Isn’t it just Shield Ghost killing an experienced mystic realm king? Shield Ghost is indeed very powerful. Consider me convinced…” “No… he killed five.” One of Mo Yuan’s friends swallowed. Mo Yuan said, “Five… five?” “Look at the big profile pictures on the cave. The big profile pictures of experienced mystic realm kings and ordinary mystic realm kings are different…” another friend whispered. Mo Yuan swept his gaze over and indeed discovered that all the experienced mystic realm kings’ profile pictures had been changed. This also meant that all the experienced mystic realm kings had been killed and were now replaced by ordinary mystic realm kings. It would at least be half a year before the next experienced mystic realm king appeared. Mo Yuan :”…” Damn, I’ve prepared meticulously for more than half a year. Yet, you’re telling me that all the experienced mystic realm kings have disappeared?! Who the hell was he supposed to reason with?! “Shield Ghost, you…” Mo Yuan could not help but shout at him. A hoarse voice sounded from the armor. “What’s the matter?” Mo Yuan raised his head and was about to argue, but he was faced with the cold armor. At this moment, the impressive battle results of Shield Ghost flashed in his mind like lightning. The thought of arguing instantly disappeared. “No… It’s fine. I just wanted to ask if you were injured,” Mo Yuan said with a forced smile. “Thank you for your concern. I’m fine. You’re not a bad person.” Lin Xuan recalled that in the previous battle to clean up the Poison Mosquitoes, Mo Yuan had also reminded him that Ferocious Poison Mosquitoes would appear in the seventh region. Looks like this person was a good person. Mo Yuan looked at the back of Shield Ghost’s departing figure and was speechless. Should I wait another half a year or should I let myself be wronged and use five ordinary advancement materials to advance? The joys and sorrows of others had nothing to do with Lin Xuan. At this moment, he had already returned to his single room and was beginning to advance. “Advance!” The five Ferocious Poison Mosquito King War Wings that were lying obediently in his consciousness space instantly turned into lights and fused into his body. In an instant, his attributes increased rapidly! By the time Lin Xuan looked at the data panel again, he had already become a Fourth Realm martial artist. His basic attributes were now 207 Constitution, 77 Strength, 78 Spirit, and 73 Agility. “The feeling of becoming stronger is really good.” Lin Xuan was overjoyed. Then, he took out the blueprint he had obtained from Lu Luo. “The materials I need are… 30 Mica Ingots and 60 Mountain Copper Ingots. I have a lot of them here. Let’s start!” In his consciousness space, the forging table received Lin Xuan’s order and immediately began to forge the equipment. Half an hour later, a brilliant golden light flashed on the forging table. The golden light dissipated, and a ring appeared in front of him. “Javier’s ring increases the carrying load by 20% and the upper limit of energy by 10%. Good stuff!” Lin Xuan was very happy and immediately equipped this ring. … The next day, he was about to enter the Fourth Realm mystic realm controlled by the Germinal Organization, the Coiling Thread Cave, with his Shield Ghost identity. Amidst the broadcast, Manager Number One’s voice suddenly sounded. “All Fourth Realm fighters, pay attention. Gather at the base hall immediately!” Lin Xuan had a puzzled expression, but his legs did not move at all. What has the matter of the Germinal Organization got to do with me?! “All Fourth Realm fighters, please take note! Gather in the hall of the base immediately! A new mystic realm has appeared in the Northern Area of East Lake City!” Lin Xuan stood up immediately. “The matters of the Germinal Organization are my business! It’s my responsibility to explore the mystic realm!” He immediately changed into Shield Ghost’s equipment and rushed to the base hall. A large number of Fourth Realm martial artists had already gathered here, numbering about 40. If nothing unexpected happened, these should be all the Fourth Realm martial artists of the Germinal Organization. Lin Xuan saw that Lu Luo, Mo Yuan, and the others were also among them. Clearly, they had also advanced to the Fourth Realm. When Manager Number Two saw Shield Ghost, he heaved a sigh of relief and walked over. He whispered, “I was planning to get Lin Xuan to call you.” Lin Xuan nodded slightly as a response. “We’ll talk about the specifics when we get to the door of light. Everyone, follow me!” Manager Number Two walked in front of everyone and waved his hand, taking the lead. The Fourth Realm martial artists followed closely behind. Dozens of people rushed out of the base and headed straight for the northern area of East Lake City. Along the way, they killed more than a dozen wandering demon beasts. Soon, they arrived in the northern area. A four-meter-tall door of light suddenly stood here. The door of light flickered incessantly, and shadows were visible inside, as if many demon beasts were about to surge out. “The door of light is about to be formed. At the same time, the mystic realm will be connected to this world!” “I want you to immediately set up a defensive line and surround the door of light. You can’t let any demon leave this range!” Manager Number Two shouted with the aura of a superior. The fighters were usually trained and had long made plans. They moved the surrounding ruins over to act as bunkers. In less than ten minutes, the bunker was completed. The martial artists hid behind cover and stared intently at the flickering door of light. Lu Luo was beside Lin Xuan. She said in a low voice, “No one knows what’s inside the mystic realm connected to the new door of light. We can only tell from the height of the door that it’s probably a Fourth Realm mystic realm. Don’t rush forward recklessly later. Who knows what kind of demon beast will surge out?” Lin Xuan nodded slightly. Lu Luo added, “It would be interesting if it’s connected to an undeveloped mystic realm. We will be able to find this one attribute item in there that is extremely rare.” She was clearly looking forward to Lin Xuan asking her what that attribute item was. Lin Xuan: “Oh.” Then, Lin Xuan was silent. Lu Luo: “…Don’t you want to know what it is?” Lin Xuan said, “Do you want to know why I didn’t ask you what it is?” Lu Luo was curious. “Yes.” Lin Xuan said, “I won’t tell you. I want to frustrate you.” Lu Luo: “…Alright, alright, I’ll tell you. It’s an Original Fruit! An item that can supplement one’s initial attributes!” Only then was Lin Xuan shocked. He had never heard of the Original Fruit. However, this thing could replenish one’s initial attributes? That was indeed rare. Adult men’s initial basic attributes were all 10. When the global digitization occured, everyone’s attributes were displayed on the data panel. However, not everyone was an adult. Aside from adult men, there were also children, old people, and women. As children grew older, their initial attributes would also increase. However, most people’s initial attributes were already fixed and would not increase anymore. There were also many people who had long been in a sub-health state, such as office workers who sat for long periods of time, fat people who drank cold drinks and did not exercise every day, and workers who worked in chemical plants. Despite being adult men, their attributes might even be lower than some children. At this moment, in order to improve one’s initial attributes, they needed the Original Fruit. Lin Xuan’s initial attributes were 8 Constitution, 7 Strength, 8 Spirit, and 3 Agility, totaling 26 points. Compared to the average of 40 points for an adult man, there was a difference of 14 points. He needed 14 Original Fruits to make up for his shortcomings. Boom! Boom! Boom! At this moment, the door of light fluctuated violently. The mystic realm was now completely connected to their world. It was as if a window had just been opened. Countless ferocious beasts with burning bodies roared and rushed out! Lin Xuan was deep in thought. It seemed that this mystic realm was very likely filled with demon beasts that could cause fire damage. Manager Number Two shouted, “Attack!” All kinds of skills were immediately thrown out from behind the bunker. It was obvious that the most suitable skill to deal with such a demon was a skill with frost damage. The most useless skill was a skill with fire damage. However, not everyone could learn so many skills like Lin Xuan. Most martial artists could only focus on a few skills and did not dare to learn more. This led to many martial artists not having any skills that carried frost damage. Poison, fire, and lightning skills were ineffective against these demon beasts. The Germinal Organization was clearly responding seriously, but they weren’t able to kill a lot of demon beasts in the first wave. Roar! A demon beast that was bigger than all the demon beasts that have appeared directly crossed the short distance and rushed to the edge of the bunker. This was a lion burning with flames. It was four meters long and two meters tall. It was explosive and valiant as its claws slapped fiercely towards Mo Yuan, who was behind the bunker. Mo Yuan’s pupils quickly dilated. He did not expect this Fire Lion to be so fast at all. His skills were still on cooldown and he was completely unable to counterattack. Lu Luo rushed out and slashed with the huge black sickle. Crack! The Fire Lion’s huge claw broke with a bang, and it fell to the ground with a wail, its hot blood drenching Mo Yuan’s head and face. “Thank you! Thank you, Sister Lu!” After a while, Mo Yuan reacted and hurriedly thanked Lu Luo. Lu Luo did not respond and continued to help out, quickly wandering around the battlefield. Every time the huge black sickle slashed down, another fighter would be saved, helping them escape from danger. Although Lu Luo had only recently become a level one Fourth Realm martial artist, her attributes had already far surpassed many martial artists of the same level, so she was naturally far superior to the demon beasts. For a moment, the fire demon beast’s attack was actually forced back by her ferocious counterattack. The fighters looked at Lu Luo with admiration. Manager Number Two nodded in satisfaction. How honorable! Lin Xuan did not do anything. He did not have high damage and fast movement speed like Lu Luo. At most, he could only help the few fighters beside him. However, these people were not related to him and had never helped him. Therefore… he did not plan on helping them. Soon, the first batch of fire demon beasts was killed, but they almost did not drop anything. “Replenish your energy. The second batch of demon beasts is about to rush out,” Manager Number Two said loudly. The fighters did not dare to delay. Those who had medicine quickly took the medicine, and those who did not relied on the medics. The fighters with the recovery ability were very helpless. He only had so little medicine and still had to split it between seven to eight people. It was too much. Ten minutes later, the door of light fluctuated again. This time, more restless figures appeared. Clearly, more fire demon beasts would appear this time. “According to previous experience, at least three batches of demon beasts will appear when a new door of light is opened. The first batch is relatively weak, all below level four. The second batch is stronger, from level four to level six. The third batch is the strongest, they range from level seven to level nine.” “I still won’t intervene when the second batch of demon beasts attack. I’ll leave it to you guys,” Manager Number Two said indifferently. The fighters’ hearts sank. Among the fighters present, there were only a few people above level seven Fourth Realm. There were about twenty people above level six Fourth Realm. The rest were all below level four Fourth Realm. However, they also knew that it was impossible for a Fifth Realm martial artist to come. A Fifth Realm martial artist was already an elite force in the Germinal Organization. Unless the Germinal Organization encountered a huge fatal matter, they would not appear and would still stay in the mystic realm. The fluctuation of the door of light suddenly stopped. A large group of fire demon beasts rushed out. This time, the flames on their bodies were even more intense. Even from afar, one could sense the burning high temperature, making it unbearable. Lin Xuan did not have much of a reaction. His Giant Shield Set had already been strengthened to level one Fourth Realm. With his fire resistance and his 200 points of Constitution, flames of this level were not worth mentioning to him. The battle began again. However, as soon as they made contact, the Germinal martial artists immediately felt a huge pressure. In terms of combat output, they could only rely on those martial artists who had frost skills. As for the shield… What a joke! Shield bearers could not attack. Who would deliberately place their experience points on skills that increased physical resistance, magic resistance, and elemental resistance? Soon, the first Fourth Realm martial artist died. He had accidentally fallen into the encirclement of a few Fire Hyenas. Lu Luo wanted to save him, but she was helpless. A few seconds later, the martial artist was torn into pieces by the Fire Hyenas. The shattered internal organs even splashed onto the faces of the surrounding martial artists. “Die!” A majestic martial artist suddenly pounced over, and electric sparks flashed behind his butt. In the next moment, his huge fist smashed fiercely onto a Fire Hyena. Bang! The latter’s waist immediately caved in abnormally, and its nearly two-meter-long body was sent flying more than five meters! After landing, it let out a whimper and was unable to get up. Clearly, it was on the verge of death. Lin Xuan was slightly surprised and immediately used his Observer skill. … Name: Wen Xiong Level: Level Nine Fourth Realm Experience: 80 million / 90 million Attributes: 62 Constitution, 99 Strength, 33 Spirit, 61 Agility Technique: Critical Hit Fist (Precious Purple), Lightning Rush (Precious Purple)… Equipment: Copper Mountain Gloves (Precious Purple), Berserker Chain Armor (Precious Purple)… … The only things that Lin Xuan cared about were precious purple items and skills. He could not be bothered to look at anything with a lower grade. However, even so, he also discovered that this Wen Xiong was indeed extraordinary. “His points are evenly distributed. This way, his health, movement speed, attack speed, critical hit rate, and dodging rate won’t be too low. It not only protects his survival ability but also increases his output. This is the standard attribute distribution that is most suitable for survival in this post-apocalyptic world.” Lin Xuan nodded slightly. Manager Number Two also looked at Wen Xiong somewhat ruefully. This Ferocious Poison Man was also a good seedling that he thought highly of. Unfortunately, Manager Number Three offered a higher price, and Wen Xiong joined Number Three’s faction. “Unfortunately, I couldn’t save him,” Wen Xiong said helplessly. As Wen Xiong and the other powerful martial artists stepped forward, they quickly stabilized the situation. The martial artist and the demon beasts fell into a stalemate. At this moment, several Fire Lions suddenly circled around Wen Xiong, Lu Luo, and the others after confusing them with a fake move and suddenly pounced towards the martial artists that were in the back. They had already discovered that the martial artists who used the frost technique were the main targets they should attack. These martial artists were shocked. They had already exhausted their magic power and energy by unleashing those frost techniques. Without the protection of Wen Xiong and the others, they were like little red riding hood under the mouth of a big gray wolf, powerless to resist. Lin Xuan shook his head. Manager Number Two had already looked at him several times just now. He felt that if he did not make a move now, he would probably make Manager Number Two very unhappy. Of course, it didn’t matter to him whether Manager Number Two was pleased with him or not. What he cared about was the right to enter and leave the mystic realm controlled by the Germinal Organization at will. If Number Two was unhappy and disqualified him, it would be troublesome. Therefore, he had to attack. Lin Xuan held two exaggerated shields and rushed over like a humanoid city wall. When his majestic figure enveloped these martial artists, all the martial artists were so excited that they were about to cry. Bang bang! These Fire Lions seemed to have collided with a city wall filled with spikes. In an instant, blood surged from their bodies, and their aura weakened greatly. They were all struck by the rebound damage. Wen Xiong and Lu Luo’s eyes lit up as they hurriedly took advantage of this opportunity and fought back. The iron fist and the huge sickle attacked consecutively, killing the few Fire Lions quickly. In the end, they were able to avoid a tragic outcome. Wen Xiong praised, “Shield Ghost, my brother has always admired you. You’re indeed not an ordinary person.” Lin Xuan was puzzled. “Who is your brother?” Wen Xiong smiled and said, “Wen Zhuang, he was the one who established the Big Bird Rotation Team in the Giant Rock Cave. A few days ago, he just advanced to the Second Realm.” Hearing the name Big Bird Rotation, Lin Xuan immediately had an impression. Number Two also cast an approving gaze. He was indeed worthy of his title of Shield Ghost. Just like Lu Luo, he had only recently become a Fourth Realm martial artist but was already able to fight demon beasts above the Fourth Realm. Not far away, Mo Yuan was rather surprised. He also saw the scene of Shield Ghost defending against the five Fire Lions just now. Then, he observed something very unbelievable. He had always thought that Shield Ghost must have invested a lot of experience points into the Ferocious Poison Resistance and a lot of equipment essence into the Poison Medic Set. Only by doing so was he able to defeat the experienced mystic realm king of the Poison Mosquito Swamp alone. This was the right thing to do. However, the Ferocious Poison Resistance and Poison Medic Set were almost useless against other demon beasts. For example, they would be completely useless when used to face these fire demon beasts. Once precious experience points and equipment essence were invested into certain skills and equipment, it also meant one would lose the opportunity to invest those resources into other things. Therefore, most martial artists mainly focused on one or two powerful skills and one or two powerful equipment. They would only level up their other skills and equipment casually and would not invest too many resources because experience points and the equipment essence were too scarce. According to this logic, since Shield Ghost had a high resistance to ferocious poison, it meant that his fire resistance was probably pretty low. It should only be at the level of an ordinary martial artist. However, Mo Yuan saw just now that Shield Ghost did not suffer any fire damage at all. Clearly, he had completely defended against the fire damage of the Fire Lion. This made him very puzzled. “Could it be that… Shield Ghost has a lot of experience points and equipment essence? That’s not right. No matter how much he has, it would still be impossible for him to have that much! Does he have double the amount? Triple?” Mo Yuan was puzzled. He could not help but use his Observer skill on Shield Ghost. … Name:? Level: Level One Fourth Realm Experience: 1,455 / 10 million Attributes: Constitution?, Strength 39, Spirit 25, Agility 35 Technique: Omnipotent Bone Armor (?), Ancient Tree Bark (?), Thorny Body (Precious Purple)… Equipment: Earth Dragon King Hammer Shield (?), Earth Dragon Hunter Shield (?)… … Mo Yuan was even more puzzled. Most of the information he saw with his Observer skills was replaced with question marks. Even the other party’s name was replaced with a question mark. Lin Xuan’s heart stirred. He had just realized that someone had used an Observer skill on him and immediately chuckled. He had a skill “Weaken” that could reduce his level and attributes at any time and anywhere. He also had a skill, “Disguise,” a peerless golden grade skill that could disguise or hide the level and grade of all the skills at any time and anywhere. What Mo Yuan saw through his observation technique was something Lin Xuan had deliberately changed for him to see. “Hah… they’re finally all dead.” Lu Luo heaved a sigh of relief and put away the black sickle. With the addition of Shield Ghost’s iron wall, the martial artists could attack more at ease. In the end, there were not too many difficulties and they successfully killed the second batch of demon beasts. “Good job. Leave the rest of the demon beasts to me.” Manager Number Two smiled and stepped forward. The fighters all relaxed. Manager Number Two was a Sixth Realm martial artist. When a Sixth Realm martial artist faced a Fourth Realm demon beast, it could only be said to be a one-sided crushing defeat. He could kill most Fourth Realm demon beasts alone. The reason why he did not help out when the two batches of demon beasts attacked previously was only because he wanted to temper the strength of these fighters. If all the demon beasts had to be handled by the manager himself, then why would he still need them? After a short silence, the door of light fluctuated violently again. It was like a growing flame that was starting to burn more fiercely. At a certain moment, as if having broken through some barrier, a large group of fire demon beasts suddenly rushed out. Lin Xuan swept his gaze over and discovered that there were already more than a thousand of them. The weakest was level seven Fourth Realm, and the strongest was at the level nine Fourth Realm. There were also more than 200 of them! “How long can I last with this number?” Lin Xuan estimated that if there were only 500 demon beasts between level four to level six Fourth Realm, then he could completely resist them and use his reflective damage output to forcefully kill them. However, these demon beasts were all above level seven Fourth Realm. If he could not recover, it was very likely that something would happen to him. Lin Xuan would definitely not rashly risk his life. The next moment, everyone saw Manager Number Two take out a golden staff from the storage compartment. The staff was about a meter long and was made of ancient tree bark. Three runes of different colors were embedded in the top. They were ice white, dark green, and dark blue. “Great Ice Dragon Art!” With a roar, an ice-white dragon more than ten meters long suddenly roared and rushed out from the golden staff! The ice dragon was lifelike and shone dazzlingly under the sunlight. The next moment, the ice dragon pounced towards the fire demon beasts! Boom! Large amounts of water vapor soared into the sky. All the fire demon beasts were instantly killed! After killing these demon beasts, the ice dragon did not lose its momentum. It even rushed into the door of light and into the mystic realm. Inside the door of light, successive water vapor sounds also sounded. Lin Xuan sighed. If he had such strength, he probably wouldn’t have to keep hiding. The world would feel larger, and he could go anywhere he wanted. Just as this thought rose in Lin Xuan’s mind, he recalled the battle at the east and west city walls not too long ago. He recalled those demon beasts from the ‘Drowning City mystic realm’. “No, Manager Number Two is still not strong enough. I have to surpass him… “Lin Xuan shuddered and immediately threw those thoughts to the back of his mind. “Wow, killing the enemy in one-shot. Too awesome…” “As expected of Manager Number Two. If only I could become such an expert one day.” “With a wave of his staff, thousands of demon beasts will be destroyed in an instant! This is the charm of a mage! I want to become such a person in the future!” The martial artists exclaimed repeatedly. The combat strength of a Sixth Realm martial artist really made people envious. Manager Number Two was very satisfied with their reaction and nodded slightly. However, before long, a lazy voice suddenly sounded. “Stop praising him. He doesn’t even know the Great Ice Dragon Technique. He’s only relying on that staff.” Manager Number Two’s smile instantly froze. Lin Xuan turned around and saw a man in black shirt, black pants, and black shoes. Even his face was hidden in the shadows and could not be seen clearly. In his hand was a bottle of Red Star Beer. It was Manager Number Two’s bodyguard, Black. Black wiped the beer from the corner of his mouth. “His staff has three spells. The Great Ice Dragon Art, the Great Lightning Dragon Art, and the Great Poison Dragon Art. I was the one who helped get the blueprint for that staff. These three spells require a lot of spirit to make. He hasn’t met the requirements.” Manager Number Two hurriedly coughed. Black chuckled and said, “Stop coughing. I know your secret very well.” All the martial artists suppressed their laughter and could not help but laugh. Manager Number Two sighed. Damn, once again, he had failed to act cool and was unable to obtain a good impression. It would also be harder for him to rope in a group of Fourth Realm martial artists, including Shield Ghost. “Let’s begin. I’ll leave this mystic realm to you guys to explore. Black and I will stay here until you guys defeat all the experienced mystic realm kings.” Manager Number Two waved his hand. In an undeveloped mystic realm, since no one had been challenging the mystic realm kings, they had long turned into experienced mystic realm kings. The door of light of the mystic realm could only be moved after martial artists of the same level killed these experienced mystic realm kings. This was also the reason why Lin Xuan and the others were exploring the mystic realm. Everyone immediately entered in a single file and went into the mystic realm. The moment he entered the mystic realm, a message surged into Lin Xuan’s mind. He was not the only one who received this message. Everyone else was the same. Blazing Fire Plains. This mystic realm was called the Blazing Fire Plains. This information was transmitted to their minds without any warning. The martial artists quickly scattered and explored separately. A very powerful martial artist like Wen Xiong would stop to kill the demon beast every few steps to test the other party’s strength before advancing. Lin Xuan also chose a direction and advanced. He was different from Wen Xiong. He strode towards the depths of the Blazing Fire Plains and did not rest at all. He killed all the demon beasts he encountered along the way. However, after entering the seventh region, he also clearly felt that the pressure from the demon beasts was much greater. It was not a problem for him to fight one-on-one, but after the number of demon beasts increased, his health actually began to decrease. This made Lin Xuan stop. To be cautious, he decided to stop in region seven and choose a training avatar here. “I’ll remove my avatars in the Demon Ant Nest, the Tree King Sea, and the Poison Mosquito Swamp.” Lin Xuan muttered to himself. The three avatars that were training in the mystic realms immediately fell to the ground and died. “Coupled with the avatar space I obtained when I advanced to the Fourth Realm, I now have four avatar slots.” Then, he searched and chose the four fire demon beasts with the highest attributes. Fire Lion, Fire Hyena, Fire Bear, and Fire Leopard. After killing these four demon beasts, he quickly transformed them into his avatars. “With four avatars training together, the speed of obtaining items will increase by four!” Lin Xuan rubbed his fists in satisfaction. He hurriedly turned around and left, returning to the first region and finding a safe place to stay. At the same time, Wen Xiong, Lu Luo, and the other martial artists carefully explored various places in the Blazing Fire Plains. Their mission was to figure out what attribute items, equipment sets, skill books, and runes the demon beasts in the Blazing Fire Plains would drop. After figuring everything out, this mystic realm exploration would be considered successful. Of course, there were also the Original Fruits! This mystic realm was clearly not developed yet. The Original Fruit was the most important thing! … 10 hours later, Lin Xuan stretched his back and checked his gains. [Current Area: Blazing Fire Plains First Region (2100 general coin per minute, 10,500 experience points per minute)] [The second training avatar, the Fire Lion, has been training for 10 hours and has reached the upper limit of the training time. You have received 1,260,000 general coins, 6.3 million experience points, 5 Fire Chestnuts, 4 Charred Wood, 6 Eye Pistil, 1 Original Fruit, 16 pieces of Fourth Realm equipment, 9 Fourth Realm skill books, and 8 runes. Do you wisto collect?] [The third training avatar, the Fire Hyena, has been training for 10 hours and has reached the upper limit of the training time. You have received 1,260,000 general coins, 6.3 million experience points, 3 Fire Chestnuts, 7 Charred Wood, 3 Eye Pistil, 2 Original Fruit, 17 pieces of Fourth Realm equipment, 11 Fourth Realm skill books, and 10 runes. Do you wish to collect?] [Number Four training avatar, Fire Bear…] [Number 5 training avatar, Fire Leopard…] “Collect!” Lin Xuan muttered silently, and a large number of items instantly appeared in his consciousness space. The total number of general coins was 50.4 million, and the total number of experience points was 25.2 million. He required 10 million experience points to level up to level one Fourth Realm. To advance to level two Fourth Realm, he needed 20 million. “The experience points are only enough for me to increase my cultivation by one level. Alright, it’s still an increase.” Every time a Fourth Realm martial artist advanced by one level, they would obtain 6 free attribute points. After leveling up and investing all six free attribute points he had obtained into his Constitution, Lin Xuan began to check his attribute items, equipment, skill books, and runes. To him, these things were more important. Attribute items: Fire Chestnut, Charred Wood, Eye Pistil, and Original Fruit. Skill Book: High-level Fire Resistance, Fire Weapon, Fire Ring Technique, Fire Arrow. Equipment: Explosion Set, Demon Flame Set, Stronghold Set, Spark Staff, Fire Command Sword, Quenching Dagger. Runes: Let the flames purify everything (1), Flame Protection (1 / 2). Seeing this, Lin Xuan nodded in satisfaction. Having four training avatars at the same time was awesome . He began to check them one by one. The effect of Fire Chestnut was+1% energy recovery speed, the effect of the Charred Wood was+1 fire resistance, the effect of the Eye Pistil was+1% dodging rate, and the effect of the Original Fruit was an increase in one’s initial attributes. High-level Fire Resistance was a rare blue grade passive skill. It did not require any magic power or energy. After learning it, one’s resistance to flames would directly increase by 45%. As for the Fire Weapon, Fire Ring Technique, Fire Arrow, they were clearly for a melee fighter, a mage, and an archer, respectively. Among the equipment he obtained, the Spark Staff, Fire Command Sword, Quenching Dagger, and the other weapons were clearly useless. Among them, there was even a peerless golden Quenching Dagger that Lin Xuan directly threw into the smelting table. As for the Explosion Set, it was only suitable for high-strength martial artists. On the other hand, the Demon Flame Set was suitable for high-spirit martial artists. They had nothing to do with Lin Xuan, so he just threw it all away for smelting. What Lin Xuan cared about was the Stronghold Set. Although this set was only of a rare blue grade, it directly provided 3,000 Health Points, 100 Energy Points, and 70% flame resistance. The price was that the other resistances would drop by 20%. However, this was fine. This was because Lin Xuan had a high carrying capacity. He could just wear the Stronghold Set on the inside and wear the Giant Shield Set on the outside. “This is simply overpowered. This set should be able to allow me to come and go as I please in the Blazing Fire Plains. I just have to wait for the experience points.” Lin Xuan was very satisfied and immediately changed into this Stronghold Set. Two days later. Lin Xuan was still in the first region. However, his four training avatars had already been pushed to the seventh region. The reward for training in the seventh region of the Blazing Fire Plains was 2800 general coins per minute and 14,000 experience points per minute. In just two days, Lin Xuan had obtained more than 100 million experience points. However, he needed 450 million experience points to level up to the maximum level. He only had 100 million experience points now, and it was still too early for him to level up. He still needed another two to three days. Three days later. Lin Xuan stretched his back and muttered the word “collect”. He had already accumulated more than 500 million experience points in his consciousness space. He could advance to level nine Fourth Realm in one go and also increase some of his skills by one or two levels. After upgrading himself to level nine Fourth Realm, Lin Xuan put all 54 free attribute points into his Constitution. In this way, his Constitution reached an astonishing 258 points. “Let’s go to District 9. To be safe, I’ll work hard to increase my experience points for a few days and max out my skills.” Now that Lin Xuan had put on the Stronghold Set, his fire resistance was extremely high. All the fire demon beasts he encountered on the way could no longer injure him. Soon, he arrived at the ninth region and saw the nine mystic realm king caves. Just as Manager Number Two had said, all the caves were filled with experienced mystic realm kings. When Lin Xuan arrived, this place was still empty. Clearly, everyone, including Wen Xiong and Lu Luo, was still advancing steadily and had not arrived. Lin Xuan lay on the cold and heavy shield, hugging his head as his thoughts ran wild. “After transmigrating for so long, I haven’t eaten much good food. I wonder what this world has become after experiencing the demon disaster. I really want to go out and take a look.” “Let’s wait a little longer. After becoming a First Realm martial artist, I should be able to walk around the vicinity of East Lake City, right?” Lin Xuan smacked his lips and fell asleep. Three days later. Lin Xuan had used the experience points he had obtained to increase his “Omnipotent Bone Armor” to level nine Fourth Realm. Six days later, he upgraded his “Thorny Body” to level nine Fourth Realm. Nine days later, he upgraded the skill “Magic Armor” to level nine Fourth Realm and also strengthened the Barrier Set to level nine Fourth Realm. “After maximizing these three skills and the Barrier Set, I should be fully confident in dealing with experienced mystic realm kings.” Lin Xuan strode into one of the caves. A robust Fire Lion covered in flames appeared. … Name: Fire Lion King Title: Experienced Mystic Realm King Level: Level Nine Fourth Realm Attributes: 80 Constitution, 120 Strength, 46 Spirit, 88 Agility Technique: High-level Critical Hit (Precious Purple), Violent Four Combo (Precious Purple), Inferno Assault (Precious Purple), Lion Fang gritted his teeth … “Let’s begin.” Lin Xuan set up two large shields and prepared for battle. The battle could not be said to be climatic. At the very least, it could be described as calm. Lin Xuan was the one being attacked passively, but the more he was attacked, the more health the opponent lost. The Fire Lion King was the one who took the initiative to attack, but the more it fought, the less health it had. At first, it was still majestic and domineering. After fighting for more than ten minutes, the flames on its body seemed to have wilted, and its attacking desire had also decreased greatly. Lin Xuan berated, “You can’t be like this. If you don’t attack me, do you expect me to attack you? I’m a peace-loving person. Why would I take the initiative to attack others?” The Fire Lion King :”…” At the same time, outside the cave, Wen Xiong arrived. He was the first person to arrive after Lin Xuan. His exposed skin was covered in burn marks. Clearly, he was deeply affected by the fire demon beasts. “Eh, someone actually arrived before me?” Wen Xiong was very surprised to see that there was actually a battle going on in one of the caves. “Could it be one of the level nine Fourth Realm experts? That’s not right. I even encountered them just now. They almost fell into the siege of a group of Fire Hyenas.” “Is it Lu Luo or Shield Ghost? That’s not right either. The two of them were both level one Fourth Realm martial artists when they entered the mystic realm. Their advancement shouldn’t be that fast.” Wen Xiong pondered over it and could not figure it out. At this moment, a figure in black armor walked out unscathed. Wen Xiong’s eyes widened. “Shield Ghost, you’ve already soloed an experienced mystic realm king?” Lin Xuan nodded. “Yes.” Wen Xiong drew a cold breath, but because the temperature of the Blazing Fire Plains was very high, this cold breath was actually very hot. Just as he was about to ask Lin Xuan what he had obtained, he saw the other party walk towards the next cave. As Shield Ghost’s figure disappeared into the cave, Wen Xiong’s opened mouth could not close. “Holy… Is Shield Ghost starting again?” “However, this is a Fourth Realm mystic realm! In the past, I could still understand if he went to those Zero Realm, First Realm, Second Realm, Third Realm mystic realms alone. However, the higher the level of the mystic realm, the more ridiculous the attributes of experienced mystic realm kings are. How does he do it?” Wen Xiong knew very well how terrifying the experienced mystic realm kings were. Back then, he had also soloed Zero Realm and First Realm experienced mystic realm kings. However, he had failed twice when in the Second Realm mystic realm. When he challenged the experienced mystic realm king of the Poison Mosquito Swamp, he had failed more than ten times. He had to consume hundreds of bottles of poison antidote before he could barely clear it alone. This was actually very easy to understand. The attributes of a mystic realm king were 1.15 times that of ordinary demon beasts. On the other hand, the attributes of experienced mystic realm kings were 1.3 times that of mystic realm kings! The higher the realm of the mystic realm, the more exaggerated the attributes would be. In those cases, the 1.3 times increase in attributes would also be greater! “Unless… he uses experienced mystic realm king advancement materials every time he advances. Moreover, his equipment and skills also need to be upgraded to the max.” He immediately rejected this thought. Impossible. No matter how powerful a person was, they would not be able to reach the peak of their skills and equipment before fighting the experienced mystic realm kings. That would waste too much time. By the time he accumulated enough strength, it would be too late. Soon, Lu Luo also arrived in the ninth region. Seeing Wen Xiong, she nodded. And when she saw that someone was challenging the cave, her expression immediately changed. Before Wen Xiong could speak, she said solemnly, “Is it Shield Ghost?” Wen Xiong was surprised. “How did you know?” Lu Luo sighed helplessly. “Since you haven’t even entered, who else could it be other than him?” Half an hour later, Lin Xuan killed the experienced mystic realm king and walked out of the cave, entering the next cave. He did not rest the entire time. It was a race against time. Wen Xiong wiped his sweat. “I feel a little threatened. At this rate, all the experienced mystic realm kings will probably be wiped out by him.” Lu Luo shrugged and said, “But I’m afraid the two of us can’t beat him. We need to gather at least two more people before we can go in.” Wen Xiong had a helpless expression. He had originally been in the Fourth Realm Mystic Realm, the Coiling Thread Cave. His four-man team had challenged the experienced mystic realm king there several times in a row and had failed every time. Helpless, he decided to give it a try and see if the experienced mystic realm kings here were easier to kill. “No, I have to go in and give it a try. Lu Luo, are you coming? I have something to protect my life. Even if I can’t beat them, I can still come out.” Wen Xiong could not sit still. Lu Luo pondered for a moment and nodded in agreement. Not long after the two of them entered the cave, another figure arrived in the ninth region. It was Mo Yuan. At first, he was rather happy to see that he was alone and thought that he was the first to arrive. “…Oh, so someone is already challenging the experienced mystic realm king.” Mo Yuan covered his face. It was too early for him to be happy. “I didn’t expect eight people to have already arrived here before me. I’m really too weak.” He sighed and was ashamed of his delight. Before he could reflect on himself, two figures rushed out of one of the caves. The two of them had large burns on their bodies, and even their equipment had been damaged. They had to return to the Germinal Organization and get a blacksmith to repair their equipment. This was another huge expense. Wen Xiong’s mouth twitched in pain. Lu Luo’s face tensed up but she endured it. Mo Yuan was shocked. “Brother Wen, Sister Lu, you guys challenged the experienced mystic realm king with a two-man group? You should have at least waited for two more people.” Wen Xiong smiled bitterly. “I didn’t want to either. I was forced.” Lu Luo said, “If we didn’t try now, I’m afraid we won’t have the chance to. Of course, I can tell now that it was useless to attack.” After hearing their words, Mo Yuanyun was puzzled. What did this mean? Who forced them? At this moment, Shield Ghost walked out of a cave calmly and quickly entered the next cave. As for the profile picture in the previous cave, it had changed from the Fire Leopard King to the Fire Python King. Wen Xiong’s features furrowed. “This is already his third cave… I’m afraid I won’t have the chance to obtain the advancement materials in the previous battles…”  Lu Luo said, “Be more confident and get rid of your worries.” Wen Xiong :”…” After piecing the information together, the dumbfounded Mo Yuan finally understood. He belatedly clenched his teeth and said, “Shield Ghost is already challenging the third experienced mystic realm king?” Wen Xiong and Lu Luo nodded speechlessly. Mo Yuan had an expression as if he had seen a ghost. After the three of them, the number of martial artists that came to District Nine gradually increased to six, nine, and thirteen. However, Wen Xiong and Lu Luo were injured and would need to rest for at least a day to continue fighting. The others thought about it and felt that they were not confident, nor did they dare to team up to challenge the caves. Therefore, they could only watch as Shield Ghost attacked alone. The third, fourth… sixth… eighth, until the ninth! Lin Xuan walked out of the last cave in satisfaction. He had never felt so good before. He had successfully defeated nine experienced mystic realm kings! These experienced mystic realm kings had provided him with a total of 37 advancement materials! Other than that, he also killed a Fire Rock Turtle with a peerless golden skill and received the skill, Demon King of Fury. … Name: Demon King of Fury Level: Level Nine Fourth Realm Quality: Peerless Golden Learning Requirements: Constitution: 89, Spirit: 66 Effect 1: Permanent+15% Fire Damage, Permanent+15% Fire Resistance, Permanent+100 Magic Power. Effect 2: Consumes 40% of mana ,+25% Fire Damage ,+35% Fire Resistance, lasts for 20 minutes. Effect 3: -10% of the magic power consumed by any fire spell, -15% of the learning conditions for any fire spell. … This skill was clearly used by mages. The three effects of the skill were all extremely powerful. Lin Xuan discovered that even someone like him, who mainly invested points into his physique, could actually use a few fire spells. “I have many fire magic skill books in my consciousness space, such as Fireball and Fire Ring. They can easily be upgraded to the peerless golden level. I can give them a try when I return.” Lin Xuan was very happy. He wondered what he would be like in the future. A mage with a huge shield? Or a shield specialist who used magic? Both seemed alright. Mages had weak survival skills. What’s wrong with mages using a big shield? Shield specialists had weak damage output. So what if they learn a few fire spells? Lin Xuan walked out of the cave and was also noticed by everyone. Wen Xiong had a complicated expression, not knowing whether to laugh or cry. He had really defeated nine experienced mystic realm kings alone. Lin Xuan saw the anxious expressions of these people and immediately understood. He coughed lightly and said, “I can sell the additional 32 experienced mystic realm king advancement materials. Announce your prices quickly!” Everyone immediately reacted. That’s right! They had almost forgotten that they could trade with him! Wen Xiong was stunned and stood up immediately. “I have a peerless golden helmet blueprint!” Lin Xuan raised a finger. “I can only give you 1 experienced advancement material for that.” Wen Xiong gritted his teeth. “I have two peerless golden runes that I never got to use. I haven’t been able to find anyone to trade with.” “Let me see the effect.” Lin Xuan stretched out his hand and received the two peerless golden runes. The two runes were “Let the flames purify everything (2)” and “Scarlet Wave Rush (1)”. … Name: Let the flames purify everything (2) Level: Level One Fourth Realm Quality: Peerless Golden Set requirements: Level one Fourth Realm and above magic books, staff, magic balls, and other elemental weapons Effect 1: Magic power recovery speed+70%. Effect 2: (Locked )+30% damage from any fire magic. Effect 3: (Locked) Any fire spell will cause secondary splash damage and spread within a 50-meter radius. … Name: Scarlet Wave Rush (3) Level: Level One Fourth Realm Quality: Peerless Golden Inlaid requirements: Any weapon above level one Fourth Realm Effect 1: upper limit of magic power+20%. Effect 2: (Locked) Any fire magic will ignore 15% fire resistance. Effect 3: (Locked) There is a 10% chance of ignoring 100% fire resistance of any fire magic. … These two rune groups were clearly for fire magic. Lin Xuan did not mind and accepted them all. “These two runes are not bad. I’ll give you a total of 4 experienced advancement material.” Wen Xiong was overjoyed. “Enough, that’s enough!” With these 4 advancement materials, he could directly advance to the Fifth Realm when he returned. A Fifth Realm martial artist! Such an existence was the pillar of the Germinal Organization! The treatment he received would directly increase by ten times. He would no longer have to spend general coins to exchange for the skills and equipment needed in the logistics department. Lu Luo also arrived in front of Lin Xuan and coughed lightly. “I have two peerless golden blueprints, but I only have two left. I still have to keep one for myself… Can I use a precious purple blueprint to exchange for it?” Lin Xuan raised five fingers. “Five precious purple blueprints for an experienced advancement material.” Lu Luo frowned. “You profiteer! Doesn’t your conscience hurt?” Lin Xuan said, “What are you talking about? I have no conscience.” Lu Luo was speechless. She had only obtained three precious purple equipment blueprints when she was exploring the Blazing Fire Plains. Before she could hold on to them for long, she had to give them up again. Finally, Lu Luo used 1 peerless golden equipment blueprint and 5 precious purple equipment blueprints to exchange for 2 experienced advancement materials. She wanted to use the general coins to exchange for more, but Lin Xuan refused. Then, the few level nine Fourth Realm martial artists also came to exchange for many experienced advancement materials. Their advancement was imminent. Since Lin Xuan’s offer was more appealing compared to trading with the Germinal Organization’s logistics department, they naturally could not miss this opportunity. Because of this, Lin Xuan obtained a large number of peerless gold equipment blueprints, skill books, and runes. He had gotten numb to the feeling of winning. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong> Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios Wen Xiong smiled and said, “Everyone, the exploration is complete. It’s time to return.” All the martial artists nodded. The experienced mystic realm kings had all been suppressed. The door of light of the mystic realm could already be moved. Their goal had been achieved. Everyone left the Blazing Fire Plains mystic realm in a single file and saw Manager Number Two and Black bickering here. Number Two said, “Why do you always embarrass me? I’ll fire you!” Black: “Oh… gulp gulp gulp…” Number Two said, “You’re fired!” Black: “Oh… gulp gulp gulp…” Number Two was speechless. Black: “Burp… What? Got nothing else to say? As an employer, how dare you lose your temper at your bodyguard! I’ll punish you!” “Since you lost your temper today, you will double the general coins you give me every week starting tomorrow.” Number Two: “…Don’t be like that. If I do this, I won’t even have enough for myself.” Black said, “Then I won’t be your bodyguard. Number Three even talked to me secretly a few days ago, hoping that I’ll be his bodyguard.” Number Two said righteously, “The friendship between us is as firm as a rock. The alliance between us is unbreakable. How can it be affected by mere material things?” Black: “Are you going to start making sense or what?” Number Two said, “Fine, I’ll do as you say.” Black nodded. “Dun dun dun… this is how it should be. How can the employer tell the bodyguard what to do?” Everyone :” Manager Number Two coughed lightly and recovered his usual refined and steady image. “You’re all out? You guys were faster than I thought.” “Wen Xiong, if nothing unexpected happens, you should be the one who led the fighters to kill all the experienced mystic realm kings, right? I’ll reward you when we return. Wen Xiong smiled helplessly. “Sir , it wasn’t me. It was Shield Ghost. He was the one who defeated all the experienced mystic realm kings.’ Manager Number Two’s eyes widened. “Are you joking?” Wen Xiong was helpless. “I wish that I was.” Looking at the calm Shield Ghost, Manager Number Two suddenly laughed in satisfaction. “Good, good, good! Shield Ghost, well done!” “Black, close the door of light. Let’s return to the base!” Manager Number Two waved his hand in high spirits. Black walked to the side of the door of light and casually raised it. The door of light was held in his hand as if it was nothing. Lin Xuan was deep in thought when he saw this. Could anyone take away the door of light? Or was it only a Seventh Realm martial artist like Black who could? A day later, shocking news swept through the entire Germinal base. The news stated that Wen Xiong, Shield Ghost, Lu Luo, and a few other Fourth Realm martial artists followed Manager Number Two to explore the new mystic realm, the Blazing Fire Plains. In this exploration, all nine experienced mystic realm kings in the Blazing Fire Plains had been killed by Shield Ghost alone! This had created a historical record in the Germinal Organization! Shield Ghost had defeated nine experienced mystic realm kings alone! The refugees and wasteland reclaimers all wanted to find Shield Ghost and cozy up to him. However, even after searching the entire East Lake City, they could not find Shield Ghost. The night was dark and the wind was strong. Lin Xuan casually found an extremely ordinary ruined house in East Lake City. “I’ll use the Avatar Technique to release an avatar and see how dangerous the surroundings of East Lake City are.” When he had obtained the Avatar Technique previously, this skill was only rare blue. Back then, it could only create an avatar with 20% of the main body’s attributes for 30 minutes. However, he had already maxed out his Avatar Technique and increased its grade to peerless golden. Now, he could create an avatar with 100% attributes of the main body for a duration of 3 hours. “I’ll give him a set of mage equipment and also use this opportunity to try out the equipment and runes I obtained previously.” Lin Xuan was filled with anticipation. The peerless golden equipment blueprint he had obtained from Lu Luo was a magic book suitable for mages. Name: Blazing Fire Codex Level: Level Nine Fourth Realm Grade: Peerless Golden Equipment Requirement: Spirit 70 Effect 1: Spirit+5. Effect 2: Magic power recovery speed+15%, fire magic consumption -10%, fire magic damage+60 %. Although this equipment was not a part of a set, its effect as a single part was still very powerful. Lin Xuan liked it very much. Soon, a figure wrapped in a black cloak walked quickly towards the north of East Lake City. One kilometer, two kilometers, three kilometers… Lin Xuan’s avatar almost did not encounter any obstructions. All the demon beasts he encountered along the way were relatively weak, only at the First Realm or Second Realm. He could directly blast them into ashes with small fireballs. Four kilometers, five kilometers, six kilometers.. The level of the demon beasts the avatar encountered here gradually increased, and Third Realm and Fourth Realm demon beasts began to appear. Lin Xuan’s spells also changed from small fireballs to normal fireballs and Fire Ring Technique. However, thanks to the skills “Demon King of Fury” and the runes “Let the Flames Purify Everything” and “Scarlet Wave Rush”, his fire damage was extremely terrifying. Even some demon beasts with higher fire resistance could not withstand it and died after being attacked twice. Lin Xuan threw spells all along the way. His magic power recovery speed was very fast, and the magic power consumption from using magic was also relatively small. He could use one skill every few seconds, and it was awesome. The places he passed were all charred. Finally, he arrived at a small ruined city. This small city did not have any mystic realm doors, so naturally, no organization would be stationed here. Without an organization, there would not be any refugees gathered. This was basically a paradise for wandering demon beasts. Lin Xuan casually walked on the street, looking at the abandoned shops on both sides and sighing. “This should be the White Water City next to East Lake City. It’s only an Earth Realm city and is very small.” The mannequin in the window was wearing a black wedding dress. The small cowhide moss advertisement on the telephone pole had not fallen off even after all these years. Lin Xuan could not help but wonder what kind of glue was used to secure this advertisement. Why was it so firm? He also saw that the bookshop was selling supplementary books related to the college entrance examination. There were all kinds of such examination books. Even now, he could still see the prosperous civilization of that era decades ago. Roar! A shocking beast roar suddenly sounded. Lin Xuan looked up and saw a ferocious tiger more than six meters long appear at the end of the street. It was a level six Fifth Realm demon beast, the Hanging-Eyed Tiger. He did not know which mystic realm it came from. The ferocious tiger suddenly pounced over, and a fishy wind enveloped Lin Xuan’s face. Lin Xuan stretched out his hand, and a huge fire ring suddenly appeared, repelling the Hanging Eye Tiger far away. The fur on the latter’s body was immediately ignited. Lin Xuan stretched out his hand again, and a one-meter-wide fireball quickly condensed. Suddenly, it pierced through the Hanging Eye Tiger, which was still in midair with nowhere to go, and a huge hole appeared in its abdomen. Pieces of flesh flew and blood rained. The fireball did not lose its momentum as it directly blasted apart a rusted bus in the back. It also hit the bookshop that contained all the college entrance examination guidance books and shattered all the glass. After burning a large number of books, the fireball disappeared. Lin Xuan casually picked up an ordinary white equipment dropped by the Hanging Eye Tiger and threw it into the consciousness space smelting table. Seeing this shocking destructive force, he nodded in satisfaction. “Even a fireball can cause such damage. If I obtain a stronger fire spell, won’t I be able to casually blast a building into the sky?” Lin Xuan was planning to release a few more fireballs to satisfy his desire to destroy. At this moment, his skill, “Perception”, was activated and he suddenly discovered that someone was approaching within a hundred meters of him. “Someone’s here. I’ll put the equipment into my consciousness space and remove my avatar.” Lin Xuan immediately removed his avatar. His avatar instantly disappeared without a trace as if it had evaporated into thin air.. <strong>Translator: </strong>Atlas Studios <strong> Editor: </strong>Atlas Studios Two figures landed where Lin Xuan’s avatar had been standing. Although it was late at night, flames burned brightly here. The charred tiger corpse on the ground was even more striking. The flames reflected their faces. One was a refined middle-aged man, and the other was a cold young man with a sour face. They were Manager Number Two and Manager Number Three. “A martial artist skilled in fire magic is passing by.” Manager Number Two was slightly surprised. Manager Number Three said, “I know even if you don’t tell me.” “Then did you notice that this Fifth Realm demon beast was instantly killed?” Manager Number Two teased. Manager Number Three’s expression changed slightly. He really could not tell. He squatted down and observed carefully. This time, he only spoke after five minutes. “This martial artist who’s passing by should be between level one to level three Sixth Realm. Otherwise, it’s impossible for him to kill the other party in one hit. I suspect that it might be someone sent by the North Construction Division to investigate our Germinal Organization.” “I heard that the Construction Division is currently lacking in avatars. We should attack the Construction Division as soon as possible and not be passive.” Manager Number Two folded his arms and paced back and forth. “Your analysis is not comprehensive enough.” “Not comprehensive enough?” “This passer-by uses a fireball skill, and this skill is very easy to obtain. It’s commonly seen in First Realm or Second Realm mystic realms. Skill books with fireball skills won’t drop in higher mystic realms,” Number ftvo slowly explained. “In addition, the skill books dropped are all ordinary white grade and high grade fireball skills never get dropped.” Manager Number Three revealed a short shocked expression. “In other words, very few people will learn Fireball seriously. If they obtain better skills, they will immediately give up on Fireball and invest their resources into those skills.” Manager Number Two analyzed confidently. “This passing martial artist only used an ordinary Fireball to directly penetrate a level six Fifth Realm demon beast. It’s not difficult to infer that the other party’s Spirit attribute must be terrifyingly high! If this person is really from the Construction Division, he must definitely be someone with an important position. Otherwise, it’s impossible for him to be sent out to do a dangerous job like reconnaissance. Manager Number Two chuckled. “In addition, there’s another thing that can prove that this person is not from the Construction Division. This is something you also failed to discover.’ Number Three frowned. “What is it?” “This martial artist only encountered this stupid tiger by chance when he arrived at White Water City. The tiger was something he casually killed. ” “After that, thanks to his skill, ‘Wide Domain Perception’, Number One discovered the situation here and asked us to come and investigate. However , when we arrived, we only saw a charred tiger corpse and a burning scene. We didn’t even see the figure of that person.” “Now, take a guess, how high do you think his Agility is?” Number ftvo leaned down and stared into Manager Number Three’s eyes. Manager Number Three’s expression became even more solemn. “The people nurtured by the Construction Division won’t be so particular about their attributes. Those who have such comprehensive attributes are usually lone wolves.” “In my opinion, this person is at least level six Sixth Realm. It’s even very likely that he’s a level nine Sixth Realm martial artist like us. He was planning to find a mystic realm that has not been controlled by the organization and search for the experienced advancement materials. As for appearing here, it’s only a coincidence. Manager Number Two told the other party his thoughts. Manager Number Three nodded slightly, but he still said solemnly, “We have to be careful if such a person appears near the base.’ Number Two smiled. “You’re wrong again.” “This person directly avoided our base and left quickly before we arrived. He clearly doesn’t want to be enemies with the Germinal Organization.” Manager Number Three frowned. “Then should we not care? Number Two nodded. “I’m not going to care. I’m going back.” With that said, he slowly returned the way he came. Manager Number Three shook his head and followed. The long night was filled with stars. In Lin Xuan’s single room in the Germinal Organization’s base. “Advance!” He muttered the word. In his consciousness space, the five experienced advancement materials turned into light and entered his body. Just like before, the five experienced advancement materials increased all his attributes by 15, which also meant that his total attributes increased by 60 points. “Look at the data panel.” Lin Xuan opened the data panel. Name: Lin Xuan Level: Level One Fifth Realm Experience: 11,4514 / 100 million Attributes: 273 Constitution, 92 Strength, 93 Spirit, 88 Agility Skill: Experienced Mystic Realm King Might, Omnipotent Bone Armor, Ancient Tree Bark, Thorn Body, Steel Body, Magic Armor, Iron Wall, Shrouding Frost Iron Wall, Demon King of Fury, Fireball, Fire Ring Technique, Basic Elemental Resistance, Observer, Avatar Technique, Weaken, Disguise, Perception… Equipment: Earth Dragon King Hammer Shield, Dragon Hunter Shield, Overlord Set, Giant Shield Set, Poison Medic Set, Stronghold Set, Blazing Fire Codex, Javier Ring… Runes: Impregnable Gold (All), Fatal Spirit Medicine (All), Lightning Shattering the Darkness (1), Let the Flames Purify Everything (1 / 2), Scarlet Wave Rush (1).. Other than a few difficult skills, the other skills on him, such as Observer, Avatar, Weaken, Disguise, Perception, Omnipotent Bone Armor, Fireball, and Fire Ring, had all been upgraded to peerless golden grade. Any skill’s grade would experience a qualitative change after being leveled up. For example, It’s damage value would increase and its cooldown time, magic consumption, and learning conditions would decrease, and so on. “How nice. Time for bed.’ Lin Xuan lay down in satisfaction and fell asleep. In the next few days, he released an avatar every night and got them to head towards the east, south, and north. The west of East Lake City was the east lake. There was no need to take a long detour, so he did not get his avatar to go west. Fifteen kilometers to the east, he discovered a one-meter-tall door of light, indicating that it was connected to a Zero Realm or First Realm mystic realm. Perhaps because the various resources produced by the mystic realm were too trash, or perhaps because they were too far away, this mystic realm was not occupied by a large organization like the Germinal Organization. Now, this door of light was occupied by some First Realm and Zero Realm martial artists. As they surrounded this door of light, they also formed a small gathering place for refugees. When Lin Xuan’s avatar was exploring the south, he encountered a large number of demon beasts. After killing all the way, he discovered a level seven Sixth Realm demon beast. Its entire body was wrapped in flames, and one could tell that its resistance to flames was very high. After a short moment of thought, Lin Xuan gave up on exploring the south. In the north, after crossing White Water City, there was a small town. What was strange was that the ones occupying this place were not organizations like the Germinal Organization, but martial artists who called themselves the “Construction Division”. Out of caution, Lin Xuan did not let his avatar approach. Instead, he watched from afar. In this way, a map of the entire terrain gradually formed in his mind. “The Germinal Organization base is located in the city of East Lake City. To the north is White Water City, and further north is White Crane Town. An organization called the Construction Division has occupied this town.” “To the west of the Germinal base is the East Lake, and further west is the Azure River. The Azure River finally converges into the East Sea. The demon beasts from the Drowning City mystic realm previously went against the current and attacked the Germinal base from the East Lake. “To the east of the Germinal Organization base is a small gathering place. It’s named after the mystic realm, Thorn Forest, and is called the ‘Thorn Town’. Nearly 60 First Realm and Zero Realm martial artists are gathered here, and it’s chaotic. “The south of the Germinal base is very dangerous. There are often demon beasts wandering around. There are even Sixth Realm demon beasts.” Lin Xuan pondered over it and believed that heading to the north to develop was the best choice. “The Germinal Organization doesn’t seem to have any Sixth Realm mystic realms. After I finish grinding in the Fifth Realm inferior Demon Mountain and advance to the Sixth Realm after obtaining the experienced advancement materials, I should leave.. Fifth Realm mystic realm, Inferior Demon Mountain. After passing through the door of light, Lin Xuan saw a mountain peak that towered into the clouds. The mountain peak was 900 meters high and was divided into floors. It had one floor every 100 meters. The mystic realm king cave was located at the top. The demon beasts of the Inferior Demon Mountain had various attributes, including physical, magic, fire, lightning, frost, and poison attributes. According to the information of the Germinal Organization, Lin Xuan knew that the items dropped by the demon beasts of the Inferior Demon Mountain were all rather good. Attribute items included the Wind Wolf Mane (+1% movement speed), the Pig Fangs (+1% attack speed), the Old Tree Bark (+1% blocking rate), and the Hemp Root (+1% energy recovery speed). As for skill books, there was High-level Perception, a passive skill that allowed one to sense multiple targets within a 100-meter radius. There was also Stealth, a passive skill that reduced one’s presence by 30%. High-level Thorn Body, a passive skill that increased reflective damage by 60%. Flame Explosion, an active skill and the favorite skill of many fire mages. The Ice Spear Technique, an active skill that combined physical and frost damage. There was also the Demonized Body, a passive skill that gave +10% magic damage and +10% magic resistance. There were also many types of equipment that dropped. However, none of the equipment on the Inferior Demon Mountain were suitable for Lin Xuan. There were more sets here that were suitable for archers and mages. Moreover, the most important thing was that the Inferior Demon Mountain had many precious minerals! The minerals in the Giant Rock Cave were already unable to satisfy Lin Xuan’s needs. It was time for Lin Xuan to remove the Gold Swallowing Lizard from one of the training avatar slots and use that slot on the demon beasts of the Inferior Demon Mountain instead. When Lin Xuan arrived, he happened to see Wen Xiong also working hard to explore the mystic realm. “Shield Ghost, what a coincidence.” Wen Xiong had just killed a Demon Blood Wolf with a punch before wiping off his sweat. Lin Xuan nodded slightly and followed the winding mountain path up, not stopping at a lower height. Wen Xiong smacked his lips. “Shield Ghost is indeed as ambitious as before!” Lin Xuan continued upwards. After reaching 700 meters, he could clearly sense that the number and strength of the demon beasts had increased greatly. He first removed the training avatar of the Gold Swallowing Lizard and killed the two demon beasts of the Inferior Demon Mountain with better attributes. He then turned a Demon Blood Tiger and a Demon Blood Python into his two training avatars. (Current Area: Seventh floor of the Inferior Demon Mountain (3700 general coin per minute, 18500 experience points per minute)] In this way, he currently had six training avatars. Four of them were in the Fourth Realm mystic realm Blazing Fire Plains, and two were in the Fifth Realm mystic realm inferior Demon Mountain. He required a total of 4.5 billion experience points to advance from level one to level nine Fifth Realm. If Lin Xuan were to include the time needed to upgrade his skills, equipment, and rune fragments to level nine of the Fifth Realm, the total time required would be unimaginable. “In any case, with the Germinal Organization around, it is very safe here. I’m not in a hurry.” “I’ll wait until I get all the skill books in the Blazing Fire Plains before removing the training avatars there.” 16 ordinary white grade skill books were needed to be combined into a single peerless golden grade skill book. Since he had the ability to grind to the limit, Lin Xuan naturally did not want to leave any regrets. Then, Lin Xuan returned along the original path. When he returned to the first floor, Wen Xiong was still killing the Demon Blood Wolf here. “Eh? You’re leaving?” He was very surprised. Lin Xuan nodded. “I was a little too ambitious. I just got to 300 meters and was injured.” Wen Xiong consoled, “It’s fine, it’s fine. Then go and rest.” After saying goodbye to Wen Xiong, Lin Xuan found a deserted place and changed out of his Shield Ghost equipment. He returned to being a cautious and low-key wasteland reclaimer. “The consciousness space is a little small now. Moreover, I also have a large number of general coins in reserve. Let’s increase the size.” Lin Xuan spent a large number of general coins and quickly changed the entire consciousness space. [Consciousness Space: Level 6] Capacity: 400 cubic meters [Smelting Table: Table 1 (currently smelting ores), Table 2 (currently smelting equipment), Table 3 (currently smelting runes)] [Forging Table: Forging Table 1 (Unused), Forging Table 2 (Unused), Forging Table 3 (Unused)] (Synthesis Table: Synthesis Table 1 (Unused), click to check the synthesis list] [Medicine Table: Medicine Table 1 (Unused), Click to check the medicinal list] Currently, these workstations were all level 3 workstations with+50% efficiency. A level 4 workstation had 100% more efficiency compared to a level 1 workstation. To upgrade a workstation from a level 3 workstation to a level 4 workstation, one would require 1 million general coins. Lin Xuan raised all the workstations to level 4 in a single breath. “Alright, alright, time to increase the efficiency!” Half a month later, at night. Lin Xuan sent out his avatar and changed his appearance to arrive at Thorn Town. The last time he came here, he had only watched from afar and did not enter the town. However, this time, he planned to enter and take a look. Perhaps he could obtain more information from these people. After all, this body had left him with pitifully few memories. Ever since the demon disaster destroyed East Lake City, Lin Xuan’s previous self had been staying in East Lake City and had no idea what was going on in the outside world. Due to the existence of wandering demon beasts in the wilderness, connections were almost completely cut off, and information was extremely scarce. Lin Xuan was wearing the black cloak from before. His entire face was covered by a mask, and no one could tell who he was. The others could only determine from his appearance that this was not a person to be trifled with. Lin Xuan entered Thorn Town and was not stopped at all. However, he clearly sensed several unfriendly gazes wandering around him. Lin Xuan used his Observer skill to observe the people of Thorn Town one by one. The data panel of these people revealed all of their secrets in front of him. Everything was crystal clear. Just as he thought, the vast majority of the martial artists gathered here were at the Zero Realm and First Realm. There were very few level nine First Realm martial artists. However, when he saw a figure in the corner, he immediately lost his calm. Because this person was Lu Luo! At this moment, Lu Luo was wrapped in a large brown cloak. The cloak was covered in dirt, and those who did not know would only treat Lu Luo as an ordinary refugee. “What is Lu Luo doing here? Is she here to experience the local customs?” Lin Xuan was very puzzled. Then, he sensed that Lu Luo also looked at him with her Observer skill. However, the attributes that Lin Xuan displayed were all carefully disguised. They were not too powerful or too weak. In Lu Luo’s eyes, he was a level one Third Realm martial artist with ordinary attributes. As Lin Xuan pondered, he planned to find a place to sit. “Heh, you’re from outside. This is Thorn Town. You have to pay for coming here!” Three martial artists suddenly walked over from three directions with unkind expressions. Lin Xuan sighed. Such incidents of finding trouble were indeed common. Lin Xuan asked, “How much?” The martial artist in the lead licked his lips. He had probably mistaken Lin Xuan for a big fish. “1,000… no… 10,000 general coins!” The other party was only a level three First Realm martial artist and had only accumulated more than 900 general coins. If he could extort this spendthrift, he would be able to make a killing. Lin Xuan nodded. “Get closer. I’ll directly trade with you.” The martial artist grinned and approached without any vigilance. The next moment, a terrifying high temperature surged out of Lin Xuan’s palm and instantly pierced through the martial artist’s chest, burning a huge transparent hole. The martial artist’s eyes widened as he fell to the ground. The surrounding martial artists stood up in fear. The other party had instantly killed a level three First Realm martial artist. What kind of monster was this outsider? A level nine First Realm martial artist quickly roared, “Outsider! You’re indeed very powerful, but you can’t casually kill people!” The surrounding martial artists also warned with stern expressions, “That’s right, that’s right.” Lin Xuan clapped his hands. “This guy wanted to extort me. That was why I killed him. Do you have to be so shocked?” “I only came here to obtain some information.” After hearing this, the martial artists relaxed slightly. However, this cloaked man had casually killed a person with a single attack. This strength was too powerful, and it really made them feel as if they would be stabbed in the back if they were not careful. The level nine First Realm martial artist waved his hand. Immediately, two refugees walked over and carried the corpse away before casually throwing it out. Lu Luo was also slightly surprised as she looked over. “This martial artist is very powerful.” However, she was only momentarily surprised and did not continue to pay attention. No matter how powerful a Third Realm martial artist was, the other party was still insignificant. “You, come over.” Lin Xuan pointed at the level nine First Realm martial artist. The martial artist looked to be 17 or 18 years old. Hearing this, he sighed and walked in front of him. “What do you want to know?” Lin Xuan waved his hand. A hoarse voice sounded from under his cloak. “Don’t be so nervous. I’m not a demon.” The martial artist smiled helplessly and thought to himself, “You casually killed a person as soon as you arrived. Isn’t this what you call a demon?” How was he supposed to know if the other party was not chaotic and evil? After all, Lin Xuan could kill him whenever he wanted. Lin Xuan said, “What’s your name?” “Long Taojia.” Lin Xuan said, “Have you been to the nearby cities?” “No, I was in East Lake City when the demon disaster happened and escaped here.” Lin Xuan was surprised. “Then why don’t you join the Germinal Organization?” Long Taojia sighed. “Because of the collar, I’d rather be a human than a dog.” Lin Xuan smacked his lips. He was also wearing a collar and somehow felt like he had been insulted. Lin Xuan said, “Other than the Germinal Organization, do you know any other organizations?” Long Taojia said, “The biggest is of course the Construction Division, followed by the Germinal Organization. As for smaller organizations, there are two of them in Chang Le City. Other than that, I don’t know.” Lin Xuan nodded. “Do you know what the Construction Division is like?” To the north of East Lake City was White Water City. Further north was White Crane Town controlled by the Construction Division. He wanted to hear what ordinary people like Long Taojia thought of the Construction Division. Long Taojia’s eyes lit up. “I heard that the Construction Division is not like the Germinal Organization. They don’t make low-level martial artists wear collars and use them as cannon fodder. Moreover, the Construction Division has also built extremely large city walls that prevent demon beasts from entering. It has allocated work to the residents, allowing them to live happily in the city. I really want to join the Construction Division.” Lin Xuan said, “Then why don’t you join?” Long Taojia had a long face. “…Brother, not everyone can cross such a dangerous wilderness.” Lin Xuan noticed that as he and Long Taojia were talking about the Construction Division, Lu Luo, who was originally not very interested in him, also looked over. Lin Xuan asked, “How old are you this year?” Long Taojia: “…Is this also part of the information you need?” “Are you going to tell me?” A small fireball lit up in his palm. “I’m 18 this year. My parents are dead, I’m unmarried, and I’m widowed. My hobby is playing cards…” At this moment, Lin Xuan suddenly noticed Lu Luo quietly get up and leave, retreating into the darkness. “I’m very satisfied with your answer.” He took out 2,000 general coins and gave them to the other party. Long Taojia was stunned. “Thank you…” Lin Xuan immediately followed closely and disappeared with Lu Luo. He was very fast and quickly discovered Lu Luo’s petite figure in the distance. Then, he saw Lu Luo turn and enter a house with a low roof. In less than three minutes, another figure entered this house. “Late night rendezvous? Hiss…” Lin Xuan smacked his lips. He did not expect Lu Luo to be so naughty even though she was clearly a little loli. He quickly approached and leaned towards the wall. With his sharp senses, he immediately heard the low conversation in the house. “… The Germinal Organization has already controlled the Fourth Realm mystic realm, the Blazing Fire Plains, and their strength has increased further.” “The Germinal Organization’s strength has increased very quickly. This is very disadvantageous to us. Currently, the high-level and mid-level forces in our internal department have all been mobilized to resist the demon beasts in the Drowning City mystic realm. There are very few defensive forces here in White Crane Town.” “I understand. I’ll cooperate with Number Two to slow down the development of the Germinal Organization.” “You can also recruit some members of the Germinal Organization and gather all the forces that can be gathered.” “I’m doing it. There’s a person called Shield Ghost in East Lake City who refuses to join the Germinal Organization. Number Two has already expressed his goodwill to him. He should be able to recruit him.” “Very good, the Construction Division won’t forget your contributions!” After that, they stopped talking. Then, the two figures left the low house in succession. The petite figure headed west, and the tall figure headed north. Lin Xuan was deep in thought. Lu Luo and Number Two were both spies buried in the Germinal Organization? What kind of organization was this Construction Division? With this doubt in mind, Lin Xuan put all the equipment into his consciousness space and activated the Avatar Technique. Half a month passed in a flash. Lin Xuan’s four training avatars in the Blazing Fire Plains had already collected all the skill books. He took the opportunity to remove them and use all his training avatar slots on the demon beasts in the Inferior Demon Mountain. In this way, all six training avatars would hack together. Their speed was extremely fast. His level naturally increased to level nine Fifth Realm. His various skills, equipment, and runes also increased in an orderly manner according to their advancement difficulty. “In order to make sure nothing goes wrong, I’ll only challenge the experienced mystic realm king after I level up everything.” Lin Xuan nodded slightly. On this day, Lu Luo found him. “Lin Xuan, help me contact Shield Ghost. Number Two wants to meet him.” Lin Xuan said, “Shield Ghost told me to tell you guys that if you want to find him, meet him in the same place at the same time.” Lu Luo nodded. “Alright.” That night, far away from the Germinal Organization base, in the dilapidated house they had previously met. By the time Lin Xuan arrived in his black armor, there were already two figures in the house. One of them was pacing back and forth with his arms crossed. One of them was sitting on the window sill with a bottle of vodka. Seeing him appear, Manager Number Two nodded slightly. “You’re very punctual.” “What’s the matter?” a hoarse voice sounded from the black armor. Manager Number Two smiled. “Join us.” “I said that I won’t join the Germinal Organization.” Manager Number Two shook his head. “Not the Germinal Organization. Join me.” Lin Xuan pretended to be suspicious. “How are you different from the Germinal Organization?” Number Two said, “The Germinal Organization is the Germinal Organization, and I’m me. How can we be the same?” Black burped. “Can you stop speaking in riddles? Do you think you’re in Gotham City?” Manager Number Two: “…I was just being cautious.” Black pushed Number Two away in dissatisfaction. “If Shield Ghost wanted to join the Germinal Organization, he would have done so from the beginning. Why would he have waited until now? Aren’t you just wasting time by probing him? I still have a box of vodka under my bed. I’m in a hurry to go back and drink!” Number Two was speechless. Black turned to Lin Xuan. “I’ll get straight to the point. Six years ago, East Lake City was still under the control of the Construction Division. However, later on, the Germinal Organization suddenly appeared and took over this region. From then on, the Construction Division and the Germinal Organization have always been enemies. The two of us are spies planted by the Construction Division.” “Now that the Germinal Organization has gained control of another mystic realm, their strength will increase greatly. Based on the Germinal Organization’s previous bad record, they are definitely a threat to the Construction Division.” “Do you want to join the Construction Division?” Lin Xuan did not know whether to laugh or cry. This Black was really honest and straightforward. After a short moment of thought, Lin Xuan said, “I have no intention of joining any organization for the time being, be it the Germinal Organization or the Construction Division.” “Don’t be in a hurry to refuse. I know that you’re ambitious and unwilling to be an ordinary person. If so, you definitely want to know what martial artists after the Seventh Realm are like so that you can make plans early,” Black said calmly. “Please tell me.” “First, what a Seventh Realm martial artist needs is no longer experience points, but essence. Essence will only be dropped after killing those elite demon beasts.” “Second, after your skills, equipment, and runes reach the Seventh Realm, you can use a special resource to break through the upper limit of the quality. The peerless golden grade is not the limit.” “And such resources are only available in those large mystic realms.” “Currently, there are only seven known large mystic realms in the world. Two of them are under the control of the Construction Division, and the third is the Drowning City mystic realm. It’s located in the East Sea. The other four large mystic realms are distributed in the other continents.” After Black finished speaking, he stretched out a leg and straddled a chair, quietly looking at Lin Xuan. The information he said immediately made Lin Xuan’s eyes widen. After a short moment of thought, he quickly understood that in the long term, working with the Construction Division was indeed a good choice. However, he still did not want to join the Construction Division. That would restrict him too much. After hearing Lin Xuan’s description, Number Two heaved a sigh of relief. “It’s fine. We’re official employees of the Construction Division. If you don’t want to officially join, you can still be an intern. Whether or not you can enter the large mystic realm will only depend on your battle merits. As long as your battle merits are high enough, you can also enter them despite being an intern.” Only then did Lin Xuan nod slightly. “Alright, I’ll be an intern.” Manager Number Two said happily, “Since you’ve chosen to join, as a senior, I naturally have to give you some gifts. Tell me, what do you want?” He patted his chest like a war drum, appearing very generous. “Two peerless golden rings and two peerless golden runes. It’s best if they’re both defense-oriented.” Lin Xuan raised four fingers. Manager Number Two’s face immediately trembled. Black laughed heartily. “Shield Ghost, you think too highly of him. Although he’s a level nine Sixth Realm martial artist, he doesn’t have many peerless golden equipment on him.” Lin Xuan scratched his head. He had a lot of peerless golden items on him, so he often felt the same about others. He did not expect a dignified Sixth Realm martial artist and a higher-up of the Germinal Organization to not have such wealth. “How about this? I’ll give you a peerless golden ring. You will definitely like it. This ring provides a high level of stealth enhancement. Even if your Agility is not high, you can still perfectly infiltrate like you’re invisible.” Black rummaged in the storage compartment and threw over a grayish-black ring. “Hey, I’ve already taken out one. You miser, hurry up and take one out!” Black kicked Manager Number Two’s butt. Manager Number Two frowned and muttered, “It’s not that I don’t have it, but it’s only at the Sixth Realm. It won’t be of any use to him.” High-level martial artists could equip lower-level equipment and lower-level runes, but low-level martial artists could not equip higher-level equipment and higher-level runes because they haven’t met the equipment requirements. Lin Xuan said, “It’s fine. I can save it for later.” Of course, he would not say that he could most likely meet the requirements for many equipment. This was because his Constitution attribute had already reached an extremely exaggerated 273 points. As long as it was a Sixth Realm equipment that focused on defense, he would almost be able to equip it. Hearing this, Black laughed even more arrogantly. Manager Number Two’s features were about to wrinkle. He dug for a long time in the storage compartment and finally took out two runes that were flickering with golden light. “Consider these two runes as a personal gift from me to you for joining the Construction Division.” Manager Number Two was very distressed. “You have to use them well. Don’t damage them.” Lin Xuan snatched it away from Manager Number Two. “Thank you… Hey, let go!” Manager Number Two watched the two runes leave his body reluctantly. Lin Xuan placed the ring and the two runes into his consciousness space and casually asked, “Then, what’s my mission? To destroy the Germinal Organization?” “The Germinal Organization had gained complete control of the new mystic realm, the Blazing Fire Plains, not long ago. After accumulating a certain amount of strength, they will definitely expand towards other places. Next, they might attack White Crane Town. At that time, just listen to my signal.” Manager Number Two smiled like an old fox. “Pardon me for asking, but have you often caused trouble for the Germinal Organization in the past?” Lin Xuan asked casually. Manager Number Two shook his head. “How could that be? I joined the Germinal Organization halfway. In order to gain the trust of the higher-ups, I definitely have to be loyal and responsible.” Lin Xuan nodded and waved at the two of them before turning around to leave. Number Two and Black were silent. “Your heart is also very heavy, right? There are only you, me, Lu Luo, and Shield Ghost now. We’re still too weak…” Number Two whispered. Black. “Ah? I was just thinking about the box of vodka I hid under the bed.” Number Two was speechless. After returning to the dormitory, Lin Xuan began to check his gains from this trip. Name: Assassin Ring Level: Level Three Fifth Realm Grade: Peerless Golden Equipment Requirements: Strength 80, Agility 85 Effect 1: Agility+6. Effect 2: Critical Hit chance+20%, Critical Hit Damage+120%. Effect 3: Consciousness -60%, Backstab Damage+233%. Effect 4: If you have the sneak attack skill, the skill will temporarily increase by one grade (can break through the upper limit). Lin Xuan was very satisfied. This ring was simply made for him. Then, he looked at the two runes. One of the two runes happened to be part of the Scarlet Wave Rush rune group. The other was one of the rune groups of “One with the Sword.” Name: One with the Sword (1) Level: Level Six Fifth Realm Grade: Peerless Golden Set Requirements: Sword-type weapon above level one Fifth Realm Effect 1: Sword Damage+30%. Effect 2: (Locked) Any damage caused by the sword+30% critical hit chance , +130% critical hit damage ,+30% bleeding probability. Effect 3: (Locked) Any damage from a sword will ignore 15% physical resistance and have a 20% chance of ignoring 100% physical resistance. … In short, this rune group was suitable for those sword martial artists with high Agility. As long as the attack speed was stacked, the damage would definitely be ridiculous. However, to a martial artist like Lin Xuan who had a huge shield in each hand, it was useless. “I’ll keep it in the consciousness space for now. Perhaps it’ll be useful in the future.” Lin Xuan placed him into his consciousness space and lay on the bed in satisfaction before sleeping. In the next few days, the Germinal Organization seemed to be very peaceful. However, Lin Xuan could clearly sense the pressure from the orders passed down by the managers. The mission quota the wasteland reclaimers had to complete every time had been increased. The number of equipment and medicinal potions that the logisticians were required to make also increased. Level nine Third Realm, Fourth Realm, and Fifth Realm martial artists who did not have much potential were also asked to use their advancement materials as soon as possible and stop waiting to get more advancement materials. With this, ordinary people might not know what the Germinal Organization was up to. However, Lin Xuan had learned of the plan from Number Two and Black in advance and immediately sensed the tension contained in it. There was about to be a battle! There was a high chance that Thorn Town would be taken over by the Germinal Organization in one go. Martial artists who were unwilling to join the Germinal Organization would be expelled, and only martial artists who were willing to join the Germinal Organization could stay. The door of light that led to the First Realm of the Mystic Realm would probably be directly taken back to the base by the Germinal Organization. Chapter 46 The Germinal Organization Strikes Thorn Town Indeed, after only three days, Thorn Town was easily taken. Black took back the door of light of the First Realm mystic realm of Thorn Forest and placed it beside the Giant Rock Cave. In the future, the Germinal Organization would have two First Realm mystic realms. Lin Xuan entered and took a look. After learning the items dropped in Thorn Forest, he realized why the Germinal Organization had not taken action to snatch the door of light earlier. This was because Thorn Forest was too trashy. Unlike the Giant Rock Cave, Thorn Forest would not drop items that directly increased all four attributes. Instead, the items dropped would only increase two attributes: the Thorn Fruit, which increased one’s energy recovery speed by 0.1%, and the Magic Power Flower, which increased one’s upper limit of magic power by 1%. In comparison, the loot in the Giant Rock Cave was simply much better. This was because although the Giant Rock Cave was only at the Zero Realm, it could directly drop attribute items like the Black Scaled Snake Gall and the Barbaric Bull Horn that could directly increase one’s attributes! Now, the Germinal Organization had chosen to take back the door of light of Thorn Forest only because they wanted to increase their strength. After all, although Thorn Forest had few attribute items, there were still many skills, equipment, and so on that were unavailable in the Giant Rock Cave. Lin Xuan also saw that the Long Taojia who had answered many of his questions previously was also among the crowd and had also arrived at the Germinal Organization. This young man was covered in dirt and was in a sorry state. “Ordinary people can only choose to join the Germinal Organization in the end.” Lin Xuan sighed. Although the Germinal Organization’s hierarchy was strict and they treated the wasteland reclaimers like slaves, to those weaklings, they had no other choice other than to join the Germinal Organization. The wilderness was a place where experts could come and go as they pleased. Lin Xuan did not reveal his emotions and continued his duties as an ordinary wasteland reclaimer. On the surface, he was still a Second Realm martial artist who did not use the experienced advancement materials and only used four ordinary advancement materials to advance. He acted cautiously and conscientiously in the Second Realm mystic realm. He would complete the mission every time, and would not over-deliver. During this period of time, more than a third of the martial artists in his batch had died in the mystic realm. Facing these wasteland reclaimers who had died in the mystic realm, Lu Luo could not help them even if she wanted to. After all, she could not run into the mystic realm and follow every wasteland reclaimer like a nanny. One day, Lin Xuan discovered that the middle-aged brother, Sun Zhiguo, who often laughed heartily and helped others enthusiastically, had not returned. He went to Lu Luo to ask about him. Lu Luo told him that the collar had recorded the news of Sun Zhiguo’s death and that he had died under the attack of a group of Red Fire Ants. Lin Xuan nodded silently. If the mission quota had not been changed, Sun Zhiguo would probably not die. However, the sudden increase in the mission quota made Sun Zhiguo immediately enter the mystic realm before he fully recovered. In the end, he failed to hold on. In terms of the death rate of the wasteland reclaimers, District C’s death rate was already the lowest. The death rate of the wasteland reclaimers was the highest in District B. The entire District B was filled with a dangerous aura under Yang Wei’s supervision. Before the mission quota increased, the mortality rate of the wasteland reclaimers in District B had always been 30%. After the number of missions increased, the mortality rate soared to 60%. Yang Wei had done the math. In any case, with the continuous replenishment of refugees, there were bound to be attribute items that refugees could bring back to the mystic realm. If one could not reach the mission quota and died, wouldn’t it be fine as long as another person completed it for him? However, even with such a high mortality rate, the refugees still fought to join the Germinal Organization due to fear. Rather than living an ignoble life outside the Germinal Organization base, which would still cause them to die, they might as well take the collar and risk it all. In such an atmosphere, the Germinal Organization was like a war machine that was accelerating its operation and was about to reveal its fangs. “My skills, equipment, and runes have all been upgraded. I finally feel a little safe. It’s time to challenge the experienced mystic realm king of the Inferior Demon Mountain.” Lin Xuan changed into Shield Ghost’s equipment and rushed straight to the mystic realm king cave on the top of the Inferior Demon Mountain. As he passed by the fifth floor, he chanced upon Lu Luo being chased by dozens of Demon Blood Pythons. Lin Xuan helped her out. “Thank you, thank you.” Lu Luo heaved a sigh of relief. “I accidentally discovered the Demon Blood Python’s nest and was chased after by them.” Lin Xuan nodded and continued to the peak. Lu Luo looked at his back and sighed. It had only been a short while, but Shield Ghost had already surpassed me. Shield Ghost should be exploring the seventh floor. I have to speed up too. I have to increase my level as soon as possible. On the top of the Inferior Demon Mountain. Among the nine mystic realm king caves here, four were experienced mystic realm kings. However, Lin Xuan discovered that someone was currently challenging an experienced mystic realm king. “Shield Ghost? Hello, hello.” “I’ve long heard of Shield Ghost’s name. Are you planning to solo the experienced mystic realm king? How impressive.” There were not many martial artists queuing in the surroundings. There were only a total of 12 people in three teams. Seeing a figure in black armor walk over, most of the Fifth Realm martial artists in these small teams smiled and greeted him. After this period of time, Shield Ghost’s name had already spread widely in the Germinal Organization. Everyone knew his name. He had always been alone along the way. He had to rely on himself to accumulate the advancement materials. Such a person even made them unable to be envious. They were mostly filled with admiration. Lin Xuan saw that Wen Xiong, Yang Wei, and the others were also in these teams. Yang Wei had recently advanced from a Fourth Realm martial artist to a Fifth Realm martial artist and had only used five ordinary advancement materials. Compared to Lin Xuan, who had used five experienced advancement materials, it was as if Yang Wei had lost 40 attribute points. He had suffered a huge loss. Lin Xuan remembered the names of these three teams and the names of the 12 Fifth Realm martial artists very clearly. The Germinal Organization currently controlled a total of 26 Fifth Realm martial artists. Among them, only 5 were on Manager Number Two’s side, and the rest were all under Manager Number Three. These were all the information provided by Number Two. “Do you guys know who else is challenging the experienced mystic realm king?” Lin Xuan pointed at a cave. “Oh, it’s the Demon King Team. Their strength is very powerful. For the sake of today’s battle, they have also accumulated a lot of medicinal potions. They have also only entered for a few minutes.” Wen Xiong was about to say something when a martial artist beat him to the punch and replied with a smile. “Shield Ghost, if you want to solo the experienced mystic realm king, you have to hurry. Otherwise, the Demon King Team will beat you to it.” After the martial artist finished speaking, he added. Lin Xuan nodded slightly. The four people from the Demon King Team were all level nine Fifth Realm martial artists. They were Manager Number Three’s most trusted subordinates. “I didn’t expect someone to actually snatch the experienced mystic realm king from me. Then, let’s see who’s faster.” Lin Xuan chuckled in his heart and also crawled into the cave. “Shield…” Wen Xiong was about to remind Lin Xuan when he saw this. He could only swallow his words. Wen Xiong frowned and said, “Zhang Peng, why did you stop there? The four people from the Demon King Team have said that they want to take down all the experienced mystic realm kings today and won’t allow the other teams to challenge them.” The four people from the Demon King Team were the elites of the elites. He heard that the four of them had been nurtured by Manager Number Three. Every time they advanced, they would use at least two experienced advancement materials. On the other hand, the rest of them could only gather ordinary advancement materials. The captain of the Demon King Team had even used five experienced advancement materials when advancing to the First Realm and Second Realm. Although they were all level nine Fifth Realm martial artists, their total attributes were 30 to 40 points higher than the others. Zhang Peng smiled strangely. “I don’t get along with the Demon King Team. I don’t like Shield Ghost either. If they can fight, that would be great.” Wen Xiong’s frown deepened. In a while, Shield Ghost and the Demon King team would probably get into a conflict. At this moment, Wen Xiong felt that he should be on the Shield Ghost’s side and help him out. After all, he felt that Shield Ghost definitely couldn’t beat four of them alone. Wen Xiong decisively said, “I’ll temporarily withdraw from the team and not enter to challenge the mystic realm king.” The captain of his team said in surprise, “Ah? Why?” Wen Xiong pointed at the cave Lin Xuan had just entered. “I’m friends with Shield Ghost. I want to help him in case he gets into conflict with the people of the Demon King Team.” The captain smiled helplessly. “Alright, alright. I’ll find another person.” Not far away, Zhang Peng heard this and smiled sarcastically. “Forget it. You treat him as a friend, but he might not treat you as a friend. Don’t think too highly of yourself.” Chapter 47 I Want Him to Apologize to Me In the cave. What entered Lin Xuan’s sight was a small mountain-like demon. The entire thing was more than four meters tall and was completely indigo-blue. It was wearing a pantsuit and was holding a thick and large stick. This Demon King had a green face and sharp teeth, and it was ferocious. With a single glance, one could tell that it was not someone to be trifled with. Lin Xuan used his Observer skill as usual. Name: Giant Demon King Title: Experienced Mystic Realm King Level: Level Nine Fifth Realm Attributes: 169 Constitution, 182 Strength, 22 Spirit, 46 Agility Skill: Giant Demon Roar (Precious Purple), Giant Demon Hard Leather (Peerless Golden), Mastery of Heavy Weapon (Precious Purple), Stinky Attack, Fury Five Combo Seeing the skill Giant Demon Hard Leather, Lin Xuan’s eyes lit up. Aiyo, the other party actually had a peerless golden grade skill. He felt that this guy was very impressive. He really liked this skill! Roar! The Giant Demon King sensed that an enemy was nearby and immediately smashed its huge club over. At this moment, Lin Xuan had already put on the Giant Shield Set and the Overlord Set. These two sets were the equipment with the highest physical resistance he had on him. He casually used the Dragon Hunter Shield in his left hand and the Earth Dragon King Hammer Shield in his right. He was already prepared. When the huge club landed on the shield, the entire cave sounded with an ear-piercing sound of metal colliding. Clang! Lin Xuan looked down and saw that his feet had actually sunk half a centimeter into the ground. It could be imagined how powerful the Giant Demon King’s attack was just now. “However, it didn’t break my defense.” Lin Xuan glanced at his health points again and chuckled. Roar! Roar! Roar! He did not lose any health points, but because of the reflective effect of his Thorn Body and the Dragon Hunter Shield, the Giant Demon King’s health points decreased slightly and it immediately roared in anger. All kinds of skills were thrown at Lin Xuan. The other party smashed Lin Xuan five times in anger! Bang bang bang The huge club smashed down fiercely without stopping for a moment. The Giant Demon Roar! The Giant Demon King opened its mouth and let out a deafening roar. This voice seemed to be material and could directly attack one’s mind. The first time he heard the roar, Lin Xuan also felt his head spin for a moment. However, after the second and third time, the effects of the Giant Demon Roar on him could be said to be negligible. Dizziness was a negative state. As long as one’s constitution was high enough, any negative state could be avoided. There was no need to be afraid of mere dizziness. At this moment, outside the cave, the dozen or so martial artists also heard the furious roar and trembled. “I’ve experienced the terror of the Giant Demon King more than half a year ago. After fighting it once, I knew that one would not be able to handle it without a strong enough constitution.” “That’s right, that’s right. The Demon King Roar can make everyone in the entire place dizzy. The other party could also directly smash you into a bloody mess with a single club. It’s too ridiculous.” “Therefore, every team needs a shield-bearer who can resist this. Unfortunately, few people are willing to invest their precious experience points into defensive skills.” The martial artists discussed one after another. Hearing their words, Wen Xiong was even more impressed with Shield Ghost. What a ferocious man. He just so happened to love ferocious men! “The experienced mystic realm king, the Demon Blood Wolf King, has been killed! The experienced mystic realm king, the Demon Blood Wolf King, has been killed!” The announcement of the Inferior Demon Mountain safety station suddenly sounded, spreading throughout the entire mountain. Then, the four people from the Demon King Team walked out of the cave. Although the four of them were all injured, none of them had dispirited expressions and were only lightly injured. The captain, Luo Rixu, laughed heartily. “Good! As expected of our Demon King Team! You guys won decisively!” Zhang Peng was the first to approach with a flattering smile. “Captain Luo is really awesome!” “Captain Luo is awesome! Bring me along when you have time in the future!” “How’s Captain Luo’s luck? What good stuff did you get this time?” The surrounding martial artists also came over to support. They also felt that the Demon King Team would definitely succeed this time. Now that the truth was placed in front of them, they naturally had to quickly praise them. Everyone knew that Luo Xuri and the others would probably be able to advance to the Sixth Realm after some time. At that time, he would only be under a few people in the Germinal Organization! By then, even the three managers had to be polite to him, right? Luo Rixu waved his hand and said smugly, “I only got a peerless golden skill book. Actually, what I needed the most was the experienced advancement materials, but I only got three. That’s too few.” Zhang Peng was even more amazed when he heard this. “Captain Luo, your luck is off the charts today! What’s that skill book? Do you want to let us take a peek?” Luo Rixu smiled and shook his head. “That won’t do. This is my trump card. I can’t easily show it to others.” Zhang Peng was slightly furious, but he did not show it on his face and immediately changed the topic. “By the way, Captain Luo, that Shield Ghost is also here.” Luo Rixu raised his eyebrows. “Where?” Zhang Peng pointed at a cave behind him. “There, he’s challenging the Giant Demon King.” <b>non</b>  Luo Rixu turned around and saw that Lin Xuan was currently challenging one of the experienced mystic realm kings he was planning to challenge. He immediately frowned deeply. “Didn’t I say that our Demon King Team will take care of all four experienced mystic realm kings today? What’s wrong with him?” Zhang Peng shrugged helplessly. “Perhaps a rising star has a bigger temper.” Wen Xiong stood up on the spot. “Zhang Peng, don’t try to sow discord there. Shield Ghost doesn’t even know that the Demon King Team booked the entire place today.” With that said, he turned to Luo Rixu. “Captain Luo, Shield Ghost entered too quickly. I didn’t have the time to remind him. Please don’t…” Luo Rixu directly interrupted him. “A mere level four Fifth Realm martial artist… Is it your turn to interrupt?” “Can anyone tell me why a level four Fifth Realm like him could get to the peak? Who brought him here?” He pointed at Wen Xiong and looked at Zhang Peng and the others. The captain of the team that Wen Xiong had been staying in previously raised his hand helplessly. “My… my team was short of people at the last minute. I pulled him over on the way. His constitution is actually quite high and he’s qualified to be a shield-bearer…” Before he could finish speaking, he was interrupted by Luo Rixu’s scoff. “What a joke. A mystic realm king is not comparable to an experienced mystic realm king, but it’s still not something that a level four Fifth Realm mystic realm king can handle. You two are taking the lives of your other two teammates as a joke.” The captain’s expression changed slightly. “Hmph, I can’t be bothered to talk nonsense with you. When Shield Ghost comes out, I want him to apologize to me in person!” Luo Rixu waved his hand and signaled for the three people in his team to sit and rest. They had suffered some light injuries when dealing with the Demon Blood Wolf King and had also consumed some medicinal potions. Now, they had to recover to their peak state before challenging the next experienced mystic realm king. At this moment, another announcement sounded. “The experienced mystic realm king, the Giant Demon King, has been killed!” Then, the martial artists saw a figure in black armor walk out unscathed. His armor was not damaged at all, and his footsteps were not weak at all. He had actually maintained his peak state after killing an experienced mystic realm king. Luo Rixu was slightly surprised. He had never seen Shield Ghost before. He still felt that the rumors about Shield Ghost’s capabilities were probably true. Now that he saw it with his own eyes, it was indeed extraordinary. “Shield…” Before the second word could come out, Lin Xuan directly walked into the next experienced mystic realm king cave. Luo Rixu: “…Damn!” Chapter 48 Let’s See How Long He Can Stay in the Cave In the cave, Lin Xuan faced a huge demon ape with a puzzled expression. “Someone seemed to have called me just now?” “Forget it. Fighting the experienced mystic realm king is more important.” Lin Xuan used his Observer skill and discovered that although this Demon Ape King had high physical resistance, its fire resistance was very low. He immediately took out the Blazing Fire Codex and began to throw fireballs randomly. Ordinary martial artists’ Fireball were all ordinary white. Very few people would be bothered to pay attention to the advancement of the Fireball. However, Lin Xuan’s Fireball was of the peerless golden grade. Moreover, it was the same level as his cultivation. Now, it was also at level nine of the Fifth Realm. In addition, he had many equipment and runes that could increase fire magic and reduce the consumption of magic power. A few fireballs smashed over, and the Demon Ape King was burned to the point of crying out. Its combat desire had even decreased greatly. The Demon Ape King finally approached and punched Lin Xuan, but it was suddenly blocked by Lin Xuan’s huge shield. The Demon Ape King had a very shocked expression. It was an experienced mystic realm king. In other words, it had been in battle for a long time and had dealt with many martial artists. It knew all the weaknesses of the important classes such as shield-bearers, swordsmen, mages, archers, and medics. Shouldn’t mages have powerful output and weak survival skills? Why did it end up getting blocked by the extremely exaggerated shield after spending so much effort to approach? Lin Xuan coughed lightly. “I’m a mage. It’s not too much for me to take out a big shield to protect myself, right?” The Demon Ape King roared angrily and punched its robust chest with both fists, its voice like a war drum. It felt as if it had been mocked by this human. … Outside the cave. Luo Rixu heaved a long sigh. His health, magic power, and energy had all recovered to their peak. The other three members of the Demon King Team were also at full health. It was time for them to start a new battle. “Although Shield Ghost has snatched one, it’s fine. There’s still another experienced mystic realm king waiting for us. Follow me…” Before he could finish speaking, the radio at the safety station sounded again. “The experienced mystic realm king, the Demon Ape King, has been killed!” Then, Luo Rixu saw a figure enveloped in black armor walk out of the cave and walk towards the fourth experienced cave unscathed! “Stop!” Luo Rixu could not stand it anymore and shouted. Lin Xuan asked curiously, “What is it?” Luo Rixu said, “That experienced mystic realm king is ours! Don’t go in!” Lin Xuan said, “I want to go in.” With that said, he turned and entered the fourth experienced cave. Because Luo Rixu were resting at the time and were sitting at a distance, they could only watch as he walked in. Luo Rixu: “Damn!” At this moment, he was furious. He had already personally pointed out that the experienced mystic realm king belonged to their Demon King Team, but Shield Ghost still did not give him face. Moreover, he did so publicly with so many Fifth Realm martial artists watching! Luo Rixu vowed to teach him a lesson! Seeing that Shield Ghost was so powerful, Wen Xiong felt admiration and worry at the same time. “The few people from the Demon King Team are too powerful. Although Shield Ghost is powerful, he can’t fight four people alone.” “How can I help him?” Wen Xiong pondered hard. Luo Rixu shouted, “Surround the cave! As long as he comes out, we’ll beat him up!” “He has consecutively challenged three experienced mystic realm kings. He will definitely not be at his peak state. There are four of us, and all of us are at our peak state. Defeating him will be easy!” Luo Rixu gritted his teeth. “You’re just a coward who hides under his shell. Today, I’m going to expose your true identity!” Half an hour later. The ten-meter-long Demon Python King fell to the ground and died, exploding into light that filled the sky. “You received 100,000 general coins and 500,000 experience points.” “You have obtained the precious purple skill book (Demonized Body].” “You obtained the rare blue blueprint (Fire Stone Ring).” “You obtained three peerless golden advancement materials (Demon Python King’s War Snake Fang).” Name: Demonized Body Level: Level Nine Fifth Realm Quality: Precious Purple Learning Requirements: Constitution: 130, Spirit: 69 Effect 1:+30% Fire Resistance , +25% Bleeding Resistance. Effect 2: When injured, you will obtain the “demonized” state, causing all damage to increase by 15%. Lin Xuan’s eyes lit up. He had actually gotten a precious purple book. Now, he could increase his damage output after being injured. Naturally, his reflective damage would also be increased. In this way, his damage output became stronger. “This skill is precious purple. I still have many ordinary white skill books with the same name in my consciousness space. I should be able to directly increase this skill to the peerless golden grade.” Lin Xuan searched his consciousness space and indeed found nine ordinary white skill books. Eight ordinary white skill books could be combined into a single precious purple skill book. In this way, after consuming a large number of general coins, this skill was successfully upgraded to the peerless golden grade. “Perfect! I also have enough experienced advancement materials. I even obtained the two peerless golden skills, the Giant Demon Hard Leather and the Demonized Body. Time to end this!” Lin Xuan walked out of the cave with a happy expression. Then, he saw four big men squatting beside the cave. When the four of them saw Shield Ghost, they immediately surrounded him fiercely. “Shield Ghost! You broke the rules! I’ll give you a chance. Hand over the advancement materials you obtained. Otherwise, you won’t be able to leave the Inferior Demon Mountain today!” The captain of the Demon King Team, Luo Rixu, had a gloomy expression. Not far away, the corners of Zhang Peng’s mouth curled up, as if he was prepared to watch a big show. The other martial artists had different expressions. Wen Xiong had already clenched his fists and prepared to rush over to help. Lin Xuan smiled as if nothing had happened and then… stepped into the cave. He went on to challenge another mystic realm king. Luo Rixu: “…You!” He did not expect Shield Ghost to be so shameless. He actually used the special rules of the mystic realm to handle this situation. When a team challenged a mystic realm king, the other teams could not challenge it and could only wait outside. In the past, some people had also tried to use this method to avoid being chased. However, mystic realm kings were not necessarily weaker than the people they chased after. It was very difficult for people to stay in the cave forever. This was because every time a mystic realm king respawned, it would only last for a few minutes. After killing a mystic realm king, the martial artist would definitely not be at their peak condition and had to recover. The longer one stayed in the cave, the worse one’s condition became. The mystic realm kings respawned very quickly and did not give the martial artists any chance to catch their breath. In the end, they would either escape from the cave or die under the claws of the mystic realm kings. Either way, they would still die. Luo Rixu’s eyebrows furrowed. “Wait! I want to see how long he can stay in the cave!” “Captain is right. Even if he spent all his attribute points on defense, it’s impossible for him to stay in the cave forever!” “Don’t forget that he has already soloed three experienced mystic realm kings previously. His condition is definitely not good.” “We’ll wait. We’ll rest outside. He can’t rest for a moment inside! He will have to come out eventually!” The three members of the Demon King Team nodded. Hearing this, Wen Xiong immediately revealed a strange expression. He realized that these people probably did not know that Shield Ghost had single-handedly defeated the nine experienced mystic realm kings of the Blazing Fire Plains. Moreover, the news that spread failed to mention an important detail. When Shield Ghost killed the nine experienced kings alone, he did not rest the entire time! After killing one, he immediately killed another! If killing experienced mystic realm kings was already so easy for him, wouldn’t it be even easier for him to deal with these ordinary mystic realm kings? Thinking like this, Wen Xiong immediately relaxed. His gaze as he looked at Luo Rixu and the other three was somewhat teasing. Wait? He wanted to see how long these guys could wait. Chapter 49 Popping In and Out, Angering You to Death At this moment, Shield Ghost, who Luo Rixu and the others claimed to be unable to catch his breath, was lying on a soft fur cushion. His hands were on his head as he looked at the dome in the cave. The Demon Blood Tiger King was currently fiercely attacking the two large shields in front of it. However, not only was it unable to injure Lin Xuan, it was even injuring itself. “Advance!” Lin Xuan muttered the word “advance”. The five experienced advancement materials in his consciousness space immediately turned into light and fused into his body. Looking at the data panel again, he had already advanced to level one Sixth Realm. His basic attributes were: Constitution 353, Strength 110, Spirit 110, Agility 110. “The attributes of the four people from the Demon King Team are indeed not bad. They far surpass the other level nine Fifth Realm martial artists. Their highest attributes can already be compared to my Agility attribute.” After Lin Xuan killed this mystic realm king, he strode out of the cave. As soon as he walked out, he saw Luo Rixu and the other three suddenly pounce over. “Shield Ghost, you’re still…” Before he could finish speaking, Lin Xuan smiled strangely and took a step back into the cave. “I’m out!” “But I’m going back in again!” “Hey, I’m out again!” Luo Rixu and the other three saw Lin Xuan’s head popping in and out repeatedly in the cave. The four of them :”…” The other martial artists also suppressed their laughter. Luo Rixu gritted his teeth. “Are you toying with me?!” Roar! A roar sounded from the cave. Clearly, another mystic realm king had appeared. Lin Xuan threw over a few general coins. “Thank you for guarding the door for me.” Luo Rixu’s anger almost soared to the peak. He could not stand being toyed with repeatedly. Yang Wei was speechless as he watched from afar. Shield Ghost was really impressive. He even dared to provoke Luo Rixu. Lin Xuan crossed his legs and paced back and forth in the cave, not caring about the attacks of the mystic realm kings. One, two, three… Ten, twenty, thirty… a hundred… Luo Rixu and the other three waited for the entire day but did not see any signs of Shield Ghost coming out. One of the team members coughed lightly and said in a low voice, “Captain… it’s not good for us to waste time like this. It’s not good for us to continue waiting like this.” Another team member sighed and said, “Captain, something major has happened recently. It’s better for us to increase our strength as soon as possible. Since we don’t have the experienced advancement materials, let’s use the ordinary advancement materials.” Luo Rixu gritted his teeth. Previously, he had only obtained three advancement materials for challenging that experienced mystic realm king. He was still short of two. However, there were no more Fifth Realm experienced advancement materials in the Germinal Organization’s logistics department In order for him to get more, he would until half a year later! Shield Ghost directly shattered his hopes of advancing perfectly! “Then let’s kill ordinary mystic realm kings…” Before Luo Rixu could finish speaking A figure enveloped in a black armor walked out of the cave. “I’m out again.” This time, Lin Xuan strode towards them. He was done playing. It was time for him to teach them a lesson and stop them from being so pretentious in the future. From the moment he heard Luo Rixu’s first sentence, he knew that it would be impossible for them to get along without fighting today. Moreover, Luo Rixu was also a powerful expert under Manager Number Three. It was very likely that he would be on the enemy’s side in the future. In addition, Lin Xuan had already advanced to first level Sixth Realm and was almost shoulder to shoulder with the three managers. He no longer had to keep a low profile like before. He could completely be high-profile. Luo Rixu smiled sinisterly. With a wave of his hand, one of the members of the Demon King Team directly blocked the entrance of the cave. “Let’s see how you escape!” Luo Rixu roared. Lin Xuan waved his two huge shields that were like doors and quickly rushed towards Luo Rixu like lightning. The exaggerated shield expanded rapidly in Luo Rixu’s pupils and was filled with a heavy and majestic suppression. Luo Rixu’s heart suddenly sank. It was too fast! He didn’t even have time to react! “You’re the ones who should be running!” A calm voice sounded from the black armor. The next moment, the powerful Dragon Hunter Shield fiercely imprinted itself on Luo Rixu’s face! Bang! Luo Rixu’s head was almost bent 180 degrees. A lifelike dragon claw pattern appeared on his cheek. His body was even sent flying more than three meters. This attack was as fast as lightning and as heavy as Mount Tai. It directly dumbfounded the martial artists who were watching the commotion. Luo Rixu forced himself to get up and forcefully swept his gaze over his health. He was shocked. This attack just now had directly taken away one-third of his health! He was not a person who only focused on strength, spirit, and agility. He had also increased his Constitution greatly. Even if an experienced mystic realm king attacked, it would at most reduce his health by one-sixth. What the hell was this Shield Ghost!? “You three, don’t worry, it’s your turn.” Lin Xuan’s palm suddenly formed three huge, hot fireballs and suddenly blasted over. Bang! The expressions of the three team members changed drastically. They hurriedly blocked, but their defense was instantly broken and they were sent flying. Blood sprayed wildly in the air, and large areas of their chests and skin were charred. Luo Rixu’s jaw dropped exaggeratedly. Didn’t Shield Ghost use a shield and focused on Constitution points? How could he even use fire magic? The damage was even higher than the mages in their team! Wen Xiong’s eyes also widened. Damn, Shield Ghost was actually hiding something! Yang Wei had a shocked expression. He was a mage and had even greedily learned all four elemental spells. However, his fire magic might only be half of that of Shield Ghost. “Shield Ghost… How many experience points does he have?” Zhang Peng’s legs were trembling. He was beginning to regret getting involved in this matter. Lin Xuan looked at the four people from the Demon King Team who had collapsed on the ground and clapped his hands. “In the future, don’t be so arrogant. I have a good temper. I was only teaching you a lesson. If it were someone with a bad temper, they might have easily killed you.” Luo Rixu’s face was red, but he did not dare to say a word. He was afraid that Shield Ghost would attack with a fireball if he said anything else. “Let’s go. See you guys later.” Lin Xuan strode out and prepared to leave. “Wait!” A voice suddenly sounded. It was Zhang Peng, whose legs were trembling “Shield… Shield Ghost! I’ll be honest. I deliberately did not say that the Demon King Team had surrounded these four experienced caves. I had the intention to urge you guys to fight and watch the show. I was wrong!” Zhang Peng knew that Wen Xiong had seen everything. He was afraid that Wen Xiong would report this to Shield Ghost later. Therefore, he simply gritted his teeth and stomped his feet to confess. In this way, Shield Ghost might not make things difficult for him. Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. He was wondering why the people of the Demon King Team were flustered and exasperated as if they had been instigated. It turned out that someone was really instigating trouble. He responded with a fireball. Boom! Zhang Peng was also sent flying. His clothes were charred, and his health decreased by a third. “Do you think I won’t beat you up if you tell me the truth?” Lin Xuan threw out this sentence and strode down the Inferior Demon Mountain. All the martial artists looked at his back, half fearful and half admiring. Chapter 50 Protecting Shield Ghost After Lin Xuan returned to his single room, exciting news swept through the entire Germinal base like a hurricane. Not only had Shield Ghost defeated the three experienced mystic realm kings of the inferior Demon Mountain alone, but he had also soloed four people from the Demon King Team and severely injured each of them with just one hit! As soon as the news was out, all the martial artists were collectively in an uproar. Everyone knew that the Demon King Team was the trump card under Manager Number Three. They were elites that he had nurtured with all his might! It was one thing for Shield Ghost to solo one of them, but he actually defeated four of them alone! Moreover, after Shield Ghost killed three experienced mystic realm kings, he probably also obtained five experienced advancement materials and could advance to the Sixth Realm! In this world, a Sixth Realm martial artist was definitely a top-notch expert. In the Germinal base, he could even be on par with the three managers! The main point was that Shield Ghost had never joined the Germinal Organization and had completely relied on his own strength to achieve this! To many wasteland reclaimers and refugees, he had undoubtedly become an existence that was akin to a lighthouse in the night! This was really awesome! On the highest floor of the Germinal base. A fierce argument erupted in Manager Number One’s office. Manager Number Three led Luo Rixu and the others to severely condemn Manager Number Two. Manager Number Two crossed his arms and was relaxed. Manager Number One was an old man in his sixties with white hair. He sat behind his desk and rubbed his temples crazily. “…Originally, Luo Rixu could have advanced perfectly to the Sixth Realm. Now, he has to use two ordinary advancement materials! You have to give me an explanation for this matter!” Manager Number Three’s words were intense. Before Manager Number Two could speak, Black, who was pouring tons of vodka, interrupted, “Is Shield Ghost stronger or Luo Rixu stronger?” Manager Number Three said, “You can’t use that as…” Black said, “Let me ask you something. Is Shield Ghost stronger or Luo Rixu stronger?” Luo Rixu trembled and could not help but shrink behind Manager Number Three. Number Three: “…Shield Ghost is stronger.” Black took another gulp of vodka. “Then isn’t it over? Shield Ghost can play a stronger role. The strong deserve a perfect advancement more than the weak. Why should this opportunity be given to Luo Rixu? Who the hell is he?” Number Two smiled and said, “Shield Ghost is already a Sixth Realm martial artist. Instead of trying to rope in such a huge help, you even want Shield Ghost to give you an explanation. Could it be that you want to push Shield Ghost to the Construction Division?” After saying this, he directly placed the blame on Manager Number Three. Getting Shield Ghost to join the enemy! Manager Number Three’s expression changed slightly. “Number Two, don’t slander me. I’m only protecting my subordinates!” Manager Number One coughed lightly. “Alright, alright. In such a time, we are in dire need of talent. Let’s not discuss this small conflict between Luo Rixu and Shield Ghost in public. It’ll hurt our relationship.” “Everyone, disperse. We have to increase our strength as soon as possible and prepare for the battle plan.” Manager Number Three gritted his teeth. “Are we just going to let this matter go?!” Black stood up immediately and walked in front of Luo Rixu. He looked down at him and said, “Luo Rixu, do you think we should just let it go?” The aura of a Seventh Realm martial artist made Luo Rixu speechless and he instinctively nodded. Black chuckled. “Look, even the person involved has nodded.” Manager Number Three glared at Luo Rixu angrily. I helped you fight for benefits, but you backed down just because you were scared? In the end, both sides gently exchanged their opinions and left unhappily. Under Manager Number Two’s strong protection, Shield Ghost was not punished. As part of a public gesture, Luo Rixu only got two precious purple equipment from the logistics department as compensation. After this matter was resolved, the wasteland reclaimers and refugees were even more excited. Shield Ghost was really impressive! He had killed several experienced mystic realm kings and beaten up Manager Number Three’s powerful subordinates. However, under Manager Number Two’s strong protection, he did not receive any punishments! For a moment, many wasteland reclaimers and fighters had a deep impression of Manager Number Two. Some of the fighters also secretly contacted Lu Luo, hoping to join Manager Number Two’s faction. Manager Number Two was so happy that he grinned from ear to ear. Another week passed. The Germinal Organization, which had been accumulating strength, suddenly gave an order. All the martial artists were suddenly asked to spread out and search for large demon beast groups near East Lake City. After locating them, the martial artists were instructed not to alarm the group, Instead, they were supposed to immediately mark the location before returning to report. In order to ensure their safety, there were fifteen Third Realm martial artists, four Fourth Realm martial artists, and two Fifth Realm martial artists in each group. They would scatter and search in different directions. The martial artists who ended up finding the demon beast group would be rewarded with equipment, skill books, runes, and attribute items. The grade of these items would all be uncommon green and above. If one could find a larger number of demon beasts, the rewards would be even better. Hearing this news, Lin Xuan immediately guessed what the higher-ups wanted to do. They wanted to lure the demon beasts and get them to attack White Crane Town. This should only be the early stages of the battle plan. The bigger part was yet to come. As soon as the order was given, the martial artists immediately formed into teams and left the base. They explored in the north, south, and east of East Lake City. There was no need for them to explore in the western direction as the East Lake was located there. As a noble Sixth Realm martial artist and an honorary fighter of the Germinal Organization, Shield Ghost naturally did not need to participate in such bitter work. After a day, many martial artists were killed by the demon beast group. However, more martial artists also brought back news related to the demon beast group. A map of the region around East Lake City was slowly being formed. Red spots were marked on the map and indicated the gathering places of the wandering demon beasts. Lu Luo brought this map to Shield Ghost with a burning gaze. “You know what I want from you.” Lin Xuan said, “I don’t understand.” Lu Luo said, “You will be rewarded with a peerless golden rune of your choice.” Lin Xuan said, “Say no more, I understand.” In the dark of the night, Lin Xuan changed into a black cloak and left quietly. He naturally understood what Lu Luo meant. She wanted him to enter the wilderness to drive away the demon beasts. In this way, they could disrupt the Germinal Organization’s plan. Lin Xuan initially acted like he didn’t understand because he wanted more benefits. Although the forging table in his consciousness space had been forging runes day and night, the number of rune fragments he had obtained were still too few. Moreover, because the forging process was completely random, this often led to him getting peerless golden runes that were not suitable for him. He could only endure the pain and smelt them. “A peerless golden rune of his choice would definitely make the trip worth it.” Lin Xuan’s equipment was a Demon Flame Set that had been obtained from the Blazing Fire Plains. The effect of the set was simple and crude. It increased magic damage by 20%, fire damage by 20%, and -5% magic power consumption. He was wearing Javier’s ring and the Assassin Ring. This allowed him to wear a lot of equipment without decreasing his movement speed. In the night, he moved quickly through the wilderness like a ghost. Soon, he found the first demon beast group on the map. This demon beast group only had more than a hundred demon beasts. The strongest was only at the Fourth Realm. “The best way to drive them away is to kill them all!” The flames in his palm reflected Lin Xuan’s Patrick Star mask, calm and ridiculous. Chapter 51 I’m Patrick Star The night was dark. Luo Rixu and Mo Yuan were assigned to the first team and were currently patrolling outside the Germinal base. During this period of time, Mo Yuan had also advanced to the Fifth Realm. However, he only used one experienced advancement material. The other four were all ordinary advancement materials. He could not advance perfectly like Lin Xuan. “Brother Luo, is something big about to happen here? Why did they suddenly increase the mission quota and make the logisticians speed up the forging of equipment and medicinal potions? They even increased the patrol strength and even let Fifth Realm martial artists like us come out to patrol… Do you know anything about this? Tell me,” Mo Yuan whispered. Mo Yuan had long sensed the increasingly anxious atmosphere in the Germinal base and vaguely felt that something was wrong. He wanted to ask Manager Number Three, but Manager Number Three only told him to mind his own business and did not say anything. However, he felt that since Luo Rixu was the martial artist Manager Number Three valued the most, he definitely knew a lot of secrets. Luo Rixu smiled smugly. “You didn’t guess wrong. There’s indeed a big matter.” Mo Yuan pressed, “What is it?” Luo Rixu whispered, “The three managers have already reached an agreement to attack White Crane Town!” “Hiss…” Mo Yuan gasped and instinctively said, “But the Construction Division is so powerful. Aren’t we overestimating ourselves by attacking them?” Luo Rixu berated unhappily, “Idiot! Although the Construction Division is currently the largest organization in Asia, being large also means that their defensive line is very long!” Mo Yuan immediately reacted. “Do you mean that the Construction Division doesn’t have the energy to support White Crane Town?” Luo Rixu nodded slightly. “Lord Number Three already told me that they have received internal news that the number and level of the demon beasts that surged out of the Drowning City mystic realm has increased. The Construction Division has mobilized a large number of high-end and mid-level forces to deal with the situation in the coastal areas.” “Even the martial artists of the White Crane Town have been mobilized. A Seventh Realm martial artist and several Sixth Realm martial artists were mobilized to leave, and their current defense is rather weak.” Mo Yuan’s eyes lit up. “This is our chance to prove ourselves!” Luo Rixu smiled smugly. “That’s right. Later, when the time comes, the first to attack White Crane Town and the first to rush to the mystic realm’s door of light will definitely receive great re…” Before he could say the word “rewards”, he suddenly saw a flame appear in the distance. Immediately after, a faint demon wail sounded. Luo Rixu suddenly became solemn. “Something’s wrong!” He waved his hand, and Mo Yuan immediately followed closely. The two of them quickly arrived at the scene of the accident. When they arrived, they only saw flames and charcoal on the ground. Among the more than a hundred demon beasts, the weakest was at the First Realm, and the strongest was at the Fourth Realm. However, they were all instantly killed and did not even have the chance to escape. Luo Rixu squatted down and saw the charred marks left by the fireball hitting the ground with a solemn expression. He could tell that the fireball was more than two meters in diameter. If it smashed into a person, who knew what the consequences would be? Mo Yuan smacked his lips incessantly. “This is bad, someone’s causing trouble!” Luo Rixu nodded. “The three managers had just ordered for the location of the nearby demon beast groups to be marked. However, on the same night, a demon beast group had been slaughtered. Moreover, not a single one was left. Someone must have known about this and deliberately caused trouble!” At this moment, he saw flames appear in the distance. “Go back and report. I’ll chase after him and investigate!” Luo Rixu was suddenly excited. Mo Yuan frowned slightly, but he still nodded and immediately returned to the base. Luo Rixu licked his lips and rushed towards the flames. As Number Three’s most valued martial artist, he naturally knew the use of these demon beasts. The Germinal Organization planned on using them to attack White Crane Town. In that case, the identity of the person who caused trouble was self-evident. It was very likely someone from the Construction Division. If he could capture the other party alive, it was very likely that they could obtain a lot of information from the other party! If he succeeded, it would definitely be a meritorious deed! He naturally had to monopolize such a huge opportunity and directly sent Mo Yuan away. “This guy only knows how to cause trouble in the dark. He definitely doesn’t have the guts. I can easily take care of him!” Luo Rixu was smug and felt extremely smart about his decision just now. Soon, he rushed to the flames. There was still no one there, only flames and a ground of charred corpses. Luo Rixu was even more smug. “He doesn’t dare to face me at all. He must be very afraid of me! I have to quickly capture him so that I can go back and claim credit!” He continued to chase after the flames in the distance, as if he was chasing after a huge treasure. Lin Xuan casually used his Fireball to directly kill more than a hundred demon beasts. Then, he used his Fireball to kill the dozen or so Fifth Realm demon beasts that were still alive. Sensing the figure that rushed over from behind, he shook his head slightly. “I only came out to clean up the demon beasts. I didn’t even want to fight you, but you insisted on chasing me alone. Why do you have to court death?” Lin Xuan quietly hid in the black shadow and waited for this unlucky person. Soon, Luo Rixu rushed over. He still saw the quietly burning flames and the charred corpses on the ground. However, he did not see the figure from before. “This guy sure is fast on his feet. Wait, why can’t I see the flames this time?” Luo Rixu looked around and discovered that it was pitch black everywhere. “Because I’m behind you.” A sharp voice suddenly sounded. The next moment, Luo Rixu felt a blazing high temperature ignite on his back. Boom! The terrifying Flame Explosion had erupted recently and directly burned his entire back to ashes. The pain instantly engulfed Luo Rixu’s nerves. At this moment, he almost fainted from the pain. Boom! Before he could take out the Life Potion from the storage compartment and use it, another Flame Explosion appeared again and smashed fiercely into the back of his head. Luo Rixu’s health points flew down by 3,000 feet and were instantly cleared. Before dying, he saw a figure enveloped in a cloak with flames burning in his palm. The feeling this figure gave him was even more terrifying and powerful than Shield Ghost back then. “I want to see… his face. Who is he…?!” Luo Rixu forced himself to look up and saw… a Patrick Star mask. “You didn’t expect this, did you? I’m Patrick Star.” Luo Rixu :”…” Crash. After Luo Rixu died, the items in his storage compartment directly fell to the ground. Lin Xuan placed them all into his consciousness space, not leaving behind a single one. “If you had a collar on your neck, I would still have some qualms. Unfortunately, you don’t.” Lin Xuan smiled faintly. The collars worn by the wasteland reclaimers would record their deaths. For example, Lu Luo could find out the cause of Sun Zhiguo’s death. Of course, this was not impossible to deal with. As long as he destroyed the wasteland reclaimer’s collar before killing them, there would naturally be no records left. After becoming a Sixth Realm martial artist, Lin Xuan could already see the information on the collar on his neck. This was a Seventh Realm curse equipment. There were two ways to get rid of the collar. The first was for one to advance to the Third Realm and the collar would naturally be removed by the manager. The second was to forcefully blast it open. With Lin Xuan’s current ability, he was already able to blast it open directly. However, it was still too early for him to make a move. Half an hour later, when Mo Yuan and the other Fifth Realm martial artists searched here with difficulty, they only saw a charred corpse. Luo Rixu’s charred corpse. Chapter 52 Something Big Is Going to Happen Bang! Manager Number Three punched the table fiercely. The cup swayed from side to side and fell to the ground. After just one patrol, the martial artist he valued the most had died outside for no reason! Mo Yuan had a nervous expression. “Judging from the situation of the scene, the person who killed Brother Luo is someone skilled in fire magic. Brother Luo was almost instantly killed and could not resist… Moreover, this person was the same person who killed a large number of demon beasts along the way.” After hearing Mo Yuan’s description, the scene he saw in White Water City not long ago suddenly appeared in Manager Number Three’s mind. On an abandoned street, there was a charred tiger corpse. The killer of that tiger was also proficient in fire magic and was able to get the job done with one hit. Could it be the same person? “Take me to the place where he died,” Manager Number Three growled. Mo Yuan nodded repeatedly. “Wait, call Number Two along,” Number Three said. A moment later, Mo Yuan led Number Two, Number Three, and Black to the place where Luo Rixu had died. Even after more than two hours, the smell of burning still lingered here. Judging from the burn marks on the ground, the spell used was far more intense than fireball. Clearly, they were higher-level and higher-level fire spells. As a level nine Sixth Realm martial artist who was well-versed in elemental magic, Number Two could tell at a glance that this was the mark left by Flame Explosion. Manager Number Three’s pupils constricted. They were identical. This scene was very similar to the tiger corpse he had seen in White Water City that day. Number Two also exclaimed softly, “This scene looks familiar.” Number Three took a deep breath. “It’s identical to the scene in White Water City. It must be that person! You even said that he’s only a lone wolf and won’t threaten the Germinal Organization!” Number Two coughed lightly. “There’s still a difference.” “A difference?” “This time, the other used Flame Explosion, not fireball.” Manager Number Three :”…” Manager Number Two also did not expect that the lone wolf would appear again and even kill a core member of the Germinal Organization. Moreover, although Number Two was secretly glad that Luo Rixu had died, he really did not know who the murderer was. Number Two turned to look at Black, who shook his head, indicating that he did not know either. The four of them finally returned and named the murderer “Flame Explosion”. Flame Explosion. The next day, all the martial artists ate breakfast in the cafeteria of the Germinal base. Before they even left the mystic realm, the announcement of the Germinal base was announced. “Last night, an outsider with the code name ‘Flame Explosion’ attacked the demon beasts wandering outside the base and killed the captain of the demon king team, Luo Rixu, with a sneak attack. As long as anyone can provide information regarding this Flame Explosion, they will immediately be rewarded with 500,000 general coins and a precious purple equipment!” The announcement sounded, and all the martial artists were shocked. The captain of the Demon King Team, Luo Rixu, was actually killed by an outsider? Lin Xuan also heard this broadcast from his single room and immediately cursed. “Flame Explosion? This code name is so much worse than Shield Ghost. Do they know how to come up with names?” He curled his lips. The rewards offered by the three managers were indeed enviable. Instantly, a large number of “clues” surged, but all of them were fake. Only after Yang Wei directly killed a few refugees who were fabricating clues did this reckless behavior gradually calm down. Of course, in the end, they could not find any clues. This was because other than Lin Xuan, no one had seen Flame Explosion before. The night was dark. Lin Xuan changed into his cloak and jacket again and entered the wilderness. This time, he planned to kill all the more powerful demon beasts in one go. The remaining First Realm and Second Realm demon beasts were useless. The defensive strength of White Crane Town could easily kill such a weak demon beast. In an abandoned house on the east side of the Germinal base, Mo Yuan looked at the young man with a sour face in front of him with an uneasy expression. The young man was naturally Manager Number Three. He had changed into an ordinary set of equipment and looked no different from Mo Yuan and the other martial artists at first glance. “Sir, will Flame Explosion still appear tonight?” Mo Yuan could not help but ask. Number Three said indifferently, “Do you doubt me?” Mo Yuan shuddered and shook his head repeatedly. “No, no. I’m just worried that if he doesn’t come, won’t you have made a wasted trip and wasted your time?” Number Three said, “He killed 15 demon beasts last night. They’re all north of East Lake City. However, there are still many demon beasts in the east and south of East Lake City. Among them, there’s no lack of demon beasts led by Fifth Realm and Sixth Realm demon beasts. He’ll definitely appear tonight. With a 50% chance, do you think I won’t be able to find him?” Soon, Number Three changed his equipment and changed from a young man with a sour face to a stubble man. “From now on, I’m an ordinary Fifth Realm martial artist. You can just call me Third Brother.” Mo Yuan nodded. “Yes, Third Brother!” The two of them walked out of the abandoned house one after another and took over the patrol mission of the previous Fifth Realm martial artists. The last batch of Fifth Realm martial artists in charge of patrolling included Lu Luo and Wen Xiong. Lu Luo was too lazy to speak. Wen Xiong nodded at Mo Yuan as a form of greeting. Mo Yuan coughed lightly. “Next, it’s our turn to take over. The two of you, go and rest.” Lu Luo’s gaze suddenly became sharp as she stared coldly at Manager Number Three. “Who is this person? I know every single Fifth Realm martial artist.” Wen Xiong immediately put on his gloves and entered a combat state. “Could it be a spy from the Construction Division!?” Manager Number Three :”…” Mo Yuan did not know whether to laugh or cry. He whispered, “It’s Manager Number Three.” Lu Luo berated on the spot, “Stop speaking nonsense. Why should I believe you?” “Use your Observer skill to take a look.” Manager Number Three was also helpless. He did not know if he should be happy or ashamed to encounter such a responsible patrolman like Lu Luo. Lu Luo used her Observer skill and froze on the spot. Wen Xiong also used his Observer skill. However, afterwards, his eyes became even more vigilant. “All I can see are a bunch of question marks. You’re definitely a spy!” Number Three :”…” Lu Luo coughed lightly. “Sorry, we mistook you for a spy from the Construction Division. It’s our fault.” She hurriedly left with Wen Xiong. Manager Number Three had deliberately disguised himself like this. It was definitely not for no reason. Something bad was about to happen! After walking for a distance, Lu Luo looked back and watched as Number Three and Mo Yuan’s figures were drowned in the darkness. Her heart skipped a beat. If nothing unexpected happened, Shield Ghost would also go out to chase away the demon beasts tonight. It was very likely that he would encounter Number Three! Number Three was a level nine Sixth Realm martial artist, and Shield Ghost had just advanced to the Sixth Realm! The difference between their attributes was at least 72 points! Lu Luo’s expression did not change, but she was actually anxious. However, she did not have a way to contact Shield Ghost. At this moment, she could only wait. “Sister Lu Luo, let’s go to the canteen to eat. My treat.” Wen Xiong smiled honestly. Lu Luo shook her head. “I have something to tell Sir Number Two. I won’t eat first.” With that said, she hurriedly ran towards Manager Number Two’s office. In the office, she quickly found Manager Number Two, who was working diligently. Lu Luo’s knocking immediately alarmed Number Two. After wiping the sparkling saliva from the corner of his mouth, Number Two opened the office door calmly. “Sir, there might be a huge problem!” Lu Luo’s expression was solemn. Chapter 53 Fighting Manager Number Three! Manager Number Two was stunned. Lu Luo had always been a calm person. Why did she suddenly say that something bad was going to happen? “Xiao Lu, this isn’t good. You shouldn’t panic no matter what…” “Number Three has disguised himself as a patrolman and entered the wilderness! He might encounter Shield Ghost!” Manager Number Two was shocked and stood up immediately. “Damn! There’s going to be a huge problem!” Seeing that he was also so anxious, Lu Luo was even more anxious. “How powerful is Number Three? Will Shield Ghost be able to escape from him?” Number Two sighed lightly. “When Number Three advanced to the First Realm, Second Realm, Third Realm, Fourth Realm, and Fifth Realm, he used five experienced advancement materials every time to advance perfectly. Only when he advanced to the Sixth Realm did he use four experienced advancement materials and one ordinary material.” “Other than that, he has at least five peerless golden skills, four peerless golden equipment, and three peerless golden rune groups.” With that said, Lu Luo’s heart turned cold. If the other party was such a powerful level nine Sixth Realm martial artist, it was useless no matter how high Shield Ghost’s constitution and defense were. “I only hope that Shield Ghost won’t encounter Number Three. Number Three’s Agility is extremely high. Once he discovers Shield Ghost, he will definitely be able to catch up to him…” Manager Number Two frowned deeply. “How should we help Shield Ghost? Are we just going to watch?” Number Two paced back and forth. “Go and get Black first. We’ll rush to the wilderness and find an excuse to intercept Number Three!” Lu Luo was puzzled. “Then should we get Black?” Number Two: “…I can’t beat Number Three.” Lu Luo :”…” She hurriedly rushed to the black single dormitory and kicked open the door, only to find Black lying on the ground with a huge pile of empty vodka bottles beside him and half a bottle of vodka in his hand. A long stream of sparkling saliva dripped from Black’s mouth as he snored loudly. However, even though he was drunk, his entire body was still wrapped in black, and only his chin was exposed. Lu Luo hurriedly stepped forward and shook him awake. “Shield Ghost is in danger. Number Two asked me to get you. Quickly go to the wilderness!” Black did not react. Lu Luo was already experienced with waking people up. She directly picked up the half bottle of vodka in Black’s hand, opened Black’s mouth, and poured it into his mouth. His black eyes opened immediately. He was energetic and did not seem to be drunk at all. “Let’s go.” Black grabbed Lu Luo’s hand and rushed out. In the wilderness. Lin Xuan casually used a Flame Explosion skill. With a bang, the entire demon beast horde below the Fourth Realm instantly disappeared. The dozens of demon beasts above the Fourth Realm were also severely injured by this attack and wailed endlessly. Lin Xuan casually used another Flame Explosion and easily killed them. “It sure is good to harvest effortlessly like this.” Lin Xuan followed the map and rushed to the next region where the demon beasts roamed. The map only indicated an approximate location. After all, this was the real world. It was impossible for the demon beasts to stop at one place and not move. They also had to forage for food, excrete, and mate. However, when he arrived, Lin Xuan saw two figures passing by. Just like Luo Rixu and Lin Xuan last night, these two people were clearly on patrol. One of them was Mo Yuan, and Lin Xuan did not know who the other person was. He recalled the information regarding all the Fifth Realm martial artists that Number Two had provided him and suddenly discovered that he had never seen a Fifth Realm martial artist who looked like this Germinal Organization. However, it was also possible that the other party was a Fifth Realm martial artist who had just advanced from the level nine Fourth Realm. It was normal for him not to know him. Lin Xuan did not take this matter to heart. Since these two people had not discovered him, he did not plan to make a move. There was no need for him to attract the attention of the Germinal Organization. It would be better for him to kill the demon beasts in the wilderness secretly. Last night, Luo Rixu was simply poking a bear with a stick. Moreover, that person was also an expert subordinate working underneath Manager Number Three. The earlier he was killed, the better. However, just as Lin Xuan was about to let those two off, the bearded man’s eyes suddenly flashed with a sharp light. He suddenly pulled out his two swords from the storage compartment and pierced through the 100-meter distance like a sharp knife through the night, directly heading for Lin Xuan’s back! Lin Xuan’s perception quickly discovered this figure that was quickly approaching. He immediately used the Fire Ring Technique. The main advantage of Fire Ring Technique was not its damage, but its ability to instantly repel all enemies. <b>ove</b>  This was also one of the few skills Fire Mages could use to protect themselves. The flames quickly illuminated Lin Xuan and Number Three. Boom! The flames directly burned past Number Three. However, contrary to Lin Xuan’s expectations, he failed to push the other party more than ten meters away. Instead, he only pushed the other party more than five meters. Five meters could be crossed in the blink of an eye for a level nine Sixth Realm Master like Manager Number Three. The sharp blade stabbed into the soft cloak craftily. Then… Lin Xuan was sent flying back by an even greater force! Under the cloak was not a weak body, but an even stronger armor! Number Three was dumbfounded. In this instant, Lin Xuan retreated more than ten steps and used his Observer skill on the other party. Only by knowing oneself and the enemy could one formulate a battle plan. Lin Xuan was not a rash person who only knew how to erect a huge shield. Name: Manager Number Three Level: Level Nine Sixth Realm Experience: 9 billion / 9 billion Attributes: 99 Constitution, 121 Strength, 101 Spirit, 389 Agility Skill: Bloodthirsty Assault (peerless golden), High-level Critical Hit Mastery (peerless golden), Shadow Assassination (?), Wind Walk (?), Observer (?)… Equipment: Poison Frost Blade (peerless golden), Shadow Assault Set (peerless golden), Agility Ring (?), Strength Ring (?)… Lin Xuan was shocked. Damn, this person was Manager Number Three. Coupled with Manager Number Three’s disguise, he quickly understood the reason. Manager Number Three had disguised himself as a patrolman only to capture “Flame Explosion”. Moreover, Number Three’s attributes, skills, and equipment were all very impressive! Just this 389 points of Agility was enough to make any level nine Sixth Realm martial artist with low attack health tremble in fear. Lin Xuan’s Constitution was only 353 points now, and it was much inferior. Agility increased critical hit chance, critical damage, attack speed, movement speed, dodging, and perception. This meant that even without using any equipment, Manager Number Three had an extremely high critical hit chance. In addition, Number Three also had the peerless golden grade “Advanced Critical Hit Mastery”, which provided an additional 30% critical hit chance. “That attack just now directly made me lose more than 300 health points, almost one-third of my health points!” Ever since he transmigrated, Lin Xuan had never lost so much health before. Moreover, the attack just now also carried the negative effects of poison and Shrouding Frost. Clearly, it was caused by the two “Poison Frost Blade”. In a poisoned state, one’s health would continue to decrease. In the case of Shrouding Frost, one’s movement speed would decrease. However, under the enhancement of Lin Xuan’s extremely high resistance, the duration and potency of these two negative statuses decreased quickly and soon disappeared. Chapter 54 Take This! Flame Explosion Technique, Increase by 145%! Lin Xuan was very shocked. However, Manager Number Three was even more shocked when he saw the Patrick Star mask under the other party’s cloak. Shouldn’t this Flame Explosion be a mage who used fire magic? Moreover, according to Manager Number Two’s analysis, this person’s Spirit and Agility were very high, so it was impossible for him to have a Constitution that was also very high. How could a mage who relied on fire magic to attack spend his precious points on Constitution? Moreover, given that he himself had high Agility and peerless golden skills, equipment, and runes, he was originally filled with confidence. He believed that even if he could not instantly kill Flame Explosion, he would still be able to kill it eventually. He did not expect the other party to actually block his attack. From the looks of it, the other party did not seem to be injured at all. Even his Poison Frost Blade had not been able to cause the other party to enter a poison or frost state. Why?Number Three could not figure it out! It had been proven that when a person doubted himself, he would become hesitant. Manager Number Three did not continue to chase after the other party. Instead, he chose to use his Observer skill as well. However, even Black had not been able to see through Lin Xuan’s attributes back then. His Observer skill was only precious purple and its level was even lower than Black’s Observer skill. Naturally, he was unable to see all the information. He could only see a few attributes, a few skills, and equipment, but not even their grades. Not far away, Mo Yuan, who was hiding behind a rock, saw this scene with his own eyes. He was shocked and speechless. Manager Number Three was simply a god-like existence in his eyes. Any demon that Number Three attacked would instantly die. Back then, when the demon beasts from the Drowning City mystic realm attacked the Germinal Organization from the lake, if Manager Number Three was also there, Black would not have been able to take all the credit. However, despite being so powerful, Manager Number Three’s sharp double swords were still blocked by this Flame Explosion, who was clearly only wearing a cloak. Mo Yuan was very dumbfounded. He felt that his world view had been shattered. Why was this mage’s Constitution so high? This did not make sense. In this short period of time, Lin Xuan had already quickly drawn up a plan. This sudden encounter with Manager Number Three had completely exceeded his expectations. Given Manager Number Three’s attributes, he did not expect that he could kill the other party easily. Therefore, his current goal was… to retreat! However, Manager Number Three would definitely not let him go. It had to be known that his current identity was “Flame Explosion”. He had killed Luo Rixu, who Manager Number Three valued the most. If he could not avenge his trusted martial artist, Manager Number Three would definitely lose face. Be it for himself or the Germinal Organization, Manager Number Three would definitely chase him to the ends of the earth. Therefore, if Lin Xuan wanted to retreat, he had to first defeat Manager Number Three. A heavy magic book suddenly stretched out from under the black cloak. The surface of the book was made of crimson metal, and flames blossomed around it. The magic book opened by itself, and there seemed to be fire sprites jumping between the pages. peerless golden equipment, Blazing Fire Codex! This equipment provided Lin Xuan with 5 points of spirit and could also increase his magic power recovery speed by 15%, -10% magic consumption with fire spells, and 60% fire magic damage. Then, Lin Xuan used his skill, Demon King of Fury. This skill first had a passive effect. Even if it was not used, the effect would still exist. In other words, it would permanently increase fire damage by 15%, permanently increase fire resistance by 15%, and permanently increase 100 magic power. In addition, after consuming 40% of one’s magic power to activate this skill, one’s fire damage could be increased by 40% again! In addition, Lin Xuan had previously obtained the Fire Flower in the Demon Ant Nest. That attribute item also increased fire damage, which also gave him an additional 10% fire damage. In the end, he also wore a Demon Flame Set dropped from the Fourth Realm mystic realm Blazing Fire Plains. The set effect provided another 20% fire damage. This stacked up to 145% fire damage! Flame Explosion! A huge fireball more than six meters in diameter quickly condensed as the Blazing Fire Codex flipped. The terrifying heat emitted by the fireball even made the fake beard that Manager Number Three had stuck under his nose burn slightly. Manager Number Three’s expression instantly changed. Even before he was hit by this Flame Explosion, he had already sensed the terrifying power behind this Flame Explosion! The diameter of the fireball was more than six meters, but the damage range was far greater than that! He knew this because of the combat experience he had naturally obtained after experiencing many battles! He knew that he had to avoid it! Manager Number Three’s 389 points of Agility provided him with a high movement speed. However, even so, it would still take him at least half a second to rush out of the range of Flame Explosion. However, it took Lin Xuan far less than half a second to completely condense Flame Explosion. Almost the moment Manager Number Three turned around and escaped, Flame Explosion had already been completely formed. The next moment, the huge fireball quickly and resolutely smashed towards Manager Number Three. In the wilderness enveloped by the night sky, it was as if a small sun had risen, illuminating everything in the surroundings. Manager Number One, who was resting, suddenly rolled over and stood up. Even when he was resting, his passive skill, “Wide Domain Perception,” was still in an activated state. The energy level of this Flame Explosion far surpassed the threshold he had set for this skill. Therefore, he was instantly awoken. “A battle energy level only inferior to a Seventh Realm martial artist…!” Manager Number One wore thin pajamas and rushed to the balcony in his slippers. He immediately saw the huge fireball that was rising and had a diameter of more than six meters. He also saw Manager Number Three run away resolutely under the fireball. Further away from Lin Xuan and Manager Number Three’s battleground, Manager Number Two and Black were running over. However, after seeing the fireball, Black immediately pulled him back. “It seems that we don’t need to go over.” Number Two was dumbfounded. As a martial artist who had learned all four elemental spells and was dedicated to walking further and further on the path of a mage, he knew better than anyone how shocking this Flame Explosion was. If he used Flame Explosion at full strength, the diameter would at most be four meters. It would not even reach six meters! Boom! It was as if a cannonball had directly burrowed into the ground. The soil instantly blasted into the sky and rushed to a height of 15 meters. Violent tremors immediately spread and quickly woke up the refugees in the shack outside the Germinal base, as well as the wasteland reclaimers and fighters in the dormitory. In this post-apocalyptic world, very few people could sleep soundly. Therefore, everyone involuntarily walked out and looked at the ferocious fire light that was slowly rising in the distance. “Oh my god…” Bang! Manager Number Three’s back was brushed by Flame Explosion. The clothes on his back were instantly burned, and a large portion of his skin was also burnt to a crisp. His entire body seemed to have suffered the impact of the gigantic flame directly and was immediately sent flying more than ten meters away, spitting out a mouthful of blood in the air. His health points directly decreased by one-sixth! This was only after he was hit by the edge of Flame Explosion. If he did not dodge, Manager Number Three guessed that he would lose at least half to two-thirds of his health points. Mo Yuan, who was hiding behind the rock, was not affected by the killing range of Flame Explosion, but his head was buzzing from the shock. His eyes were also burned by the incomparably bright light in that instant. Even when he closed his eyes, he could still see a ball of light swaying around. Manager Number Three looked back at the spot the other party was standing at. However, at this moment, the cloaked figure had long disappeared from his spot. Chapter 55 Is Flame Explosion One of Us? Manager Number Three endured the pain and immediately got up. He used the Poison Frost Blade and was prepared to attack if the cloaked man pounced over. He had never used his strongest skill, Bloodthirsty Assault. He had not used it at the beginning because he felt that it was not worth using to kill a fire mage. However, he had to use it now. If the other party pounced over, he would have no choice but to use this skill to fight. After activating this skill, he would obtain a 15% highest attribute enhancement, an additional 20% critical hit chance, an additional 20% movement speed, 90% additional critical damage, and 70% Life-Steal! His Agility would immediately increase to 447! Since Flame Explosion had used such a powerful Flame Explosion skill, the other party should only be able to use Fireball, Fire Ring Technique, and other skills. These skills would not be able to cause high damage. However, he was wrong. The other party had disappeared. Instead of pouncing over to take his life when he had been injured, the other party had turned around and run. Manager Number Three looked around in confusion. He did not feel anything. This meant that there were really no enemies nearby. “Ran away?” Mo Yuan’s eyes and ears were still buzzing. Manager Number Three put away the Poison Frost Blade and frowned deeply. At this moment, footsteps sounded from afar. “We’re here to provide support!” Manager Number Two and Black arrived one after another. Number Two hurriedly threw a bottle of the Great Health Potion to Manager Number Three. Number Three did not refuse and drank it immediately. The skin on his back that had been charred quickly began to recover. The dead skin fell off, and young pink skin took its place. “Was it that Flame Explosion?” asked Number Two. Number Three nodded. “You couldn’t kill him?” Black smiled spuriously. The veins on Number Three’s forehead throbbed, but he could only nod. He could not lie and say that he had chased away Flame Explosion. Black shrugged and said, “This small East Lake City is really filled with crouching tigers and hidden dragons. I’m afraid you guys have far underestimated that guy called Flame Explosion.” Manager Number Two sighed. “I previously thought that he was around level four Sixth Realm. Now, it seems that he’s at least level seven Sixth Realm.” “An expert with such strength is definitely not a lone wolf. He’s undoubtedly nurtured by the Construction Division,” Manager Number Three said coldly. Manager Number Two nodded. “Indeed.” Number Three said, “We have to attack White Crane Town ahead of time. Otherwise, this Flame Explosion will cause trouble again and again. That will be a huge hidden danger for us.” Number Two nodded. “What you say also makes sense. However, this matter still needs to be discussed through the night. We’ll need to see what Number One has to say.” The entire Germinal base did not sleep at all. Everyone was enthusiastically discussing the fierce fire in the wilderness. Flame Explosion! It was very likely Flame Explosion that killed Luo Rixu last night! When they saw Manager Number Two, Black, and the others return empty-handed, they were even more shocked. Was this Flame Explosion really that impressive? The managers had all been mobilized but were still unable to capture him. Soon, in the highest floor of the Germinal Organization, an intense discussion immediately began in Manager Number One’s office. The sudden appearance of Flame Explosion surprised the three managers. This person was too ferocious. Manager Number Three rarely lost to martial artists of the same level, but he actually failed to win this time. He could only watch as the other party escaped. It could be imagined that the consequences would be unthinkable if the one facing Flame Explosion was not Manager Number Three but those newly advanced Sixth Realm or Fifth Realm martial artists… These people would probably die after being hit by a few Flame Explosions. “Since he appeared at this time, he must have been sent by the Construction Division to destroy our Germinal Organization! My idea is to cut the Gordian knot and take down White Crane Town first before dealing with Flame Explosion,” Manager Number Three said solemnly. Manager Number Two said, “But what if we get attacked by Flame Explosion in the process of attacking White Crane Town? Our team members are already so stretched out, and it’s ultimately difficult for us to take care of everything. I think we should take things slow and wait a little longer to increase the number of Sixth Realm martial artists.” He was naturally referring to those level nine Fifth Realm martial artists who had no hope of advancing perfectly. These people could not beat the experienced mystic realm kings anyway. The faster they advanced, the better. If they could increase the number of Sixth Realm martial artists, their odds of winning would also increase. After all, if one Sixth Realm expert could not defeat Flame Explosion, they should be able to do it with two or three Sixth Realm experts, right? Four or five Fifth Realm experts would be enough to make Flame Explosion hesitate to attack, right? “No! The longer we delay, the more disadvantageous it will be for us! What if the Construction Division gets a chance to catch their breath in the battle against the Drowning City mystic realm and turns around to deal with us?” Manager Number Three suddenly slapped the table. Manager Number Two also immediately retorted, “We don’t have enough logistics and combat strength! Do you think the members of the Construction Division in White Crane Town are all targets waiting to be killed by you?” The two of them were arguing fiercely. Manager Number One simply had his back facing them as he looked at the black wilderness outside the glass. In the end, the two of them were done arguing and looked at Number One. “Number One, tell us your decision. I can’t be bothered to waste my breath on this guy,” Number Three said unhappily. Number One tapped the table lightly. “Let’s wait another day. Our reinforcements will arrive then.” Manager Number Two’s gaze immediately turned sharp. “Reinforcements?” “Yes, the headquarters sent two Seventh Realm martial artists,” Manager Number One said calmly. “With Black, we will have a total of three genuine Seventh Realm martial artists. And according to the report from the informant planted in White Crane Town, there is only one Seventh Realm martial artist in White Crane Town.” “In addition, the headquarters also said that the Construction Division will be in a battle with the Drowning City demon beasts for at least five years. Their members will constantly be invested into the front line and they won’t be able to care about the rear at all. After we take down White Crane Town, not only will we not have to worry about the retaliation of the Construction Division, but we can also use White Crane Town as a springboard to continue attacking the other cities under the control of the Construction Division.” Manager Number Two’s heart skipped a beat. The headquarters that rarely made a move was actually about to make a move? Manager Number Two knew very little about this headquarters. He only knew that Manager Number One had been sent to the vicinity of East Lake City by the Germinal Organization’s headquarters. In the past, when the Construction Division was still low on manpower, he had seized East Lake City in one fell swoop and established the Germinal Organization base here. In other words, Manager Number One was the true direct descendant of the Germinal Organization. Number Two and Number Three had only joined the Germinal Organization after this. Manager Number Two was excited. “Beautiful! I knew the headquarters would definitely make a move.” “Go back and rest. The battle is about to start.” Manager Number One smiled. After walking out of the office and returning to his office, Manager Number Two’s expression immediately became solemn. Black picked up the cup and drank it. After drinking it, he said somewhat angrily, “Why is this wine tasteless?” Manager Number Two: “…That’s water.” With a “oh”, he took out a bottle of Red Star Erguotou from the inner shelf and drank it heavily. “Is Flame Explosion one of us?” Manager Number Two could not help but ask. Black. “I’m just a bodyguard. Why the hell would you ask me that?” Manager Number Two paced for a long time and could not help but ask, “Then why is the Germinal Organization headquarters willing to send two Seventh Realm martial artists here?” “If you ask again, I’ll punch you,” Black said angrily. Manager Number Two laughed dryly. “I’m thinking about how to pass this information to them… Am I supposed to get Lu Luo to go again? Won’t that increase the risk of exposure… Hey, don’t hit me… I was only asking myself! Ouch! Ouch, ouch, ouch!” Black finished Red Star’s Erguotou in one breath. “Shield Ghost, try going to him.” Chapter 56 Secret Manipulation, Inferior Demon Mountain Demon Beast Surging Out of the Door of Light In an abandoned house in East Lake City, Lin Xuan, who was wearing Shield Ghost’s equipment, asked curiously, “Do you want me to go to White Crane Town to deliver the information?” Standing in front of him was a petite figure with a high ponytail and a small suit. It was Lu Luo. Lu Luo had a helpless expression. “I can’t leave the base easily. It’s very easy for me to be discovered. After thinking about it, it’s best for an intern like you to deliver information.” Lin Xuan was about to shake his head on the spot. What a joke! So what if it’s easy for you to get discovered? Ever since he fought Manager Number Three last night with the identity of Flame Explosion, it was obvious that the Germinal Organization would definitely increase the patrol strength. Manager Number One’s vast regional perception might be even more detailed. It was very likely that Manager Number One would be able to clearly see everyone enter and leave. Before Lin Xuan could speak, Lu Luo took out a letter. “Number Two has already written a recommendation letter for you. As long as you reach White Crane Town, you can directly enter the mystic realm of White Crane Town with this letter. There’s a Sixth Realm mystic realm there.” Lin Xuan’s eyes lit up. If he could go to the Sixth Realm mystic realm, he could possess a new training avatar there! He took the recommendation letter. “As an intern of the Construction Division, it’s my responsibility to pass information!” Lu Luo dug in the storage compartment and handed over a rune. “This is the Scarlet Wave Rush rune you wanted.” Lin Xuan nodded repeatedly. This was the mission reward that Number Two had promised him previously. The three runes happened to form a rune group. In this way, he could activate the full effect of this rune group. The three effects of Scarlet Wave Rush were+20% upper limit magic power, 15% fire resistance by fire magic, and 10% chance of disregarding 100% fire resistance. Disregarding the opponent’s resistance was basically equivalent to increasing one’s fire damage. Lu Luo took out another note and stuffed it over. “This is the codeword for you to contact the Seventh Realm martial artist from White Crane Town.” Finally, Lin Xuan asked a question, “Are Seventh Realm martial artists really that powerful?” Lu Luo nodded. “The suppression effect of a Seventh Realm martial artist on a Sixth Realm martial artist is very powerful. You’ll only be considered to have a profession when you reach the Seventh Realm. If you really want to know, you can find Black after sending the information back. He can explain it better than me.” Profession? Lin Xuan was filled with anticipation. At night. Lin Xuan casually found an abandoned house and used his skill “Avatar Technique”. Soon, a bright Lin Xuan appeared in front of him. He took out the most ordinary equipment from his consciousness space and equipped them on his avatar. Then, he put on the Giant Shield Set inside and the Stronghold Set outside. The appearance of the Stronghold Set was huge and hard like a muscular man. It was completely different from the refined, long, and full-armored warrior image of Shield Ghost. Finally, he did something crucial. He changed his training strategy for his avatars in the inferior Demon Mountain in the Fifth Realm to “take the initiative to attack”. After he became a Sixth Realm martial artist, the limit of avatars became seven. Later, he found another time to go to the inferior demon mountain to possess the corpse of a demon beast. If seven level nine Fifth Realm demon beasts took the initiative to attack, it would definitely cause other demon beasts to flee everywhere. These fleeing demon beasts would inevitably cause chaos in the mystic realm. It was even possible for them to rush out of the mystic realm. The lethality of a large number of Fifth Realm demon beasts was not something that a dozen Fifth Realm martial artists could resist. If the Germinal Organization wanted to stop these violent demon beasts, they had to send the Sixth Realm martial artists over. “The bold plan has begun.” Lin Xuan changed the training strategy of his seven avatars and waited for the right opportunity. Inferior Demon Mountain. Yang Wei spat out a large mouthful of blood with a dispirited expression. The three people beside him also shook their heads repeatedly, their bodies injured to varying degrees. They had failed to challenge the mystic realm king. They came very close to winning and the mystic realm king was injured to the point that it only had more than 400 health points left. However, Yang Wei and the other three had also consumed all the life potions. If they continued to fight, they might be able to kill the mystic realm kings. However, it was also possible for their members to die. However, the four of them did not have a particularly firm relationship. This team had only been established for less than a day. They each had their own plans and did not want to take the risk. In this way, when facing the severely injured mystic realm king, they were forced to retreat step by step. In the end, they had no choice but to escape from the cave. Yang Wei was rather resentful towards these three teammates, but he did not dare to show it on the surface. He only laughed and said, “Forget it, forget it. Let’s rest. Looks like we’re done for today.” Yang Wei also felt bitter. If his attributes were a little higher, he would have been able to break through the poison resistance of that mystic realm king. Unfortunately, he was still not strong enough. At this moment, the four of them suddenly heard continuous roars from the foot of the mountain. The other Fifth Realm martial artists who were queuing in front of the cave also instinctively turned around and looked down the mountain. “What happened?” Boom! Boom! Boom! Trees fell and mountain rocks shattered. A large number of demon beasts ran as if they were running from something terrifying. A few martial artists who had just advanced to first level Fifth Realm were training in the lower levels of the Inferior Demon Mountain. At this moment, they did not even have time to react and were instantly stepped into meat paste by the demon beasts that were fleeing everywhere. Wen Xiong and Lu Luo were relatively close to the peak and felt that something was wrong. They hurriedly ran to the peak. Even if these demon beasts ran everywhere, they still did not dare to go to the peak. This was because the peak of the mountain was the cave of a mystic realm king. They did not dare to go there. “Why is this happening?” Yang Wei was very stunned. Logically speaking, when the mystic realm suddenly changed, Manager Number One would immediately release the news and send it to every martial artist through the broadcast of the mystic realm’s safety station. However, there had been zero announcements. Could it be that Manager Number One failed to realize this? Zhang Peng’s eyes were sharp as he pointed at a certain place at the foot of the mountain and said, “Look, I think there are a few especially powerful demon beasts chasing after the other demon beasts.” Everyone hurriedly looked over and indeed saw a Demon Blood Python rampage. Everywhere it passed, all the demon beasts were swallowed. “There’s one over there too! There’s a Demon Blood Tiger currently hunting other demon beasts! I’m afraid they’re the ones who caused the other demon beasts to fearfully run around everywhere.” Wen Xiong also discovered a ferocious Demon Blood Tiger. Soon, the martial artists also discovered other demon beasts. After casting an Observer skill, they saw that these demon beasts were all level nine Fifth Realm. Moreover, their attributes were higher than ordinary level nine Fifth Realm demon beasts. They were the ones who were attacking everywhere, causing these demon beasts in the Inferior Demon Mountain to become so chaotic. Lu Luo suddenly said, “They seem to be heading towards the entrance of the mystic realm…” The martial artists’ hearts turned solemn as they looked into the distance. Under the hunt, the demon beasts had no choice but to escape downwards. Finally, they arrived at the door of light and directly rushed out! “This is bad… That’s a large number of Fifth Realm demon beasts!” Yang Wei muttered. An urgent and ear-piercing alarm immediately sounded in the Germinal base. “Fifth Realm demon beasts are surging out of the Inferior Demon Mountain mystic realm! I repeat! Fifth Realm demon beasts are surging out of the Inferior Demon Mountain mystic realm! All Fifth Realm and Sixth Realm martial artists should immediately rush to support!” Manager Number One’s anxious voice suddenly sounded from the radio. Manager Number Two was working diligently when he heard the broadcast and immediately jumped out of his chair. “I didn’t know it was possible for the demon beasts in the mystic realm of the Inferior Demon Mountain to rush out of the door of light… Don’t they only rush out when they reproduce too much? But demon beasts in the Inferior Demon Mountain have never reproduced excessively… That’s why we always had to kill them collectively every once in a while to control the number of demon beasts…” He rubbed his sleeping face and looked puzzled. Chapter 57 Arriving at White Crane Town In an abandoned house somewhere, the radio also sounded. Lin Xuan was overjoyed. “The appearance of the Fifth Realm demon beasts from the Inferior Demon Mountain will definitely cause chaos in the Germinal Organization base. It’s time to deliver the information.” Lin Xuan patted his avatar. The next moment, two figures rushed out of the abandoned house from both sides and ran north. Even in his armor, Lin Xuan’s speed was still very fast. In just a minute, he had already crossed more than 500 meters. The equipment on his avatar was even lighter, allowing his avatar to travel even faster. In Manager Number One’s office, the white-haired Number One’s eyes suddenly turned sharp. He suddenly got up and stood on the balcony, looking at the wilderness in the distance that was enveloped by the night. Under the broad perception of the region, the night seemed to not exist. He could see the stacked buildings under his feet. He could also see the demon beasts killing the weak wasteland reclaimers as well as the martial artists surging out from various dormitories to save the situation. Further away, he saw the hungry and cold refugees in the shack outside the base. At this moment, a young refugee girl was too hungry and fainted. Number One did not stop for a moment as his gaze continued to move forward. He saw two figures running north at high speed under the night sky. In the past, he would not have stopped them. This was because there were such people almost every night. The refugees only knew that there was a Construction Division in the north, but they did not know how far the Construction Division was from the Germinal Organization base. They fantasized about crossing the wilderness at night, but they did not know that the wilderness was not a place where weak martial artists could casually advance. In the past, Number One would not have cared at all and had allowed these stupid people to advance, allowing them to go wherever they wanted. However, now, when the Germinal Organization was about to attack White Crane Town, he needed to be vigilant of anyone who ran out of the Germinal base. Manager Number One had long known that there might be a spy in the Germinal Organization base, a spy from the Construction Division. This was the information provided by the Germinal spy in White Crane Town. However, he could not find out who this person was. “Number Three, please capture them for me.” Number One grabbed the communicator beside the table and said in a deep voice. Manager Number Three was currently busy saving the martial artists. After hearing Manager Number One’s description, he immediately turned around and left, allowing the martial artists beside him to be crazily slaughtered by the Fifth Realm demon beasts. Compared to stopping the Fifth Realm demon beast, it was clearly more important to capture the two possible spies. Manager Number Three quickly advanced. The night wind cut the hair on his face like a knife. He was very fast and covered more than 30 meters in a second. Soon, when the tall shadow of the ruined White Water City appeared in front of him, he saw the two figures. Lin Xuan frowned slightly. Could it be? The Germinal Organization was so chaotic, but they still had to send Manager Number Three to catch possible spies? What if the two of us were only refugees that wanted to travel to the Construction Division to seek out a good life? “We’ll split into two directions. Let’s see how you choose.” Lin Xuan controlled his avatar to get away from him. His main body and avatar split into two directions and entered the ruined city from both sides, disappearing instantly like a drop of water fusing into the sea. Manager Number Three did not stop at all. He rubbed his skill and also formed an avatar! Lin Xuan cursed. Damn, this guy also learned the Avatar Technique. He just did not know what level and grade Manager Number Three’s avatar technique was. However, Lin Xuan realized that Manager Number Three probably wouldn’t bother investing into the Avatar Technique. At most, his Avatar Technique was only at the precious purple grade. Because the Avatar Technique, Observer Technique, Weaken, Disguise, and Perception were almost useless in battle, very few people were willing to learn them, let alone invest precious experience points. Seeing that the one chasing after him was Manager Number Three’s avatar, Lin Xuan immediately smiled and steadied himself. He immediately increased his speed and rushed north. His avatar had already seen White Crane Town from afar, so he had long thought of the fastest path to White Crane Town. At this moment, his main body and avatar could quickly circle around every bus and fallen tree in this ruined city and accurately shorten the distance through small alleys. In this aspect, Manager Number Three was inferior to him. Number Three sensed that the distance was difficult to close and immediately became solemn. It was simply impossible for an ordinary refugee to be so agile! Manager Number One was right. The other party was probably a spy sent by the Construction Division to the Germinal Organization. This time, he was probably delivering information to the Construction Division! Number Three immediately activated his skill, Wind Walk, and his movement speed increased by 50%. This was also one of the skills Lin Xuan had failed to detect with his Observer skill. Sensing Manager Number Three’s speed increase, Lin Xuan was not too surprised. After all, the other party was one of the people with the highest positions in the Germinal Organization. He was a level nine Sixth Realm martial artist. It would be strange if he did not even have such a trump card. Seconds and minutes passed. Lin Xuan finally saw the thick outline of White Crane Town under the night sky! At this moment, Manager Number Three’s main body was already within 10 meters of Lin Xuan’s avatar. This distance was already enough for him to attack. Manager Number Three directly used a Slide Shovel to destroy Lin Xuan’s avatar in one hit. Then, he quickly placed the Poison Frost Blade on his neck. However, before he could ask, Lin Xuan’s avatar quickly disappeared, leaving behind the ordinary white equipment. Manager Number Three was stunned. The other party had actually learned the Avatar Technique? This skill was not as unpopular as Weaken, but learning another skill like this meant that one would need to spend a lot of additional experience points. An ordinary martial artist would not even have time to advance their own cultivation. How could they care about a skill that did not have much combat strength? “My avatar can still catch up to him!” Manager Number Three sat down and focused on controlling his avatar. Lin Xuan casually condensed an Icicle skill and smashed it towards his back. Manager Number Three’s avatar suddenly dodged. However, just as he dodged, another five to six Icicles attacked him. Among the four types of elemental spells, fire spells focused on direct damage alone, lightning spells focused on group damage, poison spells focused on continuous health reduction, and frost spells focused on causing negative status. To be more precise, they focused on the causing negative status of speed reduction and frost. Number Three’s avatar did not expect this. After receiving two Icicles, its speed immediately decreased by 10%. It was this small difference that made the distance between the two increase. Now, they had already entered the warning range of White Crane Town. Manager Number Three did not continue forward. If he continued forward, he would attract the Seventh Realm martial artist in White Crane Town to support the other party. He believed that he did not have the ability to defeat a Seventh Realm martial artist. Manager Number Three looked deeply at the iron-skinned figure and disappeared into the night. “Stop! Who are you?!” A loud roar sounded from the city wall of White Crane Town. Lin Xuan raised his hands. “Refugee, I was lucky enough to escape from the Germinal Organization.” The door opened slightly and two soldiers in armor walked out, staring at Lin Xuan suspiciously. “The Germinal base is more than a hundred kilometers away. How did you get here?” Lin Xuan scratched his head. “I walked here with my feet.” The two of them: “…Please follow us to the temporary resettlement point first. We want to ask you a comprehensive list of questions.” Lin Xuan shook his head. “That’s naturally not a problem. However, if we delay such an important matter, you won’t be able to bear the consequences. I suggest that you let me speak directly to the mayor.” After all, Number Three had seen him arrive at White Crane Town. It was impossible for Manager Number One to not react after finding out about this. It was very likely for the battle date to be brought forward. Chapter 58 Strange Codeword, Entering the Sixth Realm Mystic Realm The two soldiers looked at each other and immediately changed their attitudes, not daring to delay. “Come with us.” The two soldiers stared at Lin Xuan from the left and right, leading him forward. From time to time, they would sweep him with vigilant eyes. Lin Xuan could not blame them. Since he was an outsider, it was very normal for them to be on guard. If these two soldiers ignored him, then there would really be a problem. Lin Xuan casually looked around and could see the situation inside White Crane Town. The streets were clean and the houses were neat. There were no sloppy refugees outside the houses. After taking a few more steps, he saw a woman carrying hot food to the city wall and distributing the food to every soldier. Amidst the hot air were everyone’s happy and friendly faces. It had been a long time since Lin Xuan had seen something like this after having transmigrated to this world. Soon, the soldier led Lin Xuan to a low house in the center of the town. Knock, knock, knock. The soldier knocked uneasily. A hoarse and dignified neutral voice sounded from within. “What’s the matter?” “Mayor, someone from the Germinal Organization said that they have important information for you!” “No.” The neutral voice refused. Lin Xuan whispered, “Redsnake Hand, Yellow Vine Wine.” The door was silent for a moment before replying, “…Two yellow orioles.” Lin Xuan continued, “Thinking of Gong Jin’s past, when Xiao Qiao first got married.” Inside the door: “…You’re making me unhappy.” Lin Xuan said, “I’m a bird in heaven.” The sound of a chair being pushed suddenly sounded from inside the door, followed by light footsteps. “Everyone flies when disaster strikes.” Then, the door opened. What appeared in front of Lin Xuan was a tall and slender woman. She was in her twenties, had short hair that reached her shoulders, phoenix eyes, and black eye shadows that flew wantonly towards her temples. She also wore a small white suit on her upper body and white leg jeans on her lower body. <b>Aas</b>  Her face was angular and valiant, and she had a terrifyingly dignified beauty. Be it men or women, they would instinctively be afraid of her aura and want to get closer to her from the bottom of their hearts. “You guys can go back.” The woman waved her hand. The two soldiers nodded and turned to leave. “Follow me in.” The woman returned to her seat and signaled for Lin Xuan to close the door. The woman made herself a cup of tea and brewed another cup for Lin Xuan before pushing it in front of him and saying indifferently, “My name is Ye Yuqiu, the mayor of White Crane Town. How do you know the secret codework of our Construction Division’s veteran member, Silver Fox?” Silver Fox was Manager Number Two. That was his code name in the Construction Division. Lin Xuan sat down in front of her. “Because I’m an intern from the Construction Division.” Ye Yuqiu took a sip of tea. “Where’s the thing?” Lin Xuan took out a recommendation letter and handed it over. Ye Yuqiu opened the envelope and quickly browsed through it before nodding slightly. “I understand. Thank you for delivering the information.” “The letter also mentioned that you want to enter the Sixth Realm mystic realm that we control. Take this thing and find the person in charge of the mystic realm. You get four hours in the mystic realm.” Ye Yuqiu tore off a piece of paper and wrote a few short words before handing it to Lin Xuan. Lin Xuan looked at the flamboyant scribbles and was very speechless. “…Were you a doctor in the past?” Ye Yuqiu raised her flying sword-like eyebrows and did not say anything. Lin Xuan waved his hand. “Never mind. I’m going to the mystic realm.” He held the note and pushed open the door and walked out without delay. Ye Yuqiu crossed her slender fingers in front of her and muttered to herself, “Hmm… For you to value this person so much… What kind of talent does he have that’s worth you taking him so seriously?” After a short moment of thought, she no longer thought about it. Instead, she looked at the content of the note and tapped the table lightly, as if she was making a difficult decision. “It’s impossible for another Seventh Realm martial artist to be transferred from the vicinity. I can only…” Lin Xuan casually pulled someone to ask for the location of the mystic realm’s door of light and quickly arrived at the northern side of White Crane Town without any obstructions. Here, he saw a six-meter-tall door of light. Beside the door of light was a security pavilion. In the security pavilion was a stooped old man who was working at this moment, snoring loudly. Lin Xuan knocked on the glass to wake the old man. The old man’s face was ordinary, and there were ravine-like wrinkles running down his face. The most memorable thing about the other party was his big nose. After handing over the note, the big-nosed old man frowned. “Young man, this mystic realm is filled with poison. If you don’t have a higher poison resistance, it’s best not to enter.” With that said, he suddenly changed the topic and revealed a cunning expression. He winked and said, “I’ll sell you a set with high poison resistance here. You can exchange for it with just two pieces of precious purple equipment!” Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. “Grandpa, don’t worry. I’m fine.” The old man’s smile immediately disappeared as he snorted. “Then go in.” After watching Lin Xuan enter, the old man picked up his communicator and made a call. “Hey, Xiao Qiu, that brat didn’t listen to my advice and didn’t buy my set. He directly entered.” A neutral voice sounded from the communicator. “Uncle, help me keep an eye on him. Silver Fox has specially asked us to protect him. Don’t let him die inside.” The old man was shocked. “Strange, why would Silver Fox specifically ask for us to protect such a person? He doesn’t seem very powerful.” The old man slowly walked out of the security pavilion and also entered the mystic realm. At the same time, Lin Xuan’s feet were already standing on solid ground. An intense and stimulating air surged into his nose as dizziness attacked the depths of his mind. Lin Xuan hurriedly looked at the data panel and discovered that there was a negative status “miasma poison” on his health bar. The miasma poison was different from the venomous poison and ferocious poison of the Poison Mosquito Swamp. Its effect targeted the brain. However, Lin Xuan’s poison resistance, venomous poison resistance, and ferocious poison resistance could all be used to resist it. However, the proportions of resistance were different. After being poisoned by the miasma poison, one had a 10% chance of being stunned for 1 second every 1 minute. The higher one’s constitution was, the lower the chance of being stunned and the lower the duration of dizziness. In addition, after being infected with this “miasma poison state”, one would also lose 10 health points per second. Of course, Lin Xuan could completely ignore this mere 10 points per second. First, his Constitution was as high as 353 points, which meant that his basic life recovery speed had reached 35 points per second. Then, he was also equipped with the “Fatal Spirit Medicine” rune group and a Poison Medic Set. The first effect of the Fatal Spirit Medicine rune group was that life recovery speed+70%. <b>run</b>  The Poison Medic Set would immediately allow its user to recover 10 health points from any poison attack, which included ordinary poison, venomous poison, ferocious poison, miasma poison, and so on. With the cumulative effects, Lin Xuan’s health would instead recover more and more when attacked by the miasma poison in the air. It could be said to be a medical miracle. He was basically a humanoid blood machine. Even vampires had to treat him like a mobile canteen. As for the probability of dizziness, in the face of his extremely high Constitution, it was completely harmless. Lin Xuan directly ignored it. After a short period of discomfort, he quickly adapted. At the same time, the name of this mystic realm appeared in his mind. Poison Miasma Cave, a Sixth Realm mystic realm. “Let’s see how deep I can go. I want to set up two training avatars here as soon as possible. I want to increase my martial artist level.” Lin Xuan strode forward. Although he had the upper hand in the battle with Manager Number Three that night, it was only because he had caught Manager Number Three off guard. No one expected that someone who specialized in fire magic would actually be wearing armor and have a very tough physique. Manager Number Three’s 389 points of Agility made Lin Xuan feel a sense of danger. The difference between a level one Sixth Realm expert and a level nine Sixth Realm expert was a total of 72 points. This gap was too big. He had to quickly make up for it. Chapter 59 Germinal Organization’s Early Attack The first floor of the Poison Miasma Cave was filled with level one Sixth Realm demon beasts. Lin Xuan could casually injure these demon beasts with his ice spear technique. Moreover, these demon beasts that lived in the Miasma Poison Cave generally had very low frost resistance. He also discovered that some demon beasts even had negative frost resistance. Lin Xuan guessed that it might be because of the low temperature, causing the poison to be less active. After knowing this, Lin Xuan strode forward without delay. Every time, he would try his best to choose demon beasts with high attributes and powerful survival skills to act as training avatars. This was because after his training avatar died, he had to come to the mystic realm again to choose a new one. It was naturally the same for him this time. He could not casually pick one. The big-nosed old man followed behind and was slightly surprised. “This young man is quite interesting. He really doesn’t seem to be afraid of the poison. How high is his poison resistance exactly?” Seeing Lin Xuan can kill a level one Sixth Realm demon by casually smashing out a few fireballs, he was even more surprised. “This guy uses magic? Then he probably focuses on Spirit. His Constitution shouldn’t be very high.” Half an hour later, Lin Xuan arrived at the fourth floor of the Poison Miasma Cave without any obstructions. The number of demon beasts here increased, and at the same time, he was attacked by several Sixth Realm demon beasts. His health points decreased very quickly. Although he could recover in a few breaths, Lin Xuan immediately became vigilant. He could not lose any health points! His life was at stake! He immediately took out the Dragon Hunter Shield from his consciousness space. After he advanced to the Sixth Realm, he had long increased some of the equipment he often used and had upgraded them to first level Sixth Realm. Bang bang bang! The Sixth Realm demon beasts collided with the Dragon Hunter Shield, each and every one of them crying out in pain, their skin and flesh lacerated. Lin Xuan used a few more Ice Spear Techniques from behind the big shield and quickly killed these demon beasts. The big-nosed old man was speechless. Was he seeing things? A mage with a shield in one hand? And it was a huge shield! The big shield provided survival ability, and the frost spell provided damage output. This was indeed a good combination… Not bad… Like hell it was! How was it possible for him to have so many attribute points to spend? It could be said that spells and shields were completely unrelated. They were simply not on the same page. The big-nosed old man could not help but use an Observer skill on him. However, he saw that the name was filled with question marks. The attributes seemed very ordinary. He could only see half of the skills and equipment, but he could not see the grades of the other items. Lin Xuan, who was still advancing, suddenly shuddered. Because he had a skill perception, he immediately sensed that someone had used an Observer skill on him just now. “Lu Luo said that there are spies planted by the Germinal Organization in White Crane Town. Could they be spies observing me secretly?” Lin Xuan immediately slowed down and made an expression as if the poison had entered his body. From time to time, he would cover his mouth and cough. Seeing this, the big-nosed old man nodded. “That’s more like it. This is how a normal person should behave. Just now, he was probably forcing himself to find out how long he could last in the poison.” As Lin Xuan killed the demon beasts, he carefully sensed all the targets in his surroundings. He vaguely sensed that a figure seemed to be hiding in the cave dozens of meters behind him. Lin Xuan coughed lightly, as if he was talking to himself. “I can’t hold on anymore. I have to leave quickly.” With that said, he turned around and ran towards the entrance of the Poison Miasma Cave. The big-nosed old man was smug. “Do you regret not buying my Poison Resistance Set?” As Lin Xuan passed by the cave where the big-nosed old man was hiding, he immediately took out the Earth Dragon King Hammer and attacked the cave wall with his full strength. Boom! The rock wall collapsed, and dust filled the air. The dust cloud blocked the old man’s vision, but it did not block Lin Xuan’s perception. He headed towards the dust and swung the Earth Dragon King Hammer in his right hand again! He condensed another Ice Spear Technique in his left hand. The spear was nearly two meters long and as thick as a fist. It flowed with ice-blue light and emitted cold air. Bang! The old man was caught off guard and was struck in the face. He retreated more than four meters and collided with another rock wall before stopping. Before he could speak, the Ice Spear Technique stabbed at his chest again. Clang! Lin Xuan heaved a sigh of relief. The other party was not dead, but he should have subdued him. Then, he heard the sound of ice shattering. “Young man, you’re not bad.” A familiar voice slowly sounded. Then, a hunched figure walked out of the dust. It was the drowsy old man from the security pavilion! Moreover, the other party was not injured at all. The full-powered attack of his Earth Dragon King Hammer and the Ice Spear Technique that pierced his chest were actually unable to injure him! Lin Xuan was stunned. The big-nosed old man’s eyes lit up as he tore open his clothes, revealing his firm and bulging chest muscles. “It’s been a long time since someone injured me. You’re really not bad.” Lin Xuan tried to use his Observer skill but could not see any of the attributes. He could only see about 30% of the information, but he still saw some information. A level nine Sixth Realm martial artist. “…Grandpa, who the hell are you?” The other party clearly did not have any malice towards him. If he did, he could have severely injured him with a backhand attack just now. The big-nosed old man raised his eyebrows. “I’m just an ordinary small security guard.” Lin Xuan: “… The security guard of the Construction Division is a level nine Sixth Realm martial artist?” The big-nosed old man said, “Your Observer skill level is not low at all.” He patted his chest. “I was only following behind you to prevent a rash young man like you from dying in the Miasma Poison Cave. The poison here is not ordinary.” “However, I didn’t expect you to actually discover me and even dare to attack me decisively.” He laughed loudly. Lin Xuan also heaved a sigh of relief. It was good that everything was fine. “Since you’re completely unafraid of the poison, this old man won’t protect you. I still have to go back to work.” The big-nosed old man fixed his clothes and changed back to his stooped figure. He left the Poison Miasma Cave and returned to the security pavilion before taking out his communicator. “Hey, Little Qiu, this brat is stronger than I thought. You didn’t see him. This brat crawled all the way to the sixth floor of the Miasma Poison Cave without even resting.” “Moreover, he also discovered that I was behind him. He thought that I had evil intentions and pretended to leave, but in fact, he was approaching me to attack.” The old man laughed. “It’s rare to see such a decisive, vigilant, and powerful young man.” Ye Yuqiu nodded slightly. “Alright, I understand.” Then, she paused for a moment and said, “Uncle, this person sent news that the Germinal Organization’s headquarters will be receiving reinforcements. The reinforcements will consist of two Seventh Realm martial artists.” The old man was stunned before he chuckled. “I understand. It’s time for me to work.” “I’m hanging up. I need to sleep more now that I’m old.” After hanging up the communicator, the old man continued to work cautiously. Soon, the thunderous snoring sounded again. Ye Yuqiu also quietly hung up the communicator and stared at the air for a long time with a slight sadness in her eyes. At the same time, Lin Xuan continued to explore downwards and quickly arrived at the sixth floor of the Miasma Poison Cave. Only after arriving here did he feel the pressure from a level six Sixth Realm demon beast. “I can’t go any lower. I’ll choose the demon beasts here.” After spending some time, Lin Xuan chose a Poison Miasma Python and a Giant Rock Turtle. After dispelling the two training avatars on his side of the Inferior Demon Mountain, he possessed these two demon beasts and made them his new avatars. (Current Area: Sixth floor of the Poison Miasma Cave (4600 general coin per minute, 23,000 experience points per minute)] He did not completely remove his training avatar from the Inferior Demon Mountain because he still needed the minerals in the Inferior Demon Mountain. In addition, if he needed to, the training avatar left there could also cause a sudden riot. Seeing that the training in the Poison Miasma Cave had already begun, Lin Xuan nodded. “It’s time to go.” At this moment, an ear-piercing alarm suddenly sounded in the sky above White Crane Town. “Demon beasts are attacking! Demon beasts are attacking!” Lin Xuan sighed. He had indeed killed many demon beasts. However, he had not gone to the south of East Lake City. There were still many demon beasts there. As long as the managers were willing to make a move, they could also spend some time driving them towards White Crane Town. As expected, the Germinal Organization had acted ahead of time. However, since the Construction Division had obtained the information from Lin Xuan, they were already prepared. The outcome of the battle was still unknown. Chapter 60 I’ll Protect Two Walls Alone Lin Xuan immediately saw the martial artists rush towards the city wall in an orderly manner. They moved in unison and were well-trained. Clearly, they did not panic because of the sudden attack of the demon beasts. “The Construction Division sure is good at training martial artists.” Lin Xuan recalled the battle at the east and west city walls of the Germinal Organization. The wasteland reclaimers of the Germinal Organization had all rushed up the city wall in a disorderly manner. After more than a dozen people had died, the morale of the wasteland reclaimers had begun to waver. In comparison, whether it was their mental state or their training results, these martial artists from the Construction Division had surpassed the Germinal martial artists. However, Lin Xuan also discovered a problem. There were… very few martial artists who headed to the city wall. Lin Xuan sighed and said, “It’s really as Lu Luo said. A large portion of their forces have been mobilized to the coastal area controlled by the Construction Division to resist the demon beasts surging out of the Drowning City mystic realm.” The demon beasts that attacked this time were not powerful. The demon beast with the highest level was only at the Third Realm. On the city wall of White Crane Town, there were also unmanned defensive towers like the Germinal Organization’s machine gun towers and fire-breathing towers. These were all things that had been left behind before the demon disaster appeared. They could be used after some repair and modification. With these unmanned towers and the martial artists on the city wall, it only took them more than 30 minutes to annihilate more than 10,000 demon beasts. The martial artists’ expressions relaxed as they all walked down the city wall and went out to clean the battlefield to pick up the items dropped by the demon beasts. The martial artists in charge of the logistics hurriedly climbed up the city wall to increase the ammunition for those unmanned defensive towers. However, before they could finish cleaning the battlefield and increasing the ammunition, the ground trembled. In the dark night, it seemed like a large group of shadows was quickly approaching. “Come back quickly!” The team leader on the city wall immediately shouted anxiously. Fortunately, the demon beasts were still some distance away. These martial artists who had gone out to clean the battlefield returned safely to White Crane Town and closed the heavy door. This time, there were more than 20,000 demon beasts. However, the demon beast with the highest level was still at the Third Realm. They took more than 50 minutes to win the battle. There were still no casualties in White Crane Town, but the ammunition consumption rate in the unmanned defense tower was very high. Seeing this situation, Lin Xuan had already roughly guessed the strategy of the Germinal Organization. They wanted to use multiple batches of low-level demon beasts to attack White Crane Town in order to achieve the effect of exhausting the many martial artists in White Crane Town. If such a harassment strategy was used a few more times, the martial artists would not be able to endure it. Lin Xuan could tell, and so could Mayor Ye Yuqiu. Under Ye Yuqiu’s order, the few martial artists were divided into three groups. One group guarded the south wall, the second group rested, and the third group prepared. At the same time, in the vast wilderness, Manager Number One, Manager Number Two, and Manager Number Three were gathered. Behind them was a large number of Sixth Realm, Fifth Realm, Fourth Realm, and Third Realm martial artists from the Germinal Organization. The wasteland reclaimers below the Second Realm were all left in the Germinal Organization base. In addition, several Sixth Realm martial artists who had just advanced were left behind to guard the base. The reason why they did not bring the wasteland reclaimers out was because many of the wasteland reclaimers were loyal to the Construction Division and wanted to live a better life. If they were brought out to fight, they might directly defect to the enemy. Yang Wei, Wen Xiong, Lu Luo, and the others were all already Sixth Realm martial artists. Yang Wei saw the situation in the distance and could not help but say, “Sirs, the effect of the demon beast invasion strategy is not obvious. Is it time for us to attack?” Manager Number One laughed. “No, no, no. Wait a little longer. The time is not ripe.” Manager Number Two asked in a low voice, “Number One, didn’t you say that two Seventh Realm martial artists were going to be sent over by the headquarters? Where are they? Without them, we would at most be able to fight evenly with White Crane Town.” Manager Number One smiled faintly. “I can’t tell you. I can only wait.” Manager Number Two shook his head. “Alright.” His expression did not change, but he was very anxious internally. He only asked Shield Ghost to provide information to White Crane Town. He only mentioned that the Germinal Organization headquarters would send two Seventh Realm martial artists to the Germinal base. However, he did not know why the Seventh Realm martial artist had not appeared for so long. Shouldn’t Number One discuss with the higher-ups what strategy to use after landing? After a while, Zhang Peng returned. “Sir, the number of martial artists on the city wall of White Crane Town has decreased.” Number One nodded. “Drive all the remaining demon beasts there.” “Yes!” Zhang Peng nodded. Layers of running sounds immediately sounded in the darkness, and the ground trembled. Manager Number One nodded. “Everyone, get ready immediately! Listen to my signal and prepare to attack the three walls in three directions!” “Yes!” everyone replied in a low voice. Manager Number Two’s heart skipped a beat. Damn. Didn’t they say that it was a harassment strategy? Why did he let go of the last wave of demon beasts just now? Why would they suddenly split up and attack White Crane Town? Could it be that Number One has already discovered that he was a spy? Manager Number Two was uneasy. Manager Number Three sensed the subtle expression on his face and doubt rose in his heart. Black ton drank up a bottle of vodka and patted Number Two’s shoulder fiercely. “What’s wrong with you? You’re so timid. Are you afraid of death? With me by your side, what do you have to fear?” Number Two almost staggered from being patted and immediately said angrily, “My colleagues are still beside me. Give me some face.” Number One and Number Three heard the two of them and immediately smiled knowingly. The doubt on Number Three’s face quickly disappeared. On the other hand, the city wall of White Crane Town immediately fell into a bitter battle. Lin Xuan was also stunned. However, he quickly reacted and immediately sensed Manager Number One’s sharp strategic tactic. Se The demon beast groups in the first and second wave of demon beast attack were quite small, and their levels were not high. It looked like a harassment strategy. After that, he waited for the enemy to formulate a corresponding strategy and get the martial artists to fall in three shifts, dividing their troops to guard the city wall. Then, he would directly suppress the enemy by sending all the demon beasts in the third wave! Sensing that more than 100,000 demon beasts had appeared on the south wall facing the Germinal Organization, the martial artists of the second and third shifts quickly rushed to the city wall. However, they also needed time to get to the city wall. In this short period of time, casualties had already appeared on the city wall of White Crane Town. At the same time, an even more ear-piercing alarm sounded. “Germinal martial artists have appeared on the east wall!” “Germinal martial artists have appeared on the western city wall!” At this moment, Ye Yuqiu had already walked out of her house and arrived at the city wall. She knew better than anyone what the problem of White Crane Town was. There were too few people. Most of the forces had been mobilized to the coastal region to defend against the Drowning City demon beasts. There were only 500 plus people left to guard White Crane Town. It was very difficult for more than 500 people to guard the four walls. As a Seventh Realm martial artist, she could not join the battle too soon. Her joining the battle would cause her to be exposed in the open while the other party’s Seventh Realm martial artist hid in the dark. The difference between light and dark was obvious. “Shield Ghost, Silver Fox has high hopes for you. Can you help guard the east or west wall?” Ye Yuqiu said solemnly. She had already known Shield Ghost’s character from the letter Manager Number Two had brought. With that said, she immediately said, “I’ll give you three peerless golden runes of your choice.” Lin Xuan was overjoyed. “Alright! Then I’ll guard the east and west walls alone! The reward is six peerless golden runes.” Ye Yuqiu: “???” How could he guard two walls alone? Chapter 61 Is The Friend You’re Talking About Yourself? Ye Yuqiu took a deep breath and said solemnly, “This is not a joke!” Lin Xuan also said solemnly, “Why would I joke about this? It’s six peerless golden runes! However, I want to reserve a peerless golden rune in advance.” Ye Yuqiu looked at him speechlessly. Silver Fox had long mentioned Shield Ghost’s character. She knew that if she could not order him around, she could use money to pave the way. However, she had still underestimated the allure of money and treasures to Lin Xuan. The chances of golden peerless runes appearing on the forging table in the consciousness space were ridiculously low. It was no different from those games with extremely low drop rates. Moreover, unlike those games, one would not be guaranteed to get anything Now that he had a chance to directly choose six peerless golden runes, how could Lin Xuan miss this opportunity? “Then tell me, how are you going to guard two walls?” Ye Yuqiu questioned. Lin Xuan waved his hand. “I have a friend who’s also a Sixth Realm martial artist. In a while, I’ll get him to help guard the city wall.” Ye Yuqiu was puzzled. “Is that friend you’re talking about yourself?” Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. “Don’t worry. I’ll definitely fulfill my promise. Leave the two walls to me.” “Also, don’t we have to guard the northern city wall?” He pointed behind him. Ye Yuqiu shook her head. “There’s no need to guard.” “What runes do you want to get in advance?” Lin Xuan immediately said, “I need ‘let the flames purify everything’. I’m still short of a third to gather a set of runes. After all, the Construction Division runs a big business. You should have it, right?” Ye Yuqiu closed her eyes and recalled. “The rune warehouse. It’s on the sixth shelf in the third row. I’ll get it for you.” Lin Xuan nodded. “Then I’ll go get that friend.” Soon, Ye Yuqiu returned with the rune. What made her dumbfounded was that there were actually two people standing here. One figure was covered in thick armor that seemed to be in a metal bucket. The other figure was enveloped in a black cloak and could not be seen clearly. Ye Yuqiu was stunned. Which of them was the Shield Ghost? Which of them was the friend? She tried to use Observer, but she could not see any information. “Unfortunately, my Observer skill hasn’t improved much. I’m only at the Fourth Realm now, and the grade is only rare blue. Otherwise, I should be able to see this person’s information.” Ye Yuqiu was helpless. “I’m Shield Ghost. I’ve changed my equipment to avoid being recognized by the Germinal Organization.” Lin Xuan was currently wearing the Giant Shield Set and the Stronghold Set. Because the Stronghold Set was worn outside, it naturally looked like an iron bucket. “I’ll go east, you go west.” After receiving the rune Ye Yuqiu handed over, he patted the shoulder of his “friend” and the two of them walked with their backs facing each other. This friend of his was naturally himself. To be precise, it was his avatar. “It’s good to have an avatar. Unfortunately, I can only have one avatar with this avatar skill. I wonder if there are any high-level avatar skills?” Lin Xuan stood on the east wall and embedded an entire “Let the Flames Purify Everything” rune into his Blazing Fire Codex. The three effects of the ‘Let the Flames Purify Everything’ rune group were +70% magic power recovery speed, +30% fire magic damage, and a fire magic skill that carried splash damage within a 50-meter radius. With this rune group and the Scarlet Wave Rush rune group he had previously obtained, the strength of his fire spells had increased greatly compared to when he fought Manager Number Three previously! At the same time, Zhang Peng, Yang Wei, and Mo Yuan brought nearly a hundred martial artists of various levels to the western city wall. Lu Luo, Wen Xiong, and the others led another group of people to the east wall. Mo Yuan noticed that Yang Wei was a little nervous and casually reminded, “Don’t be nervous, and don’t worry. Sir Number One is very resourceful. Moreover, no matter what, we have a lot of people. The advantage is on our side!” Yang Wei heard this and instinctively trembled. He suddenly recalled that not long ago, when he wanted to curry favor with Number Three and deal with Shield Ghost, he had once sent out three wasteland reclaimers. The three of them had fought one-on-one and seemed to have also boldly said that the advantage was on their side. In the end, the three of them were beaten up by Shield Ghost and could not retaliate at all. “Eh, look, there’s actually only one person standing on the western city wall! I’m dying of laughter. Does he want to defend against the attack of so many of us alone?” Zhang Peng suddenly noticed the figure enveloped in a cloak on the western city wall. Mo Yuan also looked up. With just a glance, his legs weakened and he almost fell to the ground. Zhang Peng and Yang Wei supported him from both sides and asked curiously, “What’s wrong?” Mo Yuan pointed at the cloaked figure on the city wall and stammered, “Flame… Flame Explosion!” Zhang Peng and Yang Wei’s bodies trembled, “Damn, really?” They had already completely experienced the terror of Flame Explosion. Facing Flame Explosion, the captain of the Demon King Team, Luo Rixu, was unable to counterattack at all and was instantly killed! Moreover, they also heard some news from Mo Yuan. That night, when flames rose in the wilderness, it was Flame Explosion who had fought Manager Number Three. However, in the end, Flame Explosion was never captured. What did this mean? It meant that Flame Explosion had successfully escaped after fighting Manager Number Three! They did not need to be told how powerful Flame Explosion was. Manager Number Three was the best example. Lin Xuan’s avatar also saw the people below the city wall. He swept his gaze over and saw that they were all familiar. The hand under his cloak directly took out the Blazing Fire Codex and he immediately began to chant Flame Explosion. Seeing this action, Mo Yuan’s instinctive reaction was to retreat. If even the Sixth Realm martial artist leader retreated, there was even less of a need to mention those weaker martial artists. Before Lin Xuan’s avatar could start chanting, a large number of the martial artists sent by the Germinal Organization to attack the western city wall retreated. Those who did not know would think that they were currently facing a Seventh Realm martial artist on the western city wall. Zhang Peng, Yang Wei, and Mo Yuan looked at each other and saw the embarrassment in their eyes. Mo Yuan said, “Hahaha… I was so anxious just now that I couldn’t help but take a step back.” Zhang Peng said, “Understood, understood. My feet were a little itchy just now and I wanted to adjust the buckle on my feet.” With that said, the two of them stared at Yang Wei, “What about you?” Yang Wei was so anxious that he scratched his head and could not think of any good excuse for a while. Zhang Peng and Mo Yuan said in unison, “Looks like you’re afraid!” Yang Wei :”…” “Are these the Germinal Organization’s martial artists? They’re too timid.” A hoarse voice sounded from the cloak. The three of them were immediately furious. With so many of them being forced back by a single person, it would be too embarrassing if word of this got out. “Attack, charge up!” Yang Wei roared and retreated half a step, commanding the Third Realm, Fourth Realm, and Fifth Realm martial artists behind him to rush up. The martial artists behind him curled their lips, but they did not dare to disobey Yang Wei’s orders. Otherwise, Yang Wei and the other two would probably find another way to get them to charge. All kinds of skills were immediately thrown towards the city wall. As long as it was not a Sixth Realm martial artist’s skill, Lin Xuanchun would be able to block it even without the equipment with high resistance. However, it was as if all those skills landing on him were water splashing on his body, not leaving any traces. “It’s my turn.” A huge fireball more than six meters in diameter quickly formed in Lin Xuan’s palm. The martial artists under the city wall immediately swallowed when they saw the huge, hot fireball. Damn. Did Manager Number Three also face this fireball that day? Wasn’t this too terrifying? “Retreat, retreat, retreat! All of you, disperse!” Zhang Peng shouted and immediately activated his skill to increase his speed, hurriedly pouncing to the side. Yang Wei and Mo Yuan also rolled to the side like lazy donkeys. Only those martial artists who did not react in time stared at the huge fireball that was quickly approaching with shocked expressions. Boom! Flames soared into the sky. <b>?</b>  The martial artists in the center of the fireball instantly evaporated without even leaving behind a trace. Chapter 62 I’m the Best At Lazing Away The flames dissipated, leaving only a black mark on the ground. Zhang Peng, Mo Yuan, and Yang Wei swallowed their saliva as they watched. Of course, they were not hungry, but frightened. “Who else wants to die?” The voice that sounded from under the black cloak became increasingly hoarse. The three of them trembled and instinctively shook their heads. Zhang Peng coughed lightly and said solemnly, “Let’s retreat first and think about how to deal with this first.” Mo Yuan and Yang Wei nodded vigorously, “That’s right!” Hearing the three people’s orders, the other martial artists also heaved a sigh of relief and hurriedly retreated. They only stopped after retreating from the attack range of Flame Explosion. Zhang Peng said, “I think we still need to rely on the people on the south wall and the three managers to attack the White Crane Town. Am I right?” Mo Yuan and Yang Wei nodded crazily, “That makes a lot of sense! You’re right!” Zhang Peng said, “The attack power of our east and west city walls is only to delay the guards of White Crane Town. In that case, even if we don’t attack with all our strength, as long as we have dragged Flame Explosion here, our goal has been achieved. Am I right?” Mo Yuan and Yang Wei nodded crazily again. “Your strategic skills are on point. We are very impressed.” Zhang Peng said in satisfaction, “Then we’ll just throw out some skills for show. In any case, we just have to act as if we’re attacking the city.” Mo Yuan and Yang Wei directly raised their thumbs and were not stingy with their praise. “This battle plan is good!” Through the eyes of his avatar, Lin Xuan saw Zhang Peng and the others gathered together and discussing. He couldn’t help but feel that they were up to no good. Unexpectedly, after a while of discussion, Zhang Peng and the other two actually led the martial artists to approach again. However, this time, Zhang Peng was the first to attack. The skill he used this time was a slanted fire arrow. Not only did it deviate far from the target, but it even freaking shot onto the city wall. It did not even reach the city wall. “According to this attack frequency and strength, I think Flame Explosion should be able to tell,” Zhang Peng said in a low voice. Then, something very strange happened. Shouts of killing shook the sky from the western city wall. Every martial artist used all their strength before charging over, shouting until their faces and necks turned red. However, the final skills that were released were pitifully small. They were not powerful skills that they often used, but weak skills that were low in level. Various crooked small fireballs, bolts of lightning, and frost arrows flew over. Their speed was simply slower than an old man in his seventies or eighties. Lin Xuan even felt that he could send these attacks flying with a casual flick of his finger, At this moment, Lin Xuan also understood what these people meant. He was immediately at a loss whether to laugh or cry. “You guys sure are a crafty bunch.” He smiled and simply played along with them. Zhang Peng, Mo Yuan, and Yang Wei immediately smiled at the city wall in tacit understanding, and even had a hint of gratitude. He understood! Flame Explosion actually played along! On the southern city wall. The three managers saw the flames rising from the western city wall from afar. Manager Number One used his skill “Wide Domain Perception” and even saw the figure enveloped in a cloak at a glance. After hearing Manager Number One’s description, Manager Number Three gritted his teeth in hatred. “That’s him! Flame Explosion! He’s indeed from the Construction Division!” Number Two scratched his head. Did the Construction Division ever have such a person? Could it be that he was scouted by the Construction Division after he joined the Germinal Organization? “There were so many people on the western city wall, but they were actually blocked by Flame Explosion alone. It can only be said that Flame Explosion’s reputation is too great, forcing them to not dare to be too rash…” Manager Number One shook his head repeatedly. “Strange, there’s only one person standing on the east wall too. His entire body is enveloped in an iron bucket-like armor.” Manager Number One used his vast regional perception to look at the east wall again and said curiously. The Construction Division of White Crane Town was actually so bold. They only arranged for two people to guard the east and west city walls? Manager Number Two asked, “Number One, are we not going to make a move? Why don’t we let Black directly attack one of the city walls with lightning speed?” Black, who was beside them, immediately rolled his eyes. Number One shook his head. “No, we have to wait for the other party’s Seventh Realm martial artist to appear first. Now, we’re competing on patience. Whoever’s high-level combat strength appears first will fall into a disadvantageous position first.” “This is a card game. We can’t just throw out the biggest trump card we have.” Number One pointed at the south wall. “The other party piled all the martial artists on the south wall and even installed many unmanned defensive towers on the south wall, causing us to be unable to attack fiercely.” “However, their east and west city walls are their weakness. As long as we attack from either of these walls, it can cause an avalanche effect. At that time, the Seventh Realm martial artists of the Construction Division will have no choice but to attack. Our strategic goal will then be achieved.” Number Two nodded repeatedly, but he was anxious for the Construction Division members in White Crane Town. Wasn’t it too dangerous for only two people to guard the east and west city walls? At least send more people. On the east wall. Lu Luo, Wen Xiong, and the other Sixth Realm martial artists were the leaders of this attack on the east wall. When they discovered that the one guarding this city wall was a martial artist in iron bucket-like armor, their mood was a little dumbfounded. This was too much! Wasn’t the other party basically looking down on them? Lu Luo was a little worried. What was the Construction Division doing? Why were they only sending one person to guard the city? How was she supposed to act like the enemy in such a situation? Lin Xuan cleared his throat and shouted, “Tell me your name! I, Iron Wall, won’t kill nameless people!” Iron Wall? What a strange code name. Lu Luo’s face flashed with confusion. Where did Shield Ghost go? Could this person be Shield Ghost? She had never seen the face that was hidden under Shield Ghost’s black armor. In her eyes, if Shield Ghost had been equipped with other equipment, he would probably have become a different person. She tried to use Observer and could only see about 20% of the information. The other party’s name and highest attributes were not exposed at all. Wen Xiong ignored him and said to Lu Luo and the others, “This person is wearing heavy armor. He should be a martial artist with high defense and high HP who uses reflective damage to attack. I’ll distract him. You guys attack from afar!” He rushed over and stomped the ground. His legs compressed as he jumped up high like a spring The pair of iron fists smashed straight towards Lin Xuan. Lin Xuan stretched out his hand, and frost suddenly gathered in his palm. In an instant, an ice spear nearly two meters long suddenly formed, filled with cold air. Ice Spear Technique! Lin Xuan suddenly unleashed the Ice Spear Technique. With the enhancement of more than 100 points of strength, the ice spear left his hand and smashed towards Wen Xiong. In the air, Wen Xiong was a live target. He was directly struck in the chest by the ice spear, and he spat out blood violently and fell heavily from the sky. This attack directly took away one-third of his health! Wen Xiong was so frightened that he hurriedly took out a Health Potion from the storage compartment and gulped it down. “Shouldn’t this guy have high defense and high HP? How is he able to use the Ice Spear Technique?! The damage is also so freaking high!” Wen Xiong was dumbfounded. Wen Xiong was also considered an above average expert in the Germinal Organization base. His advancement to the First Realm and Second Realm had been perfect! Why was it that ever since he encountered Shield Ghost, awesome martial artists kept popping up like leeks, each more ferocious and ridiculous than the other? Now, even a martial artist wearing heavy armor and Ice Spear Technique had appeared! Was there anything more ridiculous than this? Chapter 63 Fight to the Death! Slacking Off! Lin Xuan smiled. “Everyone, I’m actually a lone wolf that wanders the wilderness. I just got paid yesterday by the Construction Division to guard the city wall. I don’t want to spend too much effort. I hope you can cooperate. In this way, it won’t be tiring for you and for me. How good is that?” With that said, many of the Germinal martial artists who had been sent to attack the east wall instinctively nodded in agreement. “Also, there is a Seventh Realm martial artist in White Crane Town. Take a guess… What do you think will happen to you guys after you defeat me and break through the east wall where the Seventh Realm martial artist is located?” “The other party will definitely run to the east wall immediately and kill all of you!” Lin Xuan spread out his hands. “Therefore, let’s not make this battle too intense.” The Germinal martial artists heard this and nodded again. A part of this was because of the powerful strength of this person who called himself “Iron Wall”. Even Wen Xiong was severely injured by a single attack. If they rushed forward, wouldn’t many of them die? After being reminded of the Seventh Realm martial artist by Lin Xuan, they realized that breaking through the city wall might not be a good thing. After all, it might attract that big shot. After luring out the Seventh Realm martial artist, they would indeed achieve Manager Number One’s strategic intention. However, what about these people who were attacking the east wall? Wouldn’t they be slapped to death by that big shot? Lu Luo was overjoyed. This guy was a genius. He seemed like a ferocious man with muscles in his head, but when he spoke in such a manner, it immediately lowered the morale of the Germinal martial artists. Of course, Lu Luo would not say that out loud. The two Seventh Realm martial artists that were called in as reinforcements from the Germinal Organization’s headquarters had not appeared yet. Those two were the greatest hidden danger. Before the situation was known, she could not expose herself. Lu Luo immediately berated, “Nonsense! How can you shake the will of us Germinal martial artists?!” She immediately took out a green longbow from the storage compartment, nocked an arrow, and shot it at Lin Xuan. Swish! Swish! Swish! Three arrows shot out. Lin Xuan also took out his shield to resist. The arrow collided with the shield and actually forced him to retreat three steps. “How powerful. Is this an expert among the Sixth Realm Germinal Organization’s martial artists? You’re much stronger than that stupid big guy just now.” Lin Xuan’s tone was solemn, as if he had really encountered a powerful enemy. Lu Luo said, “You’re not bad either. You even blocked my three-star consecutive arrows! As expected of a lone wolf valued by the Construction Division who guards a city wall alone!” Wen Xiong: “???” He whispered, “Sister Lu, I remember that you usually use a huge black sickle.” Lu Luo also replied in a low voice, “That’s right.” “Then why are you using a bow now? It doesn’t seem like you’ve leveled up this weapon, but you still forced the other party to retreat repeatedly?”. Lu Luo patted his shoulder and said earnestly, “This is because we’re in a real battle. You still have to learn more from me.” Wen Xiong’s mouth fell open. Seeing Lu Luo and Iron Wall fight and appreciate each other, his mind fell into a daze. The other Germinal martial artists also frowned. Some understood, some did not. Some pretended that they understood, while others pretended that they didn’t. Soon, the first warrior stepped forward. “Iron Wall! Eat my Venomous Poison Arrow!” This Fourth Realm martial artist also took out an ordinary white grade longbow that he had never used before. He carefully took aim and fired it seriously. The venomous poison arrow left the bow and accurately struck its target… which was the city wall three meters away. This Fourth Realm martial artist sighed. “Iron Wall probably has a long-range skill that can interfere with arrows. My venomous poison arrow won’t be able to injure him.” Then, he suddenly perked up. “However, I won’t give up! I will live and die as a member of the Germinal Organization! I will resolutely follow the orders of the three managers and fight to the death!” He rested for ten seconds and bent the bow again. This time, he successfully made the arrow hit his target… the city wall 2.5 meters away! This Fourth Realm martial artist set a good example. After him, the many martial artists sent to attack the east wall began to attack the city wall seriously. They took out low-grade equipment that had never been upgraded and used skills that they had not invested any experience points into. One after another, crooked fireballs, ice awls, lightning chains, Acid Erosion Art, and consecutive arrows were unleashed. Very few skills ended up hitting the city wall. At the same time, there also weren’t many skills that could injure Lin Xuan. However, they refused to give up! They fought again and again! This tenacious spirit flowed and sublimated among all the martial artists! “I see. I completely understand.” Seeing this scene, Wen Xiong was deep in thought. “Are you guys trying to slack…” Before he could finish speaking, Lu Luo kicked him. “Shut up! You’re interrupting my battle with Iron Wall!” Wen Xiong, the muscle man, had an aggrieved expression. He also began to throw small fireballs at the east wall. However, these small fireballs were probably not much bigger than the size of his thumb. Seeing this, Lin Xuan nodded in satisfaction. It seemed like everyone got it. This also reflected that the Germinal Organization lacked loyalty. Even the loyal lackeys of Manager Number Three, Yang Wei, Zhang Peng, and Yang Wei, could not help but slack off because of the fear of Flame Explosion. Needless to say, under Lu Luo’s guidance, all the martial artists on the east wall very wisely began to slack off. They looked solemn and serious, but they were actually very relaxed. Those who did not know might even think that they were doing battle drills. Outside the southern city wall. The battle was extremely intense. Every minute and every second, a large number of skills were used as both sides exchanged blows. Skills of various colors lit up the entire area. Thanks to Lin Xuan, Ye Yuqiu did not need to assign Construction Division members to guard the east and west walls. Instead, she placed everyone on the south wall and focused on resisting the main force of the Germinal Organization. As for the main force of the Germinal Organization, because they were directly in front of the three managers, they did not dare to slack off at all and could only bite the bullet and charge forward. However, White Crane Town had the advantage of the high ground. Moreover, it was usually well-trained and had the support of an unmanned defensive tower. For a moment, it held the advantage. More and more martial artists from the Germinal Organization died under the city wall. Many Germinal martial artists were already fearful and afraid. Manager Number One’s expression also gradually darkened. What was going on? Were the east and west walls that difficult to attack? There was clearly only one person guarding each wall! Manager Number Two also had a very anxious expression, and he even paced back and forth very cooperatively, as if he was anxious because of this anxious battle situation. In fact, he was extremely happy. He was simply overjoyed. “Hahahahaha! Where did the Construction Division find such an expert? The two of them defended two walls! Now, I want to see how Number One’s plan can continue! They better hurry and let those two Seventh Realm martial artists appear!” Manager Number Two laughed heartily in his heart as he thought to himself. At this moment, Manager Number Three took the initiative to step forward. “Number One, it’s my turn.” Manager Number One frowned deeply. “Alright, choose a city wall to attack. I’ll give you 20 minutes. You have to take down one of the city walls.” Number Three did not say anything and rushed straight to the western city wall of White Crane Town. His target was the figure enveloped in a black cloak on the western city wall. Flame Explosion! He swore to kill him this time! He wanted to avenge his previous humiliation! Chapter 64 Take This! Flame Explosion +205% Damage! On the western city wall. Zhang Peng, Yang Wei, and Mo Yuan were originally still lazily chatting with Lin Xuan. A violent wind suddenly shot over, blowing until their faces hurt. By the time they reacted, Manager Number Three’s slender figure had already appeared in front of them. That cold and arrogant face looked down at them. The three of them immediately felt fear. “Trash! The Germinal Organization has raised you for so long. What a damn waste!” Manager Number Three berated coldly. The three of them turned red in the face. Even if they were berated, they did not dare to retort. Lin Xuan stood on the western city wall and narrowed his eyes. “With the two training avatars in the Poison Miasma Cave and the training avatars in the Inferior Demon Mountain, I’ve already accumulated more than a billion experience points. I can only increase my cultivation by one level. Then, I’ll increase my cultivation level. I’ll add all 8 attribute points to my Constitution.” Lin Xuan muttered the word “increase” and his level increased to level two Sixth Realm. As soon as Manager Number Three appeared, Lin Xuan recalled the 389 Agility points he had seen that night. It really made one feel like his back was being pierced “Flame Explosion, I’m here to kill you.” After berating Zhang Peng and the other two, Manager Number Three pulled out the Poison Frost Blade from the storage compartment and pointed at Lin Xuan from afar with a cold voice. Bang! He suddenly stepped on the ground, his legs jumping, and he leaped up the city wall. Lin Xuan naturally could not let him climb up the city wall so easily.  He immediately used Flame Explosion. Boom! Flame Explosion easily hit Manager Number Three, and the latter’s figure instantly disappeared in the bright flames. Zhang Peng and the other two were dumbfounded. Manager Number Three had been hit so easily? Impossible. Lin Xuan subconsciously used the Fire Ring Technique. Clang! A groan sounded from three meters behind him. Then, the air in the region swayed slightly, and an outline resembling a human appeared. Lin Xuan immediately reacted. The one who had been hit by Flame Explosion just now was only Number Three’s avatar. The real Manager Number Three had long climbed up the city wall in a flash to attack him from behind. “Flame Explosion!” Lin Xuan was not stingy with his magic power at all. He flipped his hand and used Flame Explosion. Manager Number Three had to use Wind Walk to increase his movement speed to avoid this attack. However, this time, he suddenly discovered that the damage range of Flame Explosion was even greater! He had clearly accelerated and escaped the damage range of Flame Explosion, but his body was still charred, and his health had also decreased by about 10%. “The strength of his fire magic has increased again…” Manager Number Three frowned deeply. How did he do this? How long had it been? His combat strength had actually increased greatly. If Flame Explosion was still as powerful as before, he felt that he would definitely win. However, Flame Explosion’s strength suddenly soared, immediately pulling the scales of the battle back. Before Manager Number Three could attack, Lin Xuan used another Flame Explosion. He did not stop at all, as if his magic power was endless. Manager Number Three was very aggrieved. He could only dodge around ten meters away from Lin Xuan, failing to close the distance. As for the splash damage of Flame Explosion, it was constantly wearing down Number Three’s health points. He had chosen to become a high-sensitivity and high-level assassin. His health recovery speed was not too high. If his health was exhausted like this, he would still be the one to fail in the end. “I have to attack with lightning speed and immediately injure him severely!” Manager Number Three’s eyes flashed with coldness as he directly activated his strongest skill, Bloodthirsty Assault! Buzz! After activating this skill, he immediately obtained a 15% highest attribute enhancement, an additional 20% critical hit chance, an additional 20% movement speed, 90% additional critical damage, and 70% Life-Steal! From Lin Xuan’s point of view, Manager Number Three’s speed suddenly increased. He suddenly avoided the main damage range of Flame Explosion and stabbed fiercely at Lin Xuan’s chest. Just like last time, the two blades seemed to fail to penetrate the hard armor. However, this time, after Manager Number Three activated the Bloodthirsty Assault, his strength increased greatly. His two blades pierced through his cloak and also the hard armor, almost piercing through the skin below. “Critical Hit!” He had 389 Agility points and already had a very high critical hit rate. Coupled with the critical damage from his skills “Advanced Critical Hit Mastery” and “Bloodthirsty Assault”, the critical hit rate had already accumulated a terrifying level. If the Agility of Flame Explosion was any lower, and both sides’ Agility was suppressed, it would be almost a 100% critical hit! However, Number Three had been mistaken. There was no critical hit at all. Lin Xuan had a skill that could reduce the other party’s highest attributes by 15%! In addition, Lin Xuan’s black cloak was a Demon Flame Set from the Blazing Fire Plains. It was embedded with the “Fatal Spirit Medicine” rune group, but what he was wearing was the Giant Shield Set. On the other hand, the Giant Shield Set was embedded with the “Impregnable Gold” rune group! The Impregnable Gold rune group was currently at level nine Fifth Realm. The three effects were an increase of 15% health points, and the passive ability that allowed any attack’s critical hit chance that landed on this equipment to decrease by 80%. Any attack that landed on this equipment would also help Lin Xuan recover 25 health points. The high critical hit chance that Manager Number Three was proud of was simply ineffective against him. In fact, it was even inferior to a normal attack! After this attack, Manager Number Three’s expression suddenly turned green and changed drastically. He was actually poisoned! Moreover, it was a ferocious poison! As a highly-sensitive and powerful assassin who walked in the dark, it was impossible for him to level up his poison resistance. At most, he could only eat the attribute items dropped in the mystic realm controlled by the Germinal Organization and increase his poison resistance as much as possible. This led to his health points decreasing rapidly, as if his health was a fried chicken being consumed by a starving man. “Not only did my Poison Frost Blade not poison him, but he even poisoned me?!” Manager Number Three hurriedly took out a bottle of antidote from the storage compartment and wanted to drink it. “How dare you disrespect me by drinking medicine in front of me” Lin Xuan backhandedly used Flame Explosion, forcing Manager Number Three to stop drinking the medicine and forcefully dodge. Manager Number Three was poisoned because of the effect of the Fatal Spirit Medicine rune group. After the rune group was embedded in the armor, any venomous poison or ferocious poison attack that lands on this equipment will cause the attacker to suffer a ferocious poison state. Lin Xuan sneered. Flames gathered in his left hand as he used another Flame Explosion. Manager Number Three was about to dodge when Lin Xuan suddenly used his Ice Spear Technique! The damage of the Ice Spear Technique was not considered high, but it would cause the other party to have an additional effect of Shrouding Frost, greatly reducing their movement speed. Manager Number Three did not expect that a freaking Fire Mage like Flame Explosion would actually use Ice Spear Technique out of the blue! He was immediately hit, and his speed decreased greatly. Then, Lin Xuan activated the Demon King of Fury! A huge fireball quickly gathered in Lin Xuan’s hands. He originally already had +10% fire damage! The Demon King of Fury’s passive skill increased fire damage by 15%, and its active skill increased fire damage by 40%! The Blazing Fire Technique had +60% fire damage! The Demon Flame Set had +20% fire damage! The rune group “Let the Flames Purify Everything” also increased the fire damage by 30%! Moreover, the Scarlet Wave Rush rune group reduced the other party’s fire resistance by 15%, which was equivalent to increasing fire damage by 15%! Finally, because of the Demonized Body, Lin Xuan would enter the demonized state after getting hurt. All damage would increase by 15%! “Take this. Flame Explosion Technique with a total of +205% damage!” A fireball more than seven meters in diameter slowly rose, and heat waves surged! Chapter 65 Good Acting Skills, Worthy of Best Actor Award The huge fireball attracted everyone’s attention. Even the Construction Division and the Germinal Organization’s main force, including the mayor Ye Yuqiu and the two managers of the Germinal Organization, instinctively looked up at the fireball. Ye Yuqiu’s phoenix eyes widened. “That friend of Shield Ghost’s is this powerful? A fireball of this diameter can only be unleashed by a level nine Sixth Realm martial artist with a Spirit attribute of at least 350.” Manager Number One said in shock, “Nobody below the Seventh Realm can resist this!” Manager Number Two was shocked. “Is that caused by Flame Explosion? This is bad, this is bad. Something bad is going to happen to Number Three! Number One, we have to go and save him as soon as possible.” Of course, he was secretly overjoyed. Flame Explosion was awesome! It would be best if he could kill Manager Number Three instantly! After the battle, he would be the first to award him! Number One gritted his teeth. “Black, I’ll have to trouble you to save Number Three.” Gulp gulp gulp… Manager Number One :”…” “Wait, I’ll drink some more wine before fighting.” Black ton drank all the wine in the bottle in one gulp. Only then did he throw the empty bottle into Manager Number Two’s arms and instantly disappear into the darkness. When he appeared again, he had already arrived at the western city wall. At this moment, Manager Number Three was lying on the ground with his limbs spread out. His entire body was charred black, and he had almost turned into a humanoid charcoal. Many of his Quenching Poison Frost Blade had shattered, and a few of his equipment had also shattered, but he was not dead. “That shouldn’t be the case. After decelerating him just now, he was in the center of the damage range of my Flame Explosion. He should have been killed instantly.” Lin Xuan pondered over it and could only guess that it was because of the special effects of some special equipment. After all, he also had the Giant Shield Set. He could gain immunity to fatal damage, but the cooldown time was very long. Manager Number Three had been a manager for several years. He should also have such powerful life-preservation means. Manager Number Three opened his eyes with difficulty and wanted to get up, but he realized that his entire body was burning and he could not get up at all. He could not even take out the Life Potion from the storage compartment. Lin Xuan was about to attack when he used another Flame Explosion to finish Manager Number Three. However, Black suddenly appeared and blocked in front of Manager Number Three. “Although I don’t like Number Three either, I won’t let you kill him so easily.” Black stood in front of Lin Xuan empty-handed with a calm expression. “Lord Black! Kill him! Take revenge for Sir Number Three!” “Kill Flame Explosion! Damn this Flame Explosion!” Below the city, Zhang Peng, Yang Wei, and Mo Yuan were furious, and their saliva flew everywhere. Just now, they had been silent and did not dare to rush up the city wall to help. Now, they all acted as if Manager Number Three was their father who had been severely injured by Flame Explosion. Black ignored the words of those people and did not look at Lin Xuan who was enveloped in a black cloak. Instead, he looked at the city wall. A short-haired woman in a white suit and white slim pants was standing there. “Mayor Ye, come and fight,” Black smiled and said. Ye Yuqiu suddenly stepped on the ground and arrived at the city wall. The Seventh Realm martial artist in White Crane Town was the mayor, Ye Yuqiu. Black kicked Manager Number Three down the city wall and let him smash him into Zhang Peng and the other two. “Give him two bottles of Life Potion. He can’t die yet.” Zhang Peng and the other two were very dumbfounded. Did this mean that he was supposed to die later? They were very dumbfounded, but they did not dare to say anything. They could only help Manager Number Three open his mouth and drink the Life Potion. Although the entire world had already been digitized and martial artists also had health, energy, and magic power, they were still not invincible. If one suffered a fatal attack, one’s body would still be damaged. For example, if one was blinded, one would suffer double the damage. After replenishing one’s health points, it would also take a long time for the eye to grow back. If one’s constitution was high, this period of time would be shortened. Manager Number Three was currently covered in high burns and was on the verge of death. Even if his health points were replenished, it was impossible for him to recover his combat strength instantly. He would have to rest in bed for at least a week or two to completely recover. Ye Yuqiu said, “Go to the other city walls. I’ll deal with this lackey of the Germinal Organization.” Black smiled faintly. “I’m only doing things for money. How did I become a lackey?” Lin Xuan cursed in his heart. These two people clearly knew each other’s identity, but they were still acting. They were really professional. At this moment, the sound of a helicopter rotor suddenly sounded from the north of White Crane Town. Then, a Black Eagle helicopter pierced through the night sky and appeared in everyone’s sight. Two figures jumped down when the helicopter was dozens of meters away from the ground. Bang bang! The two of them directly landed on the northern city wall of White Crane Town, almost smashing a huge pit in the city wall. Ye Yuqiu’s pupils suddenly constricted. The Germinal Organization’s support had finally arrived! Just as she had expected, the other party had kept this trump card hidden until she appeared. Now that she was left on the western city wall to fight Black, the other places in White Crane Town were no longer guarded. At this moment, there wasn’t anyone to defend against these two Seventh Realm martial artists! Only a Seventh Realm martial artist could defend against a Seventh Realm martial artist! Very few level nine Sixth Realm martial artists could directly face the terrifying strength of a level one Seventh Realm martial artist. There was a huge divide in between. “This is White Crane Town? It looks very ordinary.” “Let’s quickly finish our work.” Two figures jumped down from the city wall and directly shattered a house under the northern city wall. A family of three was originally taking refuge in a nearby house, but as soon as they walked out, they happened to encounter these two figures. The figure on the left bowed slightly and smiled. “Our sudden appearance has interrupted your rest. I’m really sorry.” The husband heaved a sigh of relief. It seemed that this outsider was still quite easy to talk to. He grabbed onto his wife and daughter’s hands tightly. “It’s fine, it’s fine. If there’s nothing else, we’ll go home…” Before they could finish speaking, the three of them were instantly beheaded by the flash of a blade, and their headless corpses sprayed out. The figure on the right also bowed slightly and smiled. “Seeing the three of you so happy and harmonious, as an unhappy person, I felt really jealous. Therefore, I couldn’t help but behead the three of you. I’m really sorry.” Lin Xuan watched from afar as the two of them smiled and apologized after killing those people, and his heart turned cold. Manager Number One laughed loudly. “The two big shots have come to support us. Without the obstruction of a Seventh Realm martial artist, taking down the White Crane Town will be a breeze!” Manager Number Two also laughed heartily, but his laughter was not so natural. “Good, good, good! White Crane Town is about to fall into the hands of the Germinal Organization!” Ye Yuqiu raised her eyebrows and immediately wanted to save the situation. Black stopped her. “With me around, you won’t be able to go anywhere!” Sword shadows flashed crazily. Ye Yuqiu and Black exchanged more than ten moves in a flash. The two of them fought from the top of the western city wall to the bottom of the western city wall. Ye Yuqiu was hit by the other party fiercely, instantly flying for more than ten meters and collapsing a house. She spat out a mouthful of blood in the air, and everyone could see it clearly. Black followed closely behind and was aggressive. Ye Yuqiu fell into a complete disadvantage and was already covered in injuries. Her white suit and pants were torn in many places and stained with blood. Lin Xuan clicked his tongue in wonder. The two of them were too good at acting. Even the Oscar-winning best actors did not even have the right to carry their shoes. Moreover, he also keenly observed that although Black seemed to be the one winning, they were actually slowly approaching the two Seventh Realm outsiders. “If it’s a two-on-one battle, winning would be too simple. As martial artists, it would not be honorable for us to do this.” “Brother, you’re right. Why don’t we treat everyone in White Crane Town as our enemies? In this way, we’ll have more than a thousand enemies.” “This is a good idea. This way, it will be very honorable.” The two of them chatted as they approached Ye Yuqiu. Chapter 66 Foolish Brother, We’ve Been Ambushed Under the moonlight, Ye Yuqiu finally saw the faces of these two people. They also had black hair, black eyes, and yellow skin, but for some reason, they felt strange. The two of them had cold and ruthless features, as if they were carved from the same mold. They were probably twins. Seventh Realm martial artists twins. This was quite rare. A code name quickly appeared in Ye Yuqiu’s mind. The Asura twins. The older brother called himself Blood Asura, and the younger brother called himself Hungry Asura. Two Seventh Realm martial artists from the High Heaven Plains organization. Their greatest characteristic was their killing nature. It was said that before joining the High Heaven Plains, the two of them had wandered in the wilderness, killing and snatching treasures everywhere. In the end, they were subdued by a Ninth Realm martial artist from the High Heaven Plains, and only then did they join the High Heaven Plains. It turned out that the headquarters behind the Germinal Organization was High Heaven Plains! “This lady is very beautiful. She’s in her twenties, the most beautiful age for women. However, I don’t like beautiful things. It makes me feel ugly,” Blood Asura said with a smile. “I have a different opinion from my brother. This lady’s left leg is very beautiful, her eyes are very beautiful, and her lips are very beautiful, but they don’t seem beautiful when placed on this body. Honorable lady, please allow me to take away your beautiful features. They don’t belong on your body.” Hungry Asura bowed slightly like a gentleman. Ye Yuqiu sneered. “Idiots.” Blood Asura and Hungry Asura covered their ears at the same time with frightened expressions. “Honorable lady, how can you say such a filthy word? It will dirty our ears.” “Honorable lady, it’s not my place to interfere with your filthy words. However, with all due respect, since your lips have said such things, in my opinion, they are no longer beautiful.” Ye Yuqiu’s expression did not change. The other party’s words were extremely respectful, but their actions were the most vicious. The Asura Twins were such people. “Then, this… Mr. Black, whose information we can’t see clearly… Can you move aside? We’re about to attack. The scene might be a little bloody. I hope it won’t dirty your eyes.” Blood Asura pulled out a long, thin, blood-red tachi from the storage compartment and bowed to Black Smile. Black took out a bottle of Red Star Erguotou and began to drink it. “Alright, I’m only here because someone’s paying me to do this.” With that said, he made room and sat aside to watch. Up to now, the battle had already completely become a battle between Seventh Realm martial artists. If the Seventh Realm martial artist from the Construction Division won, White Crane Town would be safe and sound. If the Germinal Organization’s Seventh Realm martial artist won, White Crane Town would be reduced to a fish on a chopping block. The Sixth Realm and Fifth Realm martial artists below were simply unable to determine the outcome of the battle. On the southern city wall, the battle between the Germinal Organization and the Construction Division martial artists was still ongoing. However, everyone knew that the true battle had nothing to do with them. In particular, after seeing that the Germinal Organization had a total of three Seventh Realm martial artists, despair immediately rose in their hearts. It was too difficult for one person to win against three. In this kind of atmosphere, the combat strength of the Construction Division martial artists began to decline. A Sixth Realm martial artist from the Construction Division accidentally revealed a flaw and was killed by a Sixth Realm Germinal Organization martial artist, becoming the first Sixth Realm martial artist to be killed in this battle. His death had become a breakthrough point. The Germinal martial artists marched straight in, and the Construction Division martial artists kept retreating. They had no choice but to give up the city gate and guard beside Ye Yuqiu like trapped beasts. Manager Number One and Manager Number Two broke through the city gate under the escort of the Germinal martial artists and entered White Crane Town. Seeing that there were three Seventh Realm martial artists on their side and only one severely injured Ye Yuqiu in White Crane Town, Manager Number One laughed loudly. “Looks like White Crane Town does not have any more trump cards. We won!” Manager Number One’s tactical thinking had always been very clear. He forced the other party to use up all their trump cards until they ended up with no more trump cards. If the other party’s final trump card was already used but their own trump card was not, then it would be their victory. Now, Ye Yuqiu was already covered in injuries and blood, but there were still no Seventh Realm martial artists who jumped out to help in White Crane Town. This meant that White Crane Town really only had one Seventh Realm martial artist. In that case, the outcome was decided! Lin Xuan somewhat understood Ye Yuqiu’s plan. Ye Yuqiu was the first to step forward and compete with Black, pretending to be defeated. After seeing that no one came out to save her even after Ye Yuqiu was injured to this extent, the enemy would definitely assume that there were no more Seventh Realm martial artists. This was why they were at ease and were bold enough to let the Asura Twins appear. Then, was there still a Seventh Realm martial artist in White Crane Town? If there were no more Seventh Realm experts, this outcome of this battle would indeed be irreversible. At this moment, he noticed an ordinary old man slowly walk over. He was clearly walking towards occupied, but it was as if no martial artist had noticed him, including the Asura Twins. Only two people present noticed the old man. One was Lin Xuan, and the other was Manager Number One. “It’s that old man from the security pavilion, but isn’t he at level nine Sixth Realm?” Lin Xuan was shocked. At this moment, Hungry Asura pulled out his tachi and stomped on the ground, rushing in front of Ye Yuqiu and slashing down. He had slashed at the other party’s thigh. He had said that Ye Yuqiu’s leg was very good, so he wanted to cut it off. However, Ye Yuqiu only had a faint sneer on her face. The tachi slashed down in a powerful arc. However, the scene of blood splashing and her limb breaking did not appear. Instead, an ear-piercing sound of metal colliding sounded! Clang! Hungry Asura’s hand trembled violently. The recoil from the previous attack made him unable to even hold his tachi steady. Hungry Asura raised his head and discovered that the person in front of him was no longer that beautiful woman. Instead, it was a big-nosed old man. This old man was bare-chested, revealing his robust muscles. The old man had directly blocked that attack just now. The strange thing was that the other party actually did not have any injuries at all. The old man smiled smugly. “Looks like I still have it in me!” He turned around and punched Hungry Asura in the chest. Bang! Hungry Asura was caught off guard and seemed to have been struck by a huge elephant. His entire body flew more than ten meters and smashed into a house before stopping Manager Number One’s expression suddenly changed. Those who could block a full-strength attack of a Seventh Realm martial artist and send a Seventh Realm martial artist flying were naturally Seventh Realm martial artists. Who was this old man? He couldn’t help but wonder why he hadn’t heard anything about this from his informant? Moreover, when Ye Yuqiu was beaten until her entire body was covered in injuries, the Asura twins had already relaxed and lowered their vigilance. The sudden appearance of this old man caught Asura Hungry off guard. The other party had clearly planned this! Where did their information come from?! Blood Asura’s expression changed slightly and he immediately wanted to help out. However, the next moment. Pfft. The thin dagger suddenly pierced through Blood Asura’s chest. If not for Blood Asura having experienced countless battles and instinctively dodging, the attack just now would have pierced through his heart. Blood Asura immediately endured the pain and activated his skill, quickly pulling away. It was none other than Black who attacked him. At this moment, Black had finished the bottle of Red Star Erguotou and mimicked their tone. He smiled and bowed. “Honorable Blood Asura, I’m sorry to make a move when you’re so excited. However, I still want to say that I hope you die as soon as possible. If that happens, I’ll be very happy.” Manager Number One’s eyes widened again. Was Black a traitor? Beside him, Manager Number Two cursed, “Black! You’re actually a traitor! To think that I’ve always treated you well!” Number One was just feeling slightly relieved before a thump sounded again. A knife suddenly pierced through Manager Number One’s chest. Manager Number Two had attacked with a red knife and Manager Number One’s health immediately fell to the bottom. He looked at Manager Number Two behind him in disbelief and collapsed. “You… are also a traitor!” Number Two shouted, “Hey! Black! As someone who’s so shady, you’re really something!” Black threw an empty bottle over and smashed it onto Manager Number Two’s head. “Then I’ll do even more shady things to you in the future.” Number Two: “…Pretend I didn’t say anything.” Blood Asura roared, “Brother, we’ve been ambushed!” They originally thought that this was an unrestricted killing that could let them satisfy their urge of killing. They did not expect it to be a premeditated ambush. Was the Germinal Organization’s branch filled with trash? They did not even know how many Seventh Realm martial artists there were in White Crane Town! Even the people at the highest level were traitors! They originally thought that it would be a three-on-one battle, but it suddenly became a two-on-three battle. Moreover, they had been sneak attacked and had directly lost half his health. How were they supposed to fight? “I know…” A helpless voice sounded from the ruins of the house. Then, Hungry Asura crawled out. There was a deep dent in his chest. The old man’s attack directly injured him. He did not expect that an ordinary-looking person could actually unleash such strength. Chapter 67 Reed Country, Ghost Buddha Lamp Ye Yuqiu took out a bottle of Big Life Potion from the storage compartment and drank it in one go, recovering from many injuries. Her battle with Black was only for show. She seemed to be covered in injuries, but they were actually superficial injuries. “Attack! Capture the Asura Twins alive!” Ye Yuqiu shouted. Ye Yuqiu rushed towards Hungry Asura, and the black and big-nosed old man rushed towards Blood Asura. Clang! Clang! Clang! Continuous sounds of metal colliding sounded in the air. Lin Xuan watched their battle from afar and clicked his tongue in wonder. The thing that surprised him the most was the big-nosed old man. Wasn’t this person a level nine Sixth Realm martial artist? Why did he suddenly seem to be rejuvenated, as if he had become young again? He was actually able to send a Seventh Realm martial artist flying with a punch. Lin Xuan cast an Observer skill over and noticed that the other party was still at level nine Sixth Realm. Ye Yuqiu’s combat style was also very novel. Her left hand was covered in frost, and her right hand was covered in a long sword. She looked a little like a mage-warrior in some games before he transmigrated. <b>some</b>  Frost was used to reduce speed, and the sword was used as the main attack method. Clearly, Hungry Asura had never encountered such an attack before. Coupled with the fact that his health points were low, he was immediately caught off guard and was unable to resist. Frost covered many parts of his body, and his speed had been reduced to an extremely low level. Blood Asura’s side was even worse. He was surrounded by the two enemies, and even his weapon had been struck to the ground. He could only cross his arms in front of him and retreat as he fought. After parrying more than ten moves in a row, his arms were already covered in blood and flesh, and white bones could be seen. “My dear brother, I can’t beat him. I can only run!” Hungry Asura’s saber barely brushed away Ye Yuqiu’s sword as he roared. “My dear brother, I know!” Blood Asura vomited blood from the beating and quickly moved towards Hungry Asura. Hungry Asura immediately took out a blue lamp from the storage compartment and suddenly shattered it. A blue fire suddenly enveloped them. The flames were cold, as if they came from the Nine Nether Abyss. Ye Yuqiu’s sword slashed forward, but it was as if it had struck an incomparably firm rock and was unable to injure Hungry Asura within. “I didn’t expect you guys to also have the Ghost Buddha Lamp.” Ye Yuqiu frowned slightly. The Ghost Buddha Lamp was a prop produced by the huge mystic realm “Reed Country” controlled by the High Heaven Plains. By crushing the Ghost Buddha Lamp, it could form a Ghost Buddha Fire that enveloped the user. Those who were enveloped by the Ghost Buddha Fire were unable to be harmed, and they were also unable to attack the people outside the Ghost Buddha Fire. Three seconds later, the Ghost Buddha Fire would disappear, and even the people wrapped in the Ghost Buddha Fire would be sent to the “Reed Country”. However, the Ghost Buddha Fire also had its shortcomings. A large amount of essence would be deducted every time it was used. Moreover, the more times it was used, the more essence would be deducted. Because after reaching the Seventh Realm, one had to use essence to advance, so deducting essence would very likely cause one’s cultivation to drop a level. Losing a level also meant that the free attribute points one had obtained previously would be deducted, and one’s strength would decrease greatly. It would take several years for one to recover. The Construction Division had dealt with all the large organizations in the world today, and this naturally included High Heaven Plains. They were deeply impressed by the shamelessness of the Ghost Buddha Lamp. Several times, when a Seventh Realm martial artist from the Construction Division was about to kill the other party, the other party would use the Ghost Buddha Lamp to escape. Moreover, the advantage of the Ghost Buddha Lamp was that it was useless even if an enemy obtained it. This was because they would still only be transmitted to the “Reed Country”. Manager Number One was still alive at this moment. He forced himself to roar, “Lord Asura… take me with you!” Blood Asura shook his head. “I’m really sorry. You’re just a small pawn. We’re Seventh Realm martial artists and high-level combat strength that the organization can’t lose. For our safety, we have no choice but to sacrifice your life.” Manager Number One had a dejected expression. Hungry Asura licked his lips and said to Ye Yuqiu, “Beautiful lady, the next time we meet, I’ll definitely personally cut off your beautiful long leg and treat it as my precious…” Boom! A fireball suddenly smashed over. This attack naturally did not have any effect. After all, Lin Xuan had never seen the Ghost Buddha Lamp before and could not help but try. Hungry Asura: “…Sir, how can you interrupt me when I’m talking excitedly? Can you tell me your name? The next time we meet, I’ll personally send you off.” Lin Xuan jumped down from the city wall and said indifferently, “My name is Zhao Zilong of Chang Mountain!” Hungry Asura said, “What a strange name… Mr. Chang Zilong, I’ll remember your name. Remember to save your life. Wait for me to name it.” Buzz. The Ghost Buddha Fire suddenly disappeared like water vapor, and the Asura twins were also teleported away. Since the Seventh Realm martial artists had all escaped, the remaining Germinal martial artists were naturally not Ye Yuqiu and Black’s match. They either surrendered or escaped, scattering like birds and beasts. Manager Number Three was originally slowly recovering from his injuries. When he saw this scene, he was so furious that he vomited blood and fainted again. Manager Number One was originally only left with a bit of health. He hoped that the Asura twins would bring him along, but he was directly abandoned. He had always worked hard for the Germinal Organization and racked his brains, but in the end, he was abandoned like this. He was so furious that he fainted. Thump. The old man seemed to have instantly lost all his energy and also fell to the ground. Ye Yuqiu stepped forward and carried him with difficulty. “Uncle…” The old man forced a smile. “Little Qiu, don’t be sad. I’ve lived long enough in this life. As long as I die for the Construction Division, my death will be a worthy death.” “After I die, bury me in White Crane Town. I was born here, grew up here, and died here. It was worth it.” The old man forced himself to finish speaking and closed his eyes peacefully. Seeing this, Lin Xuan was also silent. Indeed, there was only one Seventh Realm martial artist in White Crane Town. The big-nosed old man was a level nine Sixth Realm martial artist. However, just now, he had suddenly become stronger, even to the extent that his physical body was capable of blocking Hungry Asura’s saber and sent the other party flying with a punch. It should be because his body had been stimulated by something Lin Xuan did not know what that stimulation was, but he knew it was definitely something good. After all, High Heaven Plains had only controlled a “Reed Country” and they were already able to obtain something as good as the Ghost Buddha Lamp. Since the Construction Division controlled two large mystic realms, there would definitely be something as good as the Ghost Buddha Lamp. He guessed that this item was an item that could increase one’s strength for a short period of time but had extremely powerful side effects. It was probably also something the Construction Division obtained from one of the large mystic realms. … A day later, the martial artists of the Construction Division arrived in East Lake City. Black attacked and shattered the collars on the necks of all the wasteland reclaimers. The wasteland reclaimers were moved to tears and volunteered to join the Construction Division. Then, Black and Ye Yuqiu brought all six mystic realm doors of lights that were under the Germinal Organization’s control back to White Crane Town. Zhang Peng, Mo Yuan, Yang Wei, and the others had already felt that something was wrong last night. Especially after seeing the Asura Twins escape, the three of them also ran away immediately. This was especially true for Yang Wei. He knew very well that when he oppressed the wasteland reclaimers back then, it had indirectly led to the deaths of many wasteland reclaimers in the mystic realm. If he was caught by the Construction Division, they would definitely settle this score with him. Thus, he could only run. SCOT After thinking about it, they could only run towards Chang Le City in the south. That side was occupied by two small organizations, and the Construction Division could not do anything to them. If the three of them, Sixth Realm martial artists, went there, they would be able to occupy an area for themselves and reign over it. Under Lu Luo’s persuasion, Wen Xiong joined the Construction Division. Manager Number One and Manager Number Three were the main culprits in suppressing the wasteland reclaimers. They were tried by the Construction Division and were executed at the same time. All the martial artists applauded. Manager Number Two was actually Silver Fox, and Black and Lu Luo were all spies sent by the Construction Division to the Germinal Organization. They had all contributed greatly. Lastly, Shield Ghost also contributed greatly. Shield Ghost had joined the Construction Division and become an intern the night before the Germinal Organization was about to attack White Crane Town. He had brought crucial information that allowed Ye Yuqiu to come up with a plan. Moreover, he also guarded the two city walls of the east and west with his friends, Flame Explosion. This had ruined Manager Number One’s strategic intentions. All the rewards were distributed according to the Construction Division’s standards and the battle merits were also recorded. However, throughout all of this, Lin Xuan had never revealed his exact identity. In the eyes of outsiders, Lin Xuan, Shield Ghost, and Flame Explosion were ultimately three different people. “The traitor hidden in White Crane Town has not been dug out. There’s no need to expose my identity.” On the surface, Lin Xuan was still an ordinary level nine Second Realm martial artist. After taking off the wasteland reclaimer’s collar, he was even more relaxed. Chapter 68 Teacher Black’s Lesson Begins In a house in White Crane Town. “Shield Ghost, this will be your house in the future.” Lu Luo arrived with Lin Xuan, who was dressed in full armor. Lin Xuan looked around and felt that it was not bad. There were three rooms and a hall. There was a master bedroom, a second bedroom, and a third room that served as a gym. There were barbells and other gym equipment. In addition, he had a bath, a squatting toilet, and water and electricity. It was completely different from the cramped single dormitory of the Germinal Organization. “Not bad. I like it very much.” Lin Xuan’s deliberately hoarse voice sounded from the black armor. Lu Luo hesitated for a moment. “…By the way, do you really want to live here with Lin Xuan and Flame Explosion?” Lin Xuan said, “What’s wrong with that? I’m friends with them. Good friends should know how to share.” Lu Luo said, “For three men to live together like this, isn’t it a little… Forget it. Since you’re willing, I won’t say anything. I’ll be staying beside you. If you have any problems that you can’t resolve, you can look for me.” She pointed at the house beside her. Lin Xuan nodded slightly. Lu Luo handed the five golden runes over. “Here are the five peerless golden runes you need. I found them all according to your request. It took me a lot of effort.” She could not help but show a hint of envy. She would have to save up for a long time to obtain so many peerless golden runes. Lin Xuan received the five runes and nodded slightly Among the five runes, two were the “Lightning Shattering the Darkness” runes, two were the “One with the Sword” runes, and the last rune was the single rune “Magic Power” that increased one’s magic power. Inlaid in the glove, it could directly increase the upper limit of one’s magic power by 20%. In this way, Lin Xuan also had the complete set of runes for One with the Sword and Lightning Shattering the Darkness. “Also, this is the battle credit card of our Construction Division. This is yours and this is Flame Explosion’s. You delivered the information and defended the east wall. You obtained a total of 1,000 military merits. Flame Explosion defended the western wall and obtained 500.” Lu Luo handed over two red cards. Lin Xuan swept his gaze over and discovered this card was also a special equipment and was similar to wasteland reclaimers’ collars. Aside from being a savings card, it did not have any other special effects. “Don’t monopolize the battle merits of Flame Explosion!” Lu Luo warned. Lin Xuan shook his head. “I’m good friends with Flame Explosion! Why would you even question me?” “By the way, how many battle merits do you need to enter the huge mystic realm controlled by the Construction Division?” Lu Luo stretched out a finger. “300 per time. For each time you enter, you can stay for three days.” Lin Xuan rubbed his chin. “That’s a little much.” “There are many sources of battle merits. Other than battle merits in large-scale battles, one can also obtain battle merits by selling various high grade items to the Construction Division.” “Or perhaps you can go to the wilderness to clean up the demon beasts to obtain battle merits,” Lu Luo said casually. “However, the battle merits obtained from killing the demon beasts are relatively small.” Lin Xuan’s eyes lit up. “Then what if the demon beasts attack White Crane Town and I kill them?” If he could lure the demon beasts to attack White Crane Town and kill them before the demon beasts arrived, wouldn’t that be considered a huge contribution? Lu Luo sized him up. “Don’t even think about such a dangerous thing.” Lin Xuan coughed lightly. “One last question. Where is Black? I want to ask him about professions.” “I’m at your house,” a calm voice and a gulp sounded. Lin Xuan turned around and saw a figure in black sitting on the sofa. The figure was holding a bottle of Maotai and was drinking it. “How did you get in?” Lin Xuan was puzzled. Black pointed to the second floor. “Through the window.” Lin Xuan: “…How much do you know about professions?” Black smiled. “I know almost everything you want to know.” Lu Luo waved her hand. “Then you guys chat. Many of the Germinal Organization’s martial artists have surrendered, but I still have a lot to deal with.” Immediately, only Lin Xuan and Black were in the house. “Then please tell me. I’m all ears.” Lin Xuan sat down opposite him. Black took a big gulp and said readily, “After a Sixth Realm martial artist becomes a Seventh Realm martial artist, they will have to face the problem of choosing a profession.” “Professions are divided into four main categories according to the four-dimensional attributes: Constitution, Strength, Spirit, Agility.” “Professions are divided into low-level professions, intermediate professions, and high-level professions. They correspond to Seventh Realm martial artists, Eighth Realm martial artists, and Ninth Realm martial artists. Every time you advance, you will obtain a profession skill. Because it’s a profession skill, the essence consumed to level up is only half of the other skills.” Black continued, “There are four basic professions that correspond to four attributes. They are the armored warrior, warrior, mage, and assassin.” Lin Xuan was deep in thought. “Then does that mean that there are also non-basic professions?” Black snapped his fingers. “Of course, for example, the Asura Twins who were chased away by us last night. According to what we know, the two of them are both killers. Although we can’t see all the information, we roughly estimate that they should also have precious purple professions. Otherwise, it’s impossible for High Heaven Plains to let them carry precious items like the Ghost Buddha Lamp.” Lin Xuan raised his eyebrows. “I understand. Professions are also divided into ordinary white, uncommon green, rare blue, precious purple, and peerless golden.” “But you still haven’t told me how you got your profession.” Lin Xuan was even more curious. Since professions were also divided into grades, how could he obtain the highest grade professions? If he could only obtain an ordinary white profession, wouldn’t his powerful attributes be in vain? “All the demon beasts in the Sixth Realm mystic realm might drop basic-level profession scrolls, but the probability is very low. Moreover, the higher the grade, the lower the drop rate. The Construction Division has experimented with this before. The drop rate of an ordinary white profession scroll is 1%, and the drop rate of a green rare profession is 1 in 1,000. As for higher-level profession scrolls, none of them were dropped in the experiments, so it’s impossible to know the approximate drop rate.” “In addition, the profession scrolls that were dropped are completely random and have nothing to do with the mystic realm itself. To put it more clearly, for example, the profession scrolls that are dropped in the Poison Miasma Cave might not be related to poison. Instead, all kinds of profession scrolls could be dropped there.” Black smiled. Lin Xuan immediately heaved a sigh of relief. So that’s how it was. It turned out that even Sixth Realm mystic realm demon beasts could drop profession scrolls. He was so worried that he thought he would have to go out and take a risk again. Black was puzzled. “You seem to have relaxed a lot.” Lin Xuan nodded. “Since you’ve cleared my doubts, I’ve naturally become more relaxed.” Black burped. “Then I’ll go. Also, I’ll take Zhou Feng away too.” He suddenly disappeared. When he appeared again, he picked up a young man from the second floor. This was Manager Number Two, no, Silver Fox’s son, Zhou Feng. Black grabbed Zhou Feng’s collar with one hand and lifted him into the air. However, Zhou Feng was not unhappy at all. Instead, he danced with joy. “Idol! Long time no see! In order to become stronger, I’ve been training seriously recently!” Lin Xuan: “…How did you get in?” “Through the window.” “Damn, learn from the best, right?” Just now, Lin Xuan had been too focused on listening to Black explain the professions and had not paid much attention to the surrounding situation. This brat Zhou Feng had probably crawled in at that moment. “You have to be rational when chasing your idol. What if Shield Ghost is bathing naked the next time you crawl in?” Black said calmly. Zhou Feng’s eyes lit up. “Hmm… Something that good could happen to me?” Black: “… Looks like I have to let your father teach you a lesson.” Lin Xuan: “…Go, go. Hurry up and throw this guy out.” After sending these two off, Lin Xuan heaved a sigh of relief. It was finally quiet. After shaking off the Germinal Organization, he became an intern in the Construction Division and began his new life! “The first step was for him to get a peerless golden profession and grind the Miasma Poison Cave!” Lin Xuan’s eyes flashed. Chapter 69 Sign Here As soon as dawn arrived, Lin Xuan walked out of his house in Shield Ghost’s black armor. On the way, he encountered a group of ordinary people who had solemn expressions. The person with the highest cultivation here was only a Second Realm martial artist. They were all ordinary residents. They were all silent. Wearing black clothes, they walked in a direction with a flower in each of their hands. Although the flowers in their hands were different and were only wild flowers they had picked on the way, their emotions were similar. Lin Xuan pondered for a moment and also picked a wild flower to follow. The funeral was not only for the old man, but also every martial artist and ordinary person who had died in the battle last night. The entire process was very solemn, and no one spoke. The whole thing began and ended in silence. The old man’s grave was nothing special. It was placed beside everyone. Lin Xuan swept his gaze over. All he saw were unfamiliar names. After the funeral ended, a person stopped him. “I thought you wouldn’t come.” Ye Yuqiu was a little surprised. “You just joined the Construction Division and don’t have much of a relationship with Uncle.” Lin Xuan’s hoarse voice sounded from the black armor. “People who die for their beliefs are worthy of everyone’s respect.” With that said, Lin Xuan turned around and left. Ye Yuqiu clearly did not expect Shield Ghost to respond like this. She watched as Lin Xuanyuan left and chuckled. “Uncle said that you’re not a bad person and are worth nurturing. Now, it looks like he was right.” With his previous experience of entering the Poison Miasma Cave, Lin Xuan was relatively familiar with the path this time. Soon, he arrived at the sixth floor. “The Poison Miasma Cave does not produce minerals. It’s a pity. I still need to leave one avatar in the Inferior Demon Mountain. I’ll leave the other six training avatars in the Poison Miasma Cave.” Lin Xuan replaced his avatar slots and successfully placed his six training avatars here. After doing this, he walked to the sixth floor of the Miasma Poison Cave’s safety station. The safety station in the Poison Miasma Cave was very different from the safety station built by the Germinal Organization. However, its functions were similar and had runes installed to disperse the demon beasts. The runes used would only be dropped in large mystic realms and could not be embedded in equipment. They were special runes that could disperse demon beasts in a certain range as long as they were placed. This made the demon beasts instinctively feel fear and not dare to approach. However, it could only be effective in the mystic realm. It would not be effective in the outside world. Moreover, it could not be moved after being placed. If it was dug out again, it would shatter. Lin Xuan walked into the safety station and casually found a corner to sit down. The staff in the safety station all looked at him in surprise. “Isn’t that Shield Ghost? The one who made a huge contribution last night!” “I also heard that when he was in East Lake City, he was not afraid of the Germinal Organization’s threats and promises. No matter what, he refused to join the Germinal Organization. Later, he was developed by the Silver Fox and became an intern in our Construction Division.” “Then, he delivered us crucial information. That was why we weren’t helpless when the High Heaven Plains Asura Twins suddenly arrived.” “In my opinion, passing the information is nothing. Him and Flame Explosion guarding the two walls was the most impressive feat!” “I, I, I, I’m Flame Explosion’s fangirl! I want to have children with Brother Flame Explosion!” “I also like Flame Explosion. He’s simply too cool and even casually unleashes large fireballs! Why don’t we go and ask if there’s any way to contact him?”. In the night, the names of Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion had already spread widely in White Crane Town. This was especially true for Flame Explosion, who casually threw out large fireballs and didn’t care about fame. They were more popular among fangirls. Lin Xuan was dozing off when a voice suddenly sounded from the side. Then, several logisticians surrounded him. “Mr. Shield Ghost, this is a bowl of beef ramen for you free!” The round-faced little sister in the lead blushed and was very shy. Lin Xuan shuddered. Damn, why were there so many people surrounding him? Fortunately, his Overlord Set had covered him in armor and his face was also covered. Otherwise, he would have lost his composure. “What’s the matter?” Lin Xuan said with a hoarse voice. The round-faced little sister said shyly, “Mr. Shield Ghost, I heard about the matter of you and your friend each guarding the city walls alone. I’m very impressed with you.” “So… can you get your friend, Flame Explosion, to give me an autograph?” She pulled out her pink shoulder strap. “Can you ask him to sign it here?” Lin Xuan :”…” What the hell was this? Why did the other party not ask for his autograph and asked for Flame Explosion’s autograph instead? “Mr. Shield Ghost, please help me tell Flame Explosion! I like him! I like him very, very much!” “Mr. Shield Ghost, you and Flame Explosion are very good friends, right? Help me pass this to him. This will be our love token in the future!” “Mr. Shield Ghost…” After the round-faced little sister, the few logisticians also pounced over excitedly. They directly threw their gifts, including a pink card and a heart-shaped pendant, into Lin Xuan’s arms. Lin Xuan :”…” He was at a loss of words. “How dare you guys assume his gender?” Lin Xuan said solemnly. The round-faced little sister’s expression froze. The other women also froze. <b>Wome</b>  e. “He’s a girl? Then I’m even more excited!” the round-faced little sister suddenly shouted, and the redness on her face directly soared to her ears and neck. Lin Xuan :”…” He stood up directly and turned to leave. Lin Xuan suddenly realized that he couldn’t stay at the safety station anymore. He decided that it was better for him to find a cave in the Miasma Poison Cave to lie in. Ten hours later, in a cave on the sixth floor of the Miasma Poison Cave, he stretched lazily and stood up. (Current Area: Sixth floor of the Poison Miasma Cave (4600 general coin per minute, 23,000 experience points per minute)] (The Poison Miasma Python has been training for 10 hours and has reached the upper limit of its training time. Obtained 27.6 million general coins, 13.8 million experience points, 14 Sixth Realm skill books, 19 Sixth Realm equipment, 11 Sixth Realm runes, 3 Poison Miasma Fruits, and 2 Deep Rock Crystals. Do you wish to collect?] The Poison Miasma Fruit and the Deep Rock Crystal were the attribute items dropped in the Poison Miasma Cave. Their effects were+1% poison resistance and+1 Constitution. These two attribute items would only be dropped in the Poison Miasma Cave. Because this Deep Rock Crystal could directly increase one’s constitution, Lin Xuan felt that the Poison Miasma Cave was not too bad. However, in comparison, the mystic realms controlled by the Germinal Organization were very fertile. For example, the items produced in the Zero Realm Giant Rock Cave could increase every single attribute. Another example was the First Realm mystic realm Demon Ant Nest. There were more than twenty attribute items that could be dropped there, and there were also more than twenty mystic realm king caves. Another example was the Fourth Realm mystic realm Blazing Fire Plains. It could drop Original Fruits that could supplement one’s initial attributes! If the mystic realms were described to be mines, then the Giant Rock Cave, the Demon Ant Nest, and the Blazing Fire Plains were considered rich ore mines. As for the Poison Miasma Cave, it was considered a poor mine. Lin Xuan could not help but sigh. The Germinal Organization’s luck back then was really too good. The mystic realms they obtained were almost all very fertile. If they continued to develop for another seven to eight years, their strength would definitely be enough to take over White Crane Town in one go. Of course, they would only be able to take over White Crane Town. The Germinal Organization was still too small compared to the entire Construction Division. (The Giant Rock Turtle has been training for 10 hours and has reached the upper limit of its training time. Obtained 27.6 million general coins, 13.8 million experience points, 15 Sixth Realm skill books, 16 Sixth Realm equipment, 7 Sixth Realm runes, 1 Poison Miasma Fruit, 1 Deep Rock Crystal, and 1 profession scroll. Do you wish to collect?] Lin Xuan was very happy. It was good to have training avatars! He had gotten a profession scroll despite the poor chances. After all, he only had a one in ten thousand chance of obtaining one! He wanted to see what grade the profession scroll was. Chapter 70 My Synthesis Platform Can Synthesize a profession scroll! Lin Xuan immediately took out the profession scroll from his consciousness space. … Name: Gunner Grade: Uncommon Green Profession Skill: High Grade Weapon Proficiency Profession Skill Effect: Damage caused by high-caliber weapons+15%. Lin Xuan shook his head. This was only an uncommon green profession scroll. Moreover it was a “gunner” profession scroll. It was very unsuitable for him and he directly gave up. He continued to observe the gains of the other four training avatars. Among the other four training avatars, he obtained three more profession scrolls. Among them, two were armored warriors and mages. They were two of the four most ordinary professions Black had mentioned. The third profession scroll was “ballista”. Name: Ballista Grade: Uncommon Green Profession Skill: Bomb Weapon Proficiency Profession Skill Effect :+15% Damage caused by bomb weapons. Lin Xuan shook his head again. Trash. Trash. He had no use for it at all. However, at this moment, he suddenly noticed a notification sound in his consciousness space. He immediately immersed his mind into his consciousness space and quickly saw a line of synthesis formulas appear on the synthesis table. Weapon Master = Gunner+Ballista+Rifleman+Sniper+Maintena nce The words “Weapon Master” were actually glowing with a purple light, indicating that this was a precious purple profession! Lin Xuan said in surprise, “A synthesis table can even synthesize a profession scroll? How awesome!” According to the information Black had told him, the others could only rely on themselves to obtain the profession scrolls. However, the type and grade of the profession scrolls were up to fate. Sometimes, there was still hope, but sometimes, there was no hope. He had never heard that one could synthesize a high grade occupation with a large number of low grade professions . “However, weapon master doesn’t seem to be compatible with me. I’ll continue to hack. It’s best if I can trigger more synthesis lists. Let me see what class I can synthesize.” “If I want to directly obtain a peerless golden profession scroll, I’m afraid it will take me at least four to five years to obtain one with my six training avatars, right? With this synthesis list, it’ll be much better.” “My guess is that as long as I satisfy two of the professions contained in the synthesis formula, a complete synthesis formula will immediately appear.” Lin Xuan heaved a sigh of relief. In this way, his goal was no longer distant. He decided to take it slow. He would eventually be able to create a peerless golden profession. At the same time, on an island in the eastern sea of Asia. The entire island was connected to each other like a centipede. Before the demon disaster occurred, the entire island belonged to the border country. However, after the demon disaster, most of the countries in the world had disappeared. In their place were loose organizations. The organization that ruled this island was the “High Heaven Plains”. In the entire world, High Heaven Plains was also one of the strongest organizations. It was for no other reason than the fact that it controlled a huge mystic realm, the “Reed Country”! At this moment, at the High Heaven Plains headquarters. After the Asura Twins were teleported back to the famous Reed Country, they were immediately brought out of the mystic realm and helped to the hospital bed in the headquarters. The two of them were in an extremely poor state. Hungry Asura’s chest sank greatly, and he estimated that three of his ribs had broken, almost injuring his heart. The flesh on Blood Asura’s arms was all mashed up and white bones could be seen in many places. Moreover, after using the Ghost Buddha Lamp to escape, their cultivation directly decreased, falling from the previous level four Seventh Realm to level three Seventh Realm. Two logisticians who were proficient in medical skills treated their injuries. They quickly recovered from their injuries, and their health points were quickly filled. However, they still needed to be bedridden for at least a month to recover to their peak state. Hua. A dignified middle-aged man pushed open the door and entered. He had a square face and a short beard. He had a robust figure and was wearing a trench coat. He looked majestic without being angry. The Asura twins immediately struggled to get out of bed when they saw him. The middle-aged man stopped them. “Just lie down. Tell me what happened to the Germinal Organization.” The older brother, Blood Asura, had an ashamed expression. “Honorable leader, the Construction Division of White Crane Town seems to know about our arrival. They had hidden trump cards and were waiting for us to attack. Moreover, the Seventh Realm martial artist on the Germinal Organization’s side turned out to be a traitor. He counterattacked at the critical moment and severely injured me.” “However, there’s something that I’m very curious about. The martial artist who defeated Brother seems to be only at level nine Sixth Realm, but the strength he displayed at that moment reached the Seventh Realm…” The middle-aged man interrupted him. “That’s because of something the Construction Division obtained in the large mystic realm, the Kunlun Ruins. It’s called the Jade Blood Pill Heart. It can increase one’s strength greatly in a short period of time. The side effect is that it burns one’s lifespan. We only found out about this recently. I don’t blame you.” Only then did Blood Asura nod. The younger brother, Asura Hungry, added, “Before this, we had communicated with Manager Number One there in advance. We were supposed to take action as soon as they broke through any of the city walls of White Crane Town and fished out the Seventh Realm martial artists of White Crane Town. Who knew that the east and west city walls would actually be defended for a long time when each wall only had one person guarding it? We had no choice but to forcefully land on the north wall and attack forcefully.” The middle-aged man frowned. “One person blocking the attack of the Germinal martial artists alone?” Blood Asura nodded. “That’s right. We saw it from afar. There were at least three Sixth Realm martial artists and more than a hundred martial artists of various levels attacking the east and west city walls, but they were all stopped.” “One of them was wearing heavy armor and knows how to use the Ice Spear Technique. The other one uses fire magic.” The middle-aged man nodded. “I understand. Take care of your injuries. After you recover, go to the Reed Country to continue training. This was not your fault.” “Yes! Thank you for your nurturing, Sir Leader!” The two brothers nodded heavily. The middle-aged man walked out of the ward and waved his hand. Immediately, someone leaned over. “Leader, what can I do for you?” The middle-aged man pondered for a moment and said, “Pass the news to the spies we planted in White Crane Town. Find out who the traitor is, who leaked the information, and who defended the two walls of the east and west. I want to know their strength, their potential, and if they joined the Construction Division” “Understood!” That person nodded and quickly left. The middle-aged man had a cold expression. “No matter who it is, they must be killed for messing with the plan of my High Heaven Plains!” A few days later, in White Crane Town. It was another ordinary day. During this period of time, Lin Xuan had already obtained many profession scrolls through his training avatars. There were even hundreds of ordinary white profession scrolls. There were also nearly a hundred uncommon green profession scrolls. There were only five rare blue profession scrolls. As for the precious purple and peerless golden grade profession scrolls, he was unable to obtain them. “I can’t even get one even with so many training avatars working at once. The drop rate is too low. If this is a game, won’t the players curse at the lousy game producer repeatedly?” Lin Xuan could not help but curl his lips. However, over the past few days, he had also seen the synthesis formula of the peerless golden profession scroll on the synthesis table. Swordmaster = Warrior+Swordsman+Slayer+Luck Man “Swordmaster, that sounds awesome!” Lin Xuan clicked his tongue in wonder. Chapter 71 Poison Miasma Cave Dropped Loot Lin Xuan carefully looked at the swordmaster’s professional skills. “Specializes in sword weapons. When using a sword weapon, attack speed+30%, damage+30%.” Lin Xuan immediately recalled the ‘One with the Sword’ rune he had obtained. After embedding the one with the Sword rune set, the sword weapon could ignore 15% of physical resistance each time. It also had a chance to ignore 100% physical resistance. The faster the attack speed, the stronger the damage. The One with the Sword rune set and the swordmaster profession were simply too compatible. “However, although swordmaster is very powerful, it’s still not compatible with me. This can be used as my backup profession. If I can’t get someone something more suitable, I’ll choose swordmaster.” Lin Xuan frowned and pondered for a moment. He still decided to wait. In any case, at this moment, there wasn’t any danger in White Crane Town, and he had plenty of time to grind profession scrolls. At this moment, Silver Fox was delighted. He had been a spy in the Germinal Organization for so long. Now he could finally come to the Poison Miasma Cave to increase his strength. His level had not increased since he joined the Germinal Organization. He had always been at level nine Sixth Realm, and his experience points were not full yet. Silver Fox did not regret it. Although his cultivation has been delayed for a few years, it was worth it. If he had not been a spy, the Germinal Organization’s development would have been unbelievably fast. It would also be impossible for information to be passed to the Construction Division. “By the way, with your contributions over the years, after the headquarters approves, they should be able to reward you with a purple profession scroll. Why did you refuse?” Black stood beside him and drank a mouthful of beer before tilting his head and asking. Silver Fox smiled. “I’m different from you. Other than your advancement from the Sixth Realm to the Seventh Realm, every single one of your advancements have been perfect. But I’ve only advanced perfectly twice. My attributes are already far inferior.” “Why waste such a precious purple profession scroll on me? It should be rewarded to young people with even greater futures.” With that said, he whispered, “Actually, I quite want to transfer my credit to Shield Ghost or Flame Explosion. The two of them are the true genius martial artists. They need these profession scrolls more than me.” The black spot nodded. “So, you plan to enter the mystic realm to grind the scrolls yourself?” Silver Fox nodded. “My goal is not high. A rare blue profession scroll will do. Of course, it has to be related to Spirit. After all, my highest attribute is Spirit.” “You too?” he asked casually Black laughed. “I’m worried that you might die in the Miasma Poison Cave. After all, it would be a waste to lose a level nine Sixth Realm expert like you.” Silver Fox could not help but laugh. Usually, after hearing Black’s sharp tongue, he would be angry. However, he was not angry when he heard this. as The two of them entered the Poison Miasma Cave and headed downwards. Soon, they arrived at the seventh floor. “Why are there so few demon beasts?” Silver Fox was very surprised. There were not many Sixth Realm martial artists in White Crane Town. Including him, there should not be more than twenty. Even if twenty Sixth Realm martial artists entered the Miasma Poison Cave at the same time and trained day and night, it was also impossible for them to kill until the number of demon beasts decreased like a cliff, right? “It’s indeed a little strange. There are at least 100,000 demon beasts in the Poison Miasma Cave. Logically speaking, we should be able to encounter one or two demon beasts after walking for more than ten steps. What’s going on?” Black also frowned. The two of them had only taken a few steps when they suddenly saw a level eight Sixth Realm Giant Rock Turtle chasing and killing other demon beasts. Ahwooh… It then bit off a large piece of flesh. The demon beast that was killed by the Giant Rock Turtle was at level seven Sixth Realm. However, for some reason, it was actually so ridiculously weak despite being only one level lower. V Seeing Black and Silver Fox, the Giant Rock Turtle turned around and ran, disappearing in the blink of an eye. There were many dark narrow pathways in the Poison Miasma Cave that martial artists were simply unable to pass through. Even if Black was a Seventh Realm martial artist, he could only watch as the Giant Rock Turtle escaped. “Damn? Am I seeing things? Why would a level eight Sixth Realm demon beast appear on the seventh floor?” Silver Fox was very dumbfounded. This was the seventh floor of the Miasma Poison Cave. Unless a huge demon beast riot occurred, it was impossible for demon beasts of other levels to appear. Black scratched his head. “Could it be a sign of a demon beast riot?” The two of them continued forward and killed the demon beasts. However, there were too few demon beasts. As a result, they had only killed 13 demon beasts after entering the Poison Miasma Cave for two hours. Forget about the rare blue profession scrolls, they could not even obtain ordinary white profession scrolls. Silver Fox: “…Could it be that I have a special physique and the demon beasts sensed my arrival and ran away?” Black took out a mirror. “Look at yourself. Do you really think someone like you would have a special physique?” Silver Fox :”…” … In a certain cave in the Poison Miasma Cave, Lin Xuan was lying down leisurely. When he had nothing to do, he would look at the point of view of all his training avatars. It was as if he had also turned into a demon beast that was traveling around the Poison Miasma Cave. From the perspective of these training avatars, he could almost see all the martial artists training in the Poison Miasma Cave. Then, he saw Black and Silver Fox from the Giant Rock Turtle’s point of view and heard a portion of their conversation. Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. When he took control of the Giant Rock Turtle previously, the Giant Rock Turtle was still only at level six Sixth Realm. The reason why it became level eight Sixth Realm was naturally because it had advanced. Demon beasts did not need so many experience points to advance like human martial artists. “My training avatars are too hardworking. The reproduction rate of the Poison Miasma Cave demon beasts can no longer keep up with the death rate…” Lin Xuan did not know whether to laugh or cry. “This won’t do. If they sense that something is wrong, they will probably start to investigate the reason. No matter what, they will eventually find out about my training avatars. If one or two of them die, I will have to waste time to find new training avatars.” Lin Xuan pondered for a moment and decided to let three of his training avatars switch to a “defensive” training strategy. In this way, they would only occupy a region. If a demon beast took the initiative to attack them, they would counterattack. In this way, the number of demon beasts in the Poison Miasma Cave should increase again after a few days. In any case, demon beasts were different from ordinary animals. They did not need that much time to grow. This was like fishing. Lin Xuan could not fish every day. He still had to come up with a sustainable plan. “There’s something wrong with this person. He doesn’t seem to be focused on training.” Lin Xuan suddenly noticed a male martial artist. This person was training on the seventh floor, but he was a little absent-minded. Moreover, he did not stay in one place. It was more like he was looking for someone. “There’s a spy in White Crane Town. Could it be this person? I have to be careful.” Lin Xuan remembered this person’s face and continued to observe. However, a few hours later, he did not see this person make any special moves. He just kept searching for someone. Several hours later, Lin Xuan muttered the word “collect” and the gains of the seven training avatars fell into his consciousness space. The attribute items dropped in the Poison Miasma Cave were only the Poison Miasma Fruit and the Deep Rock Crystal. The latter was very useful and could increase one’s Constitution by 1. In addition, there were quite a lot of skills that were dropped in the Poison Miasma Cave. For example, there was the High-level Avatar Technique, which was far better than the Avatar Technique. It could create two avatars that inherited 10% of the main body’s attributes. Even if these avatars would only be of ordinary white grade, the duration would still be as long as an hour. After the grade and level increase, the attributes and duration would also increase. However, after carefully checking his skill, Lin Xuan discovered that the High-Level Avatar Technique would replace the Avatar Technique. Just like how the High-Level Thorn Body would replace the Thorn Body and how the High-Level Perception would replace the perception. “How unfortunate. If only I could use them together.” Lin Xuan sighed. High-level Disguise Technique could help Lin Xuan hide his skills to a greater extent. As long as the grade of the skill was higher than the other party’s Observer skill, the other party would not be able to see anything at all. The Venomous Demon King was somewhat similar to the skill Demon King of Fury. It could increase the strength of poison spells. Great Acid Rain was a poison spell. Poison Miasma Smoke Bomb was a long-range consumption-type skill that could release poison-inducing smoke and also help ensure one’s ability to escape. However, Lin Xuan felt that if other martial artists used this thing to escape, it would be somewhat harmful to them. This was because if they threw this out, they would also be poisoned. Moreover, this was miasma poison and was different from ordinary poison. With the miasma poison state, their health points would decrease rapidly. Chapter 72 Vicious Poison Set, Unaccountably Solicitous Lastly, the equipment dropped from the Poison Miasma Cave was the Vicious Poison Set! Seeing the four effects of this set, Lin Xuan’s eyes immediately lit up. Effect 1: Agility+10, Strength+6. Effect 2: Evasion+20%, Consciousness -35%, Melee Damage+40%, Melee Attack Speed+45%, Life-Steal+20%. Effect 3: Any poison attack damage+30%, critical hit chance+30%, critical hit damage+80%. “This Vicious Poison Set is excellent. It’s also a perfect match for the One with the Sword rune group! Looks like even the heavens are helping me. If there’s really no other way, I’ll change my profession to Swordmaster.” Lin Xuan was so happy that he could not close his mouth. “Nice, very nice. I’ll learn the skill first.” Lin Xuan immediately learned the High-Level Avatar Technique and High-Level Disguise Technique and increased them to the precious purple grade in a single go. After farming for a few days, he should be able to obtain enough ordinary white skill books to increase these skills to the peerless golden grade. Lin Xuan looked at the time again. It was almost time to go back and eat, so he walked out of his waiting area. On the way back to the entrance of the mystic realm’s door of light, he encountered a martial artist. Lin Xuan looked up. Coincidentally, it was the martial artist he had seen from the perspective of his training avatar. He casually used his Observer skill. Song Zhong was a level seven Sixth Realm martial artist. His attributes were not bad, and his main attributes were Agility and Strength. Song Zhong saw him and his eyes lit up. “Hello, Shield Ghost. My name is Song Zhong.” Lin Xuan nodded. Song Zhong smiled very warmly and said, “I’ve long heard of your deeds and have always wanted to be friends with you. Today, we’re finally fated to meet.” Lin Xuan nodded again. Song Zhong smiled somewhat awkwardly. The other party’s attitude really made him feel awkward. “Then I’ll go first. See you next time.” With that said, he quickly left. Lin Xuan looked at his back, deep in thought. Why was this person so enthusiastic about him? One who was unaccountably solicitous was definitely hiding evil intentions. However, was it possible that this person’s kink was armor? After all, some people’s kink was mushroom heads. Pfft. It couldn’t be. In short, there was something wrong with this person. Song Zhong had already left a deep impression on Lin Xuan. After Song Zhong left, Lin Xuan returned to the first floor of the Miasma Poison Cave and encountered Silver Fox and Black, who were also about to return. Silver Fox quickly saw him and greeted with a frown, “Shield Ghost? You’re going back too, huh?” Lin Xuan nodded. “How was your harvest today?” Silver Fox asked. Lin Xuan shook his head and said something he had long prepared. “Not that good. There are very few demon beasts. I only obtained an uncommon green scroll.” Silver Fox heaved a long sigh. “Damn heavens, what’s going on? Why did the number of demon beasts in the Poison Miasma Cave suddenly decrease by so much?” “At this rate, when can I advance to the Seventh Realm?” Lin Xuan was somewhat ashamed when he heard this. Fortunately, he was wearing armor, and no one could see his expression. In the end, it was because of him that the number of demon beasts in the Poison Miasma Cave had decreased. Silver Fox was so good to him. Moreover, he was willing to be a spy in the Germinal Organization and give up his advancement for the Construction Division. Lin Xuan respected such a person very much. If Silver Fox ended up not obtaining a high grade profession scroll, he would naturally feel very apologetic. In the canteen of White Crane Town. Lin Xuan and the other two spent some general coins to order food and found a place to sit. The culinary skills of these chefs in the White Crane Town canteen were not bad. Just by smelling the food, Lin Xuan was already hungry. “How are you going to eat?” Silver Fox smiled and said, “Are you still going to keep the armor on?” Lin Xuan opened his armor and revealed his mouth. “Of course I’ll eat with my mouth.” Black also smiled. The other party never revealed his face to others and only revealed his chin. Silver Fox smiled helplessly. “Alright, in any case, you’ve contributed greatly to our Construction Division. I’m not worried about your identity.” Lin Xuan ate a piece of braised pork and paired it with a mouthful of rice before asking, “How’s the situation at the front line of the Construction Division?” Silver Fox shook his head. “Not that good. Currently, most of the high-level combat strength has been sent to the coastal areas. The Drowning City mystic realm is a bottomless pit that constantly consumes the members of our Construction Division.” “Now, we also know that High Heaven Plains is behind the Germinal Organization, which means that High Heaven Plains is still eyeing us covetously. Our situation is not good.” Lin Xuan nodded and casually asked, “What if you can’t get a suitable profession scroll?” Silver Fox shrugged. “What else can I do? I’ll just have to thicken my skin and find Ye Yuqiu. I’ll just take a rare blue profession scroll. I won’t be greedy.” Lin Xuan tapped the table lightly. “If I can get a profession scroll that’s suitable for you, I’ll keep it for you.” Silver Fox laughed heartily. “That’s good!” The three of them chatted casually. Black did not talk much, but whenever he spoke, he would throw an insult at Silver Fox. Silver Fox did not retort and only smiled happily. At this moment, a round-faced little sister walked over with three bowls of soup. “Hello, this is the seaweed egg drop soup from the canteen and some shrimp skin. Please enjoy.” Lin Xuan looked up. He had an impression of this round-faced little sister. She was a logistician from the Miasma Poison Cave safety station. “I remember you. You’re…” The round-faced little sister was very happy to hear this. “Mr. Shield Ghost, you still remember me?” Then, as if she had made a major decision, she took out a small note from her towering chest under Silver Fox’s shocked gaze. Her face was shy and red. “Mr. Shield Ghost, please give this to Flame Explosion! Please!” With that said, she hurriedly ran away shyly, like those young and shy schoolgirls. Lin Xuan received it and could smell a faint fragrance coming from it. He swept his gaze over and saw the words “Mr. Flame Explosion, I like you very much. I hope you can go to the small forest on the east side of White Crane Town tonight. I have something important to tell you!” Behind him was an address and a lip mark. It should be the young lady’s address in White Crane Town. Silver Fox sighed and said, “Flame Explosion is so popular with young girls. We’re both magic users, but why isn’t anyone attracted to me?” At this moment, Black had already finished the seaweed egg drop soup. “Perhaps it’s because you’re old and stingy.” Silver Fox :”…” Lin Xuan put away the small note and pondered. Before the round-faced little sister approached, he had not noticed anything. After delivering the soup, he suddenly reacted. This round-faced little sister seemed to have been looking over faintly just now. Her actions were very secretive and cautious. However, Lin Xuan had long upgraded his “high-level perception” to the peerless golden grade in the Inferior Demon Mountain. This skill was even better than his “perception”. He recalled for a moment and immediately sensed that something was wrong with the round-faced little sister. Could this person be a spy from the Construction Division? If she was really a spy, it was best to get rid of her as soon as possible. It was not easy for him to rely on the Construction Division to become stronger. He could not afford to cause any more trouble. However, Lin Xuan did not have any evidence at the moment, and he could not directly kill someone. If the round-faced little sister was really a spy, it would be fine to kill her. If she was not, then she had killed the wrong person. Although there were no laws in this world, Lin Xuan still would not cross the bottom line in his heart. Lin Xuan decided to observe for a few days. “I’m full. I’ll go home and rest! Shield Ghost, see you tomorrow!” Silver Fox waved at Lin Xuan. The three of them split into three directions and returned to their respective houses. Chapter 73 Strange Movement in the Long Hai City Mystic Realm! The night gradually darkened. Lin Xuan used his Avatar Technique and a completely naked Lin Xuan immediately appeared in front of him. “After my Constitution became stronger, that thing seems to have become bigger…” Lin Xuan then pinched his avatar’s biceps and poked his abs. He clicked his tongue in wonder. “This is no different from those fitness experts before I transmigrated, right?” Then, he got his avatar to put on the Demon Flame Set to make it look like Flame Explosion. After that, Lin Xuan controlled his avatar to quickly disappear into the night. There was a small forest to the east of White Crane Town. It was always green throughout the four seasons and was a place many young lovers in White Crane Town liked to visit. Indeed, after taking a few steps, he heard an intense “battle” from the forest. “I really admire them. They’re still fighting seriously at night. They must be people who want to become stronger.” Lin Xuan did not alarm the young couple and continued to walk on the small path in the forest. Soon, he found the round-faced little sister under the moonlight. At this moment, the round-faced little sister was no longer wearing the service staff uniform in the canteen. Instead, she had changed into a pink lacy pajamas, revealing her pink forearms and white thighs. Although this set of clothes did not outline her impressive figure, her semi-exposed body was still very provocative.. “Mr. Flame Explosion, you really came!” The round-faced little sister was very excited when she saw him, and her face was flushed. Lin Xuan nodded. “You said that you have something important to tell me. What is it?” The round-faced little sister’s face turned even redder. “Damn, don’t you understand? Ever since you displayed your impressive battle results in the city defense battle that day, I’ve always been your loyal fan.” Lin Xuan asked, “So?” The round-faced little sister swayed her waist awkwardly, appearing even more attractive under the moonlight. “Damn, do you still need me to explain? How can a girl take the initiative?” Lin Xuan said righteously, “A woman’s heart is as deep as the ocean. How can I understand your thoughts if you don’t tell me?” The round-faced little sister took a few steps closer and deliberately breathed in his ear. “Tonight, I’m your slave. You can treat me however you want.” As she spoke, she opened Lin Xuan’s cloak and undid her belt. Lin Xuan grabbed her wrist and said solemnly, “Do you still remember the core values?” The round-faced little sister was stunned. “Ah?” After settling in White Crane Town, Lin Xuan found many books from Ye Yuqiu’s place. When his avatar was training, he would read them when he had nothing to do. He discovered that before the demon disaster, the history of this world was almost the same as that of Earth. For example, the land under their feet used to belong to the Xia Country. A large number of the members of the Construction Division used to be various public officials and soldiers of the Xia Country. Although many years had passed, many people still spoke of core values. It was said that many members of the Construction Division treated core values as their principles and had never given up. The round-faced little sister naturally knew this, but she did not understand why they needed to talk about core values at this moment. Could it be Flame Explosion’s unique hobby? “Wealth, democracy, civilization…” The round-faced little sister stammered. Lin Xuan became even more solemn. “My comrade, slaves do not exist under the core values. You can’t say that in the future, understand?” The round-faced little sister was dumbfounded. “…That’s only a metaphor.” Lin Xuan shook his head. “Although it’s only a metaphor, it also shows the bigotry you have deep down inside you. I prefer that both sides maintain an equal relationship in love and not be slaves or slave owners. I don’t think we’re right for each other.” “If this is what you mean by something important, I’m going back.” Lin Xuan let go of her hand and turned to leave. The round-faced little sister’s mouth fell open and did not close for a long time. “Mr. Flame Explosion! I won’t give up! I’ll always chase after you firmly!” A flustered rustling immediately sounded from the grass beside them. A young couple with disheveled clothes rushed out. Clearly, they were shocked by the round-faced little sister’s loud voice. The round-faced little sister took a deep breath and gradually recovered her calm. “Damn, I can’t even seduce him. Could it be that Flame Explosion is impotent?” “Or does he really like an equal relationship in love? Forget it. The mission given by the higher-ups has to be completed. I have to rope in this Flame Explosion.” The round-faced little sister’s face flashed with determination. On the way back to his house, Lin Xuan shook his head repeatedly. This woman was clearly not right. Even if she was not a spy, she was definitely greedy for his beauty. She was not a good person! <b>was</b>  In the blink of an eye, a calm month passed in White Crane Town. In the past month, the round-faced little sister had been resolutely delivering food to him every day. To be honest, if not for the fact that there might be something wrong with this woman, Lin Xuan really would not have been able to control himself. Damn, the food was too good. It tasted like the food he had before transmigrating over. Over the past month, he had also obtained a lot from the Miasma Poison Cave. The first was experience points. Because the six training avatars had worked so hard, the speed at which the demon beasts in the Poison Miasma Cave died was too fast. In order to not arouse the suspicion of Ye Yuqiu, Black, and the others, Lin Xuan had specially made two training avatars change their training strategy. In this way, it was equivalent to having four and a half training avatars working hard. In this way, he could obtain about 150 million experience points per day. In just a month, he had obtained more than 4.5 billion experience points. After advancing to the Sixth Realm, the cost required to advance was at least 1 billion. He was currently a level two Sixth Realm martial artist. To advance to level three Sixth Realm, he needed 2 billion experience points. To advance from level three Sixth Realm to level four Sixth Realm, he needed 3 billion experience points. A month of hacking could only increase his cultivation by one level. The second was the skill book. He had already maxed out his High-Level Avatar Technique, High-Level Disguise, and other skills. Its grade had reached the peerless golden grade. After reaching the peerless golden grade, the effect of the high-level Avatar Technique changed greatly. “It could only last for a few hours previously, but now, it can actually last forever?” Lin Xuan gasped, pleasantly surprised. — Name: High-level Avatar Technique Level: Level One Sixth Realm Grade: Peerless Golden Effect: Creates two avatars that inherit 100% of one’s main attributes and skills. Duration is limitless. The avatar consumes 1 magic power per second and can be canceled at any time. – – “High-level Avatar Technique, impressive!” Lin Xuan was happy for a while before starting to worry about his experience points again. “I have a training avatar, but my advancement is still so slow. The advancement of other martial artists is probably even slower.” He smacked his lips. “When will there be a demon attack in the Poison Miasma Cave? I need to get more loot and experience points.” As soon as this thought rose, a broadcast sounded in the sky above White Crane Town. Ye Yuqiu’s neutral voice sounded in White Crane Town. “All Sixth Realm martial artists, please quickly come to the mayor’s office!” “All Sixth Realm martial artists, please quickly come to the mayor’s office!” Lin Xuan was stunned. “What’s going on? Is it really happening?” He casually used the High-level Avatar Technique to create an avatar and made it wear the Demon Flame Set. “Brother Flame Explosion, let’s go!” By the time Lin Xuan and Flame Explosion rushed to the mayor’s office, there were already seven to eight people gathered there. Lu Luo, Wen Xiong, Silver Fox, and the others were all among them. Then, more Sixth Realm martial artists rushed over. In less than half an hour, all the Sixth Realm martial artists in White Crane Town gathered here. In the previous battle between the Germinal Organization and the White Crane Town Construction Division, White Crane Town had lost a total of 11 Sixth Realm martial artists. Of course, there were even more Fifth Realm and Fourth Realm martial artists who died. However, even so, including Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion, the White Crane Town Construction Division still had 24 Sixth Realm martial artists. Ye Yuqiu was still in her white suit and white pants. Seeing that everyone was here, she immediately spoke. “Everyone! Due to some unknown reason, the mystic realm controlled by the Construction Division in Dragon Sea City has changed. The demon beasts’ reproduction speed has increased greatly. However, their experts with high-level combat strength have all gone to the coastal region. I’m afraid they won’t be able to guard the mystic realm. They hope that the nearby Construction Division will send people to help.” After Ye Yuqiu finished speaking, the Sixth Realm martial artists were immediately excited. Dragon Sea City? A map quickly appeared in Lin Xuan’s mind. 120 kilometers east of White Crane Town was Dragon Sea City. It was a little far. Of course, if they had taken the high-speed rail before the demon disaster appeared, it would have only been half an hour. However, now, if one wanted to go from White Crane Town to Dragon Sea City, it would take much longer. After all, the roads were abandoned and filled with ruins. One could only rely on the off-road vehicle and would need to drive for 12 to 14 hours. The speed at which a Sixth Realm martial artist erupted in a short period of time was naturally faster than the off-road vehicle, but their endurance was insufficient. Moreover, if they kept running, they would fall into exhaustion and consume a lot of energy. It was very likely that they would encounter a large group of demon beasts in the wilderness. If the demon beasts were weak, it would be fine and they could still easily resolve it. However, if they happened to encounter a demon beast group led by a Sixth Realm demon beast when their energy was exhausted, that would be tragic. Therefore, to be safe, martial artists would choose to use transportation instead of relying on their own two legs to travel. The scale of Dragon Sea City was much larger than White Crane Town. However, because it was closer to the coastal region, compared to the Construction Division, the number of high-level experts they mobilized to the coastal regions were even higher. “I really have a blessed mouth. A situation of demon beasts accelerating their reproduction has really happened. However, it’s not the Poison Miasma Cave, but the mystic realm in Dragon Sea City.” Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. “That’s great! During this period of time, the number of demon beasts in the Poison Miasma Cave is pitifully small. Let’s hurry to Dragon Sea City!” Song Zhong nodded repeatedly. “Indeed. In the past, I could encounter demon beasts after taking just a few steps. Now, after wandering around the Miasma Poison Cave several times, I still can’t encounter any demon beasts. It’s really as if the whole place was haunted.” Another Sixth Realm martial artist nodded in agreement. Lu Luo, Wen Xiong, Silver Fox, and the others immediately asked, “When are we going over?” Ye Yuqiu smiled and said, “Everyone, don’t be anxious. This trip will take at least half a day. The dangers along the way are unknown. Of course, we have to be prepared.” “We have to bring the necessary food, water, and fuel. In addition, we need at least five off-road vehicles.” Everyone nodded repeatedly. The mayor was indeed thoughtful. Ye Yuqiu said, “Everyone, go back and rest first. I’ve already instructed them to prepare everything tomorrow.” Everyone nodded and left. Lin Xuan was also very happy. He was just worried that it would be difficult to obtain experience points. Now that an opportunity had presented itself, he naturally could not miss it. The next day, all the Sixth Realm martial artists gathered in the small square of White Crane Town and sat in the off-road vehicle modified by the Construction Division. Lin Xuan’s main body still wore the Overlord Set and disguised himself as Shield Ghost. His avatar had put on the Demon Flame Set and was disguised as Flame Explosion. To be safe, he also sat in the same off-road vehicle as his avatar. Beside him were Lu Luo, Silver Fox, and Wen Xiong, all of whom he knew. Ye Yuqiu, who was wearing a white suit and white pants, quickly walked over. “Silver Fox, you’re old and have even made a huge contribution. I’ll let you lead the team this time. You have to bring everyone back safely,” Ye Yuqiu instructed. Silver Fox bowed solemnly. “I guarantee that I’ll complete the mission!” Soon, the convoy drove out and sped through the wilderness. “This is the first day I don’t have Black by my side, I missed him.” Silver Fox smacked his lips and was a little emotional. No one seemed to answer him and he quickly felt a little embarrassed. He said, “Shield Ghost, your relationship with Flame Explosion is really good. You always have your arms around each other’s shoulders.” Lin Xuan chuckled. “It’s about the same as your relationship with Black.” “Hahahaha, then you guys must be really good friends. You guys are probably such good friends that you can even wear the same pants, right?” Silver Fox laughed loudly. The Sixth Realm martial artists basically all knew each other. The convoy was filled with happy air. Soon, a high-speed rail appeared in front of him. Lin Xuan even saw a high-speed railway vehicle lying beside the road. The white vehicle was long rusted and the word “Harmony” that was written on the front of the car could be barely seen. Even such a huge technology product had been abandoned in the wilderness. Everyone who saw it couldn’t help but sigh. “I heard that before the demon disaster occurred, people could ride high-speed rail from the south to the north, from the east to the west, and they could travel from the south to the north in half a day. Unfortunately, I was not born in that era.” Lu Luo’s delicate face stared intently at the overturned high-speed railway vehicle. Even though the convoy had already traveled far, her gaze was still fixed on that overturned vehicle. Lin Xuan also sighed. After settling down in the Construction Division, he had flipped through many books and asked many people. Finally, he obtained a relatively vague understanding of when it happened. The demon disaster happened more than a hundred years ago. A hundred years had passed, and many things had been lost. Those who had seen the era of technology and civilization should have already turned into dust. Lu Luo, Silver Fox, and the others were all born after the disaster. They could only work hard and rely on pictures and books to imagine how things were like during that prosperous era. Thinking of this, Lin Xuan could not help but feel proud. After all, he had come from that era. The next ten hours passed without any danger. However, not the entire journey was smooth-sailing. They also encountered a demon beast group passing by, but their levels were not high. If such a team of Sixth Realm martial artists could not even resolve an ordinary demon beast group, they would simply be a disgrace to all the Sixth Realm martial artists. The convoy set off at 5 AM in the morning. When they arrived at Dragon Sea City, it was already dusk and it was time for lunch. There were already people waiting here. Seeing the convoy arrive, the people in-charge hurriedly welcomed them. The convoy stopped and everyone walked down. As the captain of the convoy, Silver Fox immediately went over to shake hands with the other party. “Old Wang! Long time no see! You’re still alive!” Silver Fox laughed loudly. The other party was a short and wealthy middle-aged fatty. He was not angry when he heard this. “How can I die if you’re not dead?!” “Everyone, this fatty is called Wang Dafu. He’s an old friend of mine.” Silver Fox immediately introduced him to everyone. Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. These two people were really too good at exchanging greetings. However, he noticed the faint smell of blood on Wang Dafu’s body and the unbearable pain on his face from time to time. Wang Dafu immediately interrupted, “Everyone, the situation is urgent.” “Logically speaking, we should have brought everyone to the canteen to eat first, but the demon beasts of the Falling Thunder Mountain are reproducing too quickly. Our people can’t handle it. It’s better for everyone to quickly enter the Falling Thunder Mountain to help out so that the members of our Dragon Sea City and Yang City Construction Division can take a break.” Wang Dafu was somewhat helpless and anxious. Silver Fox immediately nodded when he heard this. “Understood, understood. Everyone, follow quickly.” Everyone immediately ran all the way to the base of the Construction Division in Dragon Sea City. On the way, Silver Fox asked, “Is the situation already bad?” Wang Dafu smiled bitterly. “That’s right. Before you guys, the people from the Yang City Construction Division had already arrived. However, even after their people had entered the mystic realm, we were still unable to suppress the demon beasts. Another batch of demon beasts almost surged out.” “Moreover, many of our members as well as the members of Yang City have died. Everyone’s mood is a little heavy.” When Lu Luo, Wen Xiong, and the others heard this, their expressions became slightly solemn. They originally thought that it was a good opportunity to kill demon beasts, but they did not expect the risk to be so high. Lin Xuan had the same expression. However, deep down, he was actually very excited. A lot of demon beasts? Good! He liked mystic realms that had a lot of demon beasts! Soon, the members of White Crane Town’s Construction Division quickly arrived in front of the mystic realm’s door of light. There were many demon corpses on the ground outside the door of light, and the air was still emitting a dense bloody smell. There were temporary tents set up in the empty ground, and the injured martial artists were being treated in these tents. A tall martial artist in white and with a firm face stood in the open space. Every time the skill cooldown ended, he would immediately use a Great Recovery skill. The emerald energy that filled the sky entered the injured and quickly recovered their injuries. He was the director of the Construction Division in Dragon Sea City, a level seven Seventh Realm martial artist, Chu Pengcheng. Seeing them arrive, Chu Pengcheng could not be bothered to speak. He only nodded at them from afar and continued to use the Great Recovery to recover the injuries of many people. Wang Dafu was about to say something when the communicator at his waist suddenly trembled violently. He hurriedly picked up the call and an anxious voice immediately sounded from the other end of the communicator. “Old Wang, some of the members of our Dragon Sea City and Yang City are trapped on a small mountain on the fourth floor of the Falling Thunder Mountain! Is there anyone else out there? Quickly get a few of them to help! The beast tide here is too ferocious…” Before he could finish speaking, the communicator was filled with the sound of signal interruptions. It was very likely that the martial artist had already been killed. “Everyone from the Construction Division of White Crane Town, saving people is more important. Follow me!” Wang Dafu gritted his teeth and suddenly waved his hand, charging into the mystic realm door of light. “Hey! Old Wang, your injuries are still not healed. You can’t enter the Falling Thunder Mountain anymore!” a medical martial artist exclaimed. Wang Dafu only said, “My injuries can be treated later, but those guys trapped in the Falling Thunder Mountain need to be saved right now!” Lin Xuan’s heart stirred. This fatty looked like a cunning person at the beginning, but he was the first to rush out in such a situation. He did not hesitate at all and did not care about his injuries. Lin Xuan and the others immediately followed and entered the mystic realm of the Falling Thunder Mountain. The Sixth Realm mystic realm, Thunderfall Mountain, was one of the several mystic realms controlled by Dragon Sea City. This mystic realm was a little different from other Sixth Realm mystic realms. It prohibited any martial artist above the Sixth Realm to enter. If a Seventh Realm martial artist entered, the constantly descending lightning in the Falling Thunder Mountain would directly blast towards the Seventh Realm martial artist. The Construction Division of Dragon Sea City clearly had a Seventh Realm martial artist, but due to this rule, he could only guard outside the mystic realm’s door of light and could not enter. “To cut the long story short, the characteristic of the Falling Thunder Mountain is that lightning can fall from every place at every moment. A silver-white spot will appear on the ground a second before the lightning falls as a hint. Therefore, martial artists who are not agile enough will suffer greatly here and will not be able to react at all.” Wang Dafu walked at the front. As he quickly advanced, he explained to Lin Xuan and the others. “Currently, at least 20 Sixth Realm martial artists are trapped in the fourth floor of the Falling Thunder Mountain. They are very likely to have encountered the siege of the Falling Thunder Mountain Beast Tide.” Wang Dafu said in a low voice, “Our first goal is to help them escape from their predicament. In the future, we’ll find out the reason for the abnormality in the Falling Thunder Mountain.” “Does everyone understand?” Everyone, including Lin Xuan, nodded. “Understood.” At this moment, Lin Xuan also noticed blood beginning to seep out of Wang Dafu’s waist. Moreover, it covered a large area in a short period of time. Clearly, Wang Dafu had previously been injured in the battle in the Falling Thunder Mountain mystic realm. He had just come out to rest for a moment when he learned that the people from their White Crane Town Construction Division had arrived, and he hurriedly came to pick them up. However, now, he needed to save the people that had been surrounded. “There’s a silver-white spot!” Lu Luo suddenly shouted. Everyone immediately spread out. Lin Xuan looked down and indeed, a light spot about a meter in diameter appeared. A second later. A silver-white lightning as thick as a bowl descended from the sky and struck the light spot fiercely. There seemed to be small lightning sparks spreading in the air. Everyone seemed to be able to sense the rich lightning aura. “Everyone, split up into two groups and take action. The beast tide should be gathered on the fourth floor now. We’ll meet again after we reach the fourth floor. Otherwise, the chances of attracting lightning will increase if there are more people.” Wang Dafu shouted and left with Silver Fox. The other martial artists also formed teams. Lin Xuan naturally formed a team with his good brother, Flame Explosion. A dozen or so two-man teams quickly scattered and rushed into the Falling Thunder Mountain. On the first floor of the Falling Thunder Mountain, Lin Xuan encountered a few level one Sixth Realm demon beasts after taking a few steps. These demon beasts were all enveloped in dense lightning power. Lin Xuan also saw lightning land on them, but it did not cause any damage. Instead, they were very comfortable. After being struck by lightning, their strength seemed to have become stronger. The few demon beasts roared and directly rushed over. Lin Xuan’s main body had already changed his equipment. He wore the Giant Shield Set on the inside and the Overlord Set on the outside. The Giant Shield Set did not have so many fancy effects. It only had high elemental resistance. Then, Lin Xuan took out the Dragon Hunter Shield and blocked. Bang! The lightning damage caused by these demon beasts was negligible. “Looks like my Lightning Resistance is not bad.” Seeing that these demon beasts were unable to injure him, Lin Xuan did not stop and continued to climb higher. He did not stop at the second floor and rushed all the way to the third floor of the Falling Thunder Mountain. The density of the demon beasts here had clearly increased greatly, and he could still hear the sounds of battle from higher up. At this moment, a silver-white spot happened to appear under his feet. Lin Xuan’s heart stirred. “I wonder how powerful the lightning is… Why don’t I give it a try?” He had already prepared the Great Health Potion. If a bolt of lightning struck him and his health got too low, he would immediately use the Great Health Potion. In his consciousness space, the medicinal table had been producing various potions. There were both Great Health Potions and Great Demon Power Potions. Boom! The lightning bolt struck Lin Xuan fiercely. In the blink of an eye, his health points decreased by one-fifth. A numb feeling flowed through his entire body. “I see. Lightning bolts consist of two types of damage. One is lightning damage, and the other is true damage. No wonder Wang Dafu said not to forcefully block it and to avoid it as much as possible.” True damage ignored all resistance and directly affected one’s health. If there were enough lightning bolts, even a Seventh Realm martial artist could be directly killed despite having a lot of health. No wonder Seventh Realm martial artists could not enter. Since he had an understanding of the damage caused by the falling lightning, Lin Xuan no longer had any qualms. Instead, he directly rushed to the fourth floor. On the fourth floor. More than 20 members of the Construction Division were trapped on a small mountain. Below them were groups of demon beasts, numbering more than 10,000. More demon beasts were killing everywhere in the Falling Thunder Mountain. These demon beasts had gathered here because there was a bloody smell that they had never smelled before. If this continued for too long, more and more demon beasts would gather like sharks. Moreover, because they were all gathered here, they had also attracted the lightning. On average, lightning would fall every ten seconds. However, these members had no place to hide and could only let those with higher lightning resistance resist it. In this way, almost everyone was covered in injuries. Their less-than-half health points had been maintained for a long time, and the Life Potion and Magic Power Potion had almost been exhausted. The level nine Sixth Realm martial artist in the lead, Bai Xinghe, cut the Lightning Frog in front of him in half with a sword and shouted, “Are the reinforcements not here yet? Didn’t they say that the members of White Crane Town’s Construction Division have already arrived?!” The durability of his armor had dropped to less than half. His entire body was covered in cracks, and his skin was bleeding. It had to be known that he was not a martial artist who focused on Constitution like Lin Xuan. He focused more on strength and was a high Strength swordmaster. However, even so, he did not retreat. Instead, he stayed in the periphery of the crowd to ensure that the members inside who focused on magic and long-range skills could attack steadily. “They should be arriving soon. Everyone, work hard and hang in there!” The only medic in the team, Xu Xuan, squeezed out the last of her magic power and released a recovery spell. At this moment, Wang Dafu, Silver Fox, and the others also rushed over. After all, it was only the fourth floor and was not far from the mystic realm door of the Falling Thunder Mountain. Seeing the demon beasts that filled the mountain, everyone gasped. The exact number was naturally unknown, but the rough estimate was also about 10,000. This was even after the joint cleanup of the Dragon Sea City and the Yang City Construction Division had been carried out a few days ago. It could be imagined how terrifying the abnormal behavior of the mystic realm demon beasts in the Falling Thunder Mountain this time was. “Who else hasn’t arrived?” Wang Dafu swept his gaze around. Silver Fox looked around and frowned. “Song Zhong hasn’t arrived… Wait, Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion haven’t arrived either. That shouldn’t be the case. The two of them are very powerful.” Wang Dafu was stunned. “I seem to remember these two. Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion… Were they the ones that guarded a city wall each on their own?” Silver Fox nodded somewhat smugly. “Yes, it’s the two of them. They’re the pride of our White Crane Town.” Lu Luo whispered, “They might have encountered a small problem. Perhaps there were more demon beasts along the way and blocked their path. Don’t worry, the two of them are very powerful.” Wen Xiong scratched his head. “So, no one cares about Song Zhong?” Everyone :”…” Wang Dafu coughed lightly. “The situation is urgent, and we can’t wait any longer. However, we don’t have a lot of people, and it’s impossible for us to directly rush forward and attack. My idea is to lure away the demon beasts on the periphery bit by bit and destroy them separately. As long as we delay for a little longer, the members outside will be able to come after their injuries recover!” Silver Fox nodded. “That makes sense. Then…” Roar! Roar! At this moment, the demon beasts outside the beast tide suddenly let out wails of death. Then, a huge fireball more than seven meters in diameter smashed into the demon beasts like a falling meteor. Boom! All the demon beasts in the range of Flame Explosion suffered varying degrees of injuries. Those with weaker levels, such as those below level three Sixth Realm, were directly killed by this Flame Explosion! Those with higher levels, such as those between level four to level six Sixth Realm, almost lost half of their health points. As for those above level seven Sixth Realm, they also lost almost a third of their health points. Originally, these demon beasts had already rushed towards the martial artists who were surrounded. This Flame Explosion immediately attracted their attention. These surrounded martial artists looked into the distance and saw a figure enveloped in a black cloak. “Is it a member of the Construction Division of White Crane Town?” Xu Xuan said in surprise. Roar! Roar! Roar! The demon beasts were incomparably furious as they directly rushed towards that figure. Bai Xinghe’s heart skipped a beat. “This is bad. That guy is a mage. He can’t resist the attack of so many demon beasts at all!” At this moment, a figure in full armor suddenly leaped and blocked in front of the fire mage. A heavy and exaggerated black shield was erected in front of him. Lu Luo stood up immediately. “It’s Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion!” Wang Dafu: “…Silver Fox, I didn’t know how brave they were previously. Now I know.” Silver Fox had a worried expression. “They’re quite brave, but I’m worried that they’re in danger.” On the small mountain top, Xu Xuan exclaimed, “He’s alone! How can he resist so many demon beasts alone?!” “It’s over. The two of them risked their lives to save us,” a martial artist said dejectedly. “They might as well give up on us. Seeing our Construction Division members sacrifice themselves like this, I can’t bear it!” Another martial artist beat his chest and stomped his feet. Bai Xinghe, Xu Xuan, and the others did not dare to look anymore. They knew that the shield looked huge, but in the next moment, the terrifying demon beasts would directly shatter the shield and drown the two people behind it. The demon beast collided fiercely, but it was as if a wave had collided with a reef. The reef was motionless, but the waves scattered. Pfft! Pfft! Pfft! Lightning Frogs, Lightning Snakes, Plasma Bees… Many demon beasts from the Falling Thunder Mountain rushed out. Not only were they unable to break through the heavy shield, but they also died one after another in front of the shield.  Bai Xinghe, Xu Xuan, and the other martial artists were immediately dumbfounded when they saw the scene of flesh and blood splashing. Wang Dafu: “…It’s… Dangerous?” Silver Fox: “…I didn’t expect him to be so tough.” Lu Luo and Wen Xiong sighed. “He has always been very tough when he was in the Germinal Organization. I just didn’t expect him to still be this tough even after becoming a Sixth Realm martial artist.” In the eyes of the others, Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion cooperated extremely well. Shield Ghost blocked in front and blocked all the demon beasts from the Falling Thunder Mountain. Flame Explosion hid steadily behind Shield Ghost and attacked. The frequency of Flame Explosion in his hands was very high, as if he was throwing small fireballs. Every time his magic power was about to run out, he would immediately take out a bottle of the Great Magic Power Potion and drink it. A large group of Falling Thunder Mountain demon beasts had been suppressed by a single person. Moreover, because Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion had diverted their attention, the demon beasts no longer surrounded Bai Xinghe, Xu Xuan, and the others. Instead, they had turned around to attack those two. “Good opportunity! Let’s go and save them quickly!” Wang Dafu shouted. They immediately ran and killed the demon beasts along the way before meeting up with Bai Xinghe and the others. Seeing Bai Xinghe’s bloody and shattered armor, Lu Luo and Wen Xiong gasped. Wang Dafu also said in admiration, “Old Bai, the organization is proud of you!” “Stop talking about this. What should we do with the two of them? We have to get them out safely too!” Xu Xuan pointed at Lin Xuan and said anxiously. “That’s right. Our survival cannot be based on the sacrifice of the other members. If that’s the case, we would rather die in the Falling Thunder Mountain Range,” Bai Xinghe said solemnly. “Let’s go, just go. We’ll be fine.” “I’ll take these demon beasts away. We’ll meet outside!” Just as Bai Xinghe finished speaking, Lin Xuan shouted. Then, everyone saw Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion retreat in unison and run. The Falling Thunder Mountain demon beasts also chased closely like a silver-white river. In the blink of an eye, only a few demon beasts were left beside Wang Dafu, Bai Xinghe, and the others. “This…” The corners of Xu Xuan’s mouth twitched.” A shield-bearer and a fire mage. Can they outrun so many Falling Thunder Mountain demon beasts? ” Bai Xinghe also hesitated. “Silver Fox, tell us clearly whether or not those two can do it. I, Bai Xinghe, can’t watch my colleagues die under the claws of the demon beasts!” Silver Fox did not know whether to laugh or cry. “The two of them are Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion. You should have heard about them.” Xu Xuan exclaimed, “So it’s the two of them? No wonder you’re so confident.” The battle between White Crane Town and the Germinal Organization had long been spread in the nearby Construction Division. Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion were good friends who each guarded a city wall and indirectly led to the destruction of the Germinal Organization. This outstanding battle record made many of the Construction Division members very impressed. Lu Luo smiled and said, “Don’t think he’s slow just because of the heavy armor on Shield Ghost. Also, don’t think that Flame Explosion can’t run fast just because he’s a fire mage. Their performance will definitely exceed your expectations.” Only then did Bai Xinghe calm down. “Then we can’t increase the burden on them. Let’s send the heavily injured out to rest and replenish some life potions before we return!” The others nodded. Since most of the demon beasts were led away by Lin Xuan, they did not encounter many demon beasts obstructing their way down the mountain. They easily walked out of the mystic realm’s door of light and returned to Dragon Sea City. As soon as everyone walked out, Chu Pengcheng, who was pacing back and forth, hurriedly walked over. “How are you guys doing? How many have you sacrificed?” he asked anxiously. Bai Xinghe said in a low voice, “Three of our members were cut off from the team and were sacrificed.” Xu Xuan also sighed. “Two members of our Yang City Construction Division were also willing to stay behind to cover the retreat. They sacrificed themselves.” Chu Pengcheng’s heart was heavy. If only he could enter the Falling Thunder Mountain. Unfortunately, he could not. If he entered, he would probably be killed by the endless lightning of the Falling Thunder Mountain before he could save anyone. He could only guard outside. Seeing that the atmosphere was somewhat solemn, Wang Dafu hurriedly said, “Don’t be sad for now. Boss Chu, hurry up and use a Great Recovery skill. Just now, two members attracted the attention of the demon beasts and diverted the demon beasts away. Only then can we successfully escape. We still have to enter after recovering a little.” Chu Pengcheng immediately used his skill. Emerald green energy rippled from his hands, entering everyone’s bodies within a ten-meter radius like clean water. The injuries on Bai Xinghe and the others were recovering quickly at a visible speed. As he used his skill, Chu Pengcheng shouted, “Are they from the White Crane Town Construction Division?” Seeing Wang Dafu nod, he shouted, “Wang Dafu, how could you do such a thing? How can you disregard their lives?” There was a hint of reprimand in his voice. Clearly, he was dissatisfied with Wang Dafu’s behavior. Wang Dafu scratched his head. “Boss Chu, if you saw how ferocious those two guys were, you wouldn’t have such a reaction.” The anger on Chu Pengcheng’s face became even more intense. “Bullsh*t! No matter how ferocious those two members are, do you think it’s possible for them to defeat all the demon beasts of the Falling Thunder Mountain?!” He hurriedly arrived in front of Silver Fox with an apologetic expression. “Sorry, sorry. I’ll immediately arrange for martial artists in better condition to go in and save them. Don’t worry.” Silver Fox also scratched his head. He was actually very confident in Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion, but seeing Chu Pengcheng’s worried expression, it would seem strange if he acted indifferently. After all, Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion were members of their White Crane Town Construction Division! Silver Fox nodded. “Alright, find a few members who are in better condition and enter with us.” Bai Xinghe and Xu Xuan were the first to raise their hands. “We’ve already rested.” Wang Dafu coughed lightly. “I’ll go too.” Lu Luo and Wen Xiong also raised their hands. After resting for less than 20 minutes, the team formed by the twenty members of the Construction Division entered the Falling Thunder Mountain again. This time, the mission was to bring out Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion seatbelts. Before entering, Chu Pengcheng said solemnly, “We can’t let down every member who’s willing to contribute! We have to save them!” At the same time, two figures had already circled the Falling Thunder Mountain three times with the demon beasts. After three rounds, Lin Xuan’s health points had not decreased much at all. Flame Explosion had also not been touched by a single demon beast. However, the number of demon beasts chasing after them had decreased to one-third. Two-thirds of the demon beasts were already killed by Flame Explosion. Lin Xuan shrugged helplessly. “How much do you hate me? So many of you guys have already died, but you still want to chase after me.” Flame Explosion turned around and used Flame Explosion to blast more than ten demon beasts away. “The efficiency of killing is still a little low. If only I could obtain fire spells that are even more impressive than Flame Explosion.” Lin Xuan pondered. After another period of time, the demon beasts that were chasing after Lin Xuan all died. Only then did Lin Xuan heave a sigh of relief and directly climb to the higher levels of the Falling Thunder Mountain with his avatar. Because he always advanced perfectly every time, his attributes were very powerful. Although he was only at level three Sixth Realm now, he did not stop along the way. He directly arrived at the sixth floor of the Falling Thunder Mountain before he vaguely felt the pressure brought by the demon beasts. “Let’s stop here and find a few demon beasts with good survival skills to act as training avatars.” “Moreover, the Falling Thunder Mountain produces quite good minerals. I can remove my training avatar from the Inferior Demon Mountain and place it here.” Lin Xuan quickly realized what he needed to do and successfully possessed the Thunderbolt Lion, the Lightning Python, and the other demon beasts as his training avatars. However, because he still lacked some of the skills that were dropped in the Poison Miasma Cave, Lin Xuan did not place all seven training avatars here. Instead, he placed four training avatars here. “Begin the training!” With Lin Xuan’s order, the four training avatars immediately scattered and began to train according to their attack and defense strategy. As he trained, he heard a voice in his mind. [Current Area: Sixth floor of the Falling Thunder Mountain (4600 general coin per minute, 23,000 experience points per minute)] [Falling Thunder Mountain News: Under the influence of the advancement of the mystic realm, energy will disperse from the ground for 74 days and 13 hours. During this period, the drop rate of all items will increase by 100%, and the efficiency of obtaining general coins and experience points will increase to 300%.] Lin Xuan was stunned. A mystic realm advancement?! This was the first time he had heard about this. Lin Xuan pondered for a moment and did not rashly go to the seventh floor of the Falling Thunder Mountain. Instead, he found a relatively safe small mountain on the sixth floor and sat down. Through the view of his avatar, he observed the entire Falling Thunder Mountain. “The advancement of a mystic realm… From the words alone, it’s very likely that the mystic realm will become even more dangerous. Could it be that it’s going to go from a Sixth Realm mystic realm to a Seventh Realm mystic realm? Wait, it might even advance to the Eighth Realm and above !” “Due to the energy dissipated from the ground, the reproduction rate of the demon beasts had increased. Because of this, they surged out of the Falling Thunder Mountain and attacked the city.” “As the demon beasts reproduce faster, the drop rate of items on the demon beasts will naturally increase.” Although he could not exactly understand the meaning of the so-called mystic realm advancement, Lin Xuan knew that it was at least beneficial to him at the current moment. Especially since his experience points would be tripled! It was too awesome! “This continues for more than 70 days! How many experience points will I obtain? I have to quickly use this opportunity to obtain more experience points. I can worry about the loot in the Poison Miasma Cave later.” Lin Xuan immediately decided to remove all the training avatars from the Poison Miasma Cave and use all seven training avatar slots on the demon beasts of the Falling Thunder Mountain! Now, he could obtain 23,000 experience points per minute. After being multiplied by 300%, that would be 69,000 experience points. With the seven training avatars working at the same time, he would have nearly 700 million experience points per day. In 74 days, that would be 514 billion! It was already enough for Lin Xuan to rush to level nine Sixth Realm in a single breath! The additional experience points could also be used to increase his skills and runes. Moreover, Lin Xuan’s training avatar could become stronger by absorbing the falling lightning. The speed of their advancement was very fast. In perhaps two to three days, he would be able to change the training area from the sixth floor to the seventh, eighth, and even ninth floor.  In that case, he would obtain even more experience points! “I can’t wait to be suffocated by all these experience points.” Lin Xuan grinned from ear to ear. On the other side, Bai Xinghe, Wang Dafu, Silver Fox, and the others had already entered the mystic realm door of light again and were advancing towards the high ground of the Falling Thunder Mountain. “Shield Ghost! Flame Explosion!” Everyone shouted after walking for a while. However, these sounds would immediately be drowned by the endless lightning. It was simply a waste of time for one to compete with the sound of the thunder. Because the demon beasts had already been brought away by Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion, they quickly arrived at the fourth floor without any obstructions. However, after arriving at the fourth floor, they immediately saw a shocking scene. As far as the eye could see, there were dense demon beast charred corpses everywhere, and the air was filled with an alluring roasted meat smell. Wen Xiong could not help but squat down and cut a small portion before throwing it into his mouth. “Woah… I still feel the numbing electricity when I eat it. Delicious food!” Everyone :”…” “This was all done by Flame Explosion?” Xu Xuan said in shock. Bai Xinghe, who had always been solemn, could not help but pout at this moment. “He has too many magic power potions.” Although Bai Xinghe had increased his strength, that did not mean that he was unaware of the magic consumption of Flame Explosion. One of these items consumed 30% of one’s magic power. He only had enough magic power to throw out three. Even if his magic power recovered rapidly, his magic power still could not be consumed so quickly. Without more than a hundred Flame Explosion skills, it was impossible for there to be so many charred demon beast corpses. Bai Xinghe could only imagine that Flame Explosion must have a lot of magic potions. Moreover, in order to save people, Flame Explosion was actually willing to use so many magic power potions! Bai Xinghe was even more emotional. Silver Fox was also filled with praise. As a martial artist who focused and had learned many elemental spells, his understanding of magic was even deeper than Bai Xinghe’s. He also knew better than Bai Xinghe how high Flame Explosion’s Spirit and magic power would be in order to achieve such damage. Wang Dafu whispered, “Silver Fox, tell me something.” “Speak.” “Why don’t you transfer Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion to our Dragon Sea City’s Construction…” “Forget it! I’ll freaking fight you!” Silver Fox shouted. Wang Dafu coughed dryly. “After all these years of friendship…” Silver Fox said, “Who the hell are you? I don’t know you.” Wang Dafu :”…” Everyone smiled when they saw this, but they suppressed their laughter. Lu Luo was holding back her tears. “Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion should still be on the fourth floor. Let’s split up and find them. We’ll immediately contact them through the communicator.” The more than twenty Sixth Realm martial artists were divided into two teams and surrounded the fourth floor to search. Half an hour later, they finally met on the other side of the mountain. “Damn… How many demon corpses did I see along the way?” Wang Dafu swallowed. Xu Xuan frowned. “I roughly estimated that there were more than 8,000. It’s difficult to imagine how Flame Explosion did it.” Wang Dafu smacked his lips. “Flame Explosion is powerful, but we still also have to protect Shield Ghost well. These two are geniuses.” “However, we haven’t found Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion. I wonder if they have found them.” Song Zhong shook his head. “Hey, I see them.” Wang Dafu saw the figures of Bai Xinghe, Silver Fox, and the others in the distance, but he did not see any figures in black armor or black cloaks in the crowd. Wang Dafu’s heart skipped a beat. The two groups of people would quickly get together. The first thing they said when they met was… “Have you guys found Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion?” Hearing the other party say this in unison, everyone’s heads swelled. Silver Fox, who was originally very confident in Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion, was finally a little anxious. Could it be… Xu Xuan was so anxious that she could not calm down. Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion were only willing to lure the demon beasts away in order to save them. If these two people died, she would feel guilty for the rest of her life! Bai Xinghe frowned deeply. “Let’s all share our opinions. Where will the two of them go?” “Could it be that they happened to be behind us and have already returned to Dragon Sea City through the mystic realm door of light?” Song Zhong was the first to speak. Wang Dafu took out his communicator and said helplessly, “I’ve already contacted Boss Chu. He didn’t see anyone come out of the door of light.” Lu Luo raised her hand and said, “Could they have found a safe place to hide? The thunder is too loud, so it’s very normal for them to not be able to hear us.” “That’s a possibility.” Silver Fox nodded. Wen Xiong said solemnly, “Everyone, I have a guess.” “Speak.” “Could they have gone to a higher level?” “Huh?!” Other than the staff of the White Crane Town Construction Division, the corners of Bai Xinghe, Xu Xuan, Wang Dafu, and the others’ mouths twitched in disbelief. Bai Xinghe shook his head on the spot. “Impossible! The higher you go, the more dangerous it is. They must have consumed a lot of energy to lure the demon beasts away and kill many of them. How can they go higher?” Wang Dafu asked solemnly, “What’s the level of Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion?” Silver Fox scratched his head. “During the battle of White Crane Town’s guards, I think they were only at level one Sixth Realm. They should still be at level one Sixth Realm now.” Wang Dafu even shook his head. “That’s even more impossible. Very few people can jump levels to enter more dangerous areas, especially mystic realms like the Falling Thunder Mountain. Even if Old Bai is so ferocious, he only dares to train on the sixth and seventh floors after advancing to level nine Sixth Realm.” Bai Xinghe nodded. “That’s right. Going to the higher floors is no different from suicide.” Wang Dafu rubbed his temples and said helplessly, “How about this? We’ll search carefully from the original path and try our best to not miss any corner. If we still can’t find it, then we’ll consider the impossible.” An hour later, this group of martial artists met again on the other side of the Falling Thunder Mountain. Everyone saw the helplessness on their faces. In fact, everyone already had a terrifying thought, but they did not dare to say it. They would rather believe that Shield Ghost and Lin Xuan had gone to a higher level than to guess that Shield Ghost and Lin Xuan had already died in the demon beasts. Xu Xuan said solemnly, “With just the few of us, we can barely enter the fifth floor. However, if we enter the sixth floor, we’ll probably come out with heavy injuries.” At this moment, everyone suddenly saw two figures walk down the mountain together. A figure was enveloped in a black armor. The other figure wore a black cloak. The two of them were unscathed and did not have much blood on their bodies. Seeing Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion walk down from the higher levels, everyone’s mouths widened. Silver Fox directly cursed, “Damn, did they really go to the fifth floor?” “You’re all here? Didn’t I tell you to go out and rest?” Lin Xuan said. Wang Dafu rushed forward. “Are you guys alright?” Flame Explosion smiled and said, “Why wouldn’t we be?” Xu Xuan said anxiously, “How… did you escape from the demon beasts? We’ve been searching for hours on the fourth floor. We were almost worried to death.” Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. Seeing the relieved expressions on everyone’s faces, he felt a little warm in his heart. He did not expect these Construction Division members to really return to find him without hesitation. It was clear that they had not even recovered their health points. Moreover, the injuries on their bodies were also not yet healed. These guys… “After using up the magic power potions and magic power points of Flame Explosion, we gritted our teeth and went to the fifth floor. Fortunately, we did not encounter many demon beasts. After shaking off the thousands of demon beasts behind us, we also found a relatively safe small cave. We also hid until the demon beasts left before coming out.” Lin Xuan immediately said the words he had prepared. If he were to be honest and say that he was actually on the sixth floor instead of the fifth floor, these people in front of him would probably be so frightened that their jaws would go numb. More importantly, Lin Xuan’s main suspect, Song Zhong, was also in the crowd. Lin Xuan naturally did not want to appear too high-profile and decided to just tell a white lie. “Alright, alright, alright. It’s good that you’re fine. Great! Let’s go back and eat!” Silver Fox patted his shoulder heavily, and his eyes were a little red. In a residential area in Long Hai City. Many of the houses here had been cleaned and used as temporary residences for the members of White Crane Town and the Yang City Construction Division. “Fortunately, Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion have eliminated many demon beasts. There shouldn’t be any demon beasts surging out tonight. Tonight, the night shift will be handed to our Dragon Sea City Construction Division. Everyone, sleep well!” Chu Pengcheng drank a little and was very happy. In particular, after knowing that Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion had walked out of the mystic realm safely and killed many demon beasts, joy involuntarily rose. Everyone walked to their rooms. The houses were naturally shared by everyone. Moreover, they were also meticulously equipped with water and electricity. There were many pre-disaster books in the small bookcases in each room. If the members did not sleep for the long night, they could also read to relieve their boredom. However, when everyone saw Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion enter the same house, they were more or less shocked. This was especially true for a female member like Xu Xuan. Her beautiful eyes directly widened like huge eggs. After Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion closed the door, Xu Xuan could not help but ask, “Lu Luo, are they like this in White Crane Town?” Lu Luo shook her head. “Not really…” Xu Xuan heaved a sigh of relief. Lu Luo had a difficult expression. “In White Crane Town, they lived together with another man.” “Hiss…!” Xu Xuan gasped again. Clearly, Bai Xinghe had never seen such a blatant same-sex cohabitation. His solemn face could not help but twitch as he hurriedly returned to his room. In the room. Even after closing the door, Lin Xuan did not remove the high-level Avatar Technique. Instead, he allowed Flame Explosion to lie on the other bed. There were many perverts every year, especially during doomsdays. If someone like Black or Zhou Feng also liked to climb through the window and saw that there was only one person in his room, that would be bad. To be cautious, Lin Xuan decided to maintain his high-level avatar skill. “Time to sleep! I’ll be able to see the gains tomorrow.” Lin Xuan entered his dreamland happily. … The night was peaceful. No demon beasts surged out of the Falling Thunder Mountain. Lin Xuan sat up straight from the bed and muttered the word “collect”. [Thunderbolt Lion has been training for 10 hours and has reached the upper limit of its training time. Obtained 8.28 million general coins, 41.4 million experience points, 4 Sixth Realm skill books, 7 Sixth Realm equipment, 5 Sixth Realm runes, 3 Thunder Rock, 1 rune bug, 2 heavy crystals, 2 Black Frost Flowers, and 1 profession scroll. Do you wish to collect?] [Lightning Python has been training for 10 hours and has reached the upper limit of its training time. Obtained 8.28 million general coins, 41.4 million experience points, 2 Sixth Realm skill books, 4 Sixth Realm equipment, 9 Sixth Realm runes, 1 rune bug, 4 heavy crystals, and 1 Black Frost Flower. Do you wish to collect?] [The Thunder Cry Turtle has been trained…] [The Iron Claw Bear has been trained…] The gains of the seven training avatars surged into his consciousness space like a tide. Lin Xuan was overwhelmed by the dazzling array of items. He rubbed his hands excitedly and immediately began to carefully check his gains. Thunder Rock ,+1% Lightning Damage. Rune Insect ,+1% rune drop rate. Heavy Crystal ,+1 Spirit. Black Frost Flower ,+1% frost resistance. “Looks like the gains in the Falling Thunder Mountain are also quite abundant. The Thunder Rock is similar to the Black Frost Flower, but the Rune Insect is quite good. What I lack the most are runes. Also, this Heavey Crystal is a gem among the good stuff!” Lin Xuan used these attribute items in a single breath. There was a limit to the use of attribute items. For example, items like the Deep Rock Crystal and the Heavy Crystal that directly increased one’s Constitution and Spirit could at most increase one’s Constitution and Spirit by 50 points. The upper limit for the general coins, experience points, skill books, equipment, and runes that were obtained was 20%. Any more and it would be useless. As for attributes like lightning resistance and lightning damage, the upper limit was 50%. As for attack speed and movement speed, they also had their own limits. Moreover, each mystic realm could only drop at most 10 attribute items. Any more and it would be useless. Martial artists either went to other mystic realms to find new attribute items or traded for them. The attribute items provided by the seven training avatars were barely enough for Lin Xuan to use alone. After consuming them, his basic attributes were: Constitution 379, Strength 110, Spirit 120, Agility 110. As for skills, most of the skills in the Falling Thunder Mountain were related to lightning. Lightning Storm was a huge AOE skill that surpassed Flame Explosion. Lightning Shield was a rare protective skill for mages. It could absorb a lot of lightning damage. As for physical damage, magic damage, and other elemental damage, it also had a good absorption rate. Thunder Spear was a close-combat skill that was suitable for demon warriors with both high Strength and Spirit. There was also Flash! No matter what type of martial artist it was, Flash was an extremely powerful life-saving and counterattack skill. Some people used Flash to move graves, and some people killed with Flash. It all depended on how Flash was used. —- Name: Flash Level: Level One Sixth Realm Grade: Ordinary White Effect: Teleport to any place within a 10-meter radius. Cooldown time: 24 hours. —- Seeing this skill, Lin Xuan was overjoyed. This was extremely useful. Most importantly, for ordinary martial artists, they could only get a rare blue grade Flash skill. However, Lin Xuan had many training avatars who trained day and night. Sooner or later, he would be able to grind Flash to the peerless golden grade. Once its grade became peerless golden, the effect would definitely be greatly enhanced. The range of Flash would increase, and the cooldown time would decrease. As long as it was used well, it would definitely become a magic weapon that could help him win by surprise! As for the equipment dropped from the Falling Thunder Mountain, they were all single items that were not part of any sets. Lin Xuan did not care about them. Lastly, there were runes. This mystic realm contained the rune group Darkness Shattering Lightning. However, Lin Xuan had already gathered this rune group. Lin Xuan pushed open the door and walked out, welcoming the morning sun. Xu Xuan also happened to walk out of her room and met Lin Xuan’s eyes. Lin Xuan nodded as a form of greeting. However, Xu Xuan’s face turned red as she hurriedly ran away. Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. This woman was really… What was there to be shy about? Wasn’t it just two men sleeping together? After eating the breakfast provided by the Dragon Sea City canteen, everyone entered the Falling Thunder Mountain mystic realm again. Because many martial artists had already rested and recovered from their injuries yesterday, a total of more than 80 Sixth Realm martial artists entered the Falling Thunder Mountain this time. This was also the combat strength of most Sixth Realm martial artists in White Crane Town, Dragon Sea City, and Yang City. After entering the mystic realm, it was naturally impossible for everyone to gather and advance together. Otherwise, the efficiency would be too low. They had to split up and eliminate the demon beasts separately. Yesterday, because there were too many demon beasts that had gathered because of the smell of blood, Bai Xinghe, Xu Xuan, and the others had been trapped and almost died. Wang Dafu coughed lightly and brushed the few remaining hairs on his head until it was bright. Then, he walked towards Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion. Lu Luo smiled spuriously. “You want to team up with them?” Wang Dafu was stunned and said vigilantly, “You want to team up with them too?” Lu Luo shook her head with a worried expression. “We won’t be able to. Their relationship is as firm as a rock, and it’s not up to a third person to interfere.” As soon as he finished speaking, the two of them saw Bai Xinghe rub his face and try to smile kindly as he walked towards Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion. “Gentlemen, are you willing to join our team? The two of you have outstanding combat strength. You can choose the various items first.” Bai Xinghe had always been a serious person. It was really difficult for him to invite others. Hearing this, Lin Xuan shook his head firmly and looked at Flame Explosion. “What about you?” Flame Explosion also shook his head. “The two of us have a tacit understanding. We don’t need to join others. Nor do we need anyone else.” Bai Xinghe’s face was stiff. “Well… Alright.” Lu Luo shrugged. “See?” Wang Dafu said aggrieved, “Silver Fox, let’s team up.” Silver Fox was at a loss whether to laugh or cry. Wang Dafu looked at the backs of Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion somewhat enviously. “However, their relationship is really good. They’re very similar to you and Black back then.” Silver Fox shook his head repeatedly. “That’s right. Black can come up with new swear words every day. I, on the other hand, don’t use profanities.” After Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion left, the other martial artists also scattered and began to eliminate the demon beasts. Of course, it was impossible for them to form groups of two Lin Xuan. They had to team up with at least four people. Moreover, they had to ensure that there was a captain above level seven Sixth Realm in the team. The training time was somewhat boring. Half a month passed in a flash. After half a month, through continuous bitter cultivation, Lin Xuan obtained 10.5 billion experience points. In a single breath, he increased his martial artist’s level from level three Sixth Realm to level five Sixth Realm. At the same time, he also increased his commonly used skills, such as the High-Level Avatar Technique, Observer Technique, High-Level Perception, Demon King of Fury, High-Level Thorn Body, and so on by one or two levels. During this period of time, he had also obtained many profession scrolls. Most of the grades were low, and there were only six rare blue ones. He had also obtained one precious purple one, but there was still not a single peerless golden one. Thanks to these profession scrolls, there were now a lot of new synthesis formulas in the synthesis list in his consciousness space For example: Pugilist (Rare Blue) = Warrior+Berserker+Boxer Flame Sword Baron (Rare Blue) = Warrior+Swordsman+Fire Mage+Magic Affinity Shadow Martial Artist (Rare Blue) = Assassin+Ordinary Man+Poison Thrower Elemental Mage (Precious Purple) = Mage+Fire Mage+Poison Mage+Lightning Mage+Frost Mage Killer (Precious Purple) = Assassin+Ninja+Bloodthirsty Man+Wind Walker Movement Stronghold (Precious Purple) = Armored Soldier+Shieldbearer+Heavy Armor General+Self Healer Great Druid (peerless golden) = Mage+Warrior+Beast Speaker+Natural Affinity+Shapeshifter War Knight (peerless golden) = Armored Soldier+Knight+Berserker+Spear Soldier+Axe Soldier+War General … As more and more peerless golden professions appeared in front of him, Lin Xuan began to find it difficult to choose. “It’s a little like when I used to order takeout. I was clearly so hungry that my head was dizzy, but I still kept scrolling down the menu, I slowly lost my appetite.” Lin Xuan smacked his lips. He found himself in a familiar predicament. It was too hard to choose. “Sigh, I really envy others. They definitely won’t be so vexed. It’s also a form of distress to have too many choices.” “Eh, this profession…” Lin Xuan suddenly saw a synthesis formula flickering with golden light at the bottom of the list. Tyrant (peerless golden) = Armored Soldier+Warrior+Mage+Assassin+Mobile Fortress+Archdruid+Elemental Mage+Killer “This profession is quite interesting. It occupies all four basic professions.” Lin Xuan had seen a lot of synthesis formulas. Among them, this was the most special one he had ever seen. The other professions basically took up one or two basic professions, and very few took up three basic professions. Usually, the synthesis method was extremely difficult. “I wonder what the corresponding profession skill is. If it’s not good, it’s still not suitable for me.” —- Name: Tyrant Grade: Peerless Golden Profession Skill: Attribute Gain Profession Skill Effect: Increase other three attributes by 30% of the highest attribute. —- Seeing the effect of this skill, Lin Xuan’s eyes widened. “Damn, why is it so ferocious?” “Wait, this skill is still passive! Its effects are permanent!” “My current highest attribute is Constitution. 379 points, and 30% means more than 110 points! With this, my total attribute will directly increase by more than 300 points!” Lin Xuan’s face was filled with surprise. Attributes were always the most important. Constitution provided various resistance, health recovery, weight, and so on. Strength provided physical damage and energy recovery. Spirit provided magic, elemental damage, magic power recovery, and so on. Agility provided attack speed, movement speed, dodging rate, and so on. As long as his attributes were high enough, he could kill everyone even without a single skill or equipment. “If all four of my attributes were 1,000 points, I wouldn’t need to develop at all. I could directly roam the world.” Lin Xuan was filled with joy. However, he was not overjoyed. After all, this was only a synthesis formula and had not really been synthesized. “This profession is indeed impressive, but it’s also very difficult to synthesize. Indeed, it’s impossible for me to obtain such an awesome profession so easily. I wonder who came up with this profession.” Lin Xuan carefully looked at the synthesis list. During this period of time, he had been training diligently and training day and night. His hard work had also paid off. In the synthesis formula of the Tyrant profession, the professions Elemental Mage and Killer could be directly synthesized. He could even directly synthesize three Elemental Mage professions. Now, he only lacked the Mobile Fortress and the Archdruid. “No rush, no rush. In any case, Dragon Sea City is very safe. I have enough time to obtain those profession scrolls.” After a short moment of excitement, Lin Xuan had already calmed down. … In the canteen of the Construction Division of Dragon Sea City. Lin Xuan and Flame Explosion found an empty table and sat down to eat. In order to fabricate Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion’s preferences in food, Lin Xuan gave himself hot dry noodles, sweet and sour spinach, and stir-fry. On the other hand, Flame Explosion’s plate was filled with fried fish, fries, and burgers. Lu Luo sat beside him and asked, “The fried fish today was rather delicious. Why didn’t you buy some?” Lin Xuan shook his head. “I don’t like fish. Flame Explosion likes it.” Lu Luo nodded. Even if Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion had a good relationship, it was natural for him to have different preferences for food. She did not ask much and immediately began to eat her food. If a Sixth Realm martial artist was eating here, the other martial artists naturally have a tacit understanding and would not come over. It was like how if a few teachers were suddenly having a gathering in a school canteen, the students would stay far away. It was not that they were afraid. Instead, they simply felt uneasy eating beside the teacher. Perhaps, the teacher would randomly check if the students had listened to the class seriously today. After Shield Ghost, Flame Explosion, and Lu Luo sat down, Bai Xinghe, Xu Xuan, Song Zhong, Wang Dafu, and Wen Xiong all sat down at the long table. “How was your harvest today?” Silver Fox also sat down with a tray and chuckled. Song Zhong smiled and said, “I’m quite lucky to have obtained a rare blue scroll. It’s a Ghost Swordsman profession.” Wen Xiong said in surprise, “This profession is not bad. It’s also quite suitable for you.” Song Zhong nodded smugly. “That’s right. It should be impossible for me to obtain higher grade profession scrolls. I plan to use this to advance to the Seventh Realm. I should be able to get enough experience points in a month.” “What about you guys?” Silver Fox asked. Xu Xuan smiled. “You definitely won’t be able to guess what scroll I obtained.” Other than Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion, the others looked up. “Could it be of the precious purple grade?” Xu Xuan’s face was filled with happiness. “That’s right! Moreover, it’s very suitable for my profession, the Saint Hand! This profession has an additional 25% increase in recovery skills!” Everyone praised repeatedly. “Damn, you won’t have to worry about medics in the future.” “You’re basically a medic yourself.” “Impressive, impressive. Xu Xuan, your Yang City has profited greatly this time! You’ll probably be able to be a deputy director when you return.” Silver Fox raised his thumb. Xu Xuan smiled from ear to ear, revealing her two small dimples. However, other than Song Zhong and Xu Xuan, the others’ gains were relatively ordinary. Bai Xinghe only obtained an uncommon green profession scroll, the Ice Spear Mage. The skill effect of this profession was that one could obtain a 50% increase in damage when using the Ice Spear Technique, which was equivalent to a highly specialized Ice Spear Technique. However, there were many kinds of demon beasts. If he encountered a demon with high frost resistance or an enemy with a lot of frost resistance, the ice spear master profession would definitely be useless. Very few people would use this profession. Wang Dafu, Silver Fox, and the others also sighed. As they envied Xu Xuan’s good luck, they complained about their bad luck. “Hey, what about the two of you?” Song Zhong suddenly asked. “Shield Ghost, Flame Explosion, in the past half a month, other than eating in the canteen, I haven’t seen the two of you much. How was your harvest? If you don’t mind, can you tell me?” Lin Xuan looked up. “Do you really want to know?” Song Zhong nodded. “I do mind,” Lin Xuan said solemnly. Song Zhong’s expression froze. Damn, then why did you ask if I wanted to know? He could not help but laugh and say, “…Hahaha, Shield Ghost, you’re still so straightforward.” In order to ease the awkwardness, Silver Fox hurriedly said, “Ahem… Have you guys noticed that something strange has happened near Dragon Sea City recently?” Wang Dafu stopped eating the chicken leg and said solemnly, “Indeed. It seems that more demon beasts have gathered near Dragon Sea City.” Bai Xinghe also put down his chopsticks and said with a frown, “I noticed it too, but these demon beasts don’t seem like they’re planning to surround and attack us. They seemed to have been attracted by some force and gathered naturally.” Lin Xuan frowned slightly when he heard this. The demon beasts should have been affected by the energy emitted by the advancement of the mystic realm. It would still take 59 days for the Falling Thunder Mountain to completely advance. If they allowed the demon beasts to gather, these demon beasts would probably eventually form an extremely terrifying demon beast group. At that time, a mere Dragon Sea City Construction Division would not be able to guard it. Lin Xuan knocked on the table. “No matter what the reason is, it’s definitely not a good thing for the demon beasts to gather in Dragon Sea City. If their numbers increase and they form a demon beast group, it will definitely affect the civilians living in Dragon Sea City.” Wang Dafu, Bai Xinghe, and the others nodded in agreement. Dragon Sea City was much bigger than White Crane Town. There were more than 100,000 people living here, and most of them were First Realm martial artists. They were not much different from ordinary people. Since the demon beasts were gathering, they definitely could not rely on these people to resist. Once a gap appeared in the city wall of Dragon Sea City and a few demon beasts rushed in, it was very likely for civilians to die. That was the last thing the Construction Division wanted to see. “I suggest that the members of the Construction Division cleanse the place regularly. We can’t let the number of demon beasts increase. All the hidden dangers have to be eradicated in the early stages.” “If you discover a higher-level demon beast that you can’t deal with, report it immediately and let the stronger members deal with it.” Flame Explosion also put down his burger and said indifferently. “That makes sense. Hey, it’s good that Boss Chu is here for dinner. Let’s talk to him.” Wang Dafu nodded repeatedly. At this moment, he saw Chu Pengcheng walk over with a tray. Hearing their words, Chu Pengcheng did not retort. “Shield Ghost, Flame Explosion, you guys are right. You should eradicate all the hidden dangers in the early stages.” “Boss Chu, sit, sit.” Although he said that, Wang Dafu only symbolically stuck out his butt and did not even move. The corners of Chu Pengcheng’s mouth twitched. He wondered if he was too lacking in dignity. This brat Wang Dafu didn’t even give up his seat! “I won’t be sitting down. I came over because I have something to tell you in advance.” Chu Pengcheng waved his hand. Wang Dafu smiled cunningly and whispered, “You can’t sit even if you want to.” Chu Pengcheng was furious. He casually cast a recovery spell on Wang Dafu’s head. Wang Dafu instantly shouted and stood up. “It’s so hot! Don’t touch my food! I’ll go to the washroom to get some cold water!” He swung his fat body and rushed towards the bathroom. Lin Xuan was shocked. He didn’t know that the recovery spell had such an effect. Lu Luo whispered, “It’s the same state as over-healing someone.” Only then did Lin Xuan nod with a strange expression. “What is it, Boss Chu? Tell me,” Bai Xinghe asked. “It’s still about the front line.” Chu Pengcheng sighed. Everyone immediately stopped eating and stared at him seriously. Lin Xuan was no exception. Currently, he still needed to rely on the Construction Division to take advantage of the situation. Let alone everything else, he still needed to go to the two large mystic realms controlled by the Construction Division. If something major happened to the Construction Division, it would also be bad news for Lin Xuan. “Don’t be so nervous. It’s not bad news. It’s just that the war at the front line is quite intense, and the consumables are being used very quickly. The headquarters hope that the Construction Division everywhere will speed up the production of various potions and send them to the front line.” Seeing that everyone was so nervous, Chu Pengcheng hurriedly comforted them and told them the news. Everyone hurriedly heaved a sigh of relief. They all couldn’t help but feel speechless. The other party had suddenly made the atmosphere so tense and frightened them for nothing. Lin Xuan raised his hand. “If the Construction Divisions from all over the world are manufacturing and sending potions to the front line, then does that mean that the headquarters will be giving out corresponding rewards?” Chu Pengcheng nodded. “That’s natural. The good stuff from the Drowning City mystic realm has been collected. The General Division is already setting up a reward list. The various Construction Divisions will obtain rewards after completing a certain number of missions.” “For example, Drowning City produces a type of bead. As long as you grind it into powder and eat it, you can move underwater for a short period of time without any equipment. The more you eat, the longer you can stay underwater. This way, you can also dive into deeper areas!” “Also, the Drowning City has various zombies. As long as they are specially refined, they can be used in a certain way. Their defense is extremely powerful, especially their frost resistance. At critical moments, they can be used as life-saving tools.” “There’s also another special thing in Drowning City. I also heard it from a friend from the General Division. It’s a treasure that can save your life!” Speaking of the last thing, Chu Pengcheng could not help but look forward to it. “Save your life?!” Everyone gasped. If so, this was a really good treasure! Lin Xuan was also shocked. He had only seen one thing that could save his life. The Giant Shield Set in his consciousness space had an immunity to fatal damage. However, it could only resist this damage once. After blocking, the set would directly shatter. If Drowning City could produce more of these treasures, the strength of the Construction Division would probably increase greatly. After all, it would be equivalent to many high-level combatants gaining an additional life! “It’s not as powerful as you think. They all have side effects. The Ghost Buddha Lamp of the Reed Country and the Jade Blood Pill Heart of the Kunlun Ruins both have side effects. This item from the Drowning City is no different.” Chu Pengcheng waved his hand. “In short, the reward list should be announced in a day or two. Everyone, be careful. While we’re cleaning up the demon beasts of the Falling Thunder Mountain, we also have to collect more mystic realm items so that we can deliver medicinal potions to the front line members.” Everyone nodded in unison. “By the way, do any of you have the medicinal skill?” Chu Pengcheng asked. Among the Sixth Realm martial artists present, only Silver Fox and Xu Xuan raised their hands. “Just the two of you?” Hearing this, Lin Xuan also raised his hand. “I know how to, but only a little.” Wen Xiong, who had been eating and drinking, was immediately shocked. “Shield Ghost, you even know how to make potions?” “Damn, how do you have so many experience points to spend?” Silver Fox was also very surprised. Lin Xuan said without thinking, “I usually train when everyone’s resting.” “How impressive!” Wen Xiong praised. “I’m ashamed of my inferiority.” Silver Fox sighed. “Starting tomorrow, I’ll sleep an hour later and wake up an hour earlier.” A solemn look flashed in Bai Xinghe’s eyes. Xu Xuan, Lu Luo, Song Zhong, and the others were also shocked by Lin Xuan’s words. Seeing everyone so energetic, Chu Pengcheng was very satisfied. “Good! I like this energy!” Chu Pengcheng’s words were quickly realized. Two days later, an order from the Construction Division was placed on his desk. At the same time, a long reward list appeared. It included the battle merits one could obtain from making various potions and the rewards that could be exchanged for battle merits. Chu Pengcheng cleared his throat and immediately announced this news to the entire Dragon Sea City through the radio. He also posted the reward list outside his office so that everyone could see it clearly. Lin Xuan also looked over. Life Potion, 1 battle credit. The Great Life Potion, 5 battle merits. Magic Power Potion, 1 battle credit. The Great Magic Power Potion, 5 battle merits. Basic Strength Potion, 1 battle credit. High-level Strength Potion, 5 battle merits. … Lin Xuan rubbed his hands. Battle merits! Now that he had the chance to earn more battle merits, he did not have to worry about entering the large mystic realm in the future. He could also use his battle merits to exchange for some special treasures produced in Drowning City. Lin Xuan continued to look down and suddenly saw that the battle merits for the next four potions were different from the other potions. Basic Fire Wound Potion, 5 battle merits. High-level Fire Wound Potion, 10 battle merits! Basic Ice Resistance Potion, 5 battle merits. High-Level Ice Resistance Potion, 10 battle merits! After a short moment of confusion, Lin Xuan immediately reacted. Most of the demon beasts in the Drowning City mystic realm had frost damage. Moreover, their frost resistance was also high. After fighting, the members of the Construction Division would consume a lot of Fire Wound Potion and Ice Resistance Potion, so they naturally needed a lot of replenishment. “I will get a lot of battle merits if I make these two potions!” He immediately swept his gaze around in his consciousness space and discovered that with the attribute items he currently had, he could create Basic Fire Wound Potions, Basic Ice Resistance Potions, and High-Level Ice Resistance Potions. The synthesis formula for the three potions was: Basic Fire Wound Potion = 1 Flame Flower+3 water (Uncommon Green) Basic Ice Resistance Potion = 1 Ice Demon Core+3 water (Uncommon Green) High-Level Ice Resistance Potion = 1 Black Frost Flower+3 water (Rare Blue) The difference between low-level and high-level potions was that low-level potions were made with attribute items dropped from mystic realms below Fifth Realm. On the other hand, high-level potions were made with attribute items dropped from mystic realms above Fifth Realm. The water here referred to the water in the various mystic realms. The water only needed to be purified and meet the relevant standards. The higher the level of purification, the higher the grade and the more suitable it was for making potions. The synthesis formula of the synthesis table was only the most basic requirement. If he did not use uncommon green water to make the Basic Fire Wound Potion and instead used rare blue water, the effect of the Basic Fire Wound Potion would naturally be better. Moreover, this was a real world and not a game. The things produced would fluctuate in a certain range. Also, the synthesis formula was quite flexible. Basic Fire Wound Potion required Flame Flower, but Flame Flower could be replaced with other items. It could be replaced with Fire Bag Fruit or Fire Feather. Any of such items were fine as long as they were attribute items that could increase fire damage. If so, they could all be used to make this potion. “Unfortunately, I can’t make High-Level Fire Wound Potions.” Lin Xuan shrugged. In the mystic realms he had currently come into contact with, there were no mystic realms above the Fifth Realm that produced the relevant attribute items. However, he was not dejected. After all, he had three synthesis tables and had used general coins to increase his efficiency. Now, his efficiency had already increased by 100%, equivalent to six martial artists with maxed up medicinal skills helping him make potions day and night. He pondered for a moment before activating the three medicinal tables and getting them to make the Basic Fire Wound Potion, Basic Ice Resistance Potion, and High-Level Ice Resistance Potion. “These training avatars of mine haven’t been getting much Black Frost Flowers. After this news is released, the other Sixth Realm martial artists will definitely prioritize finding the Black Frost Flowers. I have to make a move early.” Lin Xuan gave his seven training avatars a training strategy and changed their priority to the “Black Frost Flower”. In this way, the seven training avatars would immediately search for the Black Frost Flower. On the way, they would also continue to train and kill other demon beasts. In this way, the efficiency of obtaining the Black Frost Flower would increase greatly. “Time to start grinding the Black Frost Flowers!” Lin Xuan led Flame Explosion into the mystic realm’s door of light and entered the Falling Thunder Mountain, satisfied! Lu Luo, Wen Xiong, and the others also started to become more arrogant when they saw him being so arrogant. Lu Luo said solemnly, “Let’s go in too! The more Black Frost Flowers we find, the fewer casualties the front line members will suffer.” Wen Xiong nodded repeatedly. At the same time, after Lin Xuan entered the Falling Thunder Mountain with an excited expression, he directly found a cave on the sixth floor to lie down comfortably. From time to time, he would even adjust his position. This cave was discovered by chance when his seven avatars were training. Its location was hidden. There were also many furs in the cave that could ensure that Lin Xuan was lying comfortably. “My training avatars, work hard. Whether or not I can obtain a large number of battle merits will all depend on you!” Lin Xuan hurriedly cheered on his training avatars. … Half a day later, Lin Xuan suddenly discovered that something was wrong. Song Zhong. This guy did not team up with others today. Instead, he wandered around the Falling Thunder Mountain alone and specially crawled into various caves. This was actually not difficult to understand. The Black Frost Flowers did not grow on the surface of the Falling Thunder Mountain, but in relatively dark places. The caves were a good place for them to grow. However, every time Song Zhong found the Black Frost Flower, he would not stuff it into the storage compartment but… directly destroy it! After destroying it, he would not leave any traces behind. This way, if outsiders found this place, they would not have discovered that Black Frost Flowers had once grown here. “You’re indeed a spy.” Lin Xuan sneered. Any member of the Construction Division would definitely not do such a thing. They were all willing to find more Black Frost Flowers and create more medicinal potions so that the soldiers on the front line would be able to use them to recover. “However… I’m the only one who knows about this. This is because only I have a training avatar. I can’t tell Chu Pengcheng that I secretly discovered that Song Zhong was a spy. If Chu Pengcheng asks me how I found out, I’ll be exposed.” Lin Xuan scratched his head. Suddenly, his eyes lit up. “Got it. I’ll find a deserted place and kill him!” He could not help but praise his wit. Indeed, directly killing him was the best way. “Moreover, I don’t even have to do anything to kill them. I’ll just let my training avatars do it.” Lin Xuan snapped his fingers and had all seven training avatars gather in the direction of Song Zhong. His training avatar could usually train on their own according to the training strategy Lin Xuan chose. However, Lin Xuan could also directly control it. Of course, it was a little tiring to control seven views at the same time. Soon, the seven training avatars quietly arrived behind Song Zhong. At this moment, Song Zhong had just come out of a cave. Destroying the Black Frost Flower was also a tiring job, and he was covered in sweat. The beads of sweat fell as the cold air emitted by the black frost flowers hit Song Zhong, making him feel as if his entire body had fallen into an ice cave, as if he was in a dead end. “En, what’s this outside? So it’s seven Sixth Realm demon beasts… Wait, what?!” Song Zhong cried out and fell to the ground with a thump from fear. The process of killing Song Zhong was surprisingly simple. It was so simple that Lin Xuan felt like he was playing a game. The seven training avatars he controlled were like seven players, and Song Zhong was like a small monster. That’s right. Although Song Zhong’s attributes were considered not bad among martial artists of the same level, his situation was still difficult as he was still facing seven level nine Sixth Realm training avatars! The demon beasts of the Falling Thunder Mountain could all become stronger by being struck by lightning. Lin Xuan’s seven training avatars could naturally do the same. Previously, when Lin Xuan had entered the Falling Thunder Mountain to possess these seven training avatars, they had already been at level six Sixth Realm. After absorbing the falling lightning for a few days, they quickly advanced to level nine Sixth Realm. Seven level nine Sixth Realm demon beasts surrounded and attacked the level eight Sixth Realm martial artist. The battle could not be said to be filled with ups and downs. It could only be said to be calm. Song Zhong was instantly drowned by the lightning spat out by the seven training avatars. He did not even have the time to drink his potions. His body instantly turned to charcoal, and various items in the storage compartment fell out and were picked up by the training avatars. One of the training avatars dug a deep pit, and the other training avatars pushed Song Zhong’s corpse into it. Before leaving, they had to completely erase the traces of the battle. Lin Xuan immediately checked Song Zhong’s various items in his consciousness space. “Damn, he’s just a poor man. How useless.” Lin Xuan flipped through and saw only one peerless golden equipment and one peerless golden skill book. There were even very few precious purple grade items. The rest were mostly rare blue grade items. Other than that, there was nothing else! Moreover, this equipment was not part of any set. Its effect was also relatively ordinary. Lin Xuan was so furious that he directly threw it onto the smelting table. After smelting this peerless Sixth Realm golden equipment, it could provide a large number of equipment essence. Lin Xuan felt that it was still acceptable. As for the peerless golden skill book, it surprised him. —- Name: Wind Rush Level: Level Three Sixth Realm Grade: Peerless Golden Effect 1: Movement speed permanently+20%. Effect 2: Consumes 25% of energy, movement speed+25%, lasts for 3 minutes. —- “This skill is not bad. I’ll learn it!” “I take back my previous words. Song Zhong, you’re still useful.” A skill that increased movement speed was useful for any profession. At this moment, Lin Xuan discovered something. A badge. On the badge was a red sun on the sea, and eight blood-red lights spread in all directions. The more he looked, the more uncomfortable he felt. After a while, Lin Xuan reacted. “A red sun split by the horizon and the sea? Isn’t this the High Heaven Plains badge?” “Song Zhong, now I can say with certainty that you’re a spy from the High Heaven Plains!” Lin Xuan sneered. This guy was definitely a bad guy. He had killed the right person. At night, it was time for dinner again. Lin Xuan and the other Sixth Realm martial artists sat around the long table with solemn expressions. Chu Pengcheng looked at Silver Fox and said in a low voice, “Everyone, Song Zhong did not return from the mystic realm of the Falling Thunder Mountain. We did not find his figure. Our initial prediction is that it’s likely that he had died.” Silver Fox sighed. Everyone’s mood was also somewhat heavy. Only half a month had passed, but the death of the first Sixth Realm martial artist had already appeared. Lin Xuan also pretended to be solemn. He did not expose Song Zhong’s true identity. This was because he knew it would alarm the others. Who could guarantee that Song Zhong was the only spy in the Construction Division? Moreover, the large organizations in the world were all infiltrating each other. Other than High Heaven Plains, there were other organizations that might send spies. The difference was that the members of the High Heaven Plains and the Construction Division used to be citizens of the Xia Country and the Border Country. The citizens of the two countries were all Easterners and it was easier for them to send spies to infiltrate each other. If this world was really no different from Earth before the global digitization, then the number of spies sent by the High Heaven Plains to the Construction Division would definitely not be small. Lin Xuan had once seen an estimate that there were at least hundreds of thousands of Border Country spies in Xia Country, infiltrating various professions. After the global digitization, many of them might have displayed their strength and been recruited by the Construction Division. They had not been exposed until now. “There’s also the round-faced little sister in White Crane Town who’s very suspicious. I’m not sure about the Construction Division of Dragon Sea City, but I can’t rule out the possibility that there are other spies hiding.” Lin Xuan’s thoughts raced as he immediately thought of a good opportunity. The various Construction Division wanted to send a large number of medicinal potions to the front line. This was definitely not something the spies wanted to see. Perhaps they would make a move. At that time, as long as he found a good location to observe, he would probably be able to find a few more spies. “I just want to enjoy the protection and benefits of the Construction Division. I’ll destroy anyone that opposes me.” Lin Xuan gradually confirmed his thoughts. Those who did not let him relax and become stronger steadily were all bad people! … Song Zhong’s death enveloped Dragon Sea City in a sad atmosphere. However, life still had to continue. In the blink of an eye, a month passed. There were only two weeks left until the abnormality of the Falling Thunder Mountain. In just a month, Lin Xuan had obtained 22.2 billion experience points. He increased his martial artist’s level from level five Sixth Realm to level seven Sixth Realm in one go, directly consuming 18 billion experience points. The 16 free attribute points he obtained after leveling up were still spent on the highest attribute Constitution. In this way, his basic Constitution had already reached 411 and directly broke through the 400 mark! During this period of time, Lin Xuan had also made many potions from the three synthesis tables in his consciousness space. There were more than a thousand Basic Fire Wound Potions and Basic Ice Resistance Potions. On average, he made more than 30 potions a day. As for the High-Level Ice Resistance Potion, even though the efficiency of the workstation had increased by 100%, it still took him a long time to make them. On average, he could only make about 15 of them per day. After a month, he could only make more than 400. Because Lu Luo, Wen Xiong, and the others did not have the medicinal skill, they also gave the Black Frost Flowers they had found to Lin Xuan and got him to help them make the potions. After the potions were made, they would split the battle merits. Shield Ghost would get 70%, and they would get the rest. “With so many potions, it will definitely reduce the casualties of the Construction Division members on the front line.” Lin Xuan was very satisfied. If not for the front line members blocking the entrance of the Drowning City mystic realm and the demon beasts that were surging out, how could ordinary people live peacefully? Thanks to them, Lin Xuan could also become stronger while guaranteeing his safety. He did not need to go out and take the risk of killing demons beasts. “Everyone, it’s the end of the month! It’s time to collect the potions!” “The first place, second place, and third place on the contribution list this time can obtain three, two, and one Water Prevention Pearl, respectively.” In the director’s office of the Construction Division of Dragon Sea City, Chu Pengcheng broadcasted his voice to the entire Dragon Sea City. Crash. A large number of martial artists surged towards the office. Even if Chu Pengcheng had already placed dozens of staff here in advance, this place was still packed. “Don’t be anxious! Everyone has a share of the battle merits!” “Hey, why did you bring a Life Potion that was mixed with so much water to exchange for battle merits? This is too much!” “Your Basic Ice Resistance Potion is not qualified. There are too many impurities.” Various chaotic noises sounded, making the atmosphere here seem like a market. “Silver Fox, 104 bottles of Basic Fire Wound Potion, 82 bottles of Basic Ice Resistance Potion, and 35 bottles of High-Level Ice Resistance Potion. You have received 1,280 battle merits this time!” A high voice suddenly sounded, immediately shocking many members. Everyone’s eyes gathered on Silver Fox. This old and stingy guy was actually good at making potions! Silver Fox was rather smug, but he said humbly, “Everyone, you’re too kind. It’s just that my medicinal skill has improved and I exceeded my usual standard.” Just as he finished speaking, another loud voice sounded. “Xu Xuan, 135 bottles of Basic Fire Wound Potion, 48 bottles of Basic Ice Resistance Potion, and 55 bottles of High-Level Ice Resistance Potion! You have obtained 1,465 battle merits this time!” Silver Fox’s smug expression instantly disappeared. “Damn… What’s wrong with that girl, Xu Xuan? Could her medicinal skill be of the precious purple grade?” The envious gazes of the Construction Division members immediately landed on Xu Xuan. At this moment, the gentle woman from the Yang City could not help but have a smug expression. During this period of time, her luck had been very good. She had often been able to find a large number of Black Frost Flowers. Moreover, the success rate of her potion production was also very high. On average, she would successfully make one high grade potion and three ordinary grade potions for every five potions she tried to make. Although the failure rate was 20%, her results were already better than most people who had the medicinal skill. Silver Fox leaned over and whispered, “What’s the grade of your medicinal skill?” If the grade of one’s medicinal skill was high, the success rate of the potion would be higher, and there would also be a higher chance for a high grade potion to be made. Xu Xuan smiled. “It’s just rare blue. My great-grandfather was an experienced TCM doctor before the global digitization. After the global digitization, his medicinal skill directly reached the precious purple grade. After that, his medicinal skill had always been passed on to the next generation. At this point, she looked ashamed. “Unfortunately, I didn’t try my best when I was learning from my father back then so my medicinal skill is still only rare blue grade. I can’t help but feel that I’ve disappointed my grandfather.” Silver Fox could not help but support his forehead. Damn, he did not expect the other party to have such a powerful ancestor. On the other hand, he had learned his medicinal skill from an old logistician during his free time. At first, the other party was unwilling to teach him. However, after the Silver Fox offered general coins, the other party was willing to teach him with a smile. The old martial artist’s medicinal skill was very ordinary, only of an uncommon green grade. After imparting it to him, the old martial artist’s lifespan had also reached its limit and he quickly passed away. Silver Fox was somewhat talented in this aspect. In the end, he was able to upgrade his medicinal skill to the uncommon green grade. Of course, the grade of the medicinal skill was only one aspect. One also had to invest experience points to increase their level in order to make high-level potions. However, for the vast majority of people, experience points were simply more important than their lives. They did not even have enough to invest in their damage skills. Why would they waste their points on supplementary skills like the medicinal skill and forging skill? “I’m too old. I can’t compare to young people like you.” Silver Fox smiled helplessly. However, his face quickly lit up. “But I still have so many potions. It should be easy for me to get second place, right?” Xu Xuan also nodded. “If nothing unexpected happens, you should be able to get second place.” Among the current martial artists in Dragon Sea City, other than Silver Fox and Xu Xuan, many other martial artists also had the medicinal skill. However, their levels were not high and they were unable to enter the Falling Thunder Mountain. They were also unable to make High-Level Ice Resistance Potions. The battle merits they obtained were naturally unable to compare with Silver Fox and Xu Xuan. At this moment, Lin Xuan and Flame Explosion had already arrived. “I didn’t expect the top three to have additional rewards. Moreover, it’s the Water Prevention Pearl that is produced in Drowning City.” “In the future, I might very well go to Drowning City. The Water Prevention Pearl is quite useful to me.” Lin Xuan was rather surprised and nodded slightly. He naturally would not miss out on a reward that he could obtain easily. “Shield Ghost is here!” “There’s also Flame Explosion!” “Everyone, move aside.” Outside the crowd, someone saw Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion and hurriedly made way. The chattering members opened up a path for those two to pass, and their eyes revealed admiration. Shield Ghost and Flame Blast were from the White Crane Town Construction Division. They had arrived in Dragon Sea City not long ago to provide support. As soon as they arrived, they entered the secret realm of the Lightning Mountain and lured away the demonic beasts surrounding Bai Xinghe, Xu Xuan, and the others, helping them escape. Later, they heard that Shield Ghost and Flame Blast were never harmed in the incident. Such people deserved their admiration. In the eyes of many people, Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion’s prestige and influence were already comparable to Bai Xinghe, who was at level nine Sixth Realm. When Silver Fox saw Lin Xuan and Lin Xuan, he immediately revealed the expression of a teacher. “I thought you said you knew how to make potions yourself. So, how many bottles did you make?” Lin Xuan shook his head. “It’s average. It didn’t reach the number I expected.” He’d expected at least three thousand bottles of each in a month. He had overestimated the efficiency of the medicinal table. Xu Xuan laughed. “Old fox, Shield Ghost must have focused his points on combat. He probably didn’t invest a lot of experience points into his medicinal skill. Why do you even want to compete with him?” Silver Fox laughed, “In terms of combat, I’m naturally inferior to Shield Ghost. Is it so bad for me to try to feel superior by comparing my medicinal skill to his?” “Hahaha!” The members nearby all laughed when they heard this. After the laughter ended, Silver Fox slapped the armor on Lin Xuan’s shoulder before speaking again. Silver Fox said earnestly and smugly, “Young man, the future is yours. However, I’m definitely going to get second place this time!” Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. “Don’t worry, I won’t fight you for second place.” Silver Fox nodded repeatedly when he heard this and was very impressed with Lin Xuan’s response. Shield Ghost was still a loyal person! “Shield Ghost, Flame Explosion, you two are also here?” Chu Pengcheng smiled and nodded when he saw them. Lu Luo and Wen Xiong also squeezed to their side and consoled, “Don’t worry, it’s fine no matter how many potions you make. No one is going to compare you to anyone.” Lin Xuan did not know whether to laugh or cry. Why was he being comforted at this moment? Wen Xiong could not help but say, “How many potions have you made?” “Not really.” Lin Xuan casually took out bottles of potions. 10, 20, 30… Everyone was shocked. 100, 200, 300… Everyone’s expressions gradually became even more shocked. 1,000, 2,000… Everyone was completely stunned. “What are you waiting for? Hurry up and count,” Lin Xuan said curiously. “Oh!” The worker in charge of the statistics suddenly reacted. He had been counting them one by one just now, and a detailed number quickly appeared in his mind. “Basic Fire Wound Potion, 1045 bottles!” “Basic Ice Resistance Potion, 1083 bottles!” “High-Level Ice Resistance Potion, 371 bottles!” “Total battle merits… 14,350 points!” Everyone was dumbfounded. Everyone stood rooted to the ground in confusion. How many points? 14,350 points? They looked down at their battle merits cards that were less than a fraction of the other party’s. Their saliva and tears fell simultaneously. They couldn’t help but envy the other party! “These 100 bottles of High-Level Ice Resistance Potion were made with the Black Frost Flower Lu Luo and Wen Xiong provided to me . According to our previous agreement, I’ll get 70 percent and they’ll get the rest.” As he spoke, Lin Xuan took out 100 High-Level Ice Resistance Potions from his consciousness space. Everyone :”…” Damn! The worker in charge of the statistics was directly dumbfounded. What the hell? “100 bottles of High-Level Ice Resistance Potion, a total of 1,000 battle merits. Shield Ghost will receive 700 points, Lu Luo and Wen Xiong will receive 150 points.” “Shield Ghost’s current battle merits are 15050 points!” After recalculating, a loud voice sounded again. The smile on Xu Xuan’s face froze. Silver Fox’s smile froze too. “This guy was right when he said that he wouldn’t compete with me for second place. He’s freaking competing for first place!” Silver Fox wanted to cry. Fifteen thousand battle merits! It completely shocked everyone. Chu Pengcheng almost stammered and was speechless. Wang Dafu stared at the many potions, his eyes glowing. Lu Luo was stunned for a few seconds and suddenly leaned in front of Silver Fox. “What did you say just now? The future belongs to the young? Don’t compete with me for second place?” Silver Fox :”…” His face immediately turned red as he cursed, “I didn’t say anything just now! I didn’t say a word!” “If anyone says anything else about what I just said, I’ll fight them!” Silver Fox looked around fiercely. Lu Luo laughed so hard that her eyes turned into crescents. Bai Xinghe strode in front of Lin Xuan and saluted him. “Shield Ghost, thank you for your contribution to the frontline construction division!” As if saluting was not enough, Bai Xinghe directly bowed deeply to Lin Xuan. Lin Xuan hurriedly helped him up. “There’s no need to be so solemn…” However, Bai Xinghe was determined not to get up. Instead, he said in a low voice, “These potions are very likely to save the lives of many members of the Construction Division at the critical moment! No matter how much respect I have for you, it’s still not enough!” Chu Pengcheng’s eyes also turned slightly red. “That’s right.” “Everyone… salute Shield Ghost!” Chu Pengcheng’s voice suddenly became high-pitched. He straightened his back and quickly raised his fingers. Just like Bai Xinghe, he gave Lin Xuan a standard military salute. Swish! Swish! Swish! Wang Dafu, Silver Fox, Lu Luo, Xu Xuan, and the others also saluted. Although Wen Xiong’s movements were not standard, he did not move a single inch after saluting. It was as if he had entered a solemn state. In an instant, the empty space was so solemn that one could hear a pin drop. Feeling the burning gazes from all directions, Lin Xuan felt as if he had returned to Earth. This scene reminded him of the rows of disciples saluting in unison during the National Day parade. These two scenes were just too similar. Lin Xuan’s heart trembled. “Alright, alright, that’s enough!” Chu Pengcheng was the first to lower his palm. The other members also did the same. “I’m deeply gratified that you can make so many potions,” Chu Pengcheng said. “But can I ask what grade your medicinal skill is?” Everyone craned their necks. To be able to make so many potions in a month, the other party’s medicinal skill grade must be very high. Lin Xuan scratched his head. He could not possibly say that he did not have the medicinal skill at all and expose the fact that he had three medicinal tables working day and night to help him make potions, right? “Golden peerless.” Lin Xuan took out the excuse he had already thought of. “Before I arrived in East Lake City, I met an old TCM doctor by chance. He said that his ancestor was from a famous TCM family. From the day the world was digitized, his medicinal skill had always been peerless golden.” “However, that old TCM doctor’s child died in the war. He felt that I was a good person, so he taught me his medicinal skill. Perhaps I have a little talent in this aspect. After pushing my limits to learn it completely, I obtained his peerless golden quality medicinal skill.” The audience was in an uproar. No wonder Lin Xuan was so good at making potions. It turned out that he had met a good master. “Where’s that old man now? Has he passed away?” Lu Luo whispered. “That’s right. Since he invested his experience points into his medicinal skill , his combat strength was naturally weaker. Unfortunately, in the end, he was killed by demon beasts.” Lin Xuan sighed. He couldn’t help but feel that he was too good at coming up with shameless lies. “What a pity.” “If he had come to our Construction Division, we would have treated him like a treasure.” Many members of the Construction Division revealed regretful expressions. The shock brought by Shield Ghost’s 15,000 battle merits gradually subsided. After all the members of the Construction Division handed over the potions, Chu Pengcheng nodded in satisfaction and announced loudly. “The top three this time are Shield Ghost, Xu Xuan, and Silver Fox!” Chu Pengcheng smiled and said, “There will be people from the headquarters escorting the potions tomorrow. They will also bring the prizes along.” Lin Xuan’s heart stirred. The headquarters of the Construction Division… He had never seen anyone from the headquarters. He wondered what kind of person would arrive in Dragon Sea City tomorrow. However, Lin Xuan guessed that that person was at least a Seventh Realm martial artist. To survive in the dangerous wilderness, one at least needed to be a Sixth Realm martial artist. Seventh Realm martial artists could come and go as they pleased. The demon beasts were almost no threat to them. “Wow, the people from the headquarters are coming?” “The people from the headquarters are personally escorting the potions? Looks like the frontline is indeed tight on potions.” The members discussed. Chu Pengcheng pressed his hands down. “In order to ensure that there are no problems with the potions, all the potions will be stored in the warehouse and guarded by the guards.” “We need to ensure that nothing happens to this batch of potions!” Chu Pengcheng said solemnly. “Yes!” All the members replied in the same deep voice. Lin Xuan also narrowed his eyes. Tomorrow, the people from the Construction Division would come to escort the potions. If there were still spies in Dragon Sea City, then tonight was their best chance to make a move. … The night was dark and the stars were sparse. In Dragon Sea City, most people had returned to their houses. As Dragon Sea City was large, most people had their own independent houses, and civilians were no exception. However, at this moment, six figures quickly ran out of Dragon Sea City in three directions. “Our mission is to use ourselves as bait to lure the demon beasts to attack Dragon Sea City and buy time for Captain.” One of the two people running towards the north of Dragon Sea City was an older Fourth Realm martial artist and the other was a younger Third Realm martial artist. It was the older one who had spoken just now. “Understood!” Fear flashed across the other person’s face, but he still replied immediately. The older man seemed to have sensed his fear and said calmly, “Did your faith waver after living in Dragon Sea City for too long? Have you forgotten your identity?” The young man hurriedly shook his head. “My faith will not waver. I always remember that I’m a part of High Heaven Plains.” The older man nodded. “It’s good that you remember. Even if we die in battle in glory, our names will still be recorded on the heroic spirit tablet of the High Heaven Plains!” Soon, the two of them ran ten kilometers away from Dragon Sea City. They were panting heavily from running. “Damn Shield Ghost. If not for his suggestion to clean up the demon beasts, we wouldn’t need to travel so far.” The older man cursed secretly. The young man could not help but say, “There shouldn’t be any mistakes tonight, right? Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion… are quite strong.” The older man took out something from the storage compartment and slowly opened it. A strange stench suddenly surged out, causing the nearby air to seem to be extremely smelly. “Wind Blade!” The elder took out his staff and immediately threw out a Wind Blade after chanting for a short time. The Wind Blade that appeared out of thin air immediately stirred up a violent wind, scattering the stench further north. The older man put away his staff and sneered. “Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion are indeed very powerful, but no matter how powerful they are, they are not Seventh Realm martial artists! Chu Pengcheng is the only Seventh Realm martial artist in Dragon Sea City, and he has the healer profession. He can’t stop three Seventh Realm demon beasts!” “Even if those level nine Sixth Realm martial artists forcefully advance in order to protect Dragon Sea City, it will still be in vain. After all, they still lack suitable profession scrolls. If they do forcefully advance, it would be equivalent to killing their future. Either way, our mission would be completed.” The young man nodded repeatedly and asked in a low voice, “Is this the Bloodline Fruit from Sunrise City?” The older man stared at the darkness in the north and shook his head. “It’s just the skin of the Bloodline Fruit covered in some special spices. After all, India has very strict control over the huge mystic realm, the Sunrise City, and prohibits the export of the Bloodline Fruit. The organization had to bribe the higher-ups of India to barely obtain this skin.” “The Bloodline Fruit is devastatingly attractive to demon beasts. After eating it, there’s a chance for them to awaken a powerful bloodline. Therefore, even if it’s just the skin of the fruit, it will still attract the nearby demon beasts.” Buzz buzz buzz. The ground trembled faintly. It was as if countless demon beasts were rushing over from the darkness. “Did you hear that? They’re coming!” The older man suddenly laughed sickly. The young man looked at the squirming black line in the night and swallowed. “They’re coming… They’re really coming.” In an instant, they were drowned by the demon beasts and could not even make a sound. The same scene appeared in the east and west of Dragon Sea City. These people’s movements were surprisingly uniform. They all took out balls that emitted a strange stench and used Wind Blade to spread the stench far away. At the same time, on the roof not far away from the warehouse of the Construction Division in Dragon Sea City. Lin Xuan was currently chewing on some melon seeds. “Something’s wrong. It’s almost 2 AM and they’re still not making a move?” He frowned. Those who were sent by High Heaven Plains to be spies should not have poor intelligence. If they could not even grasp this opportunity, why did they even become spies in the first place? At this moment, the melon seed in his hand that was about to be delivered to his mouth suddenly escaped from his fingers and fell to the ground. Lin Xuan was stunned. For a Sixth Realm martial artist, such mistakes were very rare. The reflex speed of a Sixth Realm martial artist had long surpassed that of an ordinary person. It was impossible for him to negligently drop a single melon seed. “My body seemed to have trembled just now… No, it seems like the ground is trembling.” Lin Xuan frowned deeply. He could immediately rush to the city wall with Flame Explosion. However, he also needed to leave someone here. Lin Xuan pondered over it and removed the avatar he had left in White Crane Town. Coincidentally, that avatar was also resting in the house and would not be discovered to have suddenly disappeared. After leaving behind an avatar here, Lin Xuan and Flame Explosion immediately used lightning speed to rush to the city wall of Dragon Sea City. At this moment, he suddenly saw a black line squirming on the distant horizon and quickly becoming thicker. On careful look, those were not black lines at all. They were clearly demon beasts that were rushing over! The demon in the lead was more than seven meters tall. Lightning curled around its body, and it crossed more than ten meters with a single step! Lin Xuan used his Observer skill from afar and could only see the name, level, and some attributes and skills. “Seventh Realm Demon Beast, Thunder Swallowing Horse!” He was shocked and immediately used his strength to roar, “North wall, Seventh Realm demon beast attack!” His voice was comparable to a super loudspeaker and instantly woke up many people in their sleep. As the director of the Construction Division in Dragon Sea City, Chu Pengcheng immediately rolled over and got out of bed when he heard this voice from outside. Before he could even take off his pajamas, he directly ran to the northern city wall. Therefore, Lin Xuan immediately saw Chu Pengcheng rush out in his SpongeBob SquarePants pajamas. The pajamas that were very loose for ordinary people were a little tight on Chu Pengcheng’s muscular body. Whoosh, whoosh, whoosh. Silver Fox, Bai Xinghe, Xu Xuan, Wang Dafu… More Sixth Realm martial artists appeared on the northern city wall. Everyone looked outside the city with solemn expressions. The Thunder Swallowing Horse led the way, stepping on lightning and was surrounded by thunder. It was like a lightning pegasus. After it, more and more demon beasts appeared! “A Seventh Realm demon beast. Fortunately, we can…” Silver Fox heaved a sigh of relief. Before he could finish speaking, the Construction Division member who was on duty sounded the alarm on the west wall. “West city wall! A large number of demon beasts have appeared! We can’t determine the level of the leading demon beast. The initial estimate is that it’s a Seventh Realm demon beast!” Silver Fox: “…I’m a jinx.” It was very difficult for low-level martial artists to detect the level of high-level demon beasts. Not to mention that these martial artists had not learned the Observation Technique. Even if they did, it was still very difficult for them to improve the level of their Observation Technique. However, there was a very simple way to determine the level of the demon beasts. The higher the level of the demon beast, the larger it was. This theory was applicable in most situations. Of course, it could not be ruled out that some demon beasts were very small despite their high levels. At this moment, an alarm sounded from the east wall. “A seven-meter-long demon beast has appeared on the east wall! Initial estimation is that it’s a Seventh Realm demon beast!” On the northern city wall, everyone, including Lin Xuan, had solemn expressions. Suddenly, three Seventh Realm demon beasts attacked the city! Moreover, they split into three groups and attacked in three directions! However, they had clearly been clearing all the demon beasts within ten kilometers every day! Now, a group of demon beasts suddenly attacked. This was very illogical. Chu Pengcheng said solemnly, “All Sixth Realm martial artists, answer immediately. Which of you have reached the ninth level Sixth Realm and can advance at any time?” Silver Fox and Bai Xinghe quickly raised their hands without hesitation. “Me!” “In the name of the director of the Construction Division of Dragon Sea City, I’ll temporarily give you the right to use the profession scrolls in the warehouse. You can choose the highest quality profession scroll that is suitable for you to advance to the Seventh Realm. The battle merits you need can be made up for in the future!” “Yes!” Silver Fox and Bai Xinghe nodded without hesitation. Lin Xuan noticed that an imperceptible heartache flashed across Silver Fox’s face. Lin Xuan understood Silver Fox’s feelings very well. Silver Fox had been sent to the Germinal Organization to hide for several years, wasting this period of time. Silver Fox only wanted to obtain a precious purple profession scroll that was suitable for him. Unfortunately, the drop rate was never reasonable. Such was fate. Previously, when they were eating, Lin Xuan had also heard Chu Pengcheng mention that there were many rare blue profession scrolls in the warehouse of the Construction Bureau in Dragon Sea City. However, there were only three precious purple profession scrolls. They were the Blood Hunter, the Punishment Priest, and the Shadow Assassin. The Blood Hunter and Shadow Assassin professions were both inclined towards agility. On the other hand, the Punishment Priest profession required one to have a strong faith in religion. If one’s faith was weak, the effect they could unleash would be inferior to a rare blue profession. These three professions were not suitable for Silver Fox. However, in order to protect the Construction Division in Dragon Sea City, he had to pick one of these professions even if they were not suitable for him. The Blood Hunter was quite suitable for Bai Xinghe. During the meal, Bai Xinghe had once mentioned that his goal was to accumulate enough battle merits to exchange for the Blood Hunter profession. However, with Bai Xinghe’s current title, he would need at least three to four hundred thousand battle merits to exchange for the Blood Hunter profession scroll. Chu Pengcheng noticed the flash of expression on Silver Fox’s face and patted his shoulder. “When I was working in Jade Sea City back then, I was ambushed by martial artists from the High Heaven Plains. The warehouse was on fire, and almost all the martial artists with medical skills were killed. There were also a large number of martial artists who were seriously injured and needed treatment.” “However, at that time, no one other than me could advance to the Seventh Realm and change the situation of the battle. Moreover, there were not many profession scrolls in the warehouse. Therefore, I chose the profession scroll that I had just obtained, the rare blue profession, Healer.” “After unleashing the Great Recovery Spell, a large number of members within a ten-meter radius recovered from their injuries and immediately entered the battle. They also held back the martial artists from High Heaven Plains for half an hour before the reinforcements finally arrived.” “I still remember the face of that fellow who led the High Heaven Plains. He even kept cursing. It was so funny.” “Look at me now. I’m still doing pretty well, am I not? When everyone goes to fight, they still need someone to replenish their health at the back. As a healer, I’m not bad either. Hahaha.” Chu Pengcheng smiled confidently without any gloom on his face. Silver Fox nodded silently and immediately prepared to head to the warehouse with Bai Xinghe. Lin Xuan coughed lightly. “Actually, I obtained a relatively good profession scroll yesterday at the Falling Thunder Mountain. I was originally prepared to give it to my good brother Flame Explosion to use after advancing to the Seventh Realm, but now it seems that it might be more suitable for you.” Silver Fox was stunned. “What profession?” Lin Xuan smiled. “Precious purple profession, Elemental Mage.” Silver Fox almost jumped up. He hurriedly rushed in front of Lin Xuan, his eyes flickering with a long-awaited hope. “Really… Is it really the Elemental Mage profession? This is the profession I want to get the most!” “But… doesn’t Flame Explosion also need this profession scroll?” “If… you… no, damn, I can’t even speak properly… I mean, can you lend it to me first? I’ll pay you in installments every month with battle merits…” Silver Fox’s expression was a little timid. Shield Ghost was clearly his junior and had been recruited by him to the Construction Division. However, he now needed Shield Ghost’s help. This change in status made him feel a little embarrassed. Clack. Lin Xuan placed his palm on Silver Fox’s shoulder. “What’s our relationship? Do you really think I would ask you to pay me in installments?” Silver Fox felt extremely warm and tears were about to fall. A rare smile appeared on Bai Xinghe’s serious face. Chu Pengcheng smiled even more happily. Shield Ghost had always been an intern of the Construction Division, but he was willing to take out the precious Elemental Mage profession scroll. It was really too surprising. Lin Xuan casually took out a piece of A4 paper from his consciousness space and wrote the IOU. At the same time, he took out a stamp. “I’ve already prepared everything. According to the Construction Division’s conversion rate. It will cost you 500,000 battle merits. You can also give me 500 battle merits every month. It will take a total of 1,000 months, which is about 83.3 years.” “Come, sign here and stamp here.” Lin Xuan smiled and handed the IOU and stamp to Silver Fox. Silver Fox’s touched face instantly froze. Bai Xinghe had a strange expression. Chu Pengcheng was stunned, then laughed. Silver Fox frowned. “Are you sure I can live for another eighty years?” Lin Xuan smiled and said, “Your son can also pay for you.” Silver Fox: “…I see you’ve become a big capitalist now.” “Do you want it or not?” “Yes! If your profession scroll is real, I definitely want it!” Silver Fox quickly signed and took the Elemental Mage scroll from Lin Xuan. “I’ll go to the west wall!” Silver Fox shouted and ran towards the west wall. “After I change my profession, I’ll immediately go to the east wall.” Bai Xinghe bowed slightly to Chu Pengcheng and quickened his pace towards the warehouse. “Can Director Chu stop that Thunder Swallowing Horse?” Lin Xuan saw that the Thunder Swallowing Horse was getting closer and closer. Chu Pengcheng laughed loudly. His SpongeBob SquarePants pajamas suddenly split open and he quickly put on a set of equipment. It was not the usual white healer suit, but a set of soft armor that emitted a cold aura. “Before I changed my profession to Healer, I was one of the top close combat experts in the Construction Division!” With that said, he jumped down from the city wall. When he landed, a spear about 1.8 meters long had already appeared in his palm. It flowed with an ice-blue light and emitted a cold aura. Lin Xuan was silent. He had always thought that Chu Pengcheng was a healer. He did not expect that before advancing to the Seventh Realm, he actually focused on strength. If a healer wanted to obtain a high healing amount, they had to focus on increasing their Spirit. In this way, the strength that Chu Pengcheng had spent previously was almost useless. This was reality and not a game. There were no items that could help you recover the points you spent. It was hard to imagine how many sleepless nights Chu Pengcheng had spent thinking about his original decision. It was even harder to imagine how much effort Chu Pengcheng had spent to barely increase his Spirit attribute. “He’s willing to sacrifice his future just to benefit the organization…” Lin Xuan sighed. Even after transmigrating to a new world, their faith still did not waver. “Use your long-range skills to attack from the city wall. I’ll block those Sixth Realm demon beasts!” Lin Xuan instructed the members of the Construction Division who had gathered around him and also jumped down like Chu Pengcheng. The members of the Construction Division nodded and went to their posts. Some drew their bows, some threw fireballs, some condensed poison, and some used hidden weapons. They were all doing their best to use their skills to deal with the demon beasts from afar. Lin Xuan casually raised his shield. Bang! A level seven Sixth Realm demon beast collided head-on with the huge shield. Lin Xuan did not move at all. Instead, the demon beast was forced back a few steps by the backlash, and blood flowed from its forehead. Lin Xuan stood in the center of a large number of Sixth Realm demon beasts, but he was like a reef in a huge wave, standing firm. Not far away, Chu Pengcheng blocked the Seventh Realm demon beast, the Thunder Swallowing Horse, alone. The spear was enchanted with frost magic. Every attack would slow down the Thunder Swallowing Horse and force it to fight him. Every time the Thunder Swallowing Horse attacked, it would also leave a wound on Chu Pengcheng’s body. However, every time his wounds accumulated, Chu Pengcheng would use a recovery spell on himself. However, his recovery speed could not compare to the speed at which his health points decreased. If this continued for a long time, Chu Pengcheng would still lose. “How shameless.” Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. While resisting the demon beasts, Lin Xuan did not forget the avatar he had left in the warehouse. Through the avatar’s perspective, he discovered that there were only Wen Xiong and five Fifth Realm martial artists left in the surroundings of the warehouse. Lu Luo had also rushed to the east city wall to provide support. “I don’t suspect Lu Luo and Wen Xiong. I’ve already interacted with these people for so long and there doesn’t seem to be anything wrong with them.” “I don’t know what method the other party used to attract three Seventh Realm demon beasts and a large number of Sixth Realm demon beasts to attack Dragon Sea City. If Silver Fox didn’t have the profession scroll I gave him, he probably wouldn’t have been able to defeat the Seventh Realm demon beast on the west wall.” “If that happened, the western city wall would be the first to be broken, and Silver Fox would have died in battle. The city would immediately fall into chaos. At that time, it would be a good time for the spies to destroy the potions.” “However, there’s a high chance that nothing will happen now. The three Seventh Realm demon beasts will be blocked outside the city wall. If they fail to create a chaotic environment, I wonder what they will do… Will they forcefully attack?” Lin Xuan pondered, thinking about the other party’s next plan. At this moment, he saw a violent explosion on the east wall. A large number of houses collapsed and the civilians wailed. “The eastern city wall has suddenly exploded! A hole has appeared in the city wall. A Sixth Realm demon beast has taken advantage of the chaos to enter the city! Residents near the eastern city wall, please evacuate immediately! Sixth Realm martial artists, please head to the eastern city wall to provide support!” “Repeat, Sixth Realm martial artists who are able to help, please head to the east city wall to provide support!” The broadcast sounded. After a short hesitation, Wen Xiong quickly rushed to the eastern city wall after notifying the other five martial artists. “So that’s how it is. They’re using civilians to cause a scene so that Wen Xiong would be forced to leave to check the situation. In this way, there are only five Fifth Realm martial artists left in the warehouse.” “All the Sixth Realm martial artists have already arrived at the east wall, the west wall, and the north wall to provide support. It’s time for them to take action.” Lin Xuan perked up. As expected, under the cover of the building’s shadow, a ghostly figure quickly approached the warehouse. He did not make a sound the entire time, like a bat flying silently in the night. Lin Xuan immediately let his avatar wear a new set of equipment, which was the Vicious Poison Set from the Poison Miasma Cave. This set was also embedded with the One with the Sword rune group. Then, he took out a short sword with a faster attack speed from his consciousness space. The entire Vicious Poison Set was dark green in color. Its appearance was slender and exquisite, filled with a fatal and dangerous beauty. The moment Lin Xuan’s avatar changed into his suit, that figure had already silently avoided the five patrolling Fifth Realm martial artists. With a light leap, he jumped onto the roof of the warehouse, his movements as light as a monkey. Soon, this figure silently moved the tiles and entered the warehouse. The entire process did not alarm anyone. Seeing this, Lin Xuan also did three things at once. His main body carried a large shield to resist a large number of Sixth Realm demon beasts. Flame Explosion used a fire spell to kill a large number of demon beasts. On the other hand, he controlled his second avatar to quickly approach silently and also arrived on the roof of the warehouse. Lin Xuan lowered his head and discovered that the other party was looking for the storage location of the potions in the warehouse. He activated his Observer skill and immediately saw all the other party’s information. Hao Yong was a level two Sixth Realm martial artist. His main attribute was Agility and his secondary attribute was Strength. He had a peerless golden skill and peerless golden equipment. “There’s no such person among the Sixth Realm martial artists in the Construction Division of Dragon Sea City. He should have long accumulated enough advancement materials and was waiting for this day.” Temporary advancement was nothing new. Many people had long been accumulating advancement materials and had also accumulated a lot of experience points. The most basic requirement to advance from the Fifth Realm to the Sixth Realm was only ordinary advancement material. This was extremely simple. Even if one could not obtain it, one could still buy it. The reason why many people did not advance for a long time was because they wanted to try their best to obtain more and better advancement materials. They even wanted to obtain five experienced advancement materials to achieve a perfect advancement. For example, Silver Fox and Bai Xinghe had long been level nine Sixth Realm martial artists. However, for the sake of their future, they were still trying their best to kill monsters and find profession scrolls that were suitable for them. However, with the enemy in front of them, they could not delay any longer. No matter how unsuitable the profession scroll was, they had to advance. When Lin Xuan landed on the ground silently like a ghost, Hao Yong was still flipping around. Currently, the other party only found Basic Fire Wound Potion and Basic Ice Resistance Potion. The only thing he could not find was the High-Level Ice Resistance Potion. However, everyone knew very well that High-Level Ice Resistance Potions were the potions that were consumed the most in the Drowning City battle! This was because many demon beasts in Drowning City had ridiculously high frost damage. The Basic Ice Resistance Potion only increased one’s frost resistance by 50%. It could not block such high frost damage at all. However, a bottle of High-Level Ice Resistance Potion could directly increase one’s frost resistance by 150%! In this way, even if one’s Constitution was not very high, one could still form a strong frost resistance. To those martial artists with weaker Constitution, the High-Level Ice Resistance Potion was simply a godly existence. But now, Hao Yong was very dumbfounded. Why couldn’t he find any High-Level Ice Resistance Potions?! Could it be that Chu Pengcheng had placed all the High-Level Ice Resistance Potions in his storage compartment? That was impossible! The statistics showed that all the members of the Dragon Sea City Construction Division had already submitted more than 1,000 bottles of High-Level Ice Resistance Potion! The size of an High-Level Ice Resistance Potion was much larger than a Basic Ice Resistance Potion. It was as big as two fists. A thousand bottles was not something a storage compartment could accommodate. Moreover, Chu Pengcheng had gone to the northern city wall to resist the Seventh Realm demon beasts, so it was even more impossible for him to bring it with him. This was because if he died, those potions would fall out. One could imagine what would happen to the potions if they were scattered on the battlefield. The large number of demon beasts would not care about these important and urgent strategic resources at all. Under their iron hooves, the potion would quickly shatter into glass shards! “What are you looking for?” At this moment, a hoarse voice sounded behind him. Hao Yong’s hair stood on end and he immediately turned around to block instinctively. However, he could only see an afterimage flash past. In the next moment, a sharp blade had already slashed across his neck. The wound quickly turned from bright red to dark green. The terrifying poison quickly spread through Hao Yong’s entire body in less than three seconds. Hao Yong forced himself to turn around and saw a figure covered in dark green soft armor. Then, a sense of powerlessness swept through his entire body, and darkness filled his vision. Hao Yong, a spy from the High Heaven Plains who had been hiding in the Construction Division of Dragon Sea City for nine years, was declared dead! Lin Xuan was shocked. “Damn, did I just insta-kill him?!” This was the terrifying aspect of the Vicious Poison Set and the One with the Sword rune group. The three effects of the Vicious Poison Set were: Effect 1: Agility+10, Strength+6. Effect 2: Dodge+20%, aura -35%, melee damage+40%, melee attack speed+45%, and Lifesteal+20%. Effect 3: Any poison attack damage+30%, critical strike chance+30%, critical strike damage+80%. The three effects of the One with the Sword rune group were: Effect 1: Sword damage+30%. Effect 2: Any damage caused by the sword+30% critical hit chance,+130% critical hit damage,+30% bleeding probability. Effect 3: Any damage caused by the sword will ignore 15% physical resistance and have a 20% chance of ignoring 100% physical resistance. Relying on the effect of the Vicious Poison Set, Hao Yong was still clueless even when Lin Xuan was only a meter away. As for Lin Xuan, he used Lightning Flash as soon as he arrived. His speed was so fast that before the other party could react, he had already cut the other party’s throat. His short sword was very ordinary. It was only a precious purple short sword that he had casually taken out from his consciousness space, but it had a poison attribute. Due to the fact that he already had more than 100 points of Agility, the Vicious Poison Set and the One with the Sword Rune Set provided a large number of critical hits. With the additional critical damage, he could directly kill this fellow with a single throat-slitting strike! To be honest, when Hao Yong fell, Lin Xuan did not even react. “I only wanted to use this identity to hide myself. I’m actually so strong?” Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. It seemed that he was indeed very omnipotent. After advancing to the Seventh Realm, his combat strength would probably increase even more. He probably had a small advantage even when fighting against three or four people. Moreover, he still had two avatars that had inherited 100% of the main body’s attributes! Lin Xuan smiled in satisfaction and prepared to leave. His battle with Hao Yong was extremely fast and there was no sound. The entire process did not alarm the members outside. Just as he was about to leave, he suddenly sensed that someone was coming from above! “What’s going on? Is it another spy from the High Heaven Plains? Why don’t they just come together?” The other party’s Agility was clearly not low. When his high-level perception detected the other party, the other party had already landed lightly on the ground through the hole in the roof. The two of them looked at each other and were stunned. Especially after seeing Hao Yong’s corpse, the other party was even more hesitant. This attitude stunned Lin Xuan. It was obvious these two were on the same side. Lin Xuan used an Observer skill and was even more surprised. It was actually an English name! Tom was at the second level of the Sixth Realm. His main attribute was Strength, and his secondary attribute was Constitution. He had no peerless golden skills or peerless golden equipment. After a few seconds of silence, Lin Xuan suddenly whispered, “Are you also here to destroy the potions?” The other party was stunned and said in fluent Chinese, “You too?” Lin Xuan nodded. “I’m from High Heaven Plains. This guard was hidden in the warehouse by the Construction Division. He fell asleep just now and I took the opportunity to cut his throat.” The other party directly gave a thumbs up. “Awesome!” “However, I’ve never seen you before. Why is there someone as strong as you in the Construction Division? How did you hide for so long without being discovered?” Lin Xuan sneered, “It’s fine as long as I suppress my level. After I advance, the experience points I accumulate will be enough for me to reach level four Sixth Realm in one go.” The other party gave another thumbs up. “How awesome!” “Then let’s work together to destroy the remaining potions!” With that said, he quickly walked over. Just as Tom was about to pass Lin Xuan, Tom suddenly slapped Lin Xuan’s back. However, in front of Tom, this figure wrapped in a tight and slender dark green soft armor suddenly disappeared and even left behind an afterimage. His palm did not land on Lin Xuan’s body as expected. Instead, he felt like he was slapping the air. On a closer look, his hand had really slapped into the air. Where was the other party? Just as Tom was furious, he suddenly heard a voice from behind. “You actually dare to take the initiative to approach me. You’re very brave.” Shrug. The short sword pierced through his heart, and blood spurted out. In less than three seconds, its color turned into a terrifying dark green. Tom was weak and was quickly poisoned to death. The entire process was silent. Even when Tom finally died, he was gently placed on the floor by Lin Xuan, as if he was Lin Xuan’s beloved. “His name is Tom, but he looks no different from an Easterner. Could he be one of those so-called bananas? Maybe he looks like an Easterner on the outside but acts like a Westerner.” Lin Xuan looked through the items in this person’s storage compartment and finally found a small badge. Above the badge were twelve stars that had gathered into a circle. The base color was blue. Surrounded by the stars was a knight in full armor who was riding a horse and holding a sword in one hand. “A spy from the Knights of Truth?” Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. The Knights of Truth were an organization formed after many years of global digitalization. They mainly operated in Western Europe. Just like the Construction Division and the High Heaven Plains, they were formed by public officials and soldiers at the beginning. Later on, they also recruited many newly-grown martial artists and gradually grew into one of the largest organizations in the world. “A small Dragon Sea City has been infiltrated by spies from both High Heaven Plains and the Knights of Truth. How impressive.” Other than the emblem of the Knights of Truth, Lin Xuan also accidentally discovered a profession scroll. What luck! “It just so happens that this is the last one I need to synthesize the Great Druid profession scroll!” Lin Xuan was very surprised. Lin Xuan was really grateful. The other party’s express delivery service was really awesome. Even Dongfeng Express was not as stable, accurate, and ruthless as this Tom. Lin Xuan quietly left through the big hole in the roof of the warehouse. Outside the warehouse, the five Fifth Realm martial artists yawned continuously, completely unaware that two people had already died in the warehouse. The north wall. The battle became even more intense. Lin Xuan did not feel any pressure. The other members relied on their superiority to deal with demon beasts below the Sixth Realm. The pressure on them was also very small. Only Chu Pengcheng was experiencing some problems. Although Chu Pengcheng seemed very strong, he was still a healer after all. He would always be at a disadvantage when competing with a true Seventh Realm expert. The reason why he could last until now was that he had already drunk a lot of his homemade potions. Pop! The Thunder Swallowing Horse stomped on the ground and spat out lightning. Chu Pengcheng hurriedly raised his spear to block. However, his arms went limp and he failed to block this attack. He was sent flying and slammed into the city wall. At this moment, his body hair was charred, and most of his clothes were charred. He was clearly a handsome uncle, but he had now turned into a bald and wretched man. Chu Pengcheng forcefully mobilized his magic power and wanted to throw another recovery spell at himself, but he discovered that his magic power had already been exhausted. The life potions and magic power potions in his storage compartment had also been used up. “Damn… My homemade potions… How is it possible for me to run out of homemade potions!” Looking at the Thunder Swallowing Horse approaching step by step, Chu Pengcheng cursed. The officers on the wall had a heavy heart. The other party was their director-general, the man who was often teased as Mother Chu and Boss Chu. Were they just going to watch the other party die like this? At this moment, Lin Xuan’s high-level perception suddenly sensed a powerful figure rapidly approaching. Lin Xuan smiled. Silver Fox had indeed not let him down. If Silver Fox still could not kill that Seventh Realm demon beast after changing his profession, it would be a sign of his weakness. He snapped his fingers. “Boss Chu, backup is here.” Chu Pengcheng was stunned. The Thunder Swallowing Horse raised its head vigilantly and spat out lightning from its mouth. However, it did not kill Chu Pengcheng but attacked the figure that quickly arrived at the northern city wall. The figure laughed loudly and took out his staff to casually use a lightning shield, almost completely blocking this attack. “Mother Chu! I’ll kill that Seventh Realm demon beast on the west wall to help you!” A loud laughter sounded from the lightning shield. After a short shock, Chu Pengcheng also laughed loudly. “Good! Damn good! Silver Fox, awesome!” Lin Xuan also smiled. After using the profession scroll, three experienced advancement materials, and two ordinary advancement materials to become an elemental mage, Silver Fox’s combat strength had increased greatly. The regret of not being able to advance perfectly many times previously was made up for by this profession advancement. This precious purple profession had a profession skill that increased all elemental spells by 25%. In this way, the damage of various elemental spells was not the only thing that was being increased. In fact, the Elemental Shield would also receive a 25% increase! In addition, Silver Fox was already equipped with mage equipment. In this way, it would not be a problem for him to increase his attributes by 50%. In addition, the blocking efficiency of the lightning shield against lightning damage was extremely high. This was also the reason why Silver Fox could completely block the Thunder Swallowing Horse’s skill without being injured. “Shield Ghost! I really like the Elemental Mage profession! I love you to death!” Silver Fox laughed again and threw out frost spells. The Thunder Swallowing Horse’s frost resistance was very low. It was beaten until it cried out and had no choice but to retreat. The many members of the Construction Division on the city wall looked at Shield Ghost and Silver Fox with subtle gazes. Lin Xuan’s lips twitched. If you’re grateful, then just be grateful. Don’t say things like “I love you to death”, bastard! At this moment, another cold voice suddenly sounded. “Director Chu, the Seventh Realm demon beast on the east wall has been killed. I’m here to provide support!” Bai Xinghe’s bloody figure quickly appeared on the north wall. One of his arms was broken at the base, but he was in high spirits and showed no fear. Seeing this, Lin Xuan hurriedly took out a bottle of Big Life Potion from his consciousness space and handed it over. Bai Xinghe did not decline and drank it. Chu Pengcheng also hurriedly stood up and tried his best to squeeze out some magic power to cast a purification spell. The negative statuses on Bai Xinghe’s body quickly disappeared. “It’s fine. It’s time for Silver Fox to show his might. Let’s just watch.” Chu Pengcheng patted his shoulder and laughed. Bai Xinghe was originally prepared to enter the battle again. However, he did not expect Silver Fox to actually use a frost spell to make the Thunder Swallowing Horse roar. His expression immediately froze. After pausing for a moment, he also revealed a knowing smile. “Okay!” Bai Xinghe turned to Lin Xuan and said solemnly, “Shield Ghost, thank you very much this time. If Silver Fox had not become an Elemental Mage, I’m afraid there would have been problems with the western and northern walls. Fortunately, it all turned out alright.” Chu Pengcheng coughed lightly. “It’s not good to say such things in front of your superior, right?” Bai Xinghe smiled kindly and said, “Director Chu, although Shield Ghost did not directly face the Seventh Realm demon beast, he also indirectly contributed. This time, we were able to defend three walls and ensure that no civilians were killed or injured. Shield Ghost has contributed greatly!” Chu Pengcheng nodded repeatedly with a sigh. To be honest, he did not expect Shield Ghost to obtain an Elemental Mage scroll. This was a profession that many martial artists dreamed of! Flame Explosion would definitely need it too. However, Shield Ghost took it out without hesitation. How selfless was this? Oh, it was not selfless. Silver Fox signed an eighty-year repayment agreement… Bang! The Thunder Swallowing Horse’s seven-meter-tall body fell to the ground with a bang, and the lightning around its entire body dissipated. Without the leading Seventh Realm demon beast, the Thunder Swallowing Horse, the remaining demon beasts were simply not a threat. Moreover, Lin Xuan had also killed all the Sixth Realm demon beasts. In the end, the demon beasts abandoned nearly ten thousand corpses and fled. The members of the Construction Division did not chase after them. The reproduction speed of the demon beasts was astonishing. After killing them today, a new batch would be born tomorrow. There was no need to waste time chasing after them. Silver Fox laughed and walked over. “Mother Chu, looks like you’re still not good enough. You still needed my attack at the critical moment.” Chu Pengcheng snorted and patted his shoulder. “You should think about your eighty years of debt.” Silver Fox’s smile froze. The surrounding members of the Construction Division could not help but laugh kindly. The air was filled with joy. “By the way, I found this thing beside the Thunder Swallowing Horse’s mouth when I killed it just now.” Silver Fox took out a piece of fruit skin that looked like flowing blood. “I can’t see the specific information with my Observer skill. I can only see that it’s called the Bloodline Fruit.” “Everyone, do you know what this is?” Silver Fox scratched his head. Chu Pengcheng was stunned. “Bloodline Fruit?!” He hurriedly took the fruit skin and his face trembled. Silver Fox and Bai Xinghe sensed his expression and asked curiously, “What is it?” Lin Xuan was also very surprised. As the director of the Construction Division of Dragon Sea City, Chu Pengcheng rarely lost his composure like this. What exactly was this Bloodline Fruit? “You all know about the largest organization in South Asia, right? India.” “India also controls an extremely large mystic realm, the Sunrise City.” “The bloodline fruit is a peerless treasure in the Sunrise City. After eating it, demon beasts have a chance to awaken powerful bloodlines.” “For demon beasts of the same level, the difference between those who have awakened their bloodlines and those who have not awakened their bloodlines is huge.” “Moreover, the Bloodline Fruit is extremely tempting to demon beasts. This thing is also unique in the world. If I’m not wrong, these demon beasts were attracted by the Bloodline Fruit.” Chu Pengcheng said solemnly, “But there’s something very puzzling. Most of the martial artists in India walk the path of Beast Tamers. The Bloodline Fruit is very useful to them. Our Construction Division has tried to buy the Bloodline Fruit many times, but we can’t buy it at all.” Silver Fox was shocked. “Could it be that a martial artist from India infiltrated Dragon Sea City?” Bai Xinghe shook his head and said, “That’s unlikely. The Indians don’t look like us. However, we can’t rule out the possibility that the Indians have bribed some Easterners to act as spies in the Construction Division.” “I have to report this matter to the headquarters. The Indian bloodline fruit actually appeared in our Dragon Sea City. Be it a spy sent by India or a spy from another organization, this matter will definitely anger the higher-ups of India.” Chu Pengcheng suddenly chuckled. “They have extremely strict control over the Bloodline Fruit. Last time, a Eighth Realm martial artist from India sold a Bloodline Fruit for his own personal gain. After the matter was exposed, he was immediately chased by a Ninth Realm martial artist in India.” “Even after escaping to the territory of the Knights of Truth, that guy still got killed by a Ninth Realm Indian martial artist. the Knights of Truth didn’t even have a chance to intervene.” Lin Xuan, Silver Fox, and Bai Xinghe all laughed when they heard this. Silver Fox, especially, gloated heartily. “Looks like the higher-ups of India will definitely have a headache when they find out about this. They might even start a round of counterattack!” At this moment, a member of the Construction Division ran over, panting. “Direct… Director Chu! Something big happened in the warehouse!” Bai Xinghe’s heart skipped a beat. “Were the potions destroyed?!” Silver Fox’s heart skipped a beat. “No wonder the other party attracted a group of demon beasts to attack the city. Their target has always been the potions!” However, Chu Pengcheng was rather calm, as if he had expected this. “Don’t be anxious. Tell me slowly.” The member took a deep breath and said with a strange expression, “None of the potions were destroyed, but there were two more corpses in the warehouse.” Everyone was speechless. “???” In the warehouse of the Construction Division in Dragon Sea City. Chu Pengcheng looked at the two dark green corpses in shock. Bai Xinghe put on his gloves and checked the wound. His expression was solemn. “This was done by a close-combat expert who uses a sword.” Silver Fox looked around and asked curiously, “Mother Chu, there are only basic potions here. Where are the High-Level Ice Resistance Potions?” Chu Pengcheng said, “I intentionally hid them. The High-Level Ice Resistance Potion is in a place only I know, not in this warehouse.” Silver Fox gave him a thumbs up. “As expected of Mother Chu. You’re cunning.” “Strange, our Dragon Sea City’s Construction Division has such an expert?” The more Bai Xinghe looked, the more surprised he became. This was because he discovered that almost both of them had died after being hit once. “These two are level two Sixth Realm martial artists. Our initial guess is that they were already level nine Fifth Realm martial artists and advanced at the last minute. However, even so, their combat experience is still only slightly inferior to ordinary level six martial artists. It’s impossible for them to be so weak,” Bai Xinghe said solemnly. Seeing that Lin Xuan was silent, Silver Fox asked, “Shield Ghost, what do you think?” Lin Xuan shook his head. “I don’t use a sword. I can’t tell.” “That’s strange. Could it be that there’s really a hidden expert in the Construction Division of Dragon Sea City? Could it be that he sensed that there was a spy and deliberately stayed here?” Chu Pengcheng thought about it and only had this guess in his mind. The strange incident in the warehouse did not alarm too many people. However, this matter had already left a deep impression in the minds of Chu Pengcheng and the other higher-ups of the Construction Division in Dragon Sea City. Moreover, they even gave this hidden expert a code name. Poison Blade! Deadly Blade, Deadly Poison! This was a dangerous person. A mage like Silver Fox and a martial artist like Xu Xuan who focused on healing were very likely to be instantly killed by Poison Blade. However, this person did not seem to be a threat to Dragon Sea City. On the contrary, he even helped the Dragon Sea City Construction Division kill two spies who tried to destroy the potions. To be honest, when they came up with this code name, Lin Xuan was beside them. He did not know whether to laugh or cry. After Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion, he gained another code name. Moreover, the naming style was as bad as ever. … The next day, at dawn. An off-road vehicle broke the silence of the morning and arrived at the northern city wall of the Dragon Sea City Construction Division. After the other party’s identity was verified, he was allowed to enter. The news of the person from the Construction Division immediately spread throughout the entire Dragon Sea City. Chu Pengcheng hurriedly led a group of higher-ups to welcome them. Lin Xuan was also in the crowd. He saw a tall, muscular old man jump out of the SUV. If one only looked at this person’s body, one would find that this person was no different from a burly man in his thirties or forties. He was like Arnold Schwarzenegger. However, his hair, eyebrows, and beard had already turned white. There were also wrinkles at the corners of his eyes and cheeks. Silver Fox was overjoyed. “Teacher, it’s actually you?!” He immediately rushed over to hug the old man, but was sent flying by the old man’s kick. His body only stopped when he hit the telephone pole. However, soon, Silver Fox ran to the old man as if nothing had happened. The kick just now looked fierce, but it was actually not harmful. “Don’t call me teacher. Among all the students, you’re the weakest. Black is my proud eldest disciple.” The old man snorted. Chu Pengcheng took a step forward and extended his hand. “Welcome!” The old man also reached out and casually shook his hand. “Li Weiguo, an experienced senior member from the headquarters.” Lin Xuan was surprised. There was an independent system of titles in the Construction Division. They were intern members, ordinary members, senior members, and experienced senior members. The experienced senior members and senior members were the core elites of the Construction Division and enjoyed many benefits and resources. Silver Fox had worked hard for the Germinal Organization for many years. In addition, he had contributed to the destruction of the Germinal Organization. That was why he could obtain the title of a senior member. Otherwise, one could also automatically obtain the status of a senior member after becoming a Seventh Realm martial artist. As for experienced senior members, it seemed that only those pioneers who had established the Construction Division or those who had outstanding battle achievements could obtain this identity. Moreover, it had to be a single battle achievement. It could not be the kind that was slowly accumulated. This old man was actually an experienced senior member. His identity was really extraordinary. At this moment, Silver Fox and Wang Dafu had already rushed to the old man’s side with excited expressions. Only after hearing their friendly and peaceful conversation did Lin Xuan learn about this person. Li Weiguo, an Eighth Realm martial artist, was once the teacher of Silver Fox, Wang Dafu, Black, and the others. He brought out his students’ talent and nurtured many outstanding students. One of them was even a Ninth Realm martial artist from the Construction Division who held great power. “No wonder he could become an experienced senior member.” Lin Xuan pondered. “Who are you? Why are you always wearing armor?” Li Weiguo glanced at Lin Xuan, his tone somewhat dissatisfied. As he said this, he had already used his Observer skill. However, he discovered that even with his Eighth Realm cultivation, he could only see about 40% of the other party’s information. “Eh? Interesting. I actually can’t use my Observer skill to see through you.” He could not see the name, but he could see the level and some of the attributes. He also couldn’t see the information of the equipment and skills. Lin Xuan remained calm. His High-Level Disguise Technique and Weaken had long been upgraded to the peerless golden grade. It was extremely difficult for others to obtain a peerless golden Observer skill. Naturally, they could not see through his various information. Even the information they could see was deliberately exposed by Lin Xuan after he had altered them. Silver Fox hurriedly said, “Teacher, this is Shield Ghost. He’s an intern of our Construction Division. He’s very powerful.” Li Weiguo snorted. “You’re just like Black. You wear equipment every day and don’t even show your face.” Silver Fox asked happily, “Do you want to go to the canteen to eat first?” Li Weiguo kicked out again and Silver Fox Mei was sent flying for the second time. “The battle at the front line is important. I have to send the potions over as soon as possible. The earlier they get the potions, the less casualties we’ll have!” Silver Fox hurriedly ran back to Li Weiguo’s side and admitted his mistake. As if feeling that he had lost his composure, Li Weiguo continued, “Don’t think too much. Just guard the rear and don’t let the people from the other organizations cause trouble. Only with the rear stabilized can the front line fight without any distractions.” Chu Pengcheng and the others nodded in agreement. “Alright, bring me to the warehouse. I’ll leave quickly after taking the potion.” Everyone immediately went to the warehouse. When Li Weiguo saw the huge number of basic potions here, he was slightly shocked. “Not bad. You guys actually made so many basic potions. It’s much more than the batch from White Crane Town.” “However, what about high-level potions? Could it be that you guys only made low-level potions?” Li Weiguo was puzzled. Chu Pengcheng chuckled and brought Li Weiguo to an ordinary house not far from the warehouse. When he opened the door, he saw that the room was filled with High-Level Ice Resistance Potions! Lin Xuan could not help but laugh when he saw this. It was actually just a wall away! Chu Pengcheng was really bold and careful. He treated the most dangerous place as the safest place. He was betting that these spies would not carefully check the houses near the warehouse. Li Weiguo lost his composure when he saw so many High-Level Ice Resistance Potions. “How… how many bottles are there?” Chu Pengcheng said happily, “651 bottles!” Li Weiguo walked over in a daze and casually picked up a bottle. He stood there in a daze for a long time. After a while, he whispered, “Well… well done.” Chu Pengcheng asked curiously, “What’s wrong?” Li Weiguo shook his head and heaved a sigh of relief. “Nothing. I was just a little surprised.” “I’ve already visited more than 60 cities in the Construction Division and received no more than 300 bottles of high-level ice resistance medicine.” “The situation in Yang City is even worse. A traitor appeared last night and actually burned the warehouse where the potions were stored in one go. In the end, only a dozen or so High-Level Ice Resistance Potions were saved.” “The accumulation of thousands of people for a month was destroyed…” Xu Xuan’s expression tightened when she heard this. “Were there any casualties?” She was an employee of the Yang City Construction Division. She had only come to Dragon Sea City to provide support and try her best to prevent the demon beasts of the Falling Thunder Mountain from swarming out and slaughtering the civilians. Yang City was where she felt the strongest sense of belonging. When she heard Li Weiguo say that such a big thing had happened in Yang City, her heart tightened. “The losses were huge. A few martial artists guarding the warehouse died. The spy also died in the fire in the end.” Li Weiguo sighed. Xu Xuan lowered her eyes and clenched her fists tightly. “Let’s not talk about anything else. I want to know how you guys made so many High-Level Ice Resistance Potions. Could it be that you have a medicinal master?” Li Weiguo was a little happy. Everyone looked at Lin Xuan. Chu Pengcheng smiled and said, “It’s all thanks to Shield Ghost. His medicinal skill is of peerless golden grade. Most of these High-Level Ice Resistance Potions were contributed by him.” Li Weiguo was stunned for a moment before he laughed loudly and patted Lin Xuan’s shoulder heavily. “I take back my unfriendly tone from before. You’re good! Very good!” The huge force coming from his shoulder made Lin Xuan’s teeth ache. Good lord, this strength should at least exceed 500, right? This old man was so freaking fierce. Silver Fox said helplessly, “Actually, we also had a traitor come out from nowhere last night and want to tamper with the potions, but…” After hearing Silver Fox’s description of last night, Li Weiguo’s expression gradually calmed down, and his old eyes even flickered. “Not bad, Silver Fox. You’re really lucky. Someone is actually willing to give you an Elemental Mage profession scroll.” Li Weiguo looked at Lin Xuan again. The more he looked at him, the more impressed he was. “Your armor is quite handsome! You look much better than Silver Fox, this old and stingy guy!” Silver Fox: “…Teacher, can you not insult me when you praise others?” Li Weiguo ignored him and continued, “As for that Poison Blade, I don’t think you guys have to worry too much. Since he has already helped, at least he’s not working against the Construction Division.” Li Weiguo smiled and said, “The wise sages once said that we have to make more friends and fewer enemies. Only then can we grow stronger.” “Poison Blade is someone I can rope in.” Chu Pengcheng and the others nodded repeatedly. “You’re right. We think so too.” “There are six Water Prevention Pearl here. Give them out according to the rules. I’m leaving.” After saying this, Li Weiguo hurriedly returned to the gate of the northern city wall of Dragon Sea City and walked into the off-road vehicle. Without looking back, he waved and drove away. Lin Xuan returned to his residence. He also brought a bowl of warm water. He placed the three Water Prevention Pearls on the table and studied them carefully. The quality of the Water Prevention Pearl was precious purple. Its effect was +2% underwater breathing time. Lin Xuan gently exerted strength and crushed the three Water Prevention Pearls into powder. Then, he placed the powder into warm water and poured it into his mouth. A cool feeling immediately surged from his stomach to his entire body. After a short moment of coldness, Lin Xuan suddenly felt his body become wet. It was as if he could reach out and touch the water vapor in the air. “I feel something!” Lin Xuan hurriedly ran out to get a basin of water and submerged his head in it. In the end, he realized that he had been holding his breath for more than two hours! “The three Water Prevention Pearls increased my underwater breathing time by 6%. In addition, my Constitution is very high, so my underwater breathing time is even longer.” “If I eat enough Water Repellent Pearls, I bet I can even live in the water like a fish.” Lin Xuan clicked his tongue in wonder. … Half a month passed in the blink of an eye. In this half a month, Lin Xuan’s greatest gain was the synthesis of the Mobile Fortress profession scroll. The process was actually quite rough. The synthesis formula of the Mobile Fortress required Armored Soldier, Shieldbearer, Heavy Armor General, and Self Healer professions. The Armored Soldier and Shieldbearer were very easy to obtain. Lin Xuan had dozens of them in his consciousness space. Only the Heavy Armor General and Self Healer professions were difficult to obtain. This was especially true for the Self Healer profession. Its grade was clearly only rare blue, but it was extremely difficult to obtain. It was as if this profession was a limited SSR in mobile games. The good luck that Lin Xuan was so proud of suddenly failed. This gave him a headache for a while. However, Wen Xiong happened to be lucky and obtained a Heavy Armor General. Wen Xiong was a high-strength warrior, so he naturally did not need this profession scroll. Lin Xuan used the precious purple profession scroll “Huge Blade Slayer” he had long obtained to exchange for it. This profession scroll was very suitable for Wen Xiong, and he was also very happy. They completed the deal and were both satisfied. As for the rare blue profession scroll “Self Healer”, it was Xu Xuan who had unexpectedly sent it over from Yang City. Ever since Li Weiguo said that Yang City had suffered heavy losses, Xu Xuan had been feeling uneasy. In the end, she asked Chu Pengcheng for leave to return to Yang City. Lin Xuan had asked her to help him see if there were any Self Healer profession scrolls in the Yang City warehouse. He was willing to use his battle merits to buy them. Originally, Lin Xuan had only casually mentioned it and did not expect anything. He did not expect Xu Xuan to really bring this profession scroll back the next day. As an intern, Lin Xuan needed 20,000 battle merits to buy this rare blue profession scroll. However, Xu Xuan remembered that Lin Xuan had saved her life and so she directly gave Lin Xuan a 50% discount. Lin Xuan took out five rare green profession scrolls. Each one of them was worth 1,000 battle merits. With another 5,000 battle merits, he bought the “Self Healer” profession scroll. He could actually directly exchange ten rare green profession scrolls for this Self Healer scroll, but this would easily make others suspicious. Others had been farming scrolls for multiple days, and they could not even get a single uncommon green scroll. They would naturally be suspicious if Lin Xuan took out ten in one go. Lin Xuan thought for a moment and gave up on this idea. In this way, he had already gathered all the professional scrolls to synthesize the Tyrant profession! This morning, Lin Xuan got up. Suddenly, he saw a notification pop up in his mind that showed that the energy of the Falling Thunder Mountain had dissipated, causing the 300% increase of general coins and experience points to disappear. In its place was another message. [Falling Thunder Mountain News: The mystic realm is about to be completely upgraded for 24 hours. In the final advancement stage, all attributes of the mystic realm demon beasts will increase by 30%.] Lin Xuan was shocked. All attributes will be increased by 30%?! “It’s best not to enter the Falling Thunder Mountain mystic realm for now. It’s too dangerous.” Lin Xuan thought for a moment and hurriedly ran into the Falling Thunder Mountain mystic realm. He had just entered for a few seconds and had not even encountered any demon beasts before hurriedly running out. Then, he adjusted his voice and deliberately put on a solemn tone. “This is bad! The demon beasts of the Falling Thunder Mountain have suddenly become much stronger! Everyone, don’t go in!” At this moment, Xu Xuan, Lu Luo, Wen Xiong, Wang Dafu, and the others had just woken up and washed up. When they heard this, they were all stunned. Lu Luo said in surprise, “Shield Ghost, did you go in just now?” Lin Xuan said solemnly, “In the past, as long as I raised my shield, demon beasts below level seven Sixth Realm would not be able to break through my defense. Now, they can actually cause me to lose dozens of health points after just hitting me once. This is too ridiculous.” Everyone :”…” Oh boy. This was the first time they had seen someone praise themselves in such a way. Lu Luo’s expression was serious when she heard this. “Then this means that the demons beasts have indeed become much stronger.” Wang Dafu did not believe it and ran in to find a demon to give it a try. In less than ten minutes, he slipped out. His sorry appearance immediately confirmed Shield Ghost’s words. Something strange had happened in the Falling Thunder Mountain mystic realm, and the strength of the demon beasts had increased greatly. When Chu Pengcheng heard the report, he frowned and nodded. “I’ll immediately report to the headquarters. This situation is very abnormal.” After confirming that this news had already been transmitted to a Sixth Realm martial artist in the headquarters, Lin Xuan returned to his residence in peace. He had already accumulated enough experience points. He could directly advance to level nine Sixth Realm in one go. “Advance!” Crash. His level soared like a rocket, and in an instant, he went from level seven Sixth Realm to level nine Sixth Realm. As usual, the 16 free attribute points were added to his Constitution. As such, Lin Xuan’s Constitution reached 427 points. “My cultivation is high enough and I also have the profession scroll I need. I’m just short of battle advancement materials.” Lin Xuan thought for a moment and decided to enter the Falling Thunder Mountain overnight. His thoughts were simple. No one knew what would happen after the mystic realm advanced. What if the Falling Thunder Mountain turned from a Sixth Realm mystic realm to a Seventh Realm mystic realm? If so, Lin Xuan would have no choice but to run back to White Crane Town to the Poison Miasma Cave mystic realm. It would be rather troublesome. Moreover, Lin Xuan was already certain that the changes in the Falling Thunder Mountain would also be reflected in his seven training avatars! The attributes of his seven training avatars had also increased by 30%! “It shouldn’t be a problem for the seven training avatars to escort me to the top of the Falling Thunder Mountain.” “The only thing I’m worried about now is the mystic realm kings. Have their attributes increased?” The night gradually darkened. Lin Xuan secretly entered the Falling Thunder Mountain through the door of light of the mystic realm. As soon as he entered the Falling Thunder Mountain, he smelled the extremely dense lightning aura in the air. The smell of burning seemed to be everywhere. The air seemed to be burning and could be ignited by lightning at any time. As soon as he entered, seven demon beasts waited quietly in front of him. It was his seven training avatars. “Let’s go!” The seven training avatars protected Lin Xuan and headed straight for the mountaintop. All the demon beasts they encountered along the way were quickly killed. Seven level nine Sixth Realm demon beasts was naturally a very powerful force. If weaker demon beasts dared to approach, they could even scatter their ashes. Soon, Lin Xuan arrived at the top of the mountain. He saw nine caves here. The mystic realm kings were naturally in the caves. Because the Falling Thunder Mountain was rather dangerous, seven of the nine mystic realm kings had all turned into experienced mystic realm kings. The remaining two would also become experienced mystic realm kings in another two months. Lin Xuan waved his hand, and two avatars appeared beside him. They each wore the Demon Flame Set and the Vicious Poison Set. “I’ll bring my two avatars in to take a look at the attributes of the experienced mystic realm king first. Even if all their attributes increase by 30%, I still won’t be instantly killed. If I can’t defeat him, I’ll come out and think of a way.” Lin Xuan had long had an idea. At this moment, he took a deep breath and directly strode into the cave. In the cave, a huge blue tiger appeared. Its claws stepped on the lightning, its tail was like a lightning snake, and its snores were vigorous. Sensing the aura of an outsider, the tiger immediately stood up and opened its mouth to roar at Lin Xuan. Lin Xuan casually used an Observer skill. —- Name: Thunder Tiger King Title: Experienced Mystic Realm King Level: Level Nine Sixth Realm Attributes: Constitution 308, Strength 501, Spirit 111, Agility 345 Skills: Ball Lightning (Precious Purple), Lightning Wings (Precious Purple), High-Level Dodge (Precious Purple), Lightning Breath, Three Combo Attacks —- After looking at these attributes, Lin Xuan immediately heaved a sigh of relief. “Fortunately, these attributes aren’t too ridiculous. It’s still within my range.” The experienced mystic realm king in front of him had clearly also received the 30% attribute enhancement. Otherwise, it would be impossible for it to have such shocking attributes. It had to be known that the attributes of experienced mystic realm kings were already 130% that of ordinary level nine Sixth Realm demon beasts. Now, on top of that, there was even an additional 30% increase in all attributes. The attributes all grew to a terrifying level. If Silver Fox and Bai Xinghe were still level nine Sixth Realm martial artists, they would definitely not have come to challenge the experienced mystic realm kings at this time. That was no different from courting death. “It’s also a little difficult for me to kill this experienced mystic realm king alone. However, I can guarantee that I definitely won’t die. Moreover, now that I have two avatars, it’s equivalent to a three-man team. The battle will also be much easier to deal with.” Shield Ghost, Flame Explosion, and Poison Blade. One of them carried a large shield and had high Constitution and resistance. The other was a mage in the back row. Finally, Poison Blade was a front row warrior that had a high attack speed and critical hit damage. Moreover, Poison Blade could also use poison to deal out continuous damage. Boom! Ten minutes later, the Thunder Tiger King fell to the ground. The killing process could be said to be calm. After killing it, Lin Xuan glanced at the equipment, runes, skill books, and the like that had dropped. The quality was only rare blue and was rather trash. He directly threw them into the smelting table in his consciousness space. He also threw the skill books into his consciousness space. Finally, he saw something crucial. The experienced fangs of the Thunder Tiger King. “My luck is not bad. The other party dropped three experience advancement materials. Let’s quickly kill the remaining experienced mystic realm kings before dawn.” Lin Xuan was smug as he walked to the next cave. As all the martial artists in the Falling Thunder Mountain had already retreated, no one could hear the broadcast of the safety station. … At the same time, in White Crane Town. After the round-faced little sister finished her work, she did not return to the dormitory to take a shower like the other logistics martial artists. Instead, she turned a corner and skillfully bypassed the members that were on duty at the south city wall of White Crane Town. She hid in the shadows and walked out of White Crane Town before finally entering a deserted residential area outside White Crane Town. This place was a two-story western-style building. In the past, it was a villa area for the rich. Now, it was completely abandoned. There were fewer people in the Construction Division of White Crane Town, so this place was naturally not included in the guarded area. After all, it was already quite difficult to guard the area that they were currently guarding. More importantly, Ye Yuqiu and Black did not have the very powerful perception of the Germinal Organization’s Manager Number One. Naturally, it was impossible for them to supervise the entire White Crane Town. In particular, the round-faced girl’s level was very low. She was only a Zero Realm martial artist. Even with Number one’s wide domain perception, it was very difficult for him to detect a Zero Realm martial artist entering and leaving. The round-faced little sister did not wait long before a martial artist crossed the wilderness and arrived. If Lin Xuan, Silver Fox, and the others were here, they would immediately recognize this face. This person was Yang Wei, the overseer of District B of the Germinal Organization. In the battle between the Germinal Organization and White Crane Town, the Asura Twins fled with heavy injuries. Yang Wei, Mo Yuan, and Zhang Peng felt that something was wrong and split into three directions to escape in advance. They headed south and eventually met up in Chang Le City south of East Lake City. There were two natural mystic realm doors of light in Chang Le City. One was a First Realm mystic realm and the other was a Third Realm mystic realm. There were only two small organizations here, so they were naturally powerless to resist the three Sixth Realm martial artists. Soon, they became the local tyrants of Chang Le City and enslaved the martial artists here to gain benefits for themselves. They were even more ruthless than the Germinal Organization. They forced the martial artists there to hand over all their items and only gave them basic survival guarantees. Not long after, they quietly returned to East Lake City and searched the Germinal base that had already turned into ruins. They finally found a communicator in Manager Number One’s office. After a long period of maintenance, they finally managed to contact the headquarters through it. The leader of the High Heaven Plains, who was also the leader of the Germinal Organization, was pleasantly surprised. He did not expect that there would still be such a group of lackeys. The leader gave them an order. They requested Yang Wei and the others to stay in Chang Le City for a long period of time and try their best to stay safe. They also could not be discovered by the Seventh Realm martial artists of White Crane Town. After all, these three were only Sixth Realm martial artists. In front of Seventh Realm martial artists, they were trash that could be easily killed. Of course, while protecting themselves, the leader also asked them to discover various information regarding the Construction Division of White Crane Town. If they found a major strategic target, they could directly attack without asking for permission. In the leader’s opinion, Yang Wei and the other two could completely act as a time bomb. After planting them near the Construction Division, they could directly detonate them at the critical moment. However, compared to the Germinal Organization back then, this new time bomb was clearly a little pitifully insignificant. Yang Wei and the others knew very well that even if they surrendered to the Construction Division, they would most likely be dealt with. Therefore, after receiving their leader’s order, they did not go against it at all. They were very conscientious and hardworking. Even the meeting in White Crane Town was personally handled by Yang Wei. “Sir, we tried our best to destroy the potions. Unfortunately, Ye Yuqiu is very strict and is basically one step away from living in the warehouse… You understand, right? How can we possibly resist Ye Yuqiu?” the round-faced little sister said helplessly. Yang Wei waved his hand to express his understanding. So what if he did not understand? It was not like he could do anything to Ye Yuqiu. Moreover, this round-faced girl, who was not even at the First Realm, was extremely weak. Not to mention Ye Yuqiu, even he could even easily crush such a weak martial artist. He did not expect this person to do anything big. It was enough for her to stay in White Crane Town to gather information. “Where’s Shield Ghost and the others? Have they not returned from Dragon Sea City?” Yang Wei asked. The round-faced girl nodded. “They’re not back yet.” “Have there been any abnormal movements from the White Crane Town Construction Division or the demon beasts recently?” Yang Wei asked again. The round-faced little sister was stunned and suddenly thought of something. “I remember something. Recently, there haven’t been any demon beasts within a few hundred kilometers of White Crane Town. They seem to have all run east.” “East?” Yang Wei frowned. Wasn’t Dragon Sea City to the east of White Crane Town? Demon beasts were not migratory creatures like migratory birds. This was very abnormal. These demon beasts that wandered in the wilderness usually wandered within a certain range unless they were attracted by something. “I understand. Continue to hide. When Shield Ghost and the others return, send me the news.” After Yang Wei finished speaking, he stuffed an internal communicator into her hand and quickly left. The round-faced girl nodded and quietly returned to the dormitory. … Dragon Sea City. Lin Xuan had already returned to his residence. Looking at the large pile of advancement materials on his bed, he was nervous and excited. He had killed all eight experienced mystic realm kings and obtained a total of 25 experienced advancement materials. Now, his level had already reached level nine Sixth Realm. The peerless golden profession scroll had already been synthesized, and the materials for advancement had also been prepared. He could advance. “Advance!” Lin Xuan muttered to himself and clicked on the arrow symbol on the data panel. The Tyrant profession scroll and the five experience advancement materials entered his body together, turning into a faint light that hid in his skin. Waves of comfort washed over his body. Lin Xuan could not help but close his eyes. The feeling of becoming stronger was so addictive. After a moment of silence, Lin Xuan opened his eyes. —- Name: Lin Xuan Level: Level One Seventh Realm Profession: Tyrant Essence: 0/1 million Attributes: Constitution 442, Strength 125, Spirit 135, Agility 125 Skills: Thorn Body, Steel Body, Omnipotent Bone Armor, Ancient Tree Bark, Demon King of Fury, High-Level Perception, Observation, High-Level Camouflage, High-Level Avatar Technique, Flash, Lightning Speed… Equipment: Earth Dragon King Hammer Shield, Dragon Hunter Shield, Overlord Set, Giant Shield Set, Poison Doctor Set, Demon Flame Set, Vicious Poison Set… Item: Click to reveal more items —- “I’ve finally become a Seventh Realm martial artist. Now, I can somewhat protect myself. I don’t have to worry about being insta-killed by an awesome big shot at any time.” Lin Xuan sighed. He had gone from being a wasteland reclaimer of the Germinal Organization to becoming a member of the Construction Division. Now, he was even a Seventh Realm martial artist. He had really risen one step at a time. During this time, he had been down-to-earth and diligent, not daring to slack off at all. “My current achievements are all thanks to my diligent training!” Lin Xuan sighed. Not long after Lin Xuan broke through to the Seventh Realm, the mystic realm door that connected to the Falling Thunder Mountain suddenly trembled crazily. It was as if something huge was about to squeeze out of the void and fuse with this world. A pillar of lightning shot out from the door of light of the mystic realm and into the sky. Even people thousands of kilometers away could see the dazzling lightning clearly. The members of the Dragon Sea City Construction Division were shocked and afraid. They stared at the door of light of the mystic realm and did not dare to approach. Chu Pengcheng immediately used the Construction Division’s internal communication device to contact the headquarters. The person who answered the call from the headquarters had a solemn expression when he heard this description. “It’s a mystic realm advancement!” … The General Department of the Construction Division was located in Jing City. This was once the capital of Xia Country and was also one of the largest cities in the world. After receiving Chu Pengcheng’s call, there was a slight commotion in the headquarters. However, the people in the headquarters were all experienced experts after all. After a slight loss of composure, they immediately regained their senses. At the conference table, three Ninth Realm martial artists were already sitting around. The person sitting in the best seat was an old woman with white hair that was hale and hearty. There were not many wrinkles on her face, and one could not feel the rotting feeling of an old person from her. The person sitting next to her was a muscular middle-aged man with one arm. He was two meters tall and was terrifyingly tall even when he was sitting down. Every time he moved his butt, the small folding chair would let out a sound of being overwhelmed. The person that sat across from him was a young man with a buzz cut. He was fiddling with a Rubik’s Cube with his head lowered. The three of them were Ye Lijiang, Gao Qianchi, and Wan Youxu. There were a total of six Ninth Realm martial artists in the Construction Division. Among the remaining three Ninth Realm martial artists, two of them guarded two huge mystic realms controlled by the Construction Division: the Kunlun Ruins and the Little Spirit Mountain. The final Ninth Realm expert was at the front line of Drowning City in the East Sea. “Old Gao, are you sure it’s a mystic realm advancement?” Ye Lijiang asked solemnly. Gao Qianchi nodded repeatedly. “I’m 100% sure. This was how the Sunrise City was controlled by India advanced back then. I personally witnessed it back then.” “The promotion of the mystic realm is too big. It will definitely attract the covetous eyes of other organizations.” Wan Youxi was still fiddling with the Rubik’s Cube and did not look up. “India consolidated the nearby forces a year ago. They are ambitious and have already probed our southwest region several times.” “There was once a Germinal Organization in the south of our Construction Division. It has now been confirmed that it was part of the plan of the High Heaven Plains.” “With the advancement of the Falling Thunder Mountain mystic realm, India and the High Heaven Plains are the most likely to attack. We have to reach the border as soon as possible and stop them.” Clack. The Rubik’s Cube was placed on the table. Gao Qianchi pointed. “You didn’t solve it.” Wan Youxi said, “Are you looking for trouble?” “Who said that playing the Rubik’s Cube has to be solved? I was just enjoying the process.” Gao Qianchi sneered. “The last time you played billiards, you said the same thing.” Wan Youxi’s expression did not change. “That’s because I don’t know the rules of billiards.” Ye Lijiang ignored the two people who were bickering. Instead, after a short moment of thought, he immediately said solemnly, “Gao Qianchi, you go to the southwest. Wan Youxu, you go to the East Sea.” “Understood.” … In the wet and hot rainforest in the southwest of Xia Country. This place seemed to have become a green cage, and all the plants were growing crazily. The appearance of the mystic realm also seemed to emit a strange energy that accelerated the growth of these plants. The environment here was very unsuitable for martial artists to survive. The Construction Division did not set up a stronghold here. However, this was the former border of Xia Country. Gao Qianchi stood on the side of the border and squatted beside the boundary stone. He used his remaining arm to remove the vines covering the boundary stone. Even a Sixth Realm martial artist might not be able to destroy those vines. However, in Gao Qianchi’s hand, it was like a plastic bag that could be broken easily. “The boundary stone can’t be dirty,” Gao Qianchi muttered to himself. “Even more so, it can’t be crossed by outsiders.” Hundreds of meters away from him, a slightly tanned Indian martial artist stopped. In the distant rainforest, many eyes seemed to be spying on this place. “You can stop me, but can you stop the others?” He spoke in broken Chinese and had an Indian accent. Gao Qianchi was still pulling at the vines on the boundary stone. He did not even turn his head. “If you want to fight, just fight. Why are you talking so much nonsense?” The Indian martial artist directly took out a flute and played an obscure and strange tune. The entire song was filled with emotions. Then, a black panther with shiny fur suddenly jumped out from behind Gao Qianchi. Its sharp claws emitted a cold light, as if it had harvested countless lives. Gao Qianchi finally turned around. Then, he threw an ordinary punch. His fist collided with the black panther’s claw. Boom! Gao Qianchi took a step back. However, the black panther seemed to have been smashed by a huge force. The fur and flesh on its right front paw directly exploded, leaving only ghastly white bones. Its body was sent flying and only stopped after breaking several trees. However, it was breathing heavily and was already about to die. The Indian martial artist looked deeply at Gao Qianchi and put away his flute. He even abandoned the black panther and turned to leave. In the blink of an eye, the Indian martial artists disappeared into the vast rainforest. Gao Qianchi finally wiped away all the vines on the boundary stone and muttered to himself, “I told you not to come. Now, I’ve killed another one of your pets.” The prying eyes in the rainforest also disappeared one after another. East Sea of the Xia Country. The wind and waves today were not small, but a small boat was floating on the sea. Inside the small boat was Wan Youkong, who was playing with the Rubik’s Cube with a serious expression. This time, he was playing the 4 x 4 Rubik’s Cube and not the previous 3 x3 one. “What? The 4 x 4 Rubik’s Cube isn’t difficult. It’s much easier than the 3 x 3 one.” Wan Youxi muttered. Not far away, a speedboat approached quickly with an ear-piercing rumble. On the speedboat were two capable middle-aged men. They were originally chatting and laughing, but after seeing Wan Youxu, they stopped talking. “Your reaction is very fast,” the one-eyed middle-aged man said calmly in fluent Chinese. “But you can’t stop the two of us alone.” The tall and thin middle-aged man’s Chinese, on the other hand, was not very fluent. Wan Youxi said without looking up, “Wait for me to solve the Rubik’s Cube.” With that said, he continued to solve the Rubik’s Cube. The two middle-aged men did not move. Time ticked by and half an hour passed. The two middle-aged men from High Heaven Plains were silent. Wan Youxi’s expression gradually became irritable, and his hands seemed to have afterimages. Suddenly, the two High Heaven Plains martial artists suddenly attacked without warning. With his spear, the one-eyed middle-aged man gathered an icy blue light and instantly froze the seawater between the speedboat and the small boat. The one-eyed middle-aged man suddenly stepped on the ice and quickly approached like a vigorous leopard. The tall and thin middle-aged man suddenly raised his hand, and four kunai that flickered with a dark green light shot out, aiming at Wan Youxi’s glabella, throat, chest, and right arm. The four kunai arrived first and approached before the one-eyed middle-aged man. However, after reaching a range of ten meters, the speed of the kunai suddenly decreased as if they had fallen into a quagmire. In the end, the four kunai seemed to have been completely absorbed by the kinetic energy and collapsed onto the ice. The tall and thin middle-aged man’s expression froze. “Kill!” The spear in the one-eyed middle-aged man’s hand had already arrived. A small ice dragon instantly gathered and pointed at the Rubik’s Cube in Wan Youxi’s palm. “You can hit me, but not the Rubik’s Cube.” Wan Youxi was already on the verge of going berserk. He suddenly raised his head, and his eyes actually completely turned red. There were no pupils or whites. Bang! With Wan Youxi as the center, the red light suddenly expanded in all directions The one-eyed middle-aged man’s ice dragon touched the red light and shattered inch by inch like glass. The red light did not slow down and directly hit the one-eyed middle-aged man’s chest, sending him flying far away. As the power to condense the ice had already disappeared, the one-eyed middle-aged man fell into the water. “Your… your level has increased again…” When the one-eyed middle-aged man was pulled out of the water, he stared at Wan Youxi in shock and let out a strange cry. “The last time I beat you until you ran away with the Ghost Buddha Lamp, it was you who dropped a level. My level did not increase.” Wan Youxi curled his lips. The corner of the one-eyed middle-aged man’s mouth twitched. At this moment, Wan Youxi twisted his palm, and the 4 x 4 Rubik’s Cube suddenly returned to normal. The spear that fell into the sea suddenly seemed to have received some kind of force and flew directly towards Wan Youxi. Then, it quickly shrank and entered the 4 x 4 Rubik’s Cube. “This spear is not bad. As for you guys, get lost.” Wan Youxi put away the cube and actually drove this small boat back. The two High Heaven Plains martial artists had no choice but to drive the speedboat back. After all, the other party already snatched his handy weapon. How was he supposed to fight? With his head? The border of China was long, but there were very few Ninth Realm martial artists. There were not many places that could be defended. At this moment, a Ninth Realm martial artist joined the battle. Because of this, a portion of the Seventh Realm martial artists from India and the High Heaven Plains quietly avoided the battle and entered the territory of the Construction Division. At the same time, a Chinook helicopter entered Xia Country from the southernmost point and arrived in Chang Le City. The High Heaven Plains Leader, a soft girl and a thin old man, got out of the helicopter. Yang Wei, Mo Yuan, and Zhang Peng respectfully welcomed the Leader. They were actually very puzzled. Wasn’t this the High Heaven Plains Leader? Why did he come here personally? As if seeing the confusion in their eyes, the Leader smiled faintly and said in fluent Chinese, “This is only my puppet. Its level is not high. It’s only at level four Seventh Realm.” Only then did the three of them understand. The attribute items, skill books, equipment, and runes dropped in every mystic realm were unique. Very few mystic realms would drop the same thing. At most, they would drop the same rune group. This puppet should be created by the skill that the Leader obtained in the mystic realm in the High Heaven Plains. Was the Leader controlling this puppet from afar? Could this puppet also inherit a certain level of the Leader’s strength? Yang Wei and the other two did not know, and they did not dare to guess. Anyway, since their boss was already here, they just needed to suck up to him. “The levels of the three of you aren’t very high.” The High Heaven Plains Leader walked to the canteen that had just been built in Chang Le City with his hands behind his back. Yang Wei and the other two laughed dryly. Wasn’t this nonsense? The Leader had asked them to stay in Chang Le City, where there were no Sixth Realm mystic realms. How were they supposed to gain experience? The three of them were currently at the second level of the Sixth Realm and had been stuck at this level for a long time. The experience points given by farming low-level mystic realms were so little that it was infuriating. It was simply not worth their effort. “Choose the suitable equipment and put them on. Your strength should increase by a lot.” “In addition, there are three sets of precious purple runes here. They are all very practical.” The leader casually threw out more than ten pieces of equipment and three sets of runes. Golden light and purple light intertwined. Three of them were peerless golden equipment, and the rest were precious purple equipment. Yang Wei and the other two were overjoyed. Equipment! Rune group! If their equipment and rune groups were very powerful, they could also increase their strength greatly. “These two have just advanced to the Seventh Realm and are also our companions. Say hello.” The leader waved his hand and gestured for the two people beside him to come forward. The girl seemed to have a lot of energy and extended her hand. “Hello, my code name is Killer Bee.” The skinny old man said indifferently, “My code name is Evil Doctor.” Yang Wei and the other two immediately trembled. What kind of code names were these? It was a little scary. Seeing that they had all greeted each other, the leader casually said, “Let’s set off and head north to Dragon Sea City.” Yang Wei said excitedly, “Leader, are we going to snatch that mystic realm?” Before coming, the leader had already told them that the pillar of lightning was triggered by the advancement of the mystic realm. As expected, the mystic realm had advanced to the Seventh Realm from the Sixth Realm. Seventh Realm mystic realm! There were only a few of them in the world! Since the leader had come personally, he must be here for the mystic realm! The leader glanced at him with a faint smile. “Are you crazy?” Yang Wei: “…Huh?” The leader sneered. “That mystic realm is located in Dragon Sea City. It happens to be one of the core cities in the territory controlled by the Construction Division.” “In addition, the Ninth Realm martial artists of the Construction Division have already been mobilized and are blocking the Ninth Realm martial artists of India, the Arctic Army, and my High Heaven Plains outside the border.” “If we want to snatch it, it’s equivalent to playing an away game. Do you think we’re really going to fight them on their home ground?” Yang Wei smiled awkwardly. It was true. As expected of the leader, he directly abandoned the idea of occupying that mystic realm. “Leader, then our goal is…?” Zhang Peng could not help but ask. “Murder.” “Who?” “Shield Ghost, Flame Explosion.” Yang Wei and the other two were stunned. Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion were indeed very powerful, but was there a need to mobilize so many people to kill them? The leader said indifferently, “Do you still not see how strong their potential is?” “Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion must have advanced perfectly every time. Otherwise, it would be impossible for each of them to guard a city wall alone.” “I also suspect that they also have a lot of golden peerless equipment and skills.” The leader continued, “If such people are allowed to stay in the Construction Division, they will probably become powerful martial artists comparable to the Asura Twins in less than a year. If they grow to become Ninth Realm martial artists safely, they will probably become the new Gao Qianchi and Wan Youxi.” When he said these two names, the leader’s face could not help but tremble slightly. “Moreover, the two of them are good friends. They’re intimate and even eat and stay together. Their cooperation is based on tacit understanding and they are definitely not inferior to the Asura twins.” “Don’t you think such martial artists should be killed?” Yang Wei and the other two hurriedly nodded. After hearing what the leader said, they realized how dangerous the other party was. If Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion were allowed to grow like this, they would definitely become top-notch experts. “A seedling will always be a seedling. A good seedling needs to be carefully nurtured to grow. If I eliminate these two seedlings now, it will save a lot of effort in the future.” The leader was calm and serious. “Understood!” Yang Wei and the other two nodded heavily. “However, can the few of us… do it?” Mo Yuan whispered. The leader explained calmly, “With the advancement of the mystic realm, the Construction Division will definitely send Seventh Realm martial artists to investigate. Once they enter and can’t come out for a short period of time, the defense forces of Dragon Sea City and the nearby cities will be empty.” “Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion are still Sixth Realm martial artists. They must be the group of people who are staying behind in Dragon Sea City. Do you still need me to tell you what to do next?” Yang Wei and the other two raised their thumbs at the same time. “As expected of the leader!” … At the same time, in Dragon Sea City. Lin Xuan suddenly saw the earth-shattering changes in the Falling Thunder Mountain from the perspective of his training avatar! The original Falling Thunder Mountain was only 900 meters tall, and the area below the mountain was very small. But now, the foot of the Falling Thunder Mountain extended in all directions, and the land was created from thin air. Moreover, with the Falling Thunder Mountain as the center, hills of various sizes quickly rose. Countless plants grew crazily and instantly enveloped these mountains. Lin Xuan was dumbfounded. This was too unscientific. Then, an even more shocking scene appeared. Through the perspective of one of the training avatars, he actually discovered that the demon beasts of the Falling Thunder Mountain had begun to crazily accelerate their evolution! The aura of all the demon beasts rose at a visible speed. In the blink of an eye, they broke through to the Sixth Realm and became Seventh Realm demon beasts. “The Falling Thunder Mountain has changed greatly. The previous map is no longer useful. Moreover, a new demon beast has appeared. Its level has also increased from Sixth Realm to Seventh Realm. Its combat strength has increased… It’s too dangerous.” Lin Xuan immediately had the expression of an old man. “Wait… Since all the demon beasts have evolved, what about my training avatars?” He suddenly thought of something and immediately checked the situation of his seven training avatars. The result made him overjoyed. All the training avatars also turned into Seventh Realm demon beasts! “Alright, in that case, there’s no need for me to take the risk to enter the Falling Thunder Mountain. I can directly start training.” Lin Xuan nodded repeatedly and simply waited for his gains. On the other side. In the director’s office of the Construction Division in Dragon Sea City. Chu Pengcheng received a communication from his superior and his expression was solemn. He had already heard a lot of information from his superior. A mystic realm advancement was extremely dangerous! However, it was also filled with opportunities. With the height and brightness of this lightning pillar, it was certain that the mystic realm had advanced to the Seventh Realm. In this way, it would mean that the Construction Division would control another large mystic realm! This was definitely a huge gain. The headquarters had already ordered the Seventh Realm martial artists of White Crane Town and Yang City to rush to Dragon Sea City because these two towns were the closest to Dragon Sea City. It would take at least a day for the members from the other cities to rush over. Their mission was to enter the Falling Thunder Mountain mystic realm and explore the changes brought about by the advancement of the mystic realm. Specifically, it was to map, explore the geography, find good locations to build the safety station, and explore the loot. This was a huge project, and it would definitely take up the time of many Seventh Realm martial artists, causing some cities to fall into an empty defense. If a few Seventh Realm martial artists died in the Falling Thunder Mountain mystic realm, it would be a huge loss for the Construction Division. However, they could not leave this thing alone. If there were too many demon beasts, they would definitely surge out from the mystic realm and harm the commoners. Chu Pengcheng quickly conveyed this order to everyone. He also asked the Seventh Realm martial artists to quickly gather and prepare to enter the Falling Thunder Mountain mystic realm. Lin Xuan scratched his head. He did not know if he should reveal his level. It seemed a little too shocking to suddenly say that he was already a Seventh Realm martial artist. In the eyes of others, he had just experienced the defense of White Crane Town more than two months ago. At that time, he was still at level one Sixth Realm. If he told them that he had already broken through to the Seventh Realm, they would probably not believe him. However, after his advancement, he had another avatar space. It seemed a little wasteful to just leave it there. “Forget it. There’s no need to expose it too early. It’ll be too high-profile.” “Moreover, if Falling Thunder Mountain advances to the Seventh Realm, my training avatars can also train inside. I don’t have to repeat the process of getting new avatars.” Lin Xuan thought for a moment and decided not to take the risk. The mystic realm was so dangerous. Moreover, this was a mystic realm that had just advanced to the Seventh Realm! “However, if Chu Pengcheng and the others encounter danger in the Falling Thunder Mountain, I can use my training avatar to help them.” Lin Xuan swept his gaze over the three people who were already prepared and pondered. Ten hours later, Ye Yuqiu and Black rushed over from the west in an off-road vehicle. Two middle-aged men also came from the north in an off-road vehicle. They were the director and deputy director of Yang City. Ye Yuqiu and Black greeted Chu Pengcheng and the others before walking straight towards Lin Xuan. Both men looked grim. Ye Yuqiu said in a low voice, “Shield Ghost, Flame Explosion, let me tell you something. Don’t be afraid. We haven’t said anything about this matter because we were afraid that you would be dealt a blow.” Black even handed over a bottle of wine. “Drink some alcohol to boost your courage.” Lin Xuan was very confused. “What is it?” “Your friend, that Lin Xuan… He suddenly disappeared! Our preliminary estimate is that he might have been attacked by a wandering demon beast…” Ye Yuqiu seemed to blame herself. Lin Xuan was enlightened. Back when he left White Crane Town, he had left an avatar there to act as Lin Xuan. Previously, when dealing with the traitor, he had to use another avatar, so he removed the avatar he had left in White Crane Town. However, in the eyes of Ye Yuqiu and Black, it was “Lin Xuan” who had suddenly disappeared. They felt that “Lin Xuan” was most likely dead. At the same time, they also felt that this news might be a huge blow to Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion. Considering that they were fighting bravely in the Dragon Sea City mystic realm at the time, Ye Yuqiu and Black worked together and decided not to contact Shield Ghost through the communicator and keep this matter under wraps. “We suspect that Lin Xuan encountered a demon beast when he was out and died…” Ye Yuqiu sighed softly, her tone filled with guilt.” Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion, I didn’t expect him to die just like that. My condolences.” Being killed after a chance encounter with a demon beast was a very normal way to die. There was a large residential area near White Crane Town, and many demon beasts were hiding in these abandoned buildings. They liked to attack the city at night. Although the White Crane Town Construction Division had already arranged for its members to be on night duty, it was impossible for them to not leave any blind spots. Lin Xuan had a strange expression. Fortunately, his head was in his helmet, so Ye Yuqiu could not tell. It felt strange for someone to specially come over to inform him of his death. Lin Xuan waved his hand. “It’s fine. We believe that he’s still alive.” Flame Explosion also waved his hand. “Our friend is not that weak.” The two of them turned around and left, looking as if they had suffered a huge blow. Black took a sip of wine. “It probably would have been better if we did not tell them. Look, they’re already talking nonsense.” Ye Yuqiu sighed. “They’re good friends after all. It’s better to let them know about their friend’s death.” On the other side, seeing that everyone was here, Chu Pengcheng glanced at Lu Luo, Wang Dafu, and the others and said solemnly, “Everyone, I’ll leave the Construction Division of Dragon Sea City to you for the time being. The advancement of the mystic realm will definitely attract the attention of other organizations. Please be alert and guard against any enemies!” Then, Chu Pengcheng patted Wang Dafu’s shoulder solemnly. “Wang Dafu, you will temporarily be the director-general. You can use all the power of the director-general!” Wang Dafu nodded heavily. Soon, Chu Pengcheng and the other seven Seventh Realm martial artists passed through the door of light of the mystic realm and entered the Falling Thunder Mountain. Lin Xuan also brought up the perspective of his training avatar. This training avatar was a Lightning Bee. It was very small, but its abdomen could shoot out high-temperature lightning liquid. If it landed on one’s body, it would cause a large number of burns. Its lethality could not be underestimated. The reason Lin Xuan chose it was naturally because it was small and could follow behind Chu Pengcheng and the others and pay attention to their situation at all times. At this moment, he also noticed that the training information on the Falling Thunder Mountain had changed. [Falling Thunder Mountain: 20 essence per minute] Lin Xuan glanced at his consciousness space. He immediately saw a crystal ball the size of a finger. “Experience points will directly appear on the data panel. Martial artists can choose to input them into their martial artist level, skills, and rune group.” “However, essence… exists in a physical form. This means that essence can probably be used to trade.” Lin Xuan’s thoughts quickly spread. “It’s very likely that the currency used by martial artists above the Seventh Realm is not general coins, but essence.” “Let’s see how they’re doing in the Falling Thunder Mountain.” Lin Xuan continued to pay attention to the perspective of the Lightning Bee. He saw Chu Pengcheng and the others advancing extremely cautiously. Moreover, their speed was very slow, and they had to stop every once in a while to draw the map. When they encountered demon beasts, the seven of them would rush forward and kill the demon beasts as quickly as possible. Moreover, the person with the highest-level Observer among the seven of them would carefully observe and record the information. “As expected of the Seventh Realm martial artists nurtured by the Construction Division. They’re orderly and don’t mess up at all.” Lin Xuan could not help but nod. Chu Pengcheng called for everyone to follow and suddenly his eyes lit up as he said happily, “This place is not bad. The terrain is flat and there are fewer demon beasts nearby. Moreover, the view is wide. There’s also a small stream flowing past. It’s very suitable for us to build a safety station.” The others also nodded repeatedly. Chu Pengcheng immediately took out a flag from his storage compartment and inserted it deeply into the ground. This flag was a symbol. This way, he would not forget the next time he came. “The original mountain path is already covered by vegetation. If we want to go to the other parts of the Falling Thunder Mountain, we have to open up a path ourselves.” Bai Xinghe looked up at the dense vegetation and frowned slightly. In the sky, lightning struck the mountain from time to time, blasting away all the nearby vegetation. The high temperature produced by the lightning quickly ignited the vegetation and flames spread. However, soon, the exposed mountain would grow again and be covered in vegetation. The vegetation contained a lot of water, so the flames could not burn for long before extinguishing on their own. No matter how many lightning bolts struck, the Falling Thunder Mountain was still covered in vegetation. “Lightning, lightning is falling. Spread out!” Silver Fox suddenly shouted when he saw a light spot suddenly appear under his feet. The seven of them lowered their heads at the same time and discovered a light spot the size of a basin. They hurriedly dispersed. Boom! Lin Xuan was very happy to see the lightning. After the advancement of the Falling Thunder Mountain, the lightning also became stronger! It had to be known that the demon beasts of the Falling Thunder Mountain strengthened themselves by absorbing the lightning. Didn’t this mean that his training avatars could also quickly become stronger? As expected, when Lin Xuan switched to the perspective of the other training avatars, he immediately saw that the levels of these training avatars were slowly increasing. It was estimated that they would be able to advance from level one to level two Seventh Realm in at most half a day. At this moment, Lin Xuan suddenly discovered from the perspective of an avatar that a large group of demon beasts had suddenly rushed down from above. There were more than 300 of them. Moreover, these demon beasts were at least level two Seventh Realm, and more than ten of them were level three Seventh Realm. If Chu Pengcheng and the others continued to advance at this speed, they might very well collide with these demon beasts that had suddenly become restless. The consequences would definitely be fatal. The demon beasts did not care if they were passing by. If anyone dared to appear in front of them, they would be instantly destroyed until their ashes scattered. Lin Xuan thought for a moment and immediately controlled the Lightning Bee to attack them. Before the attack, he even specially made the Lightning Bee fly faster and deliberately increased the sound of its flight so that Chu Pengcheng and the others could hear them clearly. “There’s the sound of wings flapping! Attention, it might be an insect-type demon beast!” Ye Yuqiu was the first to react and looked around vigilantly. Swoosh. In an instant, the seven martial artists stood back-to-back and observed their surroundings. “Over there, there’s a Lightning Bee! The noise we heard just now should have been emitted from this bee.” Silver Fox’s eyes were sharp and he immediately saw the Lightning Bee flapping its wings. The Lightning Bee was still very big, about the size of a palm. In particular, its abdomen was bulging and flickering with lightning. As long as he calmed down and observed, he was able to discover the Lightning Bee quite quickly. “Be careful. The Lightning Bee’s lightning liquid damage is very high. We don’t have anyone with high lightning resistance among us. Don’t resist it and try your best to avoid it,” Bai Xinghe said solemnly. Pfft! The Lightning Bee directly spat out a bolt of lightning. For some reason, everyone felt that the lightning liquid was swaying and very slow, as if it could be easily dodged. Shrug. The lightning liquid did not land on anyone and directly shot to the ground. The grass on the ground was immediately burned black by the high-temperature lightning liquid. The seven of them took a deep breath and were amazed by the damage of the lightning liquid. But when they looked up again, the Lightning Bee had disappeared. “It… ran away just like that?” Silver Fox scratched his head. “What was it after?” Chu Pengcheng was also very confused. Everyone was also very confused. Did it come here to act cute? Everyone continued forward. After walking for a while, they suddenly discovered a large number of collapsed and charred trees in front of them. Although the vegetation of the Falling Thunder Mountain was already growing very quickly, it would still take a long time to recover after being charred at such a high level. Black squatted down and checked carefully. “The footprints of many demon beasts are estimated to be 200 to 300.” “They ran from west to east in this direction just now. I wonder why.” Bai Xinghe suddenly whispered, “If we hadn’t been attacked by the Lightning Bees just now, would we have collided head-on with these high-speed demon beasts?” The other six were stunned, and a trace of surprise involuntarily rose in their minds. Everyone took a while to process this and realized that it was true! The Lightning Bees’ attack had delayed them for a few minutes, causing them to be slower. Coincidentally, because of that, they had also missed the encounter with this violent demon beast group. “Could it be that the Lightning Bee likes us?” Silver Fox was dumbfounded. Black glanced at him. “He might like us, but he definitely won’t like you.” Silver Fox :”…” “Perhaps it’s fate.” Chu Pengcheng shrugged. The others also nodded in agreement and continued exploring. Lin Xuan did not continue to stare. With the strength of Chu Pengcheng and the others, they should be able to survey all the other places in the Falling Thunder Mountain except the main peak. However, if they climbed the main peak of the Falling Thunder Mountain, the danger factor would greatly increase. It was useless for him to continue staring. It was no different from being in a daze. “My time is precious. I have to spend every minute and every second on the blade.” Lin Xuan nodded solemnly. He wrapped the small blanket around his body tightly and found a comfortable position to lie down. According to the shifts they had discussed, Lin Xuan was supposed to be on duty with Wen Xiong in the second half of the night. Xu Xuan and Lu Luo were responsible for the first half of the night. This night was not as dangerous as he had imagined. In the entire night, no one dared to attack Dragon Sea City. Of course, it was also possible that the outsiders who had sneaked in from the border had not arrived yet. “Let’s take a look at the gains first. What good things are there in a Seventh Realm mystic realm?” Lin Xuan woke up early in the morning and hurriedly came to see what his seven training avatars had obtained. [Thunderbolt Lion has been training for 10 hours and has reached the upper limit of its training time. Obtained 16,200 essence, 3 Seventh Realm skill books, 5 Seventh Realm equipment, 4 runes, 1 Thunder Rock Marrow, and 1 Mystic Realm Pearl. Do you wish to collect?] Lin Xuan was pleasantly surprised. Thunder Rock Marrow? Mystic Realm Pearl? These are new! —- Name: Thunder Rock Marrow Grade: Peerless Golden Effect: After using it, any lightning spell will be increased by 200%. The remaining elemental damage will be reduced by 90%. Duration: 10 minutes. After this duration, all attributes will be reduced by 20%. —- Lin Xuan nodded slightly. After seeing the effect, he knew what this was. It could specialize the power of lightning spells for a short period of time. Moreover, this spell was not only limited to attack-type lightning spells, but also applied to all types of lightning spells. For example, the Lightning Shield could also enjoy this enhancement. This was very terrifying. This spell could directly increase the strength of the lightning shield by 200%. With this, even a weak mage would not be killed so easily. However, the side effects of this thing were also very obvious. Sure, it provided ten minutes of power. After the time limit passed, however, one would directly become dispirited and all his attributes would decrease by 20%. That was not a joke. If one could not kill the enemy within 10 minutes or failed to escape, it would be no different from death. Lin Xuan looked at the Mystic Realm Pearl again. —- Name: Mystic Realm Pearl Grade: Peerless Golden Effect: Consume 100 Mystic Realm Pearls to upgrade a peerless golden skill to a legendary dark gold skill. —- Lin Xuan: “!!!” This was it! Previously, Black had told him before that the peerless golden grade was not the highest. All Seventh Realm mystic realms would drop especially impressive items. Those items could allow one’s peerless golden grade to increase by another level! “The Mystic Realm Pearl! It’s definitely a treasure that all Seventh Realm and above martial artists need!” “After the skill grade is increased, there will be many benefits.” Lin Xuan’s skills were almost all peerless golden. Moreover, his skill level was not much lower. On the other hand, some martial artists still had Fourth Realm skills after advancing to the Sixth Realm. It was precisely because of his peerless golden grade Observer skill, High-level Disguise Technique, and Weaken that Lin Xuan had the ability to not be spied on by those martial artists whose levels surpassed his. Moreover, he could also spy on other people’s information. Previously, when they were still in the Germinal Organization, Black had wanted to use his Observer skill to see Lin Xuan’s information. However, his Observer skill was only precious purple, so he naturally could not see Lin Xuan’s information. Lin Xuan looked at the gains of the other six training avatars. He discovered that he had only obtained three Thunder Rock Marrow and four Mystic Realm Pearls. “The drop rate of these two items is really low… To think that I have seven training avatars. If it were anyone else, they probably wouldn’t even be able to get one every two weeks, right?” Lin Xuan shook his head repeatedly. This damn drop rate! The sun set. In the blink of an eye, the second night after Chu Pengcheng and the others entered the Falling Thunder Mountain Range. Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion guarded the first half of the night, and Xu Xuan and Wen Xiong guarded the second half of the night. Lu Luo rested. Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion guarded the southern and northern city walls respectively. As for the east and west city walls, they were each guarded by five Fifth Realm martial artists. If they encountered danger that was difficult to resist or discovered outsiders, all the martial artists would immediately ring the alarm. At the same time. The leader and the others took advantage of the night and quickly approached the west wall of Dragon Sea City like bats flying close to the ground. They had circled around from White Crane Town and did not alarm White Crane Town on the way. Alarming White Crane Town was a stupid action and would definitely make the Construction Division vigilant. Since the leader’s goal was Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion, he would not be distracted at all and would not stop until he achieved his goal. Soon, they arrived at the western city wall. As nothing unexpected happened the previous night, the members were also somewhat negligent. Yang Wei looked towards the city wall and discovered that among the five Fifth Realm martial artists, two were dozing off, and only three were awake. However, the one that was awake was also not paying attention. At most, he was only half as focused as usual. Yang Wei was relieved. “Leader, that item of yours is really powerful. We’re basically invisible and it’s as if our actions have been muted. We didn’t alarm anyone at all.” He chuckled softly. The soft and cute girl, the Killer Bee, chuckled and said, “That’s an Invisibility Talisman produced by the famous country. It can give us invisibility and silence everything within a 15-meter radius by 99%. Unless a Ninth Realm martial artist comes personally, it’s impossible for them to see through our disguise.” Mo Yuan and Zhang Peng raised their thumbs at the same time. “Impressive, really impressive.” “Up the city wall.” The leader’s expression did not change as he immediately ordered. “Yes!” Yang Wei and the other two nodded solemnly and were about to attack. “I didn’t ask you. Killer Bee, go.” The leader stopped them. Yang Wei smiled awkwardly. “Leader, there’s no need to trouble a Seventh Realm martial artist with such a simple matter. We can do it too.” “That’s right, that’s right.” Mo Yuan and Zhang Peng also nodded repeatedly. The leader did not say a word and only gestured for them to look at the city wall. Killing Bee’s movements were terrifyingly clean. After lightly stepping on the city wall twice, she lightly flipped onto the city wall. Her soft fingers were like poisonous thorns as they gently poked the exposed skin of those Fifth Realm martial artists, quickly making them faint. It only took the Killer Bee three seconds to kill four people. Then she grabbed the fifth man and returned to the base of the wall. The entire process took less than ten seconds. Yang Wei and the other two felt their scalps tingle. Such a soft and cute girl did not even blink when killing people. It was too damn scary. No wonder her code name was Killer Bee. This time, instead of using her other fingers, Killer Bee extended her pinky and stabbed the martial artist’s neck. This martial artist originally had a conflicted expression, but he quickly calmed down, as if he was controlled by some spell. “Where are Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion?” the leader asked. “Shield Ghost is on the north wall and Flame Explosion is on the south wall,” the martial artist replied mechanically. The leader nodded. Killer Bee casually twisted and broke the martial artist’s head. “Let’s go to the south wall first. Flame Explosion’s damage is very high. He will be more dangerous when he become stronger,” the leader instructed. “Yes!” Everyone nodded. On the southern city wall of Dragon Sea City. Lin Xuan’s avatar, Flame Explosion, was currently looking into the dense darkness in the distance. After familiarizing himself with the perspective of the many avatars, Lin Xuan had long become used to them. He would not be affected by the perspective of the other avatars. Moreover, because he had already gotten a good rest during the day, he was not sleepy at all. Instead, he was full of energy. At this moment, he suddenly discovered through his high-level perception that someone was secretly approaching from the bottom of the wall. Flame Explosion was stunned, and Lin Xuan’s main body on the north wall was also stunned. He looked carefully again and was surprised to see a group of people secretly approaching in the night. “An outsider has finally appeared. You’re trying to ambush me in the middle of the night, right?” Lin Xuan sneered. Flame Explosion remained calm, but he had already prepared a skill behind his back. He could release Flame Explosion at any time. At this moment, the leader and the others had already arrived at the south city wall. The leader whispered, “The two of you, attack together. My request is to kill him in one strike. Don’t give Flame Explosion any chance to counterattack.” The Killer Bee and Evil Doctor were stunned at first, then they nodded solemnly. Yang Wei, Mo Yuan, and Zhang Peng were slightly shocked. To deal with a Sixth Realm martial artist, two Seventh Realm martial artists had to attack together. Wasn’t the leader a little too cautious? Evil Doctor sensed their expressions and said solemnly in Japanese, “A lion still uses its full strength to catch a rabbit. Don’t think that a Sixth Realm martial artist can’t resist a Seventh Realm martial artist.” The leader nodded in relief. “Sixth Realm martial artists are indeed completely defeated when facing Seventh Realm martial artists, but it doesn’t mean that they will be instantly killed. If Flame Explosion has something to save his life and tries his best to break free or sends out a distress signal, we will be directly exposed.” “If we could have quietly killed Flame Explosion and Shield Ghost one after another, but because of our arrogance and complacency, we end up getting exposed and have no choice but to fight head-on… Do you think it would wise?” Yang Wei and the other two nodded repeatedly. They were surprised by the leader’s cautiousness. No wonder the leader directly brought two Seventh Realm martial artists over. From the looks of it, Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion were definitely done for! The Killer Bee and Evil Doctor climbed up the city wall and silently and quickly flew up. Evil Doctor was the first to attack. He held a blowpipe in both hands and suddenly blew. Three thin needles directly flew towards Flame Explosion’s exposed skin. This was a peerless golden equipment that he had obtained after grinding for a long time. Every once in a while, it would automatically produce thin needles. There were three types of thin needles: damage, medical, and anesthetic needles. The three needles he had fired just now were all anesthetic needles. As long as the other party was not a Constitution Devil with a Constitution of more than 400 points, the other party would definitely be anesthetized and exhausted. Flame Explosion was clearly a mage who mainly focused on increasing his Spirit. Flame Explosion’s damage output could only be displayed with Shield Ghost protecting him. In front of these three anesthetic needles, he had no resistance at all! The truth seemed to be as he had expected. Three anesthetic needles accurately hit the back of Flame Explosion’s hand and arm. Flame Explosion was originally patrolling back and forth on the southern city wall. This sudden anesthesia made his entire body instantly go limp and he collapsed to the ground. The entire process took less than a blink of an eye. Evil Doctor also saw that the moment Flame Explosion fell, he wanted to crawl over and sound the alarm. However, the effect of the anesthetic needle had already been activated. His outstretched hand also drooped weakly to the ground. After the anesthetic needle hit, Killer Bee quickly approached. Her light and soft body instantly crossed the short distance and arrived in front of Flame Explosion. Other than his pinky, the other eight fingers stretched out at the same time and pierced towards Flame Explosion and his chest. However, the Killer Bee suddenly saw something light up on Flame Explosion’s chest. Terrifying heat and high temperature followed. In the next moment, a huge fireball more than seven meters in diameter instantly swallowed Killer Bee. Killer Bee did not even have the time to squeak before it was blasted into ashes by this terrifying Flame Explosion. Evil Doctor was not far from the Killer Bee. He did not expect Flame Explosion, who was already under anesthesia, to actually use Flame Explosion on Killer Bee. At this moment, he was also affected. His body was sent flying more than ten meters, and a large area in front of him was burned, causing his health to decrease by a quarter. A terrifying explosion sounded in the night sky, illuminating the leader and the others below the city wall. The entire Dragon Sea City instantly woke up from its deep sleep! The leader, Yang Wei, and the others were dumbfounded. What the hell was going on?! Evil Doctor’s anesthetic needle did not work? At this moment, Lin Xuan’s main body, Shield Ghost, had already activated Lightning Speed and was quickly approaching the southern city wall. As he approached quickly, he was also pleasantly surprised. “Damn, I instantly killed a Seventh Realm martial artist with Flame Explosion… Am I that powerful?!” Lin Xuan hurriedly estimated. His current highest attribute Constitution had reached 442 points. According to the Tyrant’s skill “Attribute Bestowment”, it meant that his Strength, Spirit, and Agility attributes each increased by 132! In other words, his attributes were actually 442 Constitution, 257 Strength, 267 Spirit, and 257 Agility! Any one of these three attributes could be compared to an ordinary Seventh Realm martial artist! Coupled with the additional fire damage, the Demon Flame Set, the Demon King of Fury, the Blazing Fire Codex, and a series of other fire damage bonuses, this attack was incomparably powerful. The fireball created had a diameter of more than nine meters! On the other hand, the Killer Bee was fast and her attack carried poison. Clearly, she was the type that mainly focused on Agility and Spirit. Her body was definitely very fragile. With this in mind, it did not seem difficult for him to kill the Killer Bee with one hit. At this moment, the leader still did not know that the Killer Bee was already dead. He hurriedly rubbed his stinging eyes. The Flame Explosion just now was too bright, and it made his tears fall. Yang Wei’s heart skipped a beat. “Then what should we do? Should we retreat?” The leader slapped him. “Idiot, there are no Seventh Realm martial artists in Dragon Sea City now. Let’s directly attack!” Although all the spies in Dragon Sea City had been eliminated, there were still spies in White Crane Town and Yang City. The spies on the other side had sent a message to the leader. According to the orders of the Construction Division’s headquarters, all Seventh Realm martial artists had been instructed to enter the Falling Thunder Mountain to explore. Currently, there were no Seventh Realm martial artists in Dragon Sea City. Since his original plan did not work, he would attack forcefully! In any case, they had three Seventh Realm martial artists on their side. What was there to be afraid of?! Yang Wei was slapped, but he immediately shouted, “Evil doctor, protect our grappling hook!” The three of them were not as agile as Killer Bee. They could only take out the grappling hooks that they had prepared from the storage compartment and shoot the hooks up the city wall. Then, they quickly climbed up the city wall with the grappling hooks. The leader suddenly stomped on the city wall and jumped up ten meters high. This speed made Yang Wei and the other two envious. Even the leader’s puppet was so powerful. The leader arrived at the city wall and his heart skipped a beat. Things did not seem to be going as he had expected. Evil Doctor’s anesthetic needle actually did not make Flame Explosion fall to the ground. He originally thought that Flame Explosion had some kind of life-saving item. He guessed that the other party had probably used Flame Explosion to force back Killer Bee in the face of death and was also seriously injured. But now, Flame Explosion was standing there calmly. Evil Doctor was charred and lying more than ten meters away. So… what about Killer Bee? Where was Killer Bee? When Lin Xuan saw the leader, he was also stunned. Damn, another Seventh Realm martial artist? He used his Observer skill and was shocked to discover that he could only see about 50% of the other party’s information. The highest attributes and the profession could not be seen. “Three Seventh Realm martial artists came to ambush me. They think too highly of me.” Lin Xuan clicked his tongue in wonder. Ten seconds later, Yang Wei and the other two also arrived at the city wall through the grappling hook. Seeing these three people, Lin Xuan was stunned again. Good lord! It’s the three of you! “Evil Doctor, how are you?” The leader helped Evil Doctor up. Evil Doctor’s pupils constricted as he pointed at an empty space and stammered. “Kill… Killer Bee…” The leader frowned and directly slapped him. “How many times have I told you that you can’t be fearful, let alone have your will disrupted because of fear!” After slapping him, Evil Doctor finally recovered from his daze and finally said those words in a coherent manner. “Killer Bee is dead!” The leader was speechless. His pupils constricted. “You said that Killer Bee… is dead?!” There was still fear in Evil Doctor’s voice. “I personally saw Flame Explosion directly swallow Killer Bee. She didn’t even have the chance to use the Life Potion.” At this moment, Yang Wei and the other two had already surrounded Flame Explosion from three directions, each holding a weapon. The weapons were all of peerless golden grade. They were specially given to them by the leader. In addition, they also embedded rune groups that were suitable for them. Now, their confidence was very inflated. Flame Explosion was only a Sixth Realm martial artist and needed to be protected in order to maximize his output. However, now that the three of them had surrounded Flame Explosion, Flame Explosion was already like a turtle in a jar! At the thought of being able to kill such a powerful martial artist like Flame Explosion, Yang Wei and the other two were excited. Back then, they had been blocked by Flame Explosion alone outside the city wall of White Crane Town! Now, they wanted to avenge their previous humiliation! The leader turned around and wanted to remind Yang Wei and the other two, but when he turned around, he discovered that Yang Wei and the other two had already rushed towards Flame Explosion. The leader looked over and immediately saw a huge fireball more than nine meters in diameter slowly rising between Flame Explosion’s hands. It was as if the sun in the night was shining brightly! Yang Wei and the other two were also stunned. When they were under the city wall in the past, they never had the chance to directly face such a huge fireball and did not feel anything. They only thought that Flame Explosion had used some life-saving item. Now that they were facing the huge fireball, they finally felt an incomparably terrifying pressure. “Hurry up and take your potions!” Yang Wei and the other two’s actions were surprisingly uniform. They hurriedly took out a bottle of Big Life Potion from the storage compartment and were about to pour it into their mouths. When they took out the potions, Flame Explosion had already landed on them. The dazzling light swallowed everyone on the city wall. In particular, Flame Explosion himself was also standing in the center of Flame Explosion. Boom! Three charred bodies flew out and were directly blasted into Dragon Sea City. These three happened to land under the feet of Xu Xuan, Lu Luo, Wen Xiong, and the others. “Damn?” Wen Xiong was dumbfounded. Although these three people’s faces were charred and they were extremely dead, they still felt a little familiar. Lu Luo said solemnly, “I remember this guy. He’s clearly Yang Wei of the Germinal Organization.” Wen Xiong said in surprise, “Yang Wei and the others have been wandering outside? They actually came all the way to Dragon Sea City?” Xu Xuan was stunned. “The remaining forces of the Germinal Organization? I’m afraid this matter involves a lot of people.” After summoning a few martial artists to look at the three charred corpses, the three of them hurriedly ran towards the city wall. Shield Ghost also followed closely like a black figure and quickly arrived. Seeing that the health points of Yang Wei and the other two were instantly emptied, the leader finally reacted. Flame Explosion… was definitely not a Sixth Realm martial artist! “You’re actually already a Seventh Realm martial artist?!” The leader was shocked and furious. He did not expect Flame Explosion to have already advanced to the Seventh Realm. Not all mystic realms produced skills like the Observer skill. At the very least, such a skill did not drop in the mystic realm of High Heaven Plains. The leader was naturally unable to observe Flame Explosion’s data panel. Of course, even if he had this skill, he would not be able to see the information of Flame Explosion completely. The information he saw would most likely be disguised. He could only guess based on the facts. Killer Bee was instantly killed. Evil Doctor stood at the edge and was blasted far away, losing a quarter of his health. Yang Wei and the other two were also instantly killed. This was not something a Sixth Realm martial artist could do! Xu Xuan and the other two arrived and happened to hear the leader’s furious words. The three of them were also very shocked. However, before they could speak, Shield Ghost rushed up the city wall and said angrily, “Flame Explosion! Why didn’t you tell me that you had advanced to the Seventh Realm? I thought we were good brothers!” Flame Explosion :”…” Xu Xuan and the other two :”…” Damn, even Flame Explosion’s good brother, Shield Ghost, did not know? Flame Explosion had actually hidden his cultivation so deeply! After a short shock, the three of them became happy. Flame Explosion had also advanced to the Seventh Realm. This meant that the strength of the Construction Division had increased again. They were naturally overjoyed. “Leader, the other party only has one Seventh Realm martial artist. We still have a chance,” Evil Doctor had already given himself two medical needles just now and his health points were just about full. The leader took a deep breath. “I originally thought that I wouldn’t have to do it myself. I didn’t expect that I would still have to do it.” Evil Doctor revealed a respectful expression. The leader was someone he admired. The Asura Twins were so arrogant and bloodthirsty. However, they were still tamed by the leader. The leader still had his trump card. That was the Puppet Manipulation Technique! It was said that when the leader was still a Third Realm martial artist, he had accidentally obtained a peerless golden grade Puppet Manipulation Technique! It was unknown what fortuitous encounter he had encountered that allowed him to increase his cultivation by three levels in a day! It was precisely because of this that the leader could stand out from countless martial artists in the High Heaven Plains and be recognized by the previous leader. In the end, the leader used the Puppet Manipulation Technique to disguise himself as the old leader’s lover and successfully assassinated the old leader when they were having sex on the bed. After that, he successfully ascended the throne! His success despite being an underdog had inspired countless martial artists in the High Heaven Plains. They all regarded the leader as their role model! Now, the leader’s main body was that of a Ninth Realm martial artist. His Puppet Manipulation Technique had definitely reached perfection, and it had increased from a peerless golden level to an even higher level! It might be legendary dark gold or even immortal rainbow! It was difficult to imagine what magical effect the Puppet Manipulation Technique of that grade had. “Quick, protect Flame Explosion in the center! Give him a good output environment!” Lu Luo was straightforward and immediately blocked in front of Flame Explosion with her huge sickle. Even though she was clearly a charging warrior, she still had to let go of her high-speed advantage. This was because everyone knew that it was impossible for a Sixth Realm martial artist to match a Seventh Realm martial artist. If they protected the only Seventh Realm martial artist among them, Flame Explosion, they might be able to win. However, if Flame Explosion was killed by the other party, the chances of winning were almost zero. “It’s too late!” The leader sneered. As soon as he finished speaking, his figure was suddenly blown away by the night wind. When he appeared again, he had already appeared behind Flame Explosion! The sharp dagger was aimed at his back! Lu Luo, Wen Xiong, and Xu Xuan’s pupils constricted. Xu Xuan had already used her recovery technique. However, it was obvious that she was a step slower than the leader. Their lives were at stake. The leader suddenly saw Flame Explosion turn his head strangely. The eyes under the cloak were not looking at him, but at the air behind him. The next moment, the leader immediately felt his short knife stab empty air. His vision blurred, and he realized that the Flame Explosion had already disappeared. What he had hit was only an afterimage. The leader was stunned. Suddenly, he felt a hot temperature quickly condense behind him. Boom! The other party used Fireball. Even if it was just a small fireball that had reached the peerless golden grade and had two enhancements, due to Flame Explosion’s 267 points of Spirit, the fireball could still release a terrifying heat energy! Lin Xuan actually wanted to use Flame Explosion. His fire resistance was very high, so he did not have to worry about being affected by the Flame Explosion. However, it was different for Xu Xuan, Lu Luo, and Wen Xiong. After a short moment of thought, Lin Xuan still used the Fireball Technique. The single-target damage was not inferior to Flame Explosion. The leader’s skill, Shadow Travel, was on cooldown and he had no choice but to take this attack. His body was sent flying more than ten meters, and his back was immediately charred. Wen Xiong could smell the roasted meat in the air. Evil Doctor hurriedly stepped forward and pierced him with two medical needles before recovering more than half of his health. Lu Luo said in surprise, “Flame Explosion, how did you suddenly disappear just now?” Flame Explosion: “Skill.” The moment the leader attacked, he used Flash and directly dodged the fierce attack. It had to be said that Flash was really useful! It was a pity that Lin Xuan’s Flash had yet to reach the peerless golden grade. Now, it was only at the precious purple grade. If he advanced to the peerless golden level, he should not have the restriction of “flashing to a place within sight”. At that time, he would be able to flash at will within a certain range. “Damn it…!” The continuous burning sensation on his back made the leader gasp. He did not doubt at all that Flame Explosion was definitely a Seventh Realm martial artist! Moreover, it was very likely that he was a Fire Mage! Moreover, it was a precious purple profession Fire Mage. The skill effect of this profession was even stronger. It allowed all fire spells to be increased by 25%. Seeing that the Seventh Realm martial artist was actually in such a sorry state, Lu Luo and the other two were overjoyed. They did not expect Flame Explosion to have a trump card. “As long as we protect them well, it’s only a matter of time before we kill them.” Wen Xiong chuckled. The leader suddenly looked at Evil Doctor. “Are you willing to sacrifice everything for the organization?” Evil Doctor was stunned and hurriedly nodded. “Yes! Leader, are you questioning my loyalty?” The leader said, “Including your life?” “Including my life.” “Alright.” After the leader finished speaking, his fingers turned into claws and actually pierced into Evil Doctor’s chest. It was as simple as stabbing tofu. Evil Doctor’s eyes widened. It was difficult for him to imagine that he would actually be killed by the leader. Of course, he could die on the battlefield for the sake of the organization. However, of all people, why was the leader the one who killed him? Sizzle. The leader directly dug out the heart of Evil Doctor. It was bright red and dripping with blood. Evil Doctor’s health points instantly decreased to zero and he fell to the ground. The items in the storage compartment immediately exploded. The leader suddenly slammed the other party’s heart onto his chest. In less than an instant, the heart was absorbed into his body. “Only with a heart can a puppet become a real puppet.” The leader suddenly raised his head, and his aura soared! Lin Xuan hurriedly used an Observer skill. To his surprise, he discovered that the level of the leader had increased from level two Seventh Realm to level four Seventh Realm! “What kind of strange skill is this?!” Lin Xuan’s heart skipped a beat. “We’re the only Seventh Realm martial artists here! You’ll definitely die today! A mage can’t survive a single attack from me!” The leader’s speed suddenly increased to the limit at this moment. His body also quickly became illusory. Lu Luo’s sickle and Wen Xiong’s huge blade struck it, but it was as if they had struck soft cotton. Not only that, the leader’s body actually passed through their bodies! It was like a ghost! A void body!. The grade of this skill had surpassed the peerless golden level and had already reached the legendary dark gold level. Its effect had undergone a qualitative change. This was also another trump card that the leader had prepared. It would help him win when fighting martial artists of the same level. After activating this skill, his body would completely turn ethereal. All the damage he received would be reduced by 90%. Moreover, he could pass through most substances. Basically, he could pass through walls. As for passing through people, that could also be done, but not completely. The leader’s puppet was currently at the Seventh Realm. The highest level of the skills, equipment, and rune groups he carried were all Seventh Realm. Therefore, he could not pass through the other party unless the other party was below the Seventh Realm. However, the leader was already confident of victory. This was because he knew that among the people present, only he and Flame Explosion was a Seventh Realm martial artist. The others were only at the Sixth Realm. Moreover, he noticed that Shield Ghost had even been surprised when he rushed over just now. He even asked Flame Explosion why Flame Explosion did not tell him about the other party’s advancement to the Seventh Realm. The only weakness of this skill was that he had to sacrifice a life to activate it. The stronger the life sacrificed, the longer the duration. A few years ago, the leader had once fought Gao Qianchi from the Construction Division. At that time, he had sacrificed an Eighth Realm martial artist from the High Heaven Plains and used his ethereal body for 10 seconds! With the help of this 10 seconds, he successfully cut off Gao Qianchi’s arm and won that battle. The leader guessed that if he sacrificed a Ninth Realm martial artist, the time might very well reach 40 or even 60 seconds. Of course, this was only a guess. After all, he had never sacrificed a Ninth Realm martial artist before. Now, after sacrificing a Seventh Realm martial artist, the effect could only last for about five seconds. However, five seconds was enough! With the leader’s agility, it did not even take him a second to cover this short distance of dozens of meters. In the blink of an eye, the leader had already arrived in front of Flame Explosion. As long as he took another step forward, this peerless golden dagger would be able to cut Flame Explosion’s throat. This short knife’s attack speed was very fast. It could cut three times in a second, and each time, it would cause the other party to bleed five times. With Flame Explosion’s weak Constitution, his health would drop to zero in at most a second! Xu Xuan, Lu Luo, and Wen Xiong could only watch helplessly as the leader approached the Flame Explosion and could not do anything to salvage the situation. “No…!” Lu Luo gritted her teeth. Xu Xuan tried her best to use the Great Recovery Technique as quickly as possible, hoping that Flame Explosion could hold on and not be insta-killed. Wen Xiong clenched his fists, helpless. Of course, they could not be blamed. After all, the leader was a Ninth Realm martial artist and the leader of the High Heaven Plains. His foundation was deep, so how could a group of Sixth Realm martial artists know about his trump card? Other than those who had fought with the leader before, no one else could have thought of such a bug-like skill. Then, in the next moment, a figure in black armor held a large shield and blocked in front of the leader. “Have you asked me for permission to hurt my brother?” A deep and steady voice sounded from the armor as Shield Ghost suddenly blocked in front of Flame Explosion! The leader sneered. “You’re not a Seventh Realm martial artist. You can’t stop me!” He kept moving forward and had the intention to pass through Shield Ghost and cut Flame Explosion’s throat. Then… Thud! The sound sounded as if a watermelon had been slapped. It was as if the leader was a wild dog that had suddenly slammed onto a glass door. He was directly knocked more than two meters away. The leader was speechless. The leader felt his head buzz. Although this was only a puppet, all kinds of pain would still be reflected on his main body. However, the pain would be weakened. If the puppet died, the pain would also be very intense, comparable to the pain of childbirth. This was also a small flaw of the Puppet Manipulation Technique. The leader’s eyes widened in disbelief. “You… you’re a Seventh Realm martial artist?!” Xu Xuan, Lu Luo, and Wen Xiong also turned around and stared at Shield Ghost in shock. However, before they could speak, Flame Explosion was the first to shout. “Shield Ghost! You also advanced to the Seventh Realm?! You actually didn’t tell me! I thought we were close brothers!” All along, Lin Xuan had deliberately made Flame Explosion’s personality calm and steady. However, this time, his tone was already slightly angry and questioning. He seemed to be really angry. A helpless voice sounded from under Shield Ghost’s black armor. “You didn’t tell me that you advanced to the Seventh Realm either. Now, we’re even.” Lin Xuan chuckled in his heart. His performance was quite good. Compared to the shock of Lu Luo and the other two, the leader’s expression was even more exaggerated. Why? How was this possible? It had only been a short while since the defense battle of White Crane Town. Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion had actually both advanced to the Seventh Realm. Generally speaking, if there was no imminent danger, martial artists would not choose to advance to the Seventh Realm in a hurry. Instead, they would farm profession scrolls day and night in the Sixth Realm mystic realm. They would try their best to get a higher quality one that was suitable for them. Given the extremely low drop rate of peerless golden profession scrolls, martial artists were already quite satisfied with precious purple profession scrolls. Even if Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion were lucky enough to obtain high-quality profession scrolls that were suitable for them… Where did they get their experience points? They couldn’t possibly create experience points out of thin air, right? Unless… The leader thought of his fortuitous encounter when he was still rising. In a mystic realm in the High Heaven Plains, he found a mysterious cave that no one had stepped into and a peerless golden Energy Pearl. The Energy Pearl could ignore everything and increase one’s level. The leader had also relied on the Energy Pearl he had found back then to increase his level and obtain the advantage, standing out from the group of High Heaven Plains martial artists. Since the High Heaven Plains mystic realm had such a treasure, it was very likely that the other mystic realms also had similar treasures. It might not have the exact same name, but it might still be given a name that was similar to Energy Pearl or Energy Essence. These things were like the treasures under the cliff that were mentioned in novels. Once one obtained them, one would be able to rise to greater heights. “Could it be that Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion were also very lucky and found the Energy Pearl?” The leader thought about it and could only guess. Otherwise, it was impossible to explain the situation of Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion leveling up like rockets. “Everyone, don’t let this guy escape!” Shield Ghost roared and rushed forward with the Dragon Hunter Shield. Lu Luo and Wen Xiong also used their long-range skills to support from afar. Xu Xuan used her recovery skill and waited to heal Shield Ghost. After all, they were only Sixth Realm martial artists. If they fought Seventh Realm martial artists at close range, it would be very easy for them to die. Since the outcome had been decided, there was naturally no need to exchange blows with the other party. The leader’s eyes flickered fiercely and he finally lost his composure. The situation had already developed to the point where it was completely out of control. His greatest trump card, his ethereal body, had already entered cooldown. The martial artists he had brought with him were all dead. However, the other party had two Seventh Realm martial artists. The situation was completely reversed! His goal could no longer be achieved. Although the leader’s main body was a Ninth Realm martial artist, this puppet was only at the third level of the Seventh Realm. It was almost impossible for it to bypass Shield Ghost’s protection to kill Flame Explosion. The leader looked deeply at Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion. “Next time, I won’t give you a chance.” As soon as he finished speaking, his body suddenly turned into wood and scattered on the ground. Before anyone could react, the wood quickly ignited and burned to ashes. During this time, Xu Xuan tried to throw an Icicle over, hoping to stop the burning wood. However, for some reason, the flames seemed to be able to burn without oxygen, fuel, and temperature. No matter how Xu Xuan tried, she could not extinguish the flames. A few minutes later, the wood quickly burned out. When the night wind blew, the black ashes dissipated into the night. “Not a real person?” Lu Luo frowned. “We don’t even know who he is.” Xu Xuan also frowned deeply. Lin Xuan walked over and nodded. “The only thing I know is that the other party is very likely a High Heaven Plains martial artist. Otherwise, it would be impossible for Yang Wei and the other two to be among them.” Xu Xuan and the other two nodded, agreeing with his guess. Lu Luo said, “We still have to wait for Director Chu, Division Commander Ye, and the others to come out. We can only find out the other party’s true identity after they report this to the headquarters.” Lin Xuan turned around and looked at the endless wilderness under the night sky. After the three Seventh Realm martial artists died, the prying eyes in the night seemed to have decreased greatly. The death of Seventh Realm martial artists clearly played a very good role in warning others. The news that Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion had both become Seventh Realm martial artists made many members of the Construction Division in Dragon Sea City extremely excited. In the next few days, there were no more martial artists attacking Dragon Sea City. Their restless hearts were clearly suppressed. If there were no Seventh Realm martial artists in Dragon Sea City, these people who wanted to attack the city would naturally have the complete advantage. However, now that Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion had appeared, they had no choice but to understand their limits. Although treasures were important, their lives were clearly more important. … On a night six days later, Chu Pengcheng and the others crossed the door of light of the mystic realm and reappeared in Dragon Sea City. The seven of them all looked very tired and had varying degrees of injuries on their bodies. However, none of them were seriously injured or died in the newly-advanced Falling Thunder Mountain mystic realm. Moreover, everyone’s faces were filled with joy. The exploration in the Falling Thunder Mountain mystic realm this time really made them overjoyed. “Now that I’m out, I still feel a little dazed.” Silver Fox laughed and said, “The exploration process went by so smoothly!” Black directly said, “Of course. It’s impossible for an Elemental Mage like you to rush to the front. How dare you say that when you’ve been protected by us?” Silver Fox :”…” Chu Pengcheng also laughed. “However, what Silver Fox said does make sense. The exploration this time was much smoother than I imagined. We almost didn’t encounter any particularly important danger the entire time.” “We’ve already determined the location of the safety station in the Falling Thunder Mountain. We can build the safety station the next time we enter.” “After the mystic realm advanced, there were many new types of demon beasts, all of which have been recorded.” “The map of the Falling Thunder Mountain is also halfway done. Other than the high-risk areas that we did not enter, it can be said that we have almost completed 90% of our mission objectives.” Bai Xinghe, Black, and the two Seventh Realm martial artists from Yang City nodded. They were already very happy that nothing had happened to them and they had even completed their objectives. Ye Yuqiu frowned slightly, as if she was thinking about something. Chu Pengcheng asked, “Director Ye, do you still have some doubts?” Ye Yuqiu rubbed her temples. The image of that Lightning Bee kept appearing in her mind. “That Lightning Bee feels strange. It seems to bring us good luck every time it appears.” “The first time it appeared to attack us, it helped us indirectly avoid the path of the violent demon beasts.” “The second time it appeared and attacked us, it allowed us to avoid a large number of lightning bolts that suddenly erupted in the area in front.” “The third time…” Ye Yuqiu said helplessly, “I even have a feeling that the Lightning Bee is a human in disguise. What do you guys think?” “Hahaha!” The other six people could not help but laugh. Silver Fox said, “Director, you worry too much.” Chu Pengcheng said, “Then how can a living person become a small Lightning Bee? Moreover, even if that bee is disguised as a human, why would the other party help us?” The director of the Yang City Construction Division suddenly rubbed his chin and said seriously, “However, Director Ye’s words remind me that there’s a profession called the Great Druid.” “After the Great Druid advances to the Ninth Realm, he can temporarily transform into a bird or beast. Moreover, he can also communicate with demon beasts. Others can’t tell that the other party is a human at all.” Black smiled and said, “According to what you just said, that could only be accomplished by Ninth Realm martial artists. However, higher-level martial artists have never been allowed to enter the Falling Thunder Mountain mystic realm. They will just be struck by lightning.” The director of Yang City chuckled. “I was just joking.” Ye Yuqiu was helpless. “Let’s report this to the headquarters. It feels a little strange.” “Director! You’re out!” At this moment, a member on duty passed by while patrolling. He was pleasantly surprised to see Chu Pengcheng and the others standing here calmly. In a short period of time, the members of the Dragon Sea City Construction Division quickly got up from their sleep and hurriedly welcomed Chu Pengcheng and the others. In order to figure out the changes in the Falling Thunder Mountain, they had stayed in the dangerous environment of the Falling Thunder Mountain mystic realm for six days. They could definitely be said to have contributed greatly to the Construction Division. In the Construction Division Food Hall. Chu Pengcheng and the others, who had already washed up, were having a meal here. Lin Xuan and the other Sixth Realm martial artists were also among them. “What? Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion are already Seventh Realm martial artists?!” Chu Pengcheng was surprised and delighted. He stared at the two of them and was overjoyed. Good news came one after another! “That’s right. If not for the two of them becoming Seventh Realm martial artists, our Dragon Sea City Construction Division would probably have been destroyed that night.” Xu Xuan sighed. Lu Luo’s small face was solemn. “If we had lost or even died that night, the martial artists from the other organizations would definitely have rushed up like hyenas.” Ye Yuqiu praised, “Shield Ghost, Flame Explosion! As expected of the members of our White Crane Town!” Chu Pengcheng coughed lightly. “Si Ye, the two of them advanced in my Dragon Sea City. They should be members of the Construction Division in my Dragon Sea City, right?” Ye Yuqiu snorted. “Nonsense! I even advanced in the territory of the Knights of Truth. Could it be that I’m a member of the Knights of Truth?” “Hahahahaha! Director Chu, you’re too much. You’re already trying to rope in people?” Silver Fox laughed loudly. Bai Xinghe had always been serious. At this moment, he could not help but say, “After all, Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion are so powerful. It’s very normal for Director Chu to love talent.” The dining table was immediately filled with happy air. Chu Pengcheng ate two mouthfuls of food and said with a smile, “By the way, according to the plan, more Seventh Realm martial artists should be rushing over from the nearby cities one after another. The initial estimate is that there are about twenty people that will be arriving. They’re all the directors and deputy directors of the various divisions.” “They’re all here to investigate the Falling Thunder Mountain?” Lin Xuan was very surprised. With so many Seventh Realm martial artists coming, those Construction Division would probably be very unguarded, right? What if other organizations like High Heaven Plains and India secretly crossed the border and did something? Wouldn’t they suffer a huge loss? Ye Yuqiu could hear the doubt in his voice. “Many of our level nine Sixth Realm martial artists claim that their strength is not at level nine Sixth Realm. In fact, they can advance to the Seventh Realm at any time.” Only then did Lin Xuan nod, as if he understood what the headquarters meant. Almost all the cities controlled by the Construction Division were infiltrated by spies from various organizations. Most of these spies were spies from the High Heaven Plains. Every once in a while, these spies would report all the information they obtained in detail. This naturally included the number of level nine Sixth Realm martial artists in the Construction Division. This was because as long as there was a need, a level nine Sixth Realm martial artist could advance to the Seventh Realm at any time, which was equivalent to a backup Seventh Realm martial artist. According to Ye Yuqiu, it seemed that many level nine Sixth Realm martial artists had received the headquarters’ orders and deliberately concealed their true levels. This would cause the spies to misjudge. Now, the Seventh Realm martial artists of the Construction Division in these cities had all been transferred away. On the surface, it seemed as if the Construction Divisions were unguarded. The other organizations were indeed very likely to take the opportunity to attack. Even if they only destroyed the Construction Division of a city, it would also weaken the overall strength of the Construction Division. However, what the enemies don’t realize is that after they attack, they would still be facing Seventh Realm martial artists after the level nine Sixth Realm martial artists go through with their advancements1! “Wonderful!” Silver Fox thought for a moment and also thought of the hidden meaning behind Ye Yuqiu’s words. Then, he hurriedly lowered his voice. “Damn, we didn’t expose ourselves, right? There shouldn’t be many spies in Dragon Sea City.” “Yes, most of the spies in Dragon Sea City died in the battle to destroy the potion.” Bai Xinghe smiled and said, “They all died in vain. They used their lives to lure the demon beasts over but were still unable to destroy the potions.” Everyone at the table could not help but laugh. Everyone hated spies. Such a sullen death was suitable for them. Chu Pengcheng stood up and raised his cup. “Everyone, rest for the next few days. When the other Seventh Realm martial artists arrive, we’ll enter the Falling Thunder Mountain. Shield Ghost, Flame Explosion, the two of you, come together. We’ll strive to completely finish drawing the map of the Falling Thunder Mountain!” In order to prevent alcohol from causing trouble, the cup was not even filled with white wine, but rice wine. Shield Ghost, Flame Explosion, Ye Yuqiu, and a group of Seventh Realm and Sixth Realm martial artists stood up and clinked glasses. After eating and drinking, everyone returned to their houses. Lin Xuan was no exception. He returned to the residence with Flame Explosion as if they were brothers. In the office, Chu Pengcheng and Ye Yuqiu contacted the headquarters through the communicator and told the headquarters about the strange situation at the Falling Thunder Mountain. “A Lightning Bee that seems to have emotions?” Wan Youxi answered the call. Hearing Ye Yuqiu’s description, Wan Youxi didn’t even play the Rubik’s Cube anymore. This was the first time he had used 100% of his attention to think about something. “The Great Druid can be eliminated. That’s something only a Ninth Realm martial artist can do.” “The only thing I can think of now is a special profession. It’s very likely an unknown profession that has never appeared before. Moreover, its level must be very high.” Wan Youxi said solemnly. Wan Youxi changed the topic and said, “However, as Chu Pengcheng said, since the Lightning Bee has helped you several times, it’s most likely on the friendly side. Just maintain the most basic vigilance and don’t attack it.” “Yes.” Chu Pengcheng and Ye Yuqiu nodded. Wan Youxi paused and suddenly said, “The people who attacked Dragon Sea City that night have been investigated. The spies we planted in the High Heaven Plains have sent news and confirmed that two of them are the Killer Bee and Evil Doctor.” “These two people have just advanced to the Seventh Realm and have gone to Dragon Sea City to carry out missions.” Chu Pengcheng asked curiously, “What about the other person? Xu Xuan and the others had said that the person in the lead actually didn’t have a body of flesh and blood and directly turned into wood that spontaneously combusted.” Wan Youxi sneered. “That’s the puppet of the leader of the High Heaven Plains. Old Gao once fought him and has some understanding.” “Hiss…” Chu Pengcheng and Ye Yuqiu both gasped. The leader of the High Heaven Plains! A Ninth Realm martial artist! He actually sent a puppet and two Seventh Realm martial artists to Dragon Sea City personally? Wan Youxi seemed to have thought of something and gloated. “Every time Leader High Heaven Plains produces puppets, he needs to consume peerless golden-quality wood. This time, he can be considered to have destroyed a puppet. He’s probably hiding somewhere and cursing.” “The High Heaven Plains has suffered some losses, so they will definitely restrain themselves. Also, we’ve already informed India about the Bloodline Fruit. I heard that India and the High Heaven Plains have already started fighting. I’m dying of laughter. They directly arranged a fight at sea.” “Forget it, forget it. I still have something important to do… Hahahahahahaha…” Beep beep beep… The other party hung up. Chu Pengcheng and Ye Yuqiu looked at each other. When Wan Youxi hung up just now, they seemed to have heard gloating laughter. … A few days later. With the influx of 23 Seventh Realm martial artists, Dragon Sea City became lively again. In everyone’s eyes, Seventh Realm martial artists were all big shots. Almost all of these people were the director or deputy director of a certain city’s Construction Division. Even if they did not hold a position, they were still top-notch experts in their respective City Construction Division. Of course, in their eyes, they didn’t think much of themselves and felt that they had only crossed the huge divide between the Sixth Realm and the Seventh Realm and stepped into a new realm. At this moment, a lot of Seventh Realm martial artists were gathered in the small Dragon Sea City. They had known each other in the past and it was normal for there to be small grudges and conflicts. These people often fought and retaliated against each other. However, the overall situation was still very harmonious and friendly. Through Chu Pengcheng and Ye Yuqiu’s introduction, Lin Xuan got to know almost all of these Seventh Realm martial artists. After these Seventh Realm martial artists heard about Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion’s battle results, almost all of them had a good impression of Lin Xuan. In their opinion, these two people who were as close as brothers clearly had a bright future and were worth befriending. Lin Xuan secretly used his Observer skill to look at their information. Other than the information of a few people, he could almost see everything. After getting to know everyone, Lin Xuan no longer appeared in public. Instead, he stayed in his residence. Of course, in the eyes of outsiders, it felt strange for Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion, the two men, to stay in the same room all day. “Reward!” It was time for the harvest again. A large number of resources fell into his consciousness space. “Mystic Realm Pearl!” Lin Xuan carefully counted and discovered that after diligently training for the past few days, he had already accumulated 105 Mystic Realm Pearls! He could now upgrade a peerless golden skill to the legendary dark gold grade! “Let me think. Which skill should I prioritize?” Lin Xuan opened the data panel and carefully browsed through the skills on his body. Defensive skills included the High-Level Thorn Body, the Steel Body, the Omnipotent Bone Armor, the Ancient Tree Bark, the Demonized Body, and so on. Attack-type skills included the Demon King of Fury, Ice Spear Technique, Flame Explosion, Fireball, and so on. There were even more supplementary skills. There were High-Level Avatar Technique, Observer Technique, High-Level Disguise Technique, Weaken, Flash, Wind Rush, High-Level Perception, and so on. With all kinds of skills in front of him, he was momentarily at a loss. After careful consideration, Lin Xuan chose the Omnipotent Bone Armor, the Demon King of Fury, the Observer skill, and the High-Level Perception skill. The Omnipotent Bone Armor provided high physical resistance and elemental resistance. If the grade of this item was increased, it would greatly increase one’s survival ability. His survival would be guaranteed. The Demon King of Fury provided a high increase in fire damage. With this increase, the lethality of Flame Explosion would increase further. The Observer skill was even more important. After advancing to the legendary dark gold grade, Lin Xuan did not doubt that he could see the data panel of all the Seventh Realm martial artists! As for his high-level perception, after increasing it, his perception range would also increase further. This way, it would be easier for him to stay away from danger. “It’s also a problem to have too many choices.” “Unfortunately, I’m not like other martial artists who only have a single pitiful peerless golden skill.” Lin Xuan sighed and finally chose to increase his Observer skill. As the saying went, know yourself and know your enemy. The Observer skill was equivalent to an all-seeing eye. He could see whatever he wanted. After upgrading, his Observer skill changed greatly. —- Name: High-Level Observer Level: Level One Seventh Realm Grade: Legendary Dark Gold Effect: When observing something, a data panel will appear… —- “Eh, its name changed from Observer to High-Level Observer?” Lin Xuan was a little surprised. He did not expect the Mystic Realm Pearl to have such an effect. “Then if I increase the grade of the legendary dark gold skill again, will the name still change?” He thought about it and felt that it was very likely. Soon, it was time to enter the Falling Thunder Mountain again. Aside from the 23 foreign Seventh Realm martial artists that came from other places, there were an additional 9 Seventh Realm martial artists that were originally in Dragon Sea City. A total of 32 people arrived at the empty space in front of the mystic realm’s door of light. In the distance, the members of the Construction Division of Dragon Sea City gathered and looked at these Seventh Realm martial artists with admiration. Lin Xuan and his avatar also arrived. When he used his High-Level Observer skill again, he indeed discovered that he could see everyone’s information clearly! Name, level, attributes, skills, equipment, and even the rune groups embedded in the equipment, as well as the quality of all the skills, equipment, and rune groups! “High-Level Observer is indeed a high priority!” Lin Xuan clicked his tongue in wonder. At this moment, another off-road vehicle suddenly drove over from the wilderness. Then, a young man directly jumped down from the off-road vehicle. The young man smiled. “Sorry, everyone. I’ve just arrived.” “Yo, Xiang Tianxiu, you’re here too?” The director of Yang City said in surprise. “Haven’t you always been in the headquarters? Could it be that those chief directors sent you here?” Ye Yuqiu was also very surprised. Silver Fox was pleasantly surprised. “Flame Explosion, Shield Ghost, this is Xiang Tianxiu. Like me and Black, he’s also a student of our teacher, Li Weiguo. I thought he wouldn’t come, but he still came! Come, come, come, let’s get to know each other.” “He’s only 26 years old this year, but he’s already a level six Seventh Realm martial artist. The six chief directors all value him very much. This guy is the role model for many young people in the Construction Division. For example, my son, Zhou Feng, used to always treat Xiang Tianxiu as his idol.” Lin Xuan looked at this person. He had a handsome and fair face, narrowed eyes, and a smile on his face. He tried to use High-Level Observer and also saw Xiang Tianxiu’s detailed information. This person mainly spent his points on Spirit and his Spirit reached 300 points. He was also covered in peerless golden equipment and was very luxurious. There were also four peerless golden skills. They were Lightning Shield, Lightning Storm, Lightning Chains, and Lightning Flash. They could help him defend, control the situation, escape, and increase his AOE at the same time. Xiang Tianxiu also had two rune groups. They were respectively embedded in the staff and robe, and they were also of peerless golden grade. “Based on his attributes, I can tell that he clearly advanced perfectly every time. The foundation of the Construction Division seems to be quite deep.” Lin Xuan exclaimed. “I didn’t expect the person who killed the puppet leader of the High Heaven Plains to be you.” Xiang Tianxiu extended her hand towards Flame Explosion. “I didn’t expect the Construction Division to have such an outstanding mage like you. Nice to meet you.” Lin Xuan did not treat him as an outsider and controlled his avatar to shake his hand. “I wonder what your profession is? Are you willing to reveal it? I can tell you that my profession is a Lightning Mentor, a peerless golden grade.” Xiang Tianxiu licked her lips, a little curious. Lin Xuan was somewhat surprised. This Xiang Tianxiu was probably the only person he had seen who had a peerless golden profession. No wonder he was valued by Li Weiguo and was even regarded by many as one of the successors of the position of the chief director. Seeing that Flame Explosion was silent, Xiang Tianxiu said, “You’re unwilling to tell me? Then how about a spar?” Silver Fox shook his head and said, “Flame Explosion has just advanced to the Seventh Realm. He’s definitely not your match. You should find someone else to fight.” Xiang Tianxiu laughed. “That’s true. I’m only at level six Seventh Realm. It would feel like I’m bullying him.” “Then let’s compete after you become stronger. I’m looking forward to that day.” Lin Xuan chuckled and did not say anything. There were always people who felt that they were very powerful and wanted to compete with everyone to show their superiority. However, they did not know that there were others that were even more powerful than them. At this moment, Xiang Tianxiu suddenly said, “Senior Brother Silver Fox, you just said that Zhou Feng used to treat me as his idol. Could it be that he doesn’t treat me as his idol anymore?” Silver Fox’s expression froze and he smiled awkwardly. “I let it slip.” “I won’t hide it from you. That child now treats Shield Ghost as his idol, since Shield Ghost is impregnable and can resist everything.” Xiang Tianxiu glanced at Shield Ghost, who was standing beside Flame Explosion. When he saw the tightly wrapped armor from head to toe, he raised his eyebrows. “Brother… your codename is Shield Ghost, right? Let me give you a piece of advice. It’s best not to wear this kind of full-body armor that looks like a tin can. If you encounter a mage professional like me who’s proficient in lightning magic, you’ll easily be electrocuted and enter a paralyzed state.” “Don’t blame me for commenting on you. This is just a kind reminder. Any Seventh Realm martial artist is a core force of the Construction Division. If they die, the Construction Division will suffer a huge loss.” Silver Fox immediately felt the atmosphere become a little stiff. Coincidentally, at this moment, not far away, Chu Pengcheng had already said loudly, “Everyone, please check the items in your storage compartment. We’re about to enter the Falling Thunder Mountain!” Silver Fox hurriedly coughed and changed the topic. “Alright, alright. Let’s not talk about this anymore. We’re going in.” Coupled with Xiang Tianxiu, a total of 33 Seventh Realm martial artists entered the mystic realm in an orderly manner and arrived at the Falling Thunder Mountain. As soon as he entered the Falling Thunder Mountain, a dense lightning aura surrounded his nose. It was as if he could swallow one or two small lightning bolts just by breathing. The strange thing was that even though the lightning was so dense and the thunder was even louder, the vegetation of the Falling Thunder Mountain was even more lush and dense than before, revealing an indescribable strangeness. After the advancement of the Falling Thunder Mountain, this was the first time Lin Xuan’ had come to the Falling Thunder Mountain with his main body. He was actually a little nervous and excited. At this moment, Xiang Tianxiu let out a long sigh. “Such rich lightning power. It feels like I’m soaking in lightning elements. It’s awesome!” Xiang Tianxiu casually threw his Lightning Chains into the distance. Crackle! The Lightning Chains directly blasted through a huge tree with a circumference of more than a dozen feet, and the flames burned non-stop. “The power of the lightning spell has increased by at least 30%!” Silver Fox exclaimed. “However, most of the demon beasts in the Falling Thunder Mountain have very high lightning resistance. The increase in the power of lightning spells probably won’t have much effect on them.” Ye Yuqiu shook her head. Xiang Tianxiu laughed loudly. “Director Ye, you must be joking. As long as the power is strong enough and the resistance is low enough, it’s enough for the lightning to crush anything!” Although his tone was arrogant, it was indeed the truth. If the power was high enough, the resistance could naturally be ignored. The damage would still be inflicted like a real injury. “Everyone, we’ve already explored 50% of the Falling Thunder Mountain last time. The only place we haven’t been to is the last main peak.” Chu Pengcheng gestured for everyone to look up at the mountain in front of them. Everyone stopped talking and looked up. The 1,000-meter mountain peak immediately came into view. After the advancement of the Falling Thunder Mountain, a large number of tall and low mountains appeared, making the main peak appear even more outstanding and extraordinary. They were outsiders and Chu Pengcheng was the director of the Construction Division of Dragon Sea City. The Falling Thunder Mountain mystic realm was naturally under his jurisdiction. In addition, Chu Pengcheng and the others were the first batch of Seventh Realm martial artists to enter the Falling Thunder Mountain mystic realm. They were more familiar with the Falling Thunder Mountain. Therefore, although Chu Pengcheng was not the strongest, they would still listen carefully to his next words. Even Xiang Tianxiu did not release lightning spells everywhere to test the power. Instead, he quietly leaned over. “Everyone has been to the Little Spirit Mountain before. You should know that a Seventh Realm mystic realm is already drastically different compared to a Sixth Realm mystic realm. The biggest difference is that mystic realm kings are no longer limited to a small cave, waiting for us to challenge them.” “They will gather demon beasts and gather in the mountains and forests and act as an overlord. Everyone has a map in their hands. We have already found and marked the territory of a few mystic realm kings. If everyone is not confident enough, don’t provoke a mystic realm king. This is because you will not only provoke a mystic realm king. It will also lead a large group of subordinates!” “The main peak of the Falling Thunder Mountain should be occupied by an experienced mystic realm king. Everyone, you have to be more careful.” At this point, Chu Pengcheng’s expression was solemn. The attributes of experienced mystic realm kings were not exaggerated. Perhaps only ten Seventh Realm martial artists of the same level could compete with it. “Also, in this exploration, all the items you obtain will belong to you. Of course, you can also choose to hand them over to the Construction Division. The Construction Division will buy these items at a high price.” After Chu Pengcheng finished speaking, he continued, “We need to split up this time.” “A portion of the members need to head to the surroundings of the Falling Thunder Mountain and place the Protection Runes to form the safety stations .” “The other group of members will form the main force. They have to climb the main peak and draw a map. At the same time, they have to find a suitable place to place the safety station. This mission is rather dangerous and requires members who are more confident in their strength.” Everyone immediately understood what he meant. Those who felt that they were strong would go to the main peak. Those who felt that they were not good enough would go and set up safety stations around the Falling Thunder Mountain. However, they were all Seventh Realm martial artists and wanted to save face. Chu Pengcheng would not be so straightforward. He could not say that the stronger ones would go to the main peak, and the weaker ones would go to the surroundings of the Falling Thunder Mountain. That would really be a little despicable. Xiang Tianxiu immediately said, “I want to go to the main peak.” With that said, he immediately looked at Flame Explosion and Shield Ghost. “The two of you should be very confident in yourselves since you can even kill the puppet of the leader of the High Heaven Plains. Let’s go to the main peak together and see who kills more demon beasts!” Silver Fox had a headache. His junior brother was indeed powerful and talented. Unfortunately, his desire to compete was too strong. He wanted to compete with everyone. Unfortunately, there were not many people of his age in the Construction Division who could suppress him. He did not know when this junior brother could change this bad habit. Ye Yuqiu frowned slightly. “That’s not good. The two of them have just advanced to the Seventh Realm.” Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. Xiang Tianxiu was provoking him. Unfortunately, he would not take unnecessary risks. This time, he had only entered the Falling Thunder Mountain to respond to the Construction Division’s mission. He still had to slack off. Slacking off during work hours was the truth of life! Lin Xuan immediately said, “I’ll go with Flame Explosion to the surroundings of the Falling Thunder Mountain to set up protective runes first. If I have time, I will go and support the force on the main peak.” Xiang Tianxiu immediately curled his lips. “No way, the two of you should have more confidence in yourselves!” Seeing that Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion were insistent, he could only shrug. Unfortunately, he would not have anyone to compete with this time. “Director Ye, why don’t we compete? Let’s see who kills more demon beasts.” He looked around and decided to turn his attention to Ye Yuqiu. Ye Yuqiu was also a youth and had a special status. She was a good opponent. Ye Yuqiu directly rejected, “No, I’m not as competitive as you.” Xiang Tianxiu scratched his head crazily. Damn it. Why was no one willing to compete with him? The organization needed healthy competition to improve! If there was no competition, it would definitely be like a pool of stagnant water that would never improve. Why didn’t they understand him and the effort he was putting in? Soon, the 33 Seventh Realm martial artists were divided into several groups. With the main peak as the center, there were four safety stations that needed to be set up in the four directions. Other than Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion, there were also two Seventh Realm martial artists for each of the three directions. Their levels were generally below level three Seventh Realm. The other 25 Seventh Realm martial artists all rushed straight to the main peak. The challenge at the main peak was the most difficult. After beating this challenge, they would gain a lot of battle merits. Watching the 25 people disappear into the vast forest, Lin Xuan also headed towards the safety station in the east. The journey to the safety station’s base could not be said to be bumpy. It could only be said to be smooth sailing. With a Flame Explosion, the demon beast was directly blasted into pieces. After obtaining his profession skill, Lin Xuan’s Spirit attribute was not much different from ordinary Seventh Realm martial artists. His magic power recovery speed was already very fast. In this way, he did not need to conserve his magic power at all. He exploded as he walked and quickly arrived at the location. However, after arriving, Lin Xuan frowned. This place was actually occupied by a large group of demon beasts! The one in the middle was more than seven meters tall. Wasn’t that a mystic realm king?! There were at least a hundred demon beasts of different levels around the mystic realm king. At this moment, they were all dozing off and playing leisurely. The base area that Chu Pengcheng and the others had cleared had already been occupied at this moment, and it was extremely chaotic because of these demon beasts. The flag planted in the base was also torn to pieces, leaving only a bare pole. As if it had smelled a stranger, a demon beast sleeping in the periphery suddenly stood up and looked at Lin Xuan. “My plan to slack off has failed. Looks like I have to fight.” “However, the mystic realm king is at level nine Seventh Realm. I’m only at level one Seventh Realm now. It might not be easy to fight him.” Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. He immediately took out his equipment. He used the Dragon Hunter Shield in his left hand and the Earth Dragon King Hammer Shield in his right. At this moment, he suddenly discovered that he had a training avatar nearby. Lin Xuan blinked. After the advancement of the Falling Thunder Mountain, his training avatars had been making the best use of their time to absorb the lightning. Their levels quickly soared from level one Seventh Realm. Currently, the lowest one was at level seven Seventh Realm, and the highest one had even reached level nine Seventh Realm. Coincidentally, the one training nearby was level nine Seventh Realm. “It’s a little difficult for me to fight a mystic realm king, but I can let my training avatar fight!” Lin Xuan immediately controlled his training avatar to approach. The sleeping mystic realm king seemed to have sensed the aura of a demon of the same level. It suddenly stood up uneasily and roared threateningly in a certain direction. Half a minute later, a huge lion that was also more than seven meters tall jumped into Lin Xuan’s sight. Ninth level Seventh Realm, Thunderbolt Lion! This demon beast was also Lin Xuan’s first training avatar when he first entered the Falling Thunder Mountain. The mystic realm king acted as if it was facing a great enemy. It was an Ardent Mane Wolf. At this moment, its pair of front claws kept scratching the ground and digging up the soil. A threatening growl constantly sounded from its throat. However, the Thunderbolt Lion was not afraid at all and walked over casually. In the middle of the two level nine Seventh Realm demon beasts, a large number of ordinary demon beasts clamped their tails tightly and their heads were almost stuck to the ground. They were just short of facing the sky to show that they were not a threat at all. It was as if they wanted to be left out of the battle between the two big shots! Lin Xuan and Flame Explosion also strode over. After all, a mystic realm king was still a mystic realm king. It enjoyed the 15% increase in all attributes given by the Falling Thunder Mountain. If it was really a one-on-one battle, the Thunderbolt Lion would definitely be at a disadvantage. However, this was not a one-on-one battle. Instead, it was a three-on-one battle! “Oh no, I have another one here.” As Lin Xuan spoke, he created another avatar and made it wear the Vicious Poison Set. Then, that avatar transformed into Poison Blade. In any case, he was the only one in this area now. He might as well stop pretending and just kill this mystic realm king! 嗷! Looking at the three people and one beast approaching step by step, the mystic realm king retreated repeatedly. Finally, it could not help but roar and attack first. Its target was not Shield Ghost, Poison Blade, or the Thunderbolt Lion, but Flame Explosion. Dressed in a cloak, he looked very fragile. It was as if the other party thought of him as a pushover. “Unfortunately, we’re not pushovers. We’re all tough.” Lin Xuan chuckled. Did you think Flame Explosion was easy to bully with his soft armor? Sorry, this avatar has inherited 100% of the main body’s attributes and also has a Constitution of 442 points! The four of them attacked together! Shield! Flame! Poison! Coupled with lightning! In less than ten minutes, the mystic realm king fell to the ground aggrievedly and let out a dying whimper. A large amount of essence erupted from its body, and at the same time, advancement materials appeared. As for the equipment and skill books, it also dropped some. Unfortunately, they were all ordinary white grade. In the blink of an eye, they were thrown into the smelting table by Lin Xuan. “Eh, the corpse didn’t explode into white light.” Lin Xuan was a little surprised. He discovered that the corpse of a mystic realm king was lying straight on the ground, unlike the mystic realm kings in the mystic realm that exploded into white light and surged into the bodies of martial artists after death. He looked thoughtful. “In that case, a Seventh Realm mystic realm is quite different from the previous mystic realms.” “Without a cave in the Seventh Realm mystic realm, mystic realm kings can wander around and gather in the mountains and forests. They won’t disappear even after death. Interesting.” Lin Xuan suddenly remembered that he still had an avatar space that he had not used. “Why don’t I take over the mystic realm king. Its attributes are stronger.” Lin Xuan stepped forward and quickly possessed this mystic realm king as his eighth training avatar. Seeing the mystic realm king stand up again, all the demon beasts were dumbfounded. After a short moment of confusion, they still respectfully expressed their submission. Although they did not know what was going on, they just had to submit. There would not be any benefits for them to resist. Lin Xuan ordered the mystic realm king, “Tell them to quickly move their butts away. Also, take all the trash away.” “Speaking of which, how can you guys eat meat, bones, and feces together? This is too much. Why are you so unhygienic?” The mystic realm king roared a few times, and the demon beasts immediately mobilized and moved away from the base. At the same time, he took away all kinds of food scraps, beast corpses, and feces. Soon, the base was renewed and turned into a flat and wide open space. Lin Xuan stepped forward and placed the Protection Rune in the center of the open space. Buzz! Light blue energy spread in all directions with the Protection Rune as the center. After spreading into a light blue energy barrier with a diameter of 100 meters, it immediately stopped. The weaker demon beasts instinctively felt fear and retreated. As for the stronger demon beasts, they roared threateningly at the light blue energy barrier and even tried to attack. Of course, as soon as their claws slapped onto the barrier, they were counterattacked by the terrifying energy of the energy barrier, and their claws directly broke! “As expected of the Protection Rune. I heard that this is a special treasure that can only be produced in the Kunlun Ruins. It can’t be found in any other mystic realms. I wonder how the other organizations that don’t have access to this treasure deal with their mystic realms. Could it be that there are no safety stations in their mystic realms?” Lin Xuan stared at the profound patterns on the surface of the protective rune and clicked his tongue in wonder. “Alright, mission completed. Let’s begin!” “Look at the time. I’ll slack off for three hours first!” Lin Xuan had a communicator in his hand. Of course, he could immediately report to Chu Pengcheng and the others that he had already set up a Protection Rune and could head to the main peak to provide support. But he was too fast. If he was too fast, others would become suspicious. Therefore, it was better for him to slack off now. At the same time, the four Seventh Realm martial artists heading to the west and north of the Falling Thunder Mountain simultaneously discovered the mystic realm kings. Chu Pengcheng and the others had marked the territories of those mystic realm kings on the map, but they had neglected a problem. The demon beasts of the Falling Thunder Mountain would instinctively chase after lightning because they could only become stronger by absorbing lightning. Naturally, the mystic realm kings would also lead their subordinates out of the territory and wander around. These mystic realm kings gathered in the forest and occupied the safety stations. For some reason, they had taken a fancy to these places. Back then, in order to choose the base location, Chu Pengcheng and the others even specially took out shovels and other tools to clean up the uneven ground. He did not expect them to be occupied by these mystic realm kings in the blink of an eye. Only the two Seventh Realm martial artists heading to the south of the Falling Thunder Mountain arrived at the southern base safely. There were no mystic realm kings at the southern base, only dozens of demon beasts. The highest level demon beast was only level three Seventh Realm. The intelligence of demon beasts was generally very low. The two of them quickly thought of a strategy to destroy them. They lured the demon beasts bit by bit and brought them far away before joining forces to kill it. Of course, this would definitely take a long time. After more than an hour, only Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion, who had headed to the east of the Falling Thunder Mountain, successfully set up the Protection Rune. The four Seventh Realm martial artists heading to the west and north of the Falling Thunder Mountain were in trouble. What were they supposed to do? The two of them were both at level two Seventh Realm. How could they deal with a level nine Seventh Realm mystic realm king who led hundreds of demon beasts? Were they supposed to use their heads to fight? These four Seventh Realm martial artists thought about it again and again and decided to temporarily avoid the enemy and not provoke the mystic realm kings. After retreating to the safe area, they hurriedly took out their communicators and communicated with the martial artists from the main peak. “What? The base has been occupied by a mystic realm king?” Chu Pengcheng felt his teeth ache when he heard this news. These mystic realm kings must have been bored to death. They had just flattened the ground and were prepared to build the safety stations. However, before they could build it, it had already been occupied? Moreover, it was not just one. Two of the bases had been occupied by mystic realm kings. ‘What about the other two?’ Chu Pengcheng hurriedly picked up his communicator and contacted the others. At this moment, an incomparably thick purple lightning suddenly struck down from the sky from the main peak of the Falling Thunder Mountain. Boom! A terrifying sound wave swept through the entire Falling Thunder Mountain. A piercing rustling sound immediately came from the communicator. At the same time, wisps of white smoke emitted from the communicator. Chu Pengcheng hurriedly threw it far away and cursed, “The communicator is malfunctioning!” In order to receive the communication immediately, the other people’s communicators were attached on their waists. At this moment, their communicators had also malfunctioned and they had no choice but to abandon them. “I’m a little worried…” Ye Yuqiu frowned slightly. No one expected the falling lightning from the Falling Thunder Mountain to have an EMP-like effect. The circuit board of the communicator was even burned. In this way, other than the 25 Seventh Realm martial artists on the main peak who could still take care of each other, the eight Seventh Realm martial artists scattered around the Falling Thunder Mountain would probably have to fight their own battles. This was definitely not good news for them. The levels of the eight Seventh Realm martial artists, including Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion, were not too high. They were all between level one and level three Seventh Realm. If they encountered a large group of demon beasts, there was a high chance that something bad would happen! Moreover, based on the news sent by the four Seventh Realm martial artists in the west and north, the other two bases were very likely to be occupied by mystic realm kings. This made things worse. Xiang Tianxiu scratched his head. “Since Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion were able to kill the puppet of the leader of the High Heaven Plains, they should still have some strength. There’s no need to be so worried.” Black White glanced at him and immediately said, “I suggest that we immediately send someone to support them. If the mystic realm king doesn’t leave the base, we can only give up and choose another base.” Ye Yuqiu, Silver Fox, Bai Xinghe, and the others nodded deeply. Soon, 4 of the 25 martial artists were chosen and rushed to the four directions of the Falling Thunder Mountain. Black was the person who had gone to support Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion. “Please don’t let anything happen.” Black muttered and used his skill to quickly descend the mountain and rush to the east side of the Falling Thunder Mountain. Black was very fast and soon arrived at the base. He did not see a large number of corpses and blood here, and his heart immediately sank. This was bad. There were actually no signs of a fight. Could it be that Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion had been insta-killed? This thought was thrown out of his mind as soon as it rose. No, no. Even if Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion could not defeat the mystic realm king and its subordinates, they would still be able to escape. They should not be instantly killed. Black carefully approached and suddenly discovered that Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion were calmly roasting meat. The rich fragrance of meat even entered Black’s nose. Lin Xuan also discovered Black and waved his hand happily. “You’re here too? Want to eat together?” Black asked curiously, “This base hasn’t been occupied by a mystic realm king?” Lin Xuan sighed. “This place is also occupied by a mystic realm king. Although the two of us have some strength, we naturally can’t defeat a mystic realm king.” “Then you guys…?” Flame Explosion smiled and said, “There were actually two mystic realm kings. They seemed like they were fighting for territory. The more they fought, the further away they went. We took the opportunity to put down the Protection Rune.” Of course, that was not the case. After possessing the mystic realm king as his avatar, Lin Xuan instructed it to quietly lie on the ground as a bodyguard. Not long after, another mystic realm king suddenly approached. These two mystic realm kings were both Ardent Mane Wolves. They looked at each other and gritted their teeth. Lin Xuan thought that they were about to fight and hurriedly prepared to call the Thunder Lion over to participate in the battle. In the end, as the two mystic realm kings stared at each other… they really started fighting. One was in front and the other was behind. Then, one was above and the other was below. One moved and the other howled like a ghost. Only then did Lin Xuan discover that the mystic realm king he had possessed was a male wolf and the other mystic realm king was a female wolf… Moreover, these two mystic realm kings were both more than seven meters long. The commotion of the “battle” was huge, and a large number of the surrounding trees had fallen. Many demon beasts were also affected and were trampled to death and injured in the process of their battle. Lin Xuan could not stand it anymore and hurriedly sent the two of them away. After being interrupted, the female wolf even roared angrily at Lin Xuan, as if saying, “If you take away my happiness, I’ll bite you to death.” The male wolf hurriedly stopped the fight and prepared to find a new place to carry out the deed with the female wolf it had just hooked up with. The two mystic realm kings eloped under the lightning. It was precisely because of this that there were only him and his avatar here. Black nodded. “I see.” After advancing, the Falling Thunder Mountain became more like the real world. In the real world, wild beasts would fight for mates and territories. This was also the case for mystic realm kings. Black took out two bottles of Erguotou from the storage compartment and one over. “You can’t just eat meat. Drink some alcohol.” The three of them immediately began to eat heartily. The atmosphere was very harmonious. Lin Xuan asked as he ate, “Why are you here to support us? Could it be that there are also mystic realm kings in the other bases?” Black quickly swallowed this big pork leg in two or three mouthfuls. He wiped the oil on his hands and nodded. “Yes, the martial artists in the west and north have contacted us. They said that there are mystic realm kings on both sides. It’s very dangerous. It’s difficult for them to set up Protection Runes.” “Chu Pengcheng was just about to contact you when a purple lightning bolt suddenly appeared at the highest point of the Falling Thunder Mountain. Just like the EMP, it directly destroyed everyone’s communication devices.” Lin Xuan took out the broken communicator from his waist and said in surprise, “I see. No wonder there was only an ear-piercing rustling sound coming from the communicator.” “Since you’ve already set up the protective rune here, let’s hurry up and support the other three.” Black had already stood up. Lin Xuan nodded and immediately followed closely behind with Flame Explosion. Soon, they arrived at the south side of the Falling Thunder Mountain. On the way, they met up with Bai Xinghe, who had come to support the south side. Although Bai Xinghe’s level was low, his profession was a precious purple Blood Hunter, and his combat strength was very strong. However, they did not find the two Seventh Realm martial artists here. Instead, they found two broken corpses that had been bitten. Black sighed and collected the belongings of these people before burying them on the spot. They quickly arrived at the southern base. As expected, a large number of demon beasts had gathered here. However, there were no signs of mystic realm kings. “I reckon that the two of them came up with a plan to lure the demon beasts away before using a method to destroy them separately.” Bai Xinghe sighed. “However, they probably lured too many demon beasts and were surrounded. In the end, they died in battle.” “What a pity. After all, they’re two Seventh Realm martial artists.” Black did not show much sadness and quickly took out a pair of short knives. Bai Xinghe nodded. “Let’s do it. Let’s quickly eliminate these demon beasts and support the remaining two sites.” With the strength of Shield Ghost, Flame Explosion, Black, and Bai Xinghe, it was not difficult for them to deal with this group of more than a hundred demon beasts. As long as Shield Ghost’s shield could still withstand it, it was only a matter of time before they killed all the demon beasts. Soon, all the demon beasts were destroyed. The three of them successfully placed the Protection Rune here. “Continue forward.” Black called for Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion to follow. Half an hour later, they arrived at the west side of the Falling Thunder Mountain and encountered three Seventh Realm martial artists who were helpless. The two of them were at level two Seventh Realm, and the other was at level six Seventh Realm. They had rushed down from the main peak to provide support. “Eh? You guys are here?” The three of them were very happy to see Lin Xuan and the others. However, after a short moment of happiness, they started to frown again. “It’s useless even if there are three more people. We can’t defeat those two mystic realm kings.” “I wonder what’s wrong with those two mystic realm kings. They’re actually stuck together like glue. They’re leading at least 600 demon beasts. This is too ridiculous. Just looking at this number makes my scalp tingle.” “Black, why don’t we use another place as our base?” The three of them looked at Black helplessly. Black shook his head. “The safety station has to be equipped with many functions. It has to have a canteen, accommodation, toilets, transactions, and many other facilities. The area it occupies is very large.” “We’ve investigated the west side of the Falling Thunder Mountain for a long time. This is the only area nearby that is suitable for building safety stations. The other areas are either steep mountains, frequent lightning strikes, or have many demon beasts. They’re all not suitable.” Black’s words made everyone feel troubled. They could not beat the mystic realm kings. However, it was not like he could build a safety station elsewhere. Could it be that the safety station could not be built on the west side of the Falling Thunder Mountain? That would only make things even more difficult. After the advancement of the Falling Thunder Mountain, its area had greatly increased. Its total area had already exceeded 30 square kilometers, which was about the size of a county. It was already very unreasonable for such a large mystic realm to only have five safety stations. Now, they even wanted to reduce another one on the west side. In this way, it was very likely that the martial artists would not come to the west to train. This was because if they encountered danger here, they would not be able to find the shelter of the safety station, and the danger factor would greatly increase. Any death of a Seventh Realm martial artist would be a loss to the core strength of the Construction Division. Lin Xuan revealed a strange expression. The two mystic realm kings were stuck together. Could it be… “Were they two Ardent Mane Wolves?” he asked. The three of them looked up at him and said in surprise, “Yes, how did you know?” Lin Xuan coughed dryly. “My base was occupied by one of them. Later on, when the other one appeared, they fought. The more they fought, the further away they went. Only then could I take the opportunity to set up the Protection Rune.” The three of them looked envious. Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion were too lucky. The two mystic realm kings even left together as they fought, giving them a chance. “If there’s really no other way, I’ll be the bait and lure away the mystic realm king and these demon beasts. You guys take the opportunity to set up the Protection Rune,” Black said in a low voice. The three of them were surprised. Black was using himself as bait. This was very dangerous. He might very well die inside. Of course, Black could also run back and enter the energy shield of the Protection Rune. However, it was very likely that the furious mystic realm king would directly lead the demon beasts to attack the energy barrier. After all, a Protection Rune was not invincible. Without the subsequent energy supply, it could not protect them for long. When the energy barrier was broken, death was still inevitable. Seeing that Black was planning to take the risk and give it a try, Lin Xuan hurriedly said, “There’s no need for you to take the risk. I have an idea.” Black was stunned. “Tell me about it.” Lin Xuan said solemnly, “Actually… I’ve been able to communicate with wild beasts since I was young.” Black and the other three people stared at him in surprise. “You were born with the Beast Speaker skill?” Beast Speaker was a rare blue profession. The profession skill of the Beast Speaker was also called “Beast Speaker”, which allowed one to communicate with wild beasts and demon beasts. As for the outcome of the exchange, it was up to the skill grade, skill level, and the level of the demon beast. When the communication worked, it was possible for both parties to be happy. However, it was also possible for the communication to fail. Originally, the demon beasts only wanted to chase the martial artists out of their territory. With this communication, the demon beasts might become even more furious and would not stop until they died. It was precisely because this profession skill was rather useless and had almost no combat strength that very few people would choose this profession. Lin Xuan simply nodded and admitted it. “Then try it from afar. Perhaps you can make those two mystic realm kings leave in harmony,” Black said solemnly. “But if they show any attack, escape! Escape immediately! I’ll cover your retreat.” Lin Xuan nodded seriously and pretended to be cautious as he slowly approached the empty space. Soon, he saw the two huge Ardent Maned Wolves lying in the open space. On the periphery were hundreds of demon beasts either playing or napping. The male wolf was licking the female wolf’s glossy fur. The female wolf seemed to have fallen apart and was lying on the ground comfortably. From the wounds on their bodies, he could tell that the battle just now was very intense. As for the detailed battle situation… Lin Xuan did not want to use the perspective of his training avatar to seriously browse through it. It might affect his normal sexual orientation. Sensing the aura of a living person, several demon beasts stood up and bared their teeth at Lin Xuan. Black and the others were immediately worried. Would it really work? Could Shield Ghost be bluffing? The male and female wolves also noticed this person. The female wolf, especially, had a deep impression of this person. Just as it was feeling good just now, this human said something and the male wolf stopped moving. Seeing this human again, it was even more furious. It opened its mouth and roared at Lin Xuan, filled with anger. Damn it, the person who interrupted my business is here again? Just you wait, I’ll get up and kill you! Black had a strange expression. Had he heard wrongly? It was normal for there to be anger in this wolf roar, but why was there also resentment? Why would a mystic realm king have resentment towards Lin Xuan?? Lin Xuan coughed lightly and pretended to say a few obscure syllables. Black and the others’ hearts were in their throats. After all, this was an exchange with a mystic realm king. If the other party did not have a temper and ended up getting angry, it would really be over. The consequences of failing to communicate were definitely fatal. As he spoke, Lin Xuan immediately controlled the male wolf to rub against the female wolf’s ears. In an instant, the female wolf’s emotions softened. Its huge bell-like eyes were no longer filled with anger and resentment. Instead, it seemed to have gotten excited. The three Seventh Realm martial artists widened their eyes. “Damn, Shield Ghost really mastered the Beast Speaker skill?” “He was born with this. It can’t be learned.” “Beast Speaker is such a useless skill. However, sometimes, it really has a miraculous effect!” Black also exclaimed, “No way, Shield Ghost actually succeeded?!” Lin Xuan even pretended to make Flame Explosion’s avatar sigh and say, “Shield Ghost, how many trump cards have you hidden behind my back? You can actually communicate with a mystic realm king.” The male wolf growled in the female wolf’s ear, and the female wolf quickly stood up excitedly and shyly. The two huge wolves, each more than seven meters long, looked at each other. One on the left and one on the right, they intertwined and walked towards the distant forest. Since their boss had left, the demon beasts naturally followed. In less than a minute, not a single demon beast was left in this empty space. Black patted Lin Xuan’s shoulder. “Awesome!” The other three also walked forward and said gratefully, “Shield Ghost, it’s all thanks to you. Otherwise, we really don’t know what to do.” Lin Xuan waved his hand, indicating that this was just a small matter. At this moment, the two wolves in the forest not far away had already let out comfortable wolf howls. Large amounts of trees collapsed to the ground, startling a large number of birds. Everyone :”…” “Are they…?” Bai Xinghe’s expression was strange. “First of all, let’s eliminate the possibility that they’re mating.” Black coughed lightly. “Set up the Protection Rune. We still have the northern part of the Falling Thunder Mountain,” Black said. The three Seventh Realm martial artists immediately took out the Protection Rune from the storage compartment and placed it on the empty ground. The light blue energy barrier immediately rippled with the rune as the center, enveloping a large area. The Protection Rune would automatically absorb the energy in the air. However, the speed of absorption was not fast, so they still needed to install a device to replenish the energy. The weaker demon beasts would instinctively stay away from the energy barrier. Even if a demon beast wanted to attack the energy barrier, it would immediately be burned and retreat in fear. Unless a large number of demon beasts attacked the energy barrier at the same time, the energy barrier would not shatter. Placing the Protection Rune was equivalent to laying the foundation of the house. In the future, martial artists who entered and left this mystic realm would bring some construction materials and finally build the safety station from scratch. This would be a considerable undertaking and would take at least three to five months. “Let’s go to the north.” With a wave of Black’s hand, everyone immediately rushed towards the north of the Falling Thunder Mountain. Lin Xuan pondered for a moment. Then, he also let the two wolf kings rush north. Since he could take advantage of the female wolf king, he naturally could not waste this opportunity. More than 40 minutes later, they killed a group of demon beasts that blocked their way and arrived at the northern base. A bloody battle was happening here. One of the three Seventh Realm martial artists had already died. The other two were also covered in blood. They could only fight back by hiding in the energy barrier of the Protection Rune. However, under the attacks of the mystic realm king and his subordinates, the energy barrier dimmed at a visible speed. Soon, these two Seventh Realm martial artists would also die. When they saw two huge wolves more than seven meters long appear in their line of sight, their expressions became even more desperate. They were already in such a miserable state. However, there were now two additional mystic realm kings. How shameless! When Black and the others arrived, they were also stunned. Damn. The two wolf kings actually came here while mating?! Black gritted his teeth. “Shield Ghost, could it be that these two wolves have fallen for you? Why don’t you communicate with them again?” When the two martial artists in the energy barrier saw Lin Xuan and the others, they hurriedly shouted, “Don’t come over! Don’t come over!” “We’re already dead. Don’t get yourselves involved!” Their thoughts were very simple. At this moment, three mystic realm kings and more than seven hundred demon beasts appeared. This number was no longer a headache, but a despair! If Black, Shield Ghost, and Flame Explosion came to save them, they would only be eaten by the demon beasts. As members of the Construction Division, they dared to sacrifice themselves, but they were unwilling to see their colleagues die to save them. Back then, Bai Xinghe and Xu Xuan were like this. Now, these people were also like this. Lin Xuan shook his head and strode over. “Damn! Do you not understand human language? Hurry up and leave! Don’t come over!” “Don’t come. We really can’t save you. Let us wait for death. We don’t want to drag you guys down with us!” The two Seventh Realm martial artists looked very anxious. They were furious. Why was this kid so stubborn?! “The two of you, believe in him! He has the Beast Speaker skill. Perhaps he can communicate with a mystic realm king,” Bai Xinghe shouted. “Beast Speaker? That thing is useless! That guy who died also had the Beast Speaker skill. He approached the mystic realm king and stretched out his hand to communicate, but he was directly swallowed!” The male martial artist in the energy barrier shouted dejectedly. Black: “…Maybe it also depends on the person. What if some Beast Speaker skills are more powerful?” “Damn, no matter how I persuade you, you won’t listen. I have no choice.” The male martial artist gritted his teeth with an angry expression. The female martial artist sighed and said, “I won’t persuade you anymore. Do whatever you want. I’ve never seen someone so suicidal…” Before they could finish speaking, the two wolf kings suddenly roared at the mystic realm king that was attacking the energy barrier! This sound was not like the comfortable sound they had made when they were mating just now. It was a roar that was completely filled with bloodlust. The mystic realm king was a Lightning Leopard. When it heard the sound, it immediately stopped attacking and turned around to roar threateningly. It seemed to be saying, “This is my freaking territory. The two of you can go back to where you came from.” “Kill it!” Lin Xuan shouted. The two wolf kings rushed over and opened their huge mouths, biting the leopard’s back. The male and female duo cooperated intimately. One feinted and the other attacked. One harassed while the other pounced over. Even the two martial artists in the energy barrier were stunned. No, were they really going to fight? Just because it was told to? Could it be that Shield Ghost’s Beast Speaker skill was really very powerful? The aftershock of the battle between the three mystic realm kings was also very ferocious. Under Lin Xuan’s secret command, their battle also got further and further away from these members of the Construction Division. The demon beasts led by the three mystic realm kings had also been fighting just now. Seeing their boss walk over, they immediately followed. In a short period of time, the two martial artists were directly saved and survived. The two of them were still a little stunned. They all felt that they were doomed, and there was no hope on their faces. Even when Black, Shield Ghost, and the others wanted to save them, they tried their best to refuse. They hoped that Black and the others would cherish their lives and not die here for no reason. The outcome was too unexpected! The man and woman hugged and cried. “Thank you! Thank you so much!” They hurriedly ran over and shook hands with Shield Ghost. Their eyes were red and tears welled up. Although the other party was already dozens of years old and had a high position in the Construction Division, they were still unable to control themselves. Unless one had experienced such near-death encounters many times, they would not be able to suppress the huge fluctuations in their emotions. Black and Bai Xinghe patted their shoulders. “Alright, alright. We’re safe now. Don’t worry.” “Take a rest. I’ll go and see how the three mystic realm kings are doing,” Lin Xuan said and quickly approached. Black nodded and took out the Life Potion from the storage compartment and gave it to the two martial artists. These two people indeed needed a good rest before continuing to fight. On the other side, Lin Xuan had already caught up to the two wolf kings. At this moment, the Lightning Leopard’s spine had already been bitten off and it fell weakly to the ground. The female wolf king wanted to eat it, but was stopped by the male wolf king. Seeing Lin Xuan appear, the female Wolf King was furious again. It felt that this human was too much! Why did it keep appearing beside them every day! Was this human not afraid of provoking them? Lin Xuan hurriedly controlled the male wolf king to rub its ears and temples against the female wolf king. Only then did the female wolf king soften. He immediately arrived beside the Lightning Leopard and removed a training avatar with the lowest level. At the same time, he seized the Lightning Leopard as his new training avatar. In a short period of time, the dead Lightning Leopard’s injuries recovered. It quickly jumped off the ground and quickly entered the forest. This huge change shocked the female wolf king for a moment. The dead demon beast actually stood up? “I’m leaving. You guys continue.” Lin Xuan waved his hand and turned to leave. Not long after, a long and comfortable wolf howl sounded from behind. After resting for an hour, the group of martial artists immediately headed for the main peak. In the four directions of the Falling Thunder Mountain, the Protection Runes had already been placed. Now, all that was left was the Protection Rune of the main peak. As long as they completed the last mission, they would be able to leave the Falling Thunder Mountain and rest for a period of time. A few hours later, on the main peak. Chu Pengcheng, Xiang Tianxiu, and the others had already arrived at a height of 500 meters. Here, they had to face the attacks of stronger demon beasts with every meter that they advanced. Almost all the strongest demon beasts in the entire Falling Thunder Mountain mystic realm were on the main peak. The team had already suffered casualties. Coupled with the approaching night of the Falling Thunder Mountain, everyone had no choice but to find a safe place to camp. Firstly, it was to adjust their emotions. Secondly, it was to recover their health and magic power. If they kept using the Life Potions and the Magic Power Potions, the consumption would be too great. It didn’t matter even if they had a lot of potions, they would not be able to support such consumption. At this moment, Lin Xuan, Black, and the others also rushed over. They followed the marks they had left on the trees and found them. After learning that three of the four base sites had been occupied by mystic realm kings and that several Seventh Realm martial artists had died, Chu Pengcheng sighed. Although he had tried his best to avoid it, there were still casualties in the end. However, when Black mentioned that Shield Ghost actually had the Beast Speaker skill, he was overjoyed. Not only him, but the other martial artists were also very surprised. Not only did Shield Ghost have this skill, but he had also successfully communicated with the other party twice. The first time, he had dissuaded the mystic realm kings. The second time, he had even instigated a battle between the three mystic realm kings. He was quite capable! Xiang Tianxiu sized up Shield Ghost excitedly. “I thought you were just a clumsy metal can. I didn’t expect you to have the Beast Speaker skill. Impressive.” “However, this skill is ultimately a support skill and is not that presentable. In the end, your strength still needs to be high enough in order for you to have assurance.” Xiang Tianxiu did not show much envy for the Beast Speaker. He only praised Shield Ghost slightly and walked to his tent. “Beast Speaker skill? Shield Ghost, I didn’t expect you to have this skill too.” A martial artist called Li Yi smiled and approached. He looked at him in surprise. “I also have this skill. We can communicate more in the future.” Lin Xuan was surprised. The other party’s gaze seemed a little too amiable. Big Brother, we’re not from the same hometown, right? Lin Xuan immediately used a High-Level Observer skill. —- Name: Li Yi Level: Level Two Seventh Realm Profession: Beast Tamer Essence: 17,828 / 2 million Attributes: Constitution 154, Strength 125, Spirit 301, Agility 122 Technique: Beast Speaker (Peerless Gold), Beast Call (Precious Purple), Beast Leader (Precious Purple), Three Star Chain Arrow… Equipment: Bird Speaker Staff (Peerless Gold), Beast King Set (Precious Purple)… —- “This person is strange. His Beast Speaker has actually reached the peerless golden grade? Where did all his skill books come from?” Lin Xuan was puzzled. “Where’s Big Brother from?” he probed. Li Yi patted his chest. “A member of the Construction Division of Elephant Mountain City!” Elephant Mountain City? A map of the various Construction Divisions immediately appeared in Lin Xuan’s mind. Currently, the Construction Division had roughly recaptured the northeastern, northern, and southern areas of Xia Country. Meanwhile, there were many factions in the larger inland areas. Currently, the main forces of the Construction Division were dealing with the demon beasts that were crazily surging out of Drowning City. It was still too early for them to deal with those places. Elephant Mountain City was a city on the edge of South China. It was equivalent to a border town. This was even stranger. The border towns needed combat strength more. Why would someone from such a town invest precious experience points into such a useless skill? This was one of the skills that many martial artists publicly admitted to be useless. It would not improve their combat strength much. “Brother Li, Elephant Mountain City is quite far from Dragon Sea City. Why did you come all the way here?” Lin Xuan asked. Li Yi was serious. “I’m duty-bound to help the organization!” Lin Xuan immediately gave him a thumbs up. After chatting for a while, everyone quickly set up their tents before night fell. At the same time, they inserted lightning rods into the soil outside the tents to try their best to keep the lightning from falling near them. Night slowly fell. In the center of the tent with more than twenty people, a large pot was boiling. All kinds of compressed food and dehydrated vegetables were thrown in, forming a huge mess. Usually, the taste of this thing would definitely be very bad. Not many people would eat it. However, after a hard day of exploration in the Falling Thunder Mountain, it was already not bad for him to be able to eat something hot. Chu Pengcheng, Silver Fox, Xiang Tianxiu, and the others began to wolf down their food bowl after bowl. Those who did not know better would think that they were afraid of their food being snatched. “Eh? Aren’t the three of you hungry?” Silver Fox noticed that Shield Ghost, Flame Explosion, and Black did not seem to be eating very happily. Black coughed lightly and glanced at Shield Ghost. The two of them nodded tacitly. “You’re the main force in exploring the main peak. We’ll let you have this pot of soup. We can endure it.” Not long ago, Black had eaten an entire roasted wild boar with Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion and gulped down a bottle of Erguotou. Even now, his stomach was still bloated and he did not feel hungry at all. The taste of compressed food and dehydrated vegetables was naturally not much compared to roasted wild boar, and he did not have much of an appetite. Lin Xuan was the same. He had yet to digest the roasted wild boar in the morning. Suddenly, everyone stopped eating and looked at them in a daze. What simplistic dedication! Having seen this, they could not help but be in tears! In contrast, the way they ate now seemed so ugly and disgusting! Xiang Tianxiu silently put down the spoon that he was using to reach into the pot. He wiped her mouth and also looked at Lin Xuan and Black with admiration. Although he was arrogant, he also admired selfless people. Chu Pengcheng shook his head solemnly. “Every member is taking risks in the Falling Thunder Mountain. You shouldn’t be treated differently. You don’t have to give us the soup. You must eat it too!” Ye Yuqiu scooped a bowl of soup and handed it to Lin Xuan. She said with concern, “I understand your feelings, but everyone has to eat their fill. Only then will you have the strength to continue exploring tomorrow. Come, finish it!” Lin Xuan: “…It’s better to give it to someone who needs it more! I’m not hungry.” Ye Yuqiu stared at him. “I think you’re hungry.” Lin Xuan :”…” Gulp, gulp. He ate a large bowl of soup. Lin Xuan felt his stomach swell. It could not be said that his stomach was the size of a pregnant lady’s belly. However, he still gained a big belly after eating. Fortunately, Shield Ghost was wearing full armor and Flame Explosion had a loose cloak. Otherwise, everyone would have been able to see his bulging stomach. After eating and drinking, Chu Pengcheng began to arrange for a night watch. “First shift will be Ye Yuqiu and Silver Fox.” “Second shift will be Chu Pengcheng and Bai Xinghe.” “Third shift… ” “…” “Seventh shift will be Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion.” At this moment, Li Yi suddenly raised his hand. “Director Chu, can you arrange for me to be on the same shift as Shield Ghost?” Chu Pengcheng was stunned. What was she doing? Didn’t she realize that Shield Ghost Flame Explosion were good brothers? Did she really want to intervene in their relationship so badly? Flame Explosion asked curiously, “Why?” Li Yi smiled awkwardly. “I saw that Shield Ghost also has the Beast Speaker skill, so I wanted to share insights with him. Perhaps I can also learn something.” The others nodded when they heard this. Lin Xuan rolled his eyes. The grade of your Beast Speaker skill was peerless golden! It would be strange if the other party could gain insights from talking with him. Lin Xuan suddenly said, “Since Brother Li feels like it, I also want to learn from him.” Li Yi immediately revealed a happy expression. In Lin Xuan’s opinion, this joy was a little strange. He felt that the other party was too happy and amiable. Seeing that Shield Ghost did not mind, Chu Pengcheng said, “Alright, then Shield Ghost and Li Yi will be placed in the seventh shift.” Soon, Chu Pengcheng announced all the members of the night watch. “There will be a shift every hour. Please be vigilant. The safety of the others will be in your hands.” Everyone nodded seriously. Ye Yuqiu and Silver Fox, who were in charge of the first shift, sat in front of the fire while the others crawled into the tent. Boom! Boom! Boom! The night at the Falling Thunder Mountain was not quiet. Instead, thunder rumbled. Speaking of which, it was strange. Before the advancement of the Falling Thunder Mountain, a large number of people would attract the lightning, causing the martial artists to have no choice but to travel separately. In the end, after the advancement, no matter how they gathered, the lightning did not seem to fall on them. Chu Pengcheng and the others were also very puzzled. In the end, they could only explain it as a strange change after the advancement. After leaving the Falling Thunder Mountain, they planned to inform the headquarters of this change and let the big shots in the headquarters rack their brains over it. Thunder rumbled, but everyone was already prepared for this trip to the Falling Thunder Mountain. They wore soundproof earplugs. Moreover, they had been exploring for the entire day. Everyone was very tired, and most of them had fallen asleep. Lin Xuan could not sleep. Even with the soundproof earplugs, the sound of thunder still drilled into his ears like small insects. Moreover, people would walk out of the tent to pee every once in a while. After all, they ate soup at night, so it was normal for them to pee a little. Lin Xuan simply called his training avatars over and patrolled the vicinity of their camp. When he had nothing to do, he would look at the perspective of these training avatars and imagine that he was watching a movie. Seven hours later, it was Lin Xuan’s turn. He walked out of the tent and exchanged places with the two night guards from the previous shift. Li Yi had also walked out of the tent at this moment. Their eyes met. The two of them sat in front of the fire and added firewood. The firewood crackled from the fire. Li Yi stared at him, his expression half excited and half hesitant. Finally, he said, “Where did you learn your Beast Speaker skill?” Lin Xuan thought for a moment. “I was born with it.” Li Yi: “???” He laughed dryly. “Then it’s fine.” The two of them were silent for a long time. Lin Xuan was puzzled. Didn’t this person want to exchange skills? Why wasn’t he saying anything? Something must be wrong! “Hiss… My stomach suddenly hurts. No, I have to settle this first. I’ll leave the duty of guarding the night to you. Shield Ghost, don’t be distracted.” Li Yi suddenly cried out softly and covered his stomach as if he was in pain. Lin Xuan sneered. Was he about to give himself away? “Alright, go. Leave this to me.” Lin Xuan’s tone was calm. “Don’t go too far. If you’re attacked by demon beasts, I won’t be able to save you.” Li Yi nodded repeatedly, took a roll of paper, covered his stomach, and fled into the forest. He walked far away and turned around to see that Shield Ghost was still waving at him and did not follow him. Only then did he feel relieved. Lin Xuan sneered. Do you think that no one will be able to see you if I don’t follow? He immediately turned to the perspective of his training avatar and controlled a Lightning Bee to approach. Soon, it silently landed on a treetop not far from Li Yi. Then, he realized… Li Yi had really taken off his pants and squatted down. However, he did not use his muscles to bring out his feces and urine. Instead, he began to release his skill. With a rub of his hands, invisible fluctuations rippled out and quickly spread more than a thousand meters. After releasing his skill, Li Yi waited patiently. Soon, several demon beasts ran to Li Yi’s side. These demon beasts were all very obedient and allowed Li Yi to stroke their smooth and soft fur. “Where’s your boss?” Li Yi squatted down and communicated with them softly. These demon beasts roared softly and pointed in a certain direction. Li Yi was pleasantly surprised. “Not far from here? Alright! I can give it a try. Although the probability of summoning a mystic realm king is not high, what if I’m lucky?” He released his skill again, and layers of emerald green ripples spread out. Not far away, the male and female wolf kings suddenly stopped. The male wolf king still wanted to move, but the female wolf king suddenly broke free and walked in Li Yi’s direction in a daze. Li Yi was even more surprised. “I actually summoned a mystic realm king! I’ve struck gold this time!” The male wolf king was very unhappy. It was in the middle of feeling good. How could it be interrupted? The male wolf king was about to give chase with a wolf howl. Lin Xuan immediately took over its body and personally commanded it, forcefully suppressing its roar. He had already guessed what Li Yi was going to do. He could even guess which organization Li Yi was from. India! His equipment and skills were too similar to those of the Indian martial artists. Whether Li Yi had been corrupted by India or had only joined the Construction Division after growing up in India… Either way, he was definitely related to India. “No wonder he suddenly became very friendly when he saw that I also had the Beast Speaker skill. This guy probably thought that I was also a spy hiding in the Construction Division…” Lin Xuan was angry and amused. “The skill Li Yi just released is Beast Summoning. After using this skill, he will have a chance to summon demon beasts to fight for him. The duration is related to the skill level, skill grade, and demon beast level.” “His skill is already at the precious purple grade. The success rate of summoning ordinary demon beasts is at least 80%. The success rate of summoning mystic realm kings should also be 10%.” Lin Xuan sneered. He had already seen through this fellow’s intentions. Li Yi wanted to summon a large number of demon beasts overnight. It was best if he could summon as many mystic realm kings as possible. Taking advantage of the fact that most Seventh Realm martial artists were sleeping, he summoned these demon beasts to attack the camp! In this way, the Seventh Realm martial artists might suffer heavy losses in a hurry. It would be even better if the large-scale battle here attracted the attention of the experienced mystic realm king at the top of the mountain. This way, there would be a high chance that they would be completely wiped out. Although there was a high chance that Li Yi would die here, his goal would still be achieved. It had to be known that the 33 Seventh Realm martial artists who entered the Falling Thunder Mountain also included Xiang Tianxiu, who was valued by many Ninth Realm martial artists. There were also Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion, who had risen like a dark horse! If these people all died in the Falling Thunder Mountain, it would definitely be a huge blow to the Construction Division! The current impact might not be obvious, but it was very likely that there would be a lack of successors in the future. If a Ninth Realm big shot died in the future, he would not have a successor. “Summoning a mystic realm king, right? I’ll let you summon as many as you want.” Lin Xuan sneered and called over his training avatars. Then, he controlled the male wolf king to imitate the female wolf king’s gaze and slowly walk over, as if it had also been successfully summoned. When Li Yi saw another mystic realm king approaching, his eyes immediately widened and he was so happy that he almost cried out. “There’s a 10% chance of succeeding three times in a row! Even the heavens are helping me!” In less than ten minutes, a large group of demon beasts surrounded Li Yi. In addition to the two mystic realm kings, there was also the Lightning Leopard from before and six level nine Seventh Realm demon beasts! There were also seventy to eighty demon beasts of various levels! These demon beasts all looked at him obediently and did not show any aggression. Li Yi was overjoyed. He was really lucky. In the past, he had never been able to summon so many powerful demon beasts. It was as if the heavens wanted to destroy the Construction Division! Li finally pulled on his pants and stood up straight. “Attack! The bigger the commotion, the better! I want them all to die!” Li Yi lowered his voice and laughed wildly. The female wolf king followed the instructions and immediately prepared to advance. However, the male wolf king leaned down and nibbled the other party’s ear. The female wolf king looked conflicted, as if she had thought of something and stopped. Li Yi frowned. What was going on? At this critical moment, they were still acting so intimately. Why were their minds filled with thoughts of mating every day! “Hurry up!” Li ordered again. Then, all the demon beasts surrounded him. Those eyes were not gentle and obedient at all. Instead, they were filled with bloodlust. Li Yi shuddered. What the hell was going on?! Had the control time of the Beast Summoning passed? That was impossible! Less than five minutes had passed! Lin Xuan pointed from afar and said. “Eat him.” The male wolf king was the first to attack. No, it moved its claws. Sharp claws popped out of his palm. Each of them was 20 centimeters long and was not much different from a short knife. At such a close distance, Li Yi, who was only a Beast Tamer who mainly focused on increasing his Spirit, was defenseless. At this moment, he did not even have the time to react before his throat was cut by the male Wolf King. Blood spurted out of Li Yi’s neck. However, he was still alive. Although he was a little flustered, he still wanted to take out the Life Potion immediately. However, the surrounding demon beasts would not give him this chance. They immediately pounced forward in groups. Lin Xuan specially ordered them to lower their voices as much as possible and cut off Li Yi’s throat as soon as they pounced over. In the dense forest, suppressed chewing sounds sounded. Li Yi died silently after being chewed at by dozens of demon beasts. With Li Yi’s death, the control on the female wolf king was also removed. It took a few steps in a daze and saw the male wolf king beside it. It immediately felt an urge to exercise. Seeing the male wolf king react, Lin Xuan simply let go of his control. The male wolf king threw the large pile of items that Li Yi had dropped into Lin Xuan’s consciousness space in a hurry. It ran more than a thousand meters with the female wolf king and began to moan again. Lin Xuan shook his head repeatedly. As expected of mystic realm kings, they were full of energy. Then, Lin Xuan began to check Li Yi’s things. He did not find the Indian badge. However, he discovered a list. Names were written on the list. Xiang Tianxiu was ranked first. Underneath Xiang Tianxiu’s name, Ye Yuqiu, Bai Xinghe, and the others’ names were also included. When he got to the 20th name, Lin Xuan also discovered the names of Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion. Moreover, Flame Explosion’s ranking was higher than Shield Ghost’s. Perhaps these people were ranked based on their killing ability. There were more than a hundred names on this list, and nearly twenty of them had red crosses. Lin Xuan’s heart sank. It was not difficult to guess that this was probably the assassination list India had handed to these spies. Some of the people on the list were already dead. “These organizations sure are unscrupulous when fighting each other. It’s either kill or get killed.” Lin Xuan shook his head repeatedly. Fortunately, he had discovered the other party’s plan. Otherwise, Li Yi could at least summon a mystic realm king. If he made a commotion, it was very likely that things would get out of hand. Even if they were not completely wiped out, at least half of them would die. Lin Xuan flipped through the items again. The Beast Speaker skill and the Bird Speaker staff had been dropped from Li Yi’s body. Lin Xuan’s luck was pretty good this time. Lin Xuan decided to learn this skill. After all, it was a peerless golden grade skill. It would be a waste not to learn it. After learning it, he immediately discovered that the sounds coming from the dense forest in all directions had changed greatly. He could actually somewhat understand the chatter of various birds and beasts. The Cold Light Owl that flew past in the night sky muttered that it had not eaten enough these few days and wanted to quickly catch a few birds to eat. The Thunder Tooth Spider lying on the treetop cursed as it weaved its spider web. It was trying to figure out the bastard that was flying everywhere and messing up its spider web? Further away, he could still hear the excited and helpless voices of the female and male wolf kings. The female wolf king: Again! The male wolf king: …There’s really not a single drop left… Lin Xuan had a strange expression and did not continue listening. He sorted out his thoughts and shouted at the place where Li Yi had run to squat, “Li Yi, why aren’t you back yet?” “Sigh, why is he taking so long?” Then, he muttered in a very realistic manner. He was almost convinced by his own acting before walking over to take a closer look. A moment later, Lin Xuan’s alarm sounded in the camp. “Li Yi is missing!” Whoosh, whoosh, whoosh. All the Seventh Realm martial artists woke up and looked at Shield Ghost in surprise. After hearing Shield Ghost’s description, everyone’s expressions could not help but turn solemn. Li Yi was a Seventh Realm martial artist after all.  He had run out and squatted in a pit, but now he was gone? Or could it be that there was actually a powerful demon beast watching them in the dark, waiting for him to leave the group? Chu Pengcheng said solemnly, “We can’t sit by and watch him disappear. How about this? Half of us will stay in the camp, and the other half will gather to search this area.” They all nodded. The search was naturally fruitless. After three hours, they did not find any traces. “Wait… there’s blood here.” Ye Yuqiu walked past a certain place and suddenly felt something wet on her arm. She turned on the flashlight and was surprised to find dried blood. With the blood as the center, they quickly discovered some fragments of clothes. Lin Xuan had deliberately instructed the male wolf king to leave behind those fragments. There were neither too many nor too few. If there were too few, they would not be able to discover them. If there were too many, it would seem deliberate. Everyone gathered. Another member of the Elephant Mountain City member leaned over and sighed. “It’s his equipment.” After a short silence, Chu Pengcheng said solemnly, “Li Yi’s death is a warning for us. In the future, even if everyone is in a hurry, we must at least travel in pairs. This way, even if something happens, we can take care of each other.” The others nodded in agreement. Lin Xuan also hurriedly nodded. Only he knew that Li Yi was a traitor in India, but he could not say it out loud. He could only pretend to be solemn. If Chu Pengcheng still did not let everyone return to the tent, he even felt like he would be unable to keep the act up. After confirming that Li Yi was dead, everyone returned to the tent. However, they could no longer sleep. The night passed uneventfully. The next morning. Due to the fact that most of their storage boxes were filled with various potions, there were not many places to store fresh water. They naturally could not use the limited fresh water they had to brush their teeth. They could only casually pluck some branches and rub their teeth with them. After eating breakfast, everyone did not continue to climb up. Instead, they found a suitable empty space at this height to place the Protection Rune. The reason why they did not go any higher was very simple. They were already close to the territory of the experienced mystic realm kings. Although it was not a problem for them to kill experienced mystic realm kings with their numbers, they would still have to pay a certain price. In that case, it was better to wait for the level nine Seventh Realm Construction Division members to arrive and let them attack. “What a pity. If we can kill this experienced mystic realm king, our gains will be huge.” “Experienced mystic realm kings will definitely drop a large number of Mystic Realm Pearls. Ordinary mystic realm kings won’t drop them if they die.” Ye Yuqiu sighed. Chu Pengcheng said helplessly, “There’s nothing we can do. We can fight, but we will also suffer heavy losses.” The others nodded and only felt a little emotional. Xiang Tianxiu smacked his lips. He really wanted those Mystic Realm Pearls. However, he was not an idiot. He knew that if he went alone to challenge the experienced mystic realm king, he would be courting death. However, while they were looking for a suitable open space, another thick purple lightning struck down from the top of the mountain. This bolt of lightning was as thick as a bucket. It was as if it pierced through the world. All the light lost its color at this moment. At this moment, it was as if only this purple lightning existed in the world. Everyone was stunned for a moment. Then, a shocking roar suddenly sounded from the top of the mountain! It was as if even the sky was trembling. A huge eagle with a wingspan of more than ten meters and lightning around its body suddenly flew up from the mountaintop. The purple lightning was emitted from its mouth. However, this eagle did not seem to be flying normally. Instead, it seemed to be struggling free from something. Silver Fox’s eyes were sharp as he pointed at the black spot on the giant eagle’s head. “There seems to be a person there!” Everyone was stunned and looked carefully. There was really someone standing on the Thunder Eagle! A golden rope was wrapped around the Thunder Eagle’s neck. The Thunder Eagle’s flying method was very strange. It probably wanted to break free from this rope. Lin Xuan also looked up. The advantage of his Constitution was that his five senses were more developed than others, including his vision. The person on the Thunder Eagle’s neck was half-naked. The muscles on his arms were like bricks as he firmly grabbed onto a golden rope. There were eight well-defined abdominal muscles on his abdomen, and beads of sweat flowed, reflecting the lightning. His facial features were standard Indian style. He had a broad nose and a wide mouth. His beard was like a lion’s, but he did not look old. However, this person’s overall posture was extremely provocative, making people want to look away. Lin Xuan threw out an advanced Observer skill from afar and saw all the information. —- Name: Dart Level: Level Seven Seventh Realm Profession: Beast King (Peerless Golden) Essence: 978,281 / 7 million Attributes: Constitution 216, Strength 139, Spirit 344, Agility 150 Technique: King of Beasts (Legendary Dark Gold), Beast Speaker (Peerless Gold), Beast Blood Boiling (Peerless Gold), Mind Control (Peerless Gold), Son of Nature… Equipment: Beast King Golden Shield (Peerless Gold), Beast Tamer Golden Rope (Peerless Gold), Forest King Set (Peerless Gold)… —- “Damn, this set of skills and equipment can only be described as luxurious.” Lin Xuan was first surprised, then his face was filled with joy. Wouldn’t he be rich if he killed the other party? Xiang Tianxiu only took a glance at this person and frowned deeply. “I know him. He’s the genius of the new generation of India, Dart. His strength and potential are at least in the top five of the new generation of India, but why is he here?” Lin Xuan was stunned. The new generation of geniuses in India? This was strange. This Dart was different from Li Yi. Li Yi was an Indian spy who had entered the mystic realm through the door of light. What about this Dart? Could he have transmigrated? Ye Yuqiu’s expression changed slightly. “Could it be that a door of light leading to the Falling Thunder Mountain has appeared in India?” All the martial artists present gasped. The mystic realms and the real world were connected by the doors of light. This meant that if a mystic realm could be connected to the world with a single door of light, it could also be connected to the world with two, three, four, five, and six doors of light. However, research had shown that having a single door of light was the most stable. Most mystic realms only had one door of light. If there were many doors of light, because the location of the door of light was different, it would cause the energy to be uneven. In the end, the doors of light would still be destroyed one by one, leaving only the most stable one. Chu Pengcheng was the first to calm down and said solemnly, “It’s also possible that it’s not a stable door but a fluctuation door.” “Fluctuation door… I think I’ve seen this term somewhere,” Lin Xuan muttered. He carefully recalled and really remembered that he had seen a description of this place when he was reading books in White Crane Town. The door of light was divided into a stable door and a fluctuation door. The latter was in a highly unstable state. The fluctuation door could randomly appear anywhere in the real world and be randomly connected to any mystic realm. Some would last for a few seconds while others might last for more than ten years. It was possible for martial artists to be eating hotpot and singing before suddenly getting swallowed by the fluctuation door and inexplicably falling into a dangerous mystic realm. This kind of thing was rare, but it was not unheard of. The contact, exploration, and conquest of humans in mystic realms had already exceeded a hundred years. All kinds of rules and events had been recorded. “No matter what, we can’t let Dart return alive.” Xiang Tianxiu had already taken out his staff. “This fellow is so bold to actually want to tame an experienced mystic realm king. Then let’s let him die completely in the Falling Thunder Mountain!” Chu Pengcheng, Ye Yuqiu, and the others nodded in agreement. After India unified the South Asia forces, it had been trying to cross Mount Everest and invade the territory of the original Xia Country. It even coveted the territory of the Construction Division. In recent years, the Construction Division and India had already fought several times. Every time, the Construction Division would win. However, India had a lot of people. Even after losing ten to twenty Seventh Realm martial artists, they could still quickly replenish their manpower. After fighting back and forth, the Construction Division still failed to shake off India. Now that there was a chance for them to kill the new generation of Indian geniuses, they naturally would not let it go! “Attack!” Chu Pengcheng shouted, and all the martial artists used their long-range skills. Lightning Chains, Icicle, Magic Arrow, Acid Ball, Flame Bullet, Armor Piercing Arrow, Poison Dart… They all used whatever they had. The pure melee martial artist scratched his head and casually picked up a fist-sized stone from the ground. He swung his arm and threw it fiercely into the air. Dart sneered and continued to control the golden rope with his right hand. In his left hand, he took out a golden round shield that was enough to cover his arm. He actually multitasked and continued to tame the Thunder Eagle while blocking the attacks below. Clang! Clang! Clang! All kinds of attacks landed on the golden round shield. However, they were all surprisingly blocked. After most of the damage was nullified by the golden round shield, the remaining damage that hit Dart’s body was almost negligible. “Damn, what kind of equipment is that? How can a Beast Tamer block so much damage?” Silver Fox cursed with an angry expression. Xiang Tianxiu scratched his head. “He’s not an ordinary Beast Tamer. I don’t know his profession, but I think he’s at least peerless golden. Otherwise, back then, when we fought, how could he have blocked my attack? For him to only have a slight disadvantage when fighting me, he’s definitely not too weak.” Silver Fox: “…Little comrade, if you have something to say about the other party, just say it directly. Why did you have to throw in a compliment for yourself?” Ye Yuqiu asked, “Have you fought him before? Do you know what effect that shield has?” Xiang Tianxiu spread his hands. “We’ve naturally fought before, but the last time we fought, he didn’t have that shield.” “It’s probably a good equipment that he obtained in Sunrise City or somewhere.” With that said, Xiang Tianxiu smiled confidently. “Don’t worry! Watch me attack! If I can beat him once before, I can naturally beat him again!” He immediately condensed his magic power at the tip of his staff and instantly created a huge chain. The chain was wrapped in lightning and crackled. The chain was more than eight meters long, as if it could bind giants. Seeing this, Dart, who was riding on the Thunder Eagle’s neck, also had a slightly solemn expression. In his opinion, the others were just nobodies. The only one he had to be wary of was Xiang Tianxiu. He had previously fought Xiang Tianxiu. Because he had lost a pet at that time, he was at a slight disadvantage. He was only able to retreat from the battlefield when the Eighth Realm Indian martial artists arrived. “Lightning Chains!” Xiang Tianxiu suddenly shouted and pointed his staff at the sky. The Lightning Chains immediately accelerated. It was as if a gigantic pair of invisible hands were holding the chain, wanting to capture Dart and the Thunder Eagle! Dart multitasked again and immediately injected magic power into the golden round shield. In the next moment, the golden round shield suddenly emitted a crazy golden light. In the blink of an eye, it formed a huge golden illusory shield more than three meters in diameter. This illusory shield enveloped Dart’s entire body and was completely seamless. Xiang Tianxiu’s Lightning Chains instantly arrived. Crackle! Lightning and golden light collided. They intertwined and were destroyed. The blinding light dissipated. Looking into the distance, he saw that Dart was still sitting steadily on the head of the Thunder Eagle and had not moved a single inch. On the other hand, the Thunder Eagle’s abdomen was attacked by the Lightning Chains. Blood splattered and it wailed repeatedly. “Hiss…” Dart endured the pain and only gasped. The illusory shield absorbed about half of the power of the Lightning Chains. However, the remaining half of the power still landed on Dart. His body stiffened for a few seconds, and his entire left arm was charred. However, he had successfully blocked the Lightning Chains! It had to be known that the last time they fought, he had been restrained by Xiang Tianxiu’s Lightning Chains after just two rounds. It was too embarrassing. “Hahaha! Xiang Tianxiu, it’s been almost two years since we last met. You haven’t improved much!” Dart said in fluent Chinese with a mocking expression. He still remembered the last battle with Xiang Tianxiu. Now, with one hand holding the golden rope tightly and multitasking, he had actually blocked the other party’s powerful attack. In his opinion, he had already won! Xiang Tianxiu was furious. “It’s not like you won against me. Why are you so happy?” “It’s enough that I can block your attack.” Dart sneered. “I also have to thank you for helping me injure the Thunder Eagle. Now, I can tame it immediately. At that time, you will all become food for this Thunder Eagle!” Xiang Tianxiu was even more furious. He did not expect his unintentional actions to help Dart. Bai Xinghe could not help but ask, “How is it possible for him to ride the Thunder Eagle… We’ve all experienced the terror of experienced mystic realm kings.” Ye Yuqiu thought for a moment and replied, “Perhaps it’s because of a skill suppression. He probably has a skill that specially restrains demon beasts.” As this voice fell into Lin Xuan’s ears, he nodded slightly. They were right. The reason why Dart could ride on the Thunder Eagle’s head was because of Dart’s “King of Beasts” skill. —- Name: King of Beasts Level: Level One Seventh Realm Grade: Legendary Dark Gold Effect 1: Suppress any wild beast or demon beast (including mystic realm kings and experienced mystic realm kings). When fighting you, their attributes will decrease by 30%. Effect 2: When taming any beast or demon beast (including mystic realm kings and experienced mystic realm kings), the speed of taming will increase by 20%, and the intimacy will increase by 30%. —- With this skill, Dart could be so bold as to climb onto the neck of an experienced mystic realm king and try to tame it. “Xiang Tianxiu, if I remember correctly, the cooldown time of your Lightning Chains is still 2 minutes and 18 seconds. Other than the Lightning Chains, you don’t have any other skills that can attack me. However, I only need another 2 minutes to tame this Thunder Eagle!” Dart laughed arrogantly. After his last defeat, he had learned about Xiang Tianxiu’s information in detail and even remembered the cooldown time of the other party’s signature skill. “After killing you all, I’ll immediately return through that fluctuation door. The Construction Division will definitely be furious, but they won’t be able to do anything to me!” When Lin Xuan heard this, he was deep in thought. How did Dart know about the duration of the fluctuation door? Could it be that India had obtained another extremely rare item? Lin Xuan could not figure it out, but he knew that if he delayed any longer, Dart would really tame that Thunder Eagle. “Even though Xiang Tianxiu won’t be able to do anything, there’s still Flame Explosion.” Lin Xuan controlled his Flame Explosion avatar to stand out and quickly powered up his Flame Explosion. A huge fireball slowly rose. The terrifying heat made the surrounding members hurriedly move aside. Dart was stunned for a moment before laughing loudly. “Where did this fire mage come from? He’s so weak. The range of fire spells is generally pretty limited. Do you really think…” Before he could finish speaking, the diameter of the fireball exceeded nine meters in the blink of an eye. Dart’s expression changed instantly. Dart had never seen such a huge fireball. In his opinion, a Seventh Realm mage who could condense a fireball with a diameter of six meters was already considered powerful. He did not expect this guy he had never seen before to be able to instantly condense a fireball with a diameter of nine meters! Even though he was in midair and staring at the rapidly expanding fireball, Dart still felt a deep pressure. “Who are you? Why haven’t I seen your information before?!” Dart was shocked and furious. Flame Explosion sneered and ignored this person’s angry words. He directly threw out the Flame Explosion. Seeing the fireball approach and feeling the high temperature in the air, Dart instinctively felt a trace of fear. He did not know if he could block this attack. Normally, he would definitely try his best to dodge such an attack. However, there was less than a minute left before the Thunder Eagle under his crotch would be completely tamed. He was so close to taming it! One had to know that this was an experienced mystic realm king! If he tamed it, he would definitely be able to obtain more resources and be taken seriously when he returned to India! He might even be able to surpass those geniuses who had suppressed him! He did not want to give up! After thinking for a moment, he decided to take a gamble and use all his strength to block this Flame Explosion. He once again injected his remaining magic power into the Beast King Golden Shield. The golden patterns on the surface of the Beast King Golden Shield quickly expanded. In the blink of an eye, it emitted a large amount of golden light again and gathered into a huge and illusory golden shield that enveloped Dart’s entire body. This time, he even enveloped the Thunder Eagle. This was because if this huge fireball with a diameter of nine meters landed on the Thunder Eagle, it would probably cause considerable damage. If the Thunder Eagle was seriously injured, even if he successfully tamed it, he would not be able to kill these members of the Construction Division. Therefore, he had to protect both himself and the Thunder Eagle! Boom! The next moment, the fireball collided with the huge golden shield. In everyone’s vision, Dart and the Thunder Eagle were swallowed by the overwhelming flames. Chu Pengcheng, Bai Xinghe, and the others almost jumped up in joy. Silver Fox muttered, “Are we about to win?” Ye Yuqiu clenched her fists tightly and did not blink. “Can we win?” Xiang Tianxiu shook his head. “It’s very powerful, but most of it was blocked.” As soon as he finished speaking, the flames dissipated and the golden light shattered. The shiny Beast King Golden Shield was already mottled and charred. The durability of his equipment had almost dropped to a critical point. If he continued to use this equipment to resist, it would directly shatter on the spot! A large number of feathers on the Thunder Eagle’s body were charred, revealing the flesh beneath. It let out a painful cry. It had been restrained by Dart the entire time and had been injured by Xiang Tianxiu’s Lightning Chains just now. It could not dodge this Flame Explosion that had been powered up for a long time and could only watch the attack land on its body. Its condition was already quite bad, and its health points had decreased by at least 50%. Dart was not doing well either. The arm that was holding the Beast King Golden Shield was burned by the high temperature and turned red. The skin on the side near the shield was completely charred. This was even after he had used a bottle of Life Potion after being hit by Flame Explosion. The smell of roasted meat entered his nostrils. The mountain wind blew past his burning skin, adding to the bone-piercing pain and crazily stimulating his nerves. However, even so, he still sat firmly on the Thunder Eagle’s neck. His other hand was still holding the Beast Taming Golden Rope tightly without moving an inch! “Hahaha! The cooldown time of Flame Explosion is even longer than the Lightning Chains. Moreover, every time you use it, it consumes a lot of magic power. You won’t be able to use a second Flame Explosion! You guys won’t be able to do anything to me! In the end, I won!” Dart gasped in pain and laughed wantonly. On the ground, the members of the Construction Division were silent. No way. Xiang Tianxiu could not injure Dart, and neither could Flame Explosion. Apart from the two of them, the others no longer had any stronger long-range attacks. Close-combat professions had higher health points and survival ability. During missions, even without companions, they could still successfully complete the mission. Long-range professions, especially mage professions, would easily be attacked by the enemy if there was no one protecting them. Therefore, unlike in video games, the ratio of martial artists who chose close combat and long-range combat was not one to one. Instead, it was seven to three or even eight to two, with the majority of martial artists choosing close-combat professions. However, to be safe, almost all close-combat professionals would learn one or two long-range skills to avoid an awkward situation. Ye Yuqiu clenched her fists. Could it be that she could only let Dart tame the Thunder Eagle? “Who said you won?” In the silent atmosphere, Flame Explosion suddenly spoke again. When everyone looked over, they were shocked to discover that Flame Explosion was already accumulating a second Flame Explosion! In the blink of an eye, the fireball expanded to nine meters. Terrifying heat surged. This time, the martial artists did not subconsciously retreat. Instead, they revealed surprised expressions. “His Flame Explosion seems to have a short cooldown?!” Silver Fox said in surprise. Ye Yuqiu was happy and gratified. “As expected of Flame Explosion!” Xiang Tianxiu exclaimed, “Could it be that your Flame Explosion has increased to the peerless golden grade?” Dart, who was sitting on the Thunder Eagle’s neck, immediately stopped laughing. Dart was furious. “The cooldown time for Flame Explosion is very long, and it also consumes a lot of magic power! You, you, you! What’s the situation with your Flame Explosion?” Flame Explosion sneered. “I won’t tell you. Go to hell and think about it slowly!” The Flame Explosion left Flame Explosion’s hand and flew at high speed again. Lin Xuan could accurately see Dart’s current health and magic power. He discovered that the Beast Taming Golden Rope was continuously consuming Dart’s magic power. When they first met, Dart’s magic power had always been below 60%. The Mind Control skill Dart used to tame the Thunder Eagle also cost him a bit of magic power. Moreover, just now, he had no choice but to spend even more of his magic power to activate the Beast King Golden Shield to resist Xiang Tianxiu’s Lightning Chains. It was the same when he resisted the Flame Explosion. After this operation, Lin Xuan saw that Dart’s magic power had already decreased to only 10% and was about to dry up. However, Dart did not replenish it with magic potions. He concluded that Dart was out of medicine. This Flame Explosion was about to become a fatal move! Dart gritted his teeth and roared angrily, “Damn it! Damn it!” The Thunder Eagle was almost tamed. However, even after taming it, he would not have the time to command the Thunder Eagle to fly away. He would immediately be hit by the Flame Explosion. Neither he nor the Thunder Eagle were in a good state. He also had very little magic power left now. If he was hit like this, his health would greatly decrease and he would definitely be severely injured. He was very likely to be captured alive by these members of the Construction Division! This was absolutely intolerable to the proud Dart. After a short struggle in his heart, Dart had no choice but to let go of the Beast Tamer Golden Rope and channel the remaining magic power in his body into the Beast King Golden Shield. At the same time, he tightened his grip on the last bottle of life potion in the storage compartment! Boom! As expected, Flame Explosion enveloped Dart and the Thunder Eagle again. A crisp cracking sound sounded from the flames! Crack! The peerless golden grade equipment, the Beast King Golden Shield, shattered! Without the Beast King Golden Shield, the remaining power of the Flame Explosion immediately bombarded Dart’s entire body crazily. The terrifying heat made him howl in pain. The Thunder Eagle under him was burned by the flames and instinctively screamed. As Dart had already retracted the Beast Tamer Golden Rope, it was no longer restrained. It immediately flapped its wings and flew high, shaking off the human on its back. Thanks to this, Dart escaped the killing range of Flame Explosion and successfully fell into the forest. This was exactly what he had expected. However, the price was that he had to give up on the Thunder Eagle that he had almost tamed. “Chase after him!” Ye Yuqiu and the others’ gazes turned cold as they immediately used various skills to chase after him. In the sky, they couldn’t do anything to Dart. Now that he had landed, there were ten thousand ways for them to beat him up! Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion immediately rushed over. However, when they could already see Dart’s back from afar, they saw that Dart had used something to open a door of light in front of him. The door of light expanded and contracted indeterminately. It was sometimes elongated and sometimes flat. Dart dragged his broken body through the door of light. He glared fiercely at Flame Explosion in the crowd. “I’ll remember you! I didn’t expect the Construction Division to have another martial artist with extremely powerful potential.” With that said, he fell into the fluctuation door. Xiang Tianxiu was extremely angry and quickly threw in his Lightning Chains. Dart cried out in pain from the door of light. Xiang Tianxiu wanted to throw in a few more spells. However, the fluctuation door suddenly closed on its own after lasting for less than eight seconds. None of the people present were stupid. He quickly realized that India must have grasped some method to open the door of light! This matter was very serious and important. They had to report this to the headquarters as soon as possible. If Indian martial artists could enter the Falling Thunder Mountain, it meant that they could also enter the Little Spirit Mountain and the Kunlun Ruins. These mystic realms were all the private property of the Construction Division and produced very important treasures. Other organizations could not be allowed to encroach on them. Silver Fox walked over and patted Flame Explosion’s shoulder as he praised, “Flame Explosion, it’s all thanks to you this time. I almost despaired.” The others also came back to their senses and gave Flame Explosion a thumbs up. “Two Flame Explosion directly shattered that shield. Moreover, for that equipment to be so powerful, its grade is probably peerless golden grade. You’ve basically greatly weakened Dart’s future development!” Chu Pengcheng praised. “Flame Explosion, our Dragon Sea City Construction Division is proud of you!” Bai Xinghe said happily. Ye Yuqiu wrinkled her nose. “Hey, hey, hey, why does your Dragon Sea City Construction Division always want to secretly rope in Flame Explosion? He’s even from our White Crane Town Construction Division!” Silver Fox teased, “Old Bai, I didn’t take you for one who played tricks.” Bai Xinghe smiled and was not embarrassed. Only a fool would not take the opportunity to rope in such a powerful person. Xiang Tianxiu said with deep meaning in her eyes, “Flame Explosion, I’m even more interested in you. If you have such strength, why did you go to the surroundings of the Falling Thunder Mountain to place protective runes previously? You should have gone to the main peak with me. We could have competed to see who was able to kill more demon beasts!” Everyone held their foreheads. This guy was at it again. This unyielding competitive spirit. Lin Xuan coughed lightly. “I think the most important thing now is to report this matter to the headquarters. Who will return to Dragon Sea City?” They were currently 500 meters above the main peak. It would take them at least three hours to return to the door of light of the mystic realm. The job of returning to report also required one to be strong enough. After some screening, Black recommended himself. Assassins were fast and powerful. It was perfect for him to return and deliver the information. After watching Black leave, everyone continued to climb the main peak. Previously, they did not dare to easily step into the territory of the experienced mystic realm kings because the experienced mystic realm kings were very ferocious. Their attributes were 130% that of ordinary level nine Seventh Realm demon beasts. But now, the Thunder Eagle was severely injured. They could take this opportunity to kill it! Soon, everyone arrived at the top of the mountain. This place was extremely high and it made the rest of the mountains seem small. As far as the eye could see, it was as if the entire Falling Thunder Mountain was covered in hundreds of hills. Dark clouds stacked in the sky, and light spots constantly appeared. Then, lightning as thick as a bucket struck the ground. However, the group was only able to find an empty huge nest at the top of the mountain. A large number of smelly corpses and remains were scattered around the huge nest. Clearly, they were the food scraps of the Thunder Eagle. There were also many scattered feathers in the huge nest, and many of them could be taken back as specimens. However, the heavily injured Thunder Eagle was nowhere to be found! Everyone was stunned. Where could it possibly run to after being severely injured? At this moment, a thick purple lightning suddenly struck the northwest region of the Falling Thunder Mountain. At the same time, the cries of birds sounded along with the wailing of a beast. Soon after, the noises immediately weakened, as if something was dying. Everyone was stunned. Xiang Tianxiu suddenly seemed to have thought of something and said in surprise, “That Thunder Eagle is hunting other mystic realm kings. It wants to recover from its injuries!” Everyone was shocked and immediately ran down the mountain in a panic. When Lin Xuan used the High-Level Observer skill just now, he had also taken a look at the Thunder Eagle’s attributes. However, the battle had been intense at that time, so he had not looked carefully at the detailed description of the Thunder Eagle’s skills. Now that he heard Xiang Tianxiu’s nervous words, he immediately reacted. Among the Thunder Eagle’s skills, there was a skill called “Gluttony”. The effect was very simple and crude. It could allow the Thunder Eage to recover its health points by eating. As for how much health points it could recover, it was related to the level and grade of the food. Compared to eating ordinary demon beasts, eating mystic realm kings would naturally allow one to recover more health points. With the Thunder Eagle’s title as an experienced mystic realm king, it should not be difficult for it to kill a mystic realm king. The tragic cry that suddenly stopped just now should be from a dead mystic realm king! Even though the Thunder Eagle was severely injured, the thick purple lightning could still unleash its rightful combat strength! Moreover, there was a top-down hierarchy system formed between experienced mystic realm kings, mystic realm kings, and ordinary demon beasts. The relationship between the three was like that of a leader, a high-level subordinate, and a lackey. Every level had an extremely powerful suppression against the lower levels. “We can’t let the Thunder Eagle recover. Otherwise, it will definitely come back and attack us,” Ye Yuqiu said solemnly. The others nodded in agreement. Not to mention anything else, Xiang Tianxiu’s Lightning Chains and Flame Explosion’s Flame Explosion had already caused huge injuries to the Thunder Eagle. If the Thunder Eagle recovered, it would definitely return to attack Xiang Tianxiu and Flame Explosion immediately. Everyone hurriedly ran down the mountain. However, how could their legs compare to the Thunder Eagle’s wingspan of more than ten meters? Before they arrived at the foot of the mountain, the Thunder Eagle had already eaten up the mystic realm king and soared in the air to find a new target. Lin Xuan immediately saw through the perspective of his training avatar that the Thunder Eagle had already aimed at the Lightning Leopard avatar with its sharp eagle eyes. Lin Xuan currently had three training avatars that were all mystic realm kings. Among them were a male and a female wolf king. The third was this Lightning Leopard. Seeing that the Lightning Leopard had been targeted by the Thunder Eagle, Lin Xuan immediately could not sit still. He immediately controlled the two wolf kings to rush over. At the same time, he also got his other five training avatars to rush over. Although these were only ordinary level nine Seventh Realm demon beasts, they could still unleash a lot of combat strength. Most importantly, these demon beasts were his training avatars and completely belonged to him. They would not be suppressed by the aura of experienced mystic realm kings. Lin Xuan casually grabbed a demon beast and immediately communicated with it. “What are you doing?” Silver Fox was puzzled. “I’m sending them to report to the mystic realm kings so that I can get them to be wary of the Thunder Eagle. I also want to get them to try their best to restrain the Thunder Eagle and buy us time!” Lin Xuan said solemnly. Lin Xuan was only putting on a show for the members of the Construction Division. He did not need to communicate with his mystic realm kings at all. He could directly multitask and control them. At this moment, a shadow that covered the sky flew above everyone. “Everyone, the Thunder Eagle is flying in that direction!” Silver Fox exclaimed. Everyone was shocked. It had eaten its prey so quickly. “Quick, quick, chase after it!” Ye Yuqiu shouted anxiously. Everyone immediately changed directions and chased after the eagle on the ground. On the other side, in the dense forest more than ten kilometers away. Under Lin Xuan’s command, the Lightning Leopard moved through the forest. The thick purple lightning was simply like a huge javelin thrown from the sky, constantly crashing and exploding around the Lightning Leopard. Countless trees were instantly detonated by the lightning. The shattered tree trunks flew everywhere, and many fragments hit the Lightning Leopard’s body. Although one or two of them could not cause any fatal injuries, if too many of these fragments hit the Lightning Leopard, it would also cause the Lightning Leopard’s health points to slowly decrease and its speed to decrease. The Thunder Eagle in the sky chased after the Lightning Leopard with sharp eagle eyes. It had already successfully completed such a hunt once, so it had become very patient. The Lightning Leopard continued to escape. Sometimes to the left, sometimes to the right. Sometimes, it stopped abruptly, and sometimes, it accelerated. The Thunder Eagle could not figure out its movements. Every time, the Lightning Leopard could barely avoid the core bombardment area of the purple lightning as it tried its best to reduce its injuries. Of course, because the tree debris that hit the Lightning Leopard was increasing, its speed had already decreased greatly. It was impossible for it to perfectly dodge every time. The Thunder Eagle finally seized the opportunity and accurately struck the Lightning Leopard. The Lightning Leopard had no choice but to stop quickly, and its speed decreased. Boom! The lightning still affected the Lightning Leopard’s front foot. Under the pain, the Lightning Leopard lost its balance and its huge body directly flew out, shattering a large number of trees. Looking down from above, it was as if the Lightning Leopard had plowed out a large forest. The Thunder Eagle’s eyes flashed with bloodlust as it flapped its wings and quickly approached. Its sharp eagle eyes had already observed the surroundings and made sure that there was no danger. Therefore, now was the best time to kill the other party in one hit! Each of its eagle claws was comparable to a sharp short knife. With just one strike, it could easily pierce through one’s spine and throat. As long as it hit its target, this Lightning Leopard would become its delicious meal! However, just as it swooped down and lowered its height, and its sharp eagle claws were about to grab the Lightning Leopard, two huge wolves suddenly pounced out from both sides! They had long been hiding quietly in the forest for a long time. Their bodies did not sway at all as they waited for the Thunder Eagle to dive! The Thunder Eagle roared in anger and tried its best to increase its height. However, its wings were still bitten fiercely by the two huge wolves! Birds relied on their wings the most. Without its wings, a bird would not have the advantage of flight and its ability to escape. This was also the attack method Lin Xuan had long thought of. He had instructed the wolves to bite its wings instead of other places! Since this bird liked to act as a bomber, he would directly turn this bird into a flightless bird. The Thunder Eagle let out a long cry in pain and spat out purple lightning everywhere. Even without Lin Xuan’s control, the two wolves were still able to quickly dodge the purple lightning. This was a combat instinct that had long been immersed in their hearts! If Lin Xuan controlled it, it might have even backfired and caused the two wolves to be hit by the purple lightning. This lightning was different from the lightning in the Falling Thunder Mountain. After being hit by the lightning of the Falling Thunder Mountain, the demon beasts would only feel comfortable and could even level up. However, the purple lightning seemed to have an opposite effect. After taking a direct hit, one would definitely be severely injured! The Thunder Eagle was not so kind. It would not spit out lightning for the sake of helping the other demon beasts level up. Roar! Roar! Roar! The tearing of the two wolf kings caused the Thunder Eagle to be unable to take off and could only be reduced to a flightless bird Lin Xuan’s other training avatars immediately rushed out of the forest and attacked like mad dogs. Feathers flew and flesh splattered! In the large group of demon beasts, the Thunder Eagle’s long cry could be heard. When everyone arrived, they were all dumbfounded. Silver Fox swallowed. “Are they fighting amongst themselves? Looks like we won’t need to do anything.” Ye Yuqiu was first shocked, then she could not help but praise, “Shield Ghost, your Beast Speaker skill is really superb. You actually thought of using a mystic realm king to deal with an experienced mystic realm king!” “Strange, aren’t mystic realm kings supposed to be suppressed by experienced mystic realm kings?” Xiang Tianxiu asked curiously. “Why is it that this mystic realm king dares to attack an experienced mystic realm king?” Chu Pengcheng scratched his head. “Is the Beast Speaker skill that powerful? It can actually make three mystic realm kings attack the Thunder Eagle…” Lin Xuan smiled. “The higher the grade, the better.” Everyone stood a safe distance away and looked around, not daring to approach. They did not know if the Beast Speaker could last forever. After all, the other party was a level nine Seventh Realm mystic realm king and a large number of ordinary level nine Seventh Realm demon beasts following it. Not long after. The Thunder Eagle’s cries became softer and softer. Finally, they completely disappeared. Essence, skill books, equipment, runes, Mystic Realm Pearls, and so on were dropped. Most importantly, these things were all emitting golden light! Everyone’s faces revealed envy. Even Xiang Tianxiu was the same. He might not need anything else. However, everyone needed the Mystic Realm Pearl urgently! They had a lot of skills that were waiting to be upgraded. However, the drop rate of the Mystic Realm Pearl was very low. Even the Ninth Realm big shots of the Construction Division were only able to increase the grade of some of the powerful skills. A Seventh Realm martial artist finally could not help but say, “Ahem… Shield Ghost is really powerful. I think we should discuss how to distribute the loot of this Thunder Eagle.” As soon as he spoke, Chu Pengcheng, Ye Yuqiu, Silver Fox, Bai Xinghe, and the others stared at him. The same martial artist couldn’t help but feel a chill run down his spine. “Did you contribute to the process of killing the Thunder Eagle?” Ye Yuqiu said indifferently. That person: “…No.” “If you didn’t, then why is it that you still dare to ask to have a share of the loot?” Ye Yuqiu sneered. “Among us, only Shield Ghost, Flame Explosion, and Xiang Tianxiu injured the Thunder Eagle.” “Among them, Xiang Tianxiu and Flame Explosion attacked the Thunder Eagle and severely injured it. Shield Ghost, on the other hand, used Beast Speaker to control these mystic realm kings to complete the kill.” Ye Yuqiu slowly said, “If you insist on saying that you contributed, then even I would feel second-hand embarrassment for you.” Those members who were somewhat restless were extremely ashamed and flushed. In the face of huge benefits, they could not help but be tempted. Xiang Tianxiu said, “I don’t want the loot this time.” “I was originally attacking Dart, but I implicated the Thunder Eagle and almost made Dart tame the Thunder Eagle faster. It would have been my fault if Dart successfully tamed it. Thus, I don’t deserve to participate in the distribution of the spoils.” Xiang Tianxiu turned around. “Flame Explosion, Shield Ghost, the spoils are yours.” Lin Xuan was slightly surprised. Although this Xiang Tianxiu was very arrogant, careless, and rash… He still displayed high self-awareness when it came to such matters. Indeed, the people chosen by the Ninth Realm big shots of the Construction Division might have some small flaws, but they were still, in general, quite alright. After that, under everyone’s gaze, Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion walked forward and said loudly, “In that case, we’ll accept it.” Lin Xuan did not have the time to look carefully before putting everything into his bag. “Hey, I know that you’re on good terms with Flame Explosion, but you can’t keep them all in your storage space, right?” Xiang Tianxiu was a little dissatisfied. “Flame Explosion, don’t you think so?” He valued Flame Explosion more and hoped that Flame Explosion would get something good. Flame Explosion was puzzled. “What’s wrong with leaving it with him?” Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. This Xiang Tianxiu was quite considerate of Flame Explosion. He laughed loudly and said, “Don’t worry, we’re very close. I’ll help him keep it first.” Xiang Tianxiu gritted his teeth. After hearing this, he felt as if he had unnecessarily intervened. Chu Pengcheng looked around and said with a smile, “Alright, everyone, there’s only one last thing to do. After drawing the map of the main peak of the Falling Thunder Mountain, we can return to Dragon Sea City.” Everyone smiled and nodded. Since the experienced mystic realm kings were dead, the danger was also resolved. Originally, they did not even expect to be able to finish drawing the map of the main peak. Now, they could even complete the mission. The process of drawing the map went by smoothly. That night, everyone strode out of the mystic realm and returned to Dragon Sea City. In order to celebrate the victory of this exploration, Chu Pengcheng instructed the canteen staff to prepare some good dishes according to everyone’s appetite. The alcohol was naturally still rice wine, yellow wine, and so on. They were all not very strong. Black, on the other hand, drank as much hard liquor as he wanted. Lin Xuan was still the same as before. He made sure that all his identities were acting according to their characters. Shield Ghost continued to eat what Shield Ghost liked to eat. Flame Explosion also ate Flame Explosion’s favorite dishes: burgers, fried chicken, fries, and so on. During the meal, Lin Xuan took the opportunity to check the items dropped by the Thunder Eagle. The Thunder Eagle actually did not drop many items. There was a peerless golden skill book, a peerless golden equipment, a precious purple rune, and 88 Mystic Realm Pearls. Lin Xuan did not even look at the precious purple runes and directly threw them into the smelting table, letting the smelting table disassemble them into rune fragments. Purple items were all trash. At the very least, an item needed to be peerless golden in order to be worthy of his attention. The peerless golden skill book that was dropped was “Lightning Demon King”. Its effect was almost the same as the skills Demon King of Fury and the Venomous Demon King. After obtaining this skill, Lin Xuan suddenly discovered that a synthesis formula had appeared on the synthesis table. Lord of the Elements (Legendary Dark Gold) = Demon King of Fury+Venomous Demon King+Lightning Demon King+Frost Demon King Seeing the words “Lord of the Elements” flowing with a dark golden light, Lin Xuan was immediately surprised. “!” “The synthesis table is awesome. It can actually synthesize a legendary dark gold skill? I’ve never even heard of this Lord of Elements.” Lin Xuan clicked his tongue in wonder. “If the four elemental types are combined into one, it will definitely be stronger. If there’s a chance, I have to synthesize it and give it a try.” He casually learned this Lightning Demon King and looked at the peerless golden equipment. Lin Xuan did not have many peerless golden grade equipment on him. The Dragon Hunter Shield and the Earth Dragon King Hammer Shield were both precious purple grade. Because the effects were very good, he had used them until now. Only the Blazing Fire Codex, the Assassin Ring, and the Javier Ring were of peerless golden grade. The remaining peerless golden grade items were the few sets… Overlord Set, Giant Shield Set, Vicious Poison Set, and so on. The Demon Flame Set was a little inferior, only of a precious purple grade. After scanning over another equipment, Lin Xuan was surprised by the effect. —- Name: Giant Thunder Spear Level: Level Nine Seventh Realm Grade: Peerless Golden Equipment Requirements: Constitution 300, Strength 240, Spirit 240 Effect 1: A huge illusory thunder spear will automatically be formed every hour. At most, five illusory thunder spears can be stored. Effect 2: Consumes 5% of one’s energy to attack in close combat. After attacking, one will release lightning with a diameter of half a meter, causing 80% physical damage and 80% lightning damage. This lightning has a 3-second cooldown. Effect 3: Consumes 20% of one’s magic power for every illusory thunder spear that is thrown. After throwing, an explosion with a diameter of three meters will be released, causing 100% physical damage and 100% lightning damage. Throwing will consume 1 illusory thunder spear. After all 5 illusory thunder spears have been thrown, one will not be able to throw any more. Effect 4: If the illusory thunder spear successfully kills the target, it will be immediately replenished by another illusory thunder spear. —- After seeing the effect, Lin Xuan silently gave a thumbs up. Just this equipment requirement alone was not something an ordinary person was capable of. Constitution: 300, Strength: 240, Spirit: 240. Which Seventh Realm martial artist could simultaneously develop both Strength and Spirit after reaching 300 Constitution? How was one supposed to get so many attribute points?! Lin Xuan estimated that he would probably have to reach level four or five Eighth Realm before he could meet the attributes requirements for the Giant Thunder Spear. However, since he was already at the Eighth Realm, why not look for an Eighth Realm equipment? Moreover, this weapon also dealt physical and lightning damage at the same time. If one did not have much lightning damage, the effects would not help much. However, Lin Xuan’s lightning damage was high! Aside from his high Spirit, he also had the lightning damage enhancement he obtained from eating attribute items as well as the damage enhancement from learning the Lightning Demon King… Moreover, he could find a set of precious purple grade equipment that increased lightning damage in his consciousness space. Although a precious purple grade was not remarkable, it was enough as long as it could accumulate lightning damage. Lin Xuan also felt very ecstatic for the fourth effect of this Giant Thunder Spear. After killing the target, he could directly recover an illusory thunder spear! If Lin Xuan could instantly kill the enemy, it also meant that he had an endless supply of illusory thunder spears. At that time, he would be able to shoot out illusory thunder spears continuously, as if he was shooting out missiles. No matter who or what the other party was, they would all be razed to the ground. “This spear is too awesome!” Lin Xuan praised in his heart and reluctantly looked at the final spoils of war. In other words, the 88 Mystic Realm Pearls. During this period of exploration in the Falling Thunder Mountain, his training avatar had been working the entire time. Although the drop rate of the Mystic Realm Pearl was not high, he had still obtained more than 30. With these 88, he could upgrade another peerless golden skill to a legendary dark gold skill. “Currently, the High-Level Avatar Technique is very useful. There’s no need to increase it. I’ll increase the level of the High-Level Disguise Technique.” Lin Xuan spent the 100 Mystic Realm Pearls on his High-Level Disguise Technique. A light flowed. The High-Level Disguise Technique immediately changed from the previous golden to dark gold. —- Name: High-Level Disguise Technique Level: Level One Seventh Realm Grade: Legendary Dark Gold Effect 1: Does not consume magic power. After activation, it can be used to disguise skills, equipment, and rune groups. Effect 2: Consumes 10% of your magic power to adjust your appearance. Effect 3: Consumes 30% of your magic power to integrate you into the environment. Presence -80%. —- Lin Xuan nodded in satisfaction. After advancing to the legendary dark gold grade, the effect of the High-Level Disguise Technique had increased and become stronger. In particular, this change in appearance was definitely very important to Lin Xuan. He could finally change the appearance of Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion. In the future, he would be able to show his face when he interacted with people. However, presently, the other members did not mind the fact that they were hiding their faces. In their eyes, Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion had contributed a lot to the Construction Division. They were definitely good members of the Construction Division. They only thought that Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion had some special hobbies and did not like to show their faces. However, if this continued, it would not be good. Lin Xuan chuckled. “I’ll go back and carefully sculpt some beautiful faces tonight.” “Come, come, come. Let’s all toast Shield Ghost. If not for him using the Beast Speaker to communicate with those mystic realm kings, our mission wouldn’t have gone so smoothly.” After three rounds of wine, Chu Pengcheng stood up and raised his glass to Shield Ghost. “Ha ha ha!” The others immediately shouted. Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. He did not reject the enthusiasm of the members. He immediately picked up his wine glass and took a sip of rice wine. In his previous life, he had never drunk rice wine and had only drunk beer and some white wine. Thus, he only tasted it slightly. This wine was sweet at the beginning and became spicier the more he drank. Chu Pengcheng pretended to be angry. “What is this supposed to mean? Are you trying to disrespect me?” Silver Fox, Wang Dafu, and the others also cheered. “It’s only rice wine. Drink more!” Lin Xuan smiled. A person’s ability to drink was related to their constitution. The higher one’s Constitution was, the more they could resist alcohol. “Director Chu, you’re competing with the wrong person.” Lin Xuan smiled and raised his glass to drink. With his high Constitution, Lin Xuan’s organs also had extremely high working efficiency. The alcohol could be digested very quickly. Then, Lin Xuan drank a second, a third, and a fourth glass… Chu Pengcheng had never focused on Constitution. In addition, he had drunk a lot with the others just now. When he toasted Lin Xuan, his face was already slightly red. Before Lin Xuan could say anything, Chu Pengcheng had already collapsed on the table, snoring like thunder. Lin Xuan was stunned. Everyone laughed. “He can even get drunk on rice wine. What’s wrong with Director Chu?” A foreign Seventh Realm martial artist could not help but laugh. “Mother Chu is like this. It’s fine as long as you get used to it.” Wang Dafu laughed until tears flowed. Lin Xuan also smiled and put down his wine glass. Looking at everyone at the long table, he took in the lively atmosphere. It was as if he was slowly integrating into this world and the Construction Division. The night gradually darkened. Everyone returned to their houses. Chu Pengcheng was helped back to his bed by Wang Dafu and Silver Fox. At the same time. The headquarters of the Construction Division… In the First Chief’s office. The news sent by Black was already placed in front of this white-haired Ninth Realm martial artist with few wrinkles on her face. Ye Lijiang was the First Chief of the Construction Division. “Sunrise City is the only large mystic realm controlled by India. Could it be that Sunrise City has mutated and started producing such a special item?” Ye Lijiang frowned deeply. After so many years, not only had India not weakened, but it had even become stronger. As the First Chief of the permanent headquarters, she had recently been planning to fight a blitzkrieg battle with India. She wanted to be fast and win big. She wanted to make India lose the chance to extend their claws everywhere for at least 20 to 30 years. At this moment, her communicator rang. She glanced at it and saw that the name displayed was “Lu Pingjiang”. “Sister Ye, the informant we planted in India suddenly reported that India is sending more troops towards the Kunlun Ruins.” Lu Pingjiang’s solemn voice sounded from the communicator. Hearing this news, Ye Lijiang’s expression was calm. The Kunlun Ruins and the Little Spirit Mountain were both located in the northwest of Xia Country. Their locations were relatively far from the territory controlled by the Construction Division and were more prone to being affected by India. Therefore, these two mystic realms had always been guarded by Ninth Realm martial artists. Lu Pingjiang and Lu Pinghai were both Ninth Realm martial artists and were respectively the guardians of the Kunlun Ruins and the Little Spirit Mountain. “Have you seen through the motives of India?” Ye Lijiang said calmly. Lu Pingjiang scratched his head. “Don’t they just want to attack the Kunlun Ruins? What is there to see through?” Ye Lijiang interrupted him. “I’ll give you another ten seconds to think. Answer seriously.” A long ten seconds passed. Ye Lijiang asked, “What’s the motive of India?” Lu Pingjiang said seriously, “I can’t tell.” Ye Lijiang: “… If you can’t tell, why did you sound so serious then?” Lu Pingjiang smiled awkwardly. “Um, didn’t you ask me to answer seriously?” Ye Lijiang shook his head. “Use your brain more. We’ve fought India so many times, can’t you tell their true intentions?” Ye Lijiang continued, “They’re trying to create a diversion by increasing the number of troops near the Kunlun Ruins. Their real goal is to attack Little Spirit Mountain. With that special item, do they still need to attack the Kunlun Ruins?” Only then did Lu Pingjiang suddenly slap his thigh. “I see. As expected of Sister Ye!” Ye Lijiang snorted. “You’re just too lazy to think.” Lu Pingjiang chuckled. Ye Lijiang said, “I’ll mobilize a small number of Seventh and Eighth Realm martial artists in batches and pretend to let them go to the Kunlun Ruins to provide support. In fact, I’ll secretly mobilize them to the Little Spirit Mountain. Do well to keep this as a secret. I don’t have to teach you the specifics, right?” Lu Pingjiang nodded repeatedly. “Alright, Sister Ye!” After hanging up, Ye Lijiang’s eyes flashed coldly. India could not wait to devour the large mystic realm of the Construction Division. Then, they would beat them at their own game and severely injure them! In this battle, she needed to defeat all the middle and high-level martial artists in India! … Dragon Sea City. After the complete exploration of the Falling Thunder Mountain, the Construction Division in Dragon Sea City welcomed a long-awaited peace. The Seventh Realm martial artists who had been mobilized from various places had already returned to their respective cities. However, Ye Yuqiu and Black stayed in Dragon Sea City. It was said that the headquarters had sent a new director to White Crane Town. In this way, after Ye Yuqiu resigned from her position as the director of the Construction Division of White Crane Town, she could train in the Falling Thunder Mountain and strengthen herself. Lin Xuan was also very fulfilled every day. He read and ate, feeling very satisfied. He even specially took a day out to make two different but equally handsome faces for Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion. During this period of time, he had also accumulated enough essence to increase his level from level one to level two Seventh Realm. Due to the existence of the profession skill “Attribute Bestowment”, Lin Xuan did not need to think too much. He immediately invested all nine free attribute points into his Constitution. After investing in his Constitution, he could unleash 1.9 times the power with 9 free attribute points. Basically, his 9 attribute points were equivalent to 17 free attribute points. However, if he had invested in Strength, Spirit, or Agility, his 9 attribute points would still just be 9 attribute points. In his leisure time, Lin Xuan did not forget to collect the skill book “Frost Demon King”. Unfortunately, there was no mystic realm in Dragon Sea City that could drop this skill book. A few days later, a transfer order from the headquarters arrived at the Construction Division in Dragon Sea City. Chu Pengcheng gathered these Seventh Realm martial artists in Dragon Sea City and said solemnly, “India suddenly built a camp at the border and gathered a large number of Seventh Realm martial artists. It’s very likely that they plan to attack the Kunlun Ruins.” “The headquarters has ordered Seventh Realm martial artists to approach the Kunlun Ruins in batches to prevent a surprise attack from India.” Lin Xuan was very surprised. With that kind of item, shouldn’t India secretly launch a sneak attack? Why were they still thinking about fighting head-on? However, he did not think too much about it. Since the headquarters wanted to send troops over to support, so be it. In any case, he would be able to obtain battle merits if he went. Lin Xuan also wanted to see if there were any skill books or equipment he needed in the Kunlun Ruins. If there were, he could use his battle merits to exchange for them. “I’m going to stay in Dragon Sea City, I won’t be going with you guys.” Chu Pengcheng sighed. “What a pity. I actually really want to go and beat them up.” With that said, he waved his hand. “Go and prepare. You’ll set off tomorrow. You’re the first batch of people to head to the Kunlun Ruins.” Everyone nodded and left. There were actually not many people. Other than Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion, only Ye Yuqiu, Black, Bai Xinghe, and Silver Fox were familiar with each other. The next day, the six of them sat in two off-road vehicles heading to the Kunlun Ruins. Food, fresh water, fuel, and tents were all prepared. Dragon Sea City was located in the middle of Xia Country, but the Kunlun Ruins was located in the northwest of Xia Country and was very far away. In the past, it would take seven to eight hours for a high-speed rail to arrive. Now, there was only the off-road vehicle. Even after being modified, it would still take a week or two for them to arrive. Ye Yuqiu said solemnly, “We should formulate a detailed path forward. Otherwise, we might very well encounter a shortage of supplies.” Everyone nodded in agreement. Therefore, in the process of heading to the next city, Ye Yuqiu made a very detailed plan. She was detailed to the extent that she had decided which city to reach and how many kilograms of food, water, and fuel to replenish. The food was also precisely divided into protein, carbon water, and many other categories. She even considered everyone’s different appetites. For example, Flame Explosion liked fried food like fried chicken and potato chips. Black had to consume hard liquor every day. After arriving at the next city, they also planned to buy some vodka, Erguotou, and other hard liquor. Even the most picky person would not be able to find any mistakes when they saw this plan. Lin Xuan looked through the entire plan and sighed. Ye Yuqiu was indeed worthy of being a director. Her plan was too thorough. With this plan, they would definitely be able to arrive at the Kunlun Ruins safely and without any accidents. Then! Then, on the way to the next city after leaving Dragon Sea City, they were stopped by another off-road vehicle that was already waiting here. Sitting in the car was a muscular and tall old man. Li Weiguo! Silver Fox and Black’s teacher. Silver Fox was stunned. “Teacher, why are you here? Shouldn’t you be in Drowning City?” At this moment, Black also stopped and looked at the old man in surprise. Li Weiguo said indifferently, “I’m missing a leg. The headquarters ordered me to go back and recuperate. I want to grow my leg back as soon as possible and bring you guys along.” With that said, he opened the car door. Everyone was shocked to discover that his left leg was actually made of machinery. Silver Fox was shocked and jumped out of the car. He gritted his teeth and said, “Was this done by a Drowning City demon beast?” Li Weiguo blew his beard and glared. “The spy from the High Heaven Plains did this. He deliberately gave us fake information and caused me to be surrounded by demon beasts. That spy even escaped. I’m really furious.” “Another spy!” Silver Fox clenched his fists. “Alright, let’s not talk about such embarrassing matters. Follow me.” Li Weiguo closed the car door and gestured for them to follow behind. Ye Yuqiu nodded and drove after him. After driving for a while, Ye Yuqiu and Lin Xuan were stunned. This was not a normal path. Where were they going? “Teacher, what are we…?” Black could not help but ask. Li Weiguo waved his hand. “The order from the headquarters is just a cover. It’s for the spies who might be hiding in the Construction Division. Just follow me.” The six of them were puzzled, but they could only follow. Three off-road vehicles drove in the wilderness. The level of the demon beasts they encountered along the way was not very high. They were all killed by Silver Fox and Flame Explosion from afar. Because they were in the wilderness, the off-road vehicle could increase its speed without any worries and did not have to worry about killing any plants. Soon, the three off-road vehicles arrived at a place that did not exist on the Construction Division map. In the memories of many members of the Construction Division, this was a large wilderness. Only a small number of core members knew that this was an underground base secretly built by the Construction Division. Above this underground base was an abandoned village. From the sky, it looked deserted. However, only by entering the small village could one discover that there was another world underground. “Follow me.” Under Li Weiguo’s guidance, the three off-road vehicles stopped in a deliberately old pig farm. The roof tiles happened to completely cover the off-road vehicle, leaving no traces. “This is…?” Ye Yuqiu jumped out of the car with a shocked expression. “This village has no name. It’s just a transfer station.” Li Weiguo led the six of them into an abandoned house and quickly entered the underground. On both sides of the dark tunnel, lights gradually lit up. Finally, Li Weiguo led the six of them to a spacious basement 300 meters underground. In the basement hall was a door of light more than a meter tall. Near the hall were bedrooms, warehouses, bathrooms, and other rooms. Lin Xuan was surprised. According to common sense, a one-meter-tall door of light usually corresponded to a First Realm mystic realm. Why was there such a strange door of light in such a hidden place? “I’m in charge of this transfer station. It’s directly under the six chiefs.” “I’m guessing there are other transit stations, but I don’t know anything about them.” “Where’s the other side?” Bai Xinghe pointed at the door of light and asked seriously. Li Weiguo smiled. “Little Spirit Mountain.” Everyone was shocked. Li Weiguo spread his hands. “It’s absolutely safe here. Now, I can tell you everything.” “On the surface, India has increased their troops near the Kunlun Ruins, but Chief Ye has determined that India’s target is actually Little Spirit Mountain.” “On the surface, you guys are supporting the Kunlun Ruins, but in fact, you’re going to the Little Spirit Mountain.” “This door of light is a secondary door of light outside the main door of the Little Spirit Mountain. Very few people know of its existence. We don’t know why there are two stable doors on the Little Spirit Mountain, nor do we know why the main door of light is more than seven meters tall and the secondary door of light is only more than a meter tall. However, this doesn’t stop us from using this door of light.” Li Weiguo smiled and said. After he finished speaking, the six of them almost understood. Lin Xuan was also surprised. He had long felt that something was wrong with the Indian army’s reinforcements to the Kunlun Ruins. This was because between the Kunlun Ruins and the Little Spirit Mountain, India would definitely choose to attack the Little Spirit Mountain without any hesitation. Moreover, starting from 20 years ago and on the basis of history, culture, and Buddhist heritage, India had been claiming that the Little Spirit Mountain mystic realm actually belonged to them and had nothing to do with the Construction Division. Of course, there were not many organizations in the world that cared about what they were saying. “Is my explanation clear enough?” Li Weiguo said with a smile. Everyone nodded. “Then, Senior Li, we should change our faces, right?” Ye Yuqiu asked. Li Weiguo nodded. “Of course, I have a High-Level Disguise Technique. I can disguise you. As long as no Ninth Realm martial artist appears, they won’t be able to see through your disguise.” With that said, he suddenly took out a set of cosmetics from the storage compartment. Lin Xuan leaned over and took a look. There were more than 30 bottles of this set of cosmetics. It included many functions such as hydration, water lock, foundation, sun protection, and whitening. Lin Xuan looked at Li Weiguo strangely. He was not the only one. Everyone looked at him strangely. Li Weiguo’s face turned red. “High-level disguise requires cosmetics. Cosmetics are quite difficult to find nowadays. I even specially gathered a set from my friends.” Silver Fox said solemnly, “Teacher, are you sure this ‘friend’ of yours is not just you?” Li Weiguo kicked him. “Get lost!” The six of them sat down and began to disguise themselves. First was Ye Yuqiu. This short-haired woman was dressed in white clothes and white pants. Be it her facial features or her personality, she was refined. Under Li Weiguo’s high-level disguise, her facial features actually softened in a short period of time. Although she had only made a slight adjustment, she seemed to have become another person. If it were not for the fact that they were usually extremely familiar with each other, they would not have been able to tell that this person was actually Ye Yuqiu. Then, it was Bai Xinghe’s turn. He had a square face and many stubble on his cheeks. Anyone who saw him would immediately know that this guy was a tough man. However, after Li Weiguo used the High-Level Disguise Technique, Bai Xinghe seemed to have become more than ten years younger and became a seventeen or eighteen-year-old youth. “What should I do with my voice? It doesn’t match my appearance.” Bai Xinghe was a little uneasy. His voice was still in his thirties. Li Weiguo waved his hand. “Don’t worry. There are many people whose voices and faces don’t match these days.” Then, Silver Fox sat down. Li Weiguo quickly changed his appearance. Seeing the wretched pockmarked face in the mirror, Silver Fox had a bitter expression. “Teacher, do you have to make me look so wretched?” Li Weiguo snorted. “That’s what you get for talking nonsense. During this period of time, just wear this face!” “Black, it’s your turn.” Li Weiguo pressed Black into a chair. Black was somewhat hesitant. In the end, he took off his hood and revealed his entire face. Her eyebrows, eyes, nose, and lips were as white as snow. If not for the protruding Adam’s apple on his neck, Lin Xuan would have thought that this guy was a woman. Ye Yuqiu and Bai Xinghe had never seen Black’s true appearance and were immediately shocked. “Are you really not a woman?” Ye Yuqiu could not help but ask. Black said angrily, “That’s why I deliberately covered my face!” Everyone laughed kindly. In the end, it was finally Lin Xuan’s turn. To be precise, it was Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion’s turn. Ye Yuqiu and the others couldn’t resist their urge and stared at them curiously. They also wanted to know what kind of faces were under Shield Ghost’s armor and Flame Explosion’s cloak. Lin Xuan was not very reserved. He had long used his High-Level Disguise Technique to make two handsome faces. After removing the head equipment, their faces immediately appeared in front of everyone. Shield Ghost’s face was angular, and his eyebrows were sharp. It was obvious that he was especially good at resisting and fighting. Flame Explosion’s face was handsome and fair. It was obvious that he was suitable to be a mage. Li Weiguo and the others were surprised to see these two faces. These two guys actually had such handsome faces? Although their styles were different, they were all equally handsome! Lin Xuan chuckled in his heart. This was all thanks to the experience he had obtained from playing many games in his previous life! In those games, he would spend all day on character creation. As for the actual game, he would only play for ten minutes! Li Weiguo praised and also began to use his High-Level Disguise Technique. He had barely changed anything. He had only adjusted his eyebrows, the corners of his mouth, and so on to successfully change their faces. Li Weiguo nodded. “Although the two of you have never revealed your true faces, you might as well change them. It’s better than not doing anything.” In this way, the faces of the six people completely changed. Even their names were hidden and they used code names. In any case, there were many members in the Construction Division with code names. In addition, the six of them could not use their usual equipment and skills during this period of time to avoid being discovered. “Let’s go to the Little Spirit Mountain!” Li Weiguo waved his hand and led the six of them through the door of light. The world spun and became strange. The surrounding scenery suddenly changed, and then it became a dim and ancient world. The sky was enveloped by dark clouds that never dissipated. The aura in the air seemed to be ancient and vast. Every once in a while, a Buddhist light would flash across the sky. There was even a faint Sanskrit sound that was shocking. Then, Lin Xuan and the others appeared in an abandoned building. Looking carefully at the architectural style, it was actually a temple. Li Weiguo whispered, “Among the six of you, only Ye and Little Black have come to the Little Spirit Mountain before. The two of you will be responsible for the introductions.” Ye and Little Black were the temporary code names of Ye Yuqiu and Black. Silver Fox curled his lips. “Old man, you’re so lazy.” Li Weiguo kicked him. Ye Yuqiu said solemnly, “Many years ago, Little Spirit Mountain was only a Fifth Realm mystic realm. overnight, it suddenly advanced to a large mystic realm. Moreover, it’s not like the Falling Thunder Mountain, where the highest level demon beast is only level nine Seventh Realm. The demon beasts here are rather chaotic. There are demon beasts ranging from level one Seventh Realm to level nine Eighth Realm. Moreover, there are mystic realm kings and experienced mystic realm kings for every Realm.” “However, those high-level demon beasts are all deep in the Little Spirit Mountain and rarely come out. Everyone, you can rest assured.” Black continued, “The overall area of Little Spirit Mountain is more than 1,000 square kilometers, far larger than the Falling Thunder Mountain and almost the size of a county in Xia Country. After advancing to a large mystic realm, these abandoned temple buildings inexplicably appeared. What’s even stranger is that every time these buildings are shattered, they will recover to their original state the next day.” Lin Xuan was surprised. Ye Yuqiu said, “The physical resistance of the demon beasts in Little Spirit Mountain is a little high. I suggest that everyone learn a few magic and elemental skills. It’s better to be prepared.” Silver Fox was puzzled. “How high can it be?” Black said indifferently, “99%.” Silver Fox: “…You call this a little high?” Ye Yuqiu continued, “There’s also a special rule in Little Spirit Mountain. Every night, the demon beasts of Little Spirit Mountain will definitely gather to attack the martial artist colonies. They will attack whichever colony that has the most martial artists.” “Moreover, there will be a medium-scale attack every seven to eight days and a large-scale attack every month, just like a tide.” “When the demon beasts attack the city, every martial artist has to obey the orders and go up the city wall to resist the demon beasts.” Hearing this, everyone nodded. Lin Xuan felt that this Little Spirit Mountain seemed to be emitting an evil aura. He felt that it was strange, but he could not tell what was wrong. “Let’s go. I’ll bring you to the nearest colony first.” Li Weiguo led the six of them forward. Nothing unexpected happened along the way. They only encountered one or two reckless Fifth Realm demon beasts and could easily kill them. Lin Xuan even specially tried it. These demon beasts’ physical resistance was indeed ridiculously high. They could only be killed with magic and elemental skills. Soon, they arrived at the colony. The colonies here had no name, only a number. This was the Colony Three. Further into the Little Spirit Mountain, there were also Colony One and Colony Two. The deeper they went, the more dangerous it became. Most of the martial artists guarding Colony One were Eighth Realm martial artists. At this moment, more than a dozen martial artists were queuing at the entrance of Colony Three and registering in turn. “Aren’t we all members of the Construction Division? Why do we have to register?” Silver Fox was puzzled. Ye Yuqiu shook her head. “Many members have been transferred to Drowning City to resist the demon beasts. The border guards of Little Spirit Mountain are not strong enough, so many people on Little Spirit Mountain’s side are civilian forces.” Silver Fox scratched his head. “Doesn’t that mean that many spies have sneaked in?” Black smiled. “Before letting the civilian forces in, the chiefs had already set a rule. The number of members of the Construction Division must not be less than 60% of the total number of martial artists in Little Spirit Mountain.” “There’s another thing.” Black smiled and said, “Even if a spy comes, won’t they still have to work? They will still be doing work anyway.” Hearing this, Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. Soon, it was their turn. “Old Wu, long time no see. You’re here to personally register again.” Li Weiguo waved at the old man in charge of registration at the entrance. The old man was surprised and immediately put down his pen. “Old Li! Why are you here?” Li Weiguo sighed. “My leg is gone. I came to recuperate for a month or two. It’s an order from the headquarters.” The old man patted his shoulder and asked, “The few behind you?” “Yes, they’re all Seventh Realm martial artists who have just advanced and took the initiative to come to Little Spirit Mountain to train,” Li Weiguo said with a smile. Li Weiguo turned to them again. “This is the person in charge of Colony Three. Let’s call him Old Wu. He actually came out to handle the registration process himself.” “I’m dying of laughter. Where are the people under you? Are they not working anymore?” This was said to the old man. The old man laughed loudly. “I can’t stay idle when I’m old. Come, register one by one.” Then, Lin Xuan and the others registered their code names. The old man took out six bracelets from the drawer and gave them to them. “This is your battle merits bracelet. When you kill the demon beasts, the battle merits will automatically be displayed on the bracelet. You can also check the battle merits ranking and exchange items on the bracelet.” The old man explained slightly. It was not difficult to make such small equipment. Back then, the Germinal Organization’s Manager Number One could even make a wasteland reclaimer collar alone. After putting on the bracelet, Lin Xuan immediately checked his battle merits. Zero. Then, he turned to the battle merits list. The top ten of the battle merits list were all Eighth Realm martial artists, and there were only two Seventh Realm martial artists. “Xiang Tianxiu?” Lin Xuan was slightly surprised. He suddenly discovered that the person ranked ninth had a familiar name, Xiang Tianxiu! “Hahaha, you’re also a fan of Xiang Tianxiu? That child is very powerful. His battle merits were even established half a year ago. The tenth Eighth Realm martial artist was unable to surpass him even after exerting all his strength. Now, he’s tired of competing.” Old Wu took a sip of wine and chuckled. “Young men, work hard. Let’s not talk about the top ten of the battle merits list. After all, it’s been a long time since there’s been a change. However, you’re people brought by Old Li. No matter what, you have to enter the top 100 of the battle merits list, right?” Li Weiguo smiled and waved his hand. “Don’t give them too much pressure.” With that said, he turned to Ye Yuqiu and the others. “Work hard. I’ll go and recuperate.” With that said, Li Weiguo limped away. Lin Xuan and the others arrived at their respective residences according to the arrangements. Although the residence was small, it was very clean. Despite the fact that no one had lived here before, it had always been taken care of. “There might be many spies in the Little Spirit Mountain. Since it’s still daytime, let’s split up and take a walk around Colony Three to see if we can discover anything abnormal.” The six of them discussed and decided to split up. Lin Xuan nodded and began to wander around the gathering place. The colony was not large, but it had a canteen, a bathhouse, a public toilet, and other facilities. These facilities were probably built at a later time. A light blue energy barrier enveloped the sky above the gathering place. Clearly, the core area had also been set up with Protection Runes. “Come and buy the Mystery Box! 1,000 essence each! 9,000 essence for ten Mystery Boxes!” As he passed by the market, Lin Xuan suddenly heard a shout from inside. Many people had gathered at that stall. Some were happy, and some were disappointed. It was very lively. Lin Xuan had a puzzled expression. Mystery Boxes? You could even choose to buy a single box or ten boxes? Damn, this stall owner sure knew how to run a business. Lin Xuan took a few steps closer and squeezed into the crowd. He finally saw what was on the stall. They were spherical objects wrapped in earthen yellow rocks. They were all about the same size and were about the size of a human head. At this moment, there were more than 300 stalls. There were also many rocks that had been knocked open beside him. The stall owner was a dark-skinned middle-aged man in his forties. He looked very honest, but every time he shouted, his eyes would reveal a hint of shrewdness. “Brother, what are these?” Lin Xuan casually asked the martial artist beside him. “A stone cocoon.” Lin Xuan wanted to ask more questions, but the other party was too lazy to answer. Lin Xuan used a High-Level Observer skill on the stall owner. The middle-aged man’s name was Liu Qiang, and he was at level one Seventh Realm. His skills, equipment, and rune group were all new. The highest grade was precious purple, and there was not a single peerless golden item. Lin Xuan wanted to continue observing. A tall and thin martial artist walked over. “Old Liu, give me ten boxes!” With that said, he exchanged 9,000 essence. “Alright! I see that your glabella is glowing today. You’ll definitely be able to get something!” Liu Qiang chuckled and immediately took out a short knife to cut the stone. The first one was empty. The second one was empty. The third contained an uncommon green dagger. The fourth one was empty. … On the tenth, Liu Qiang had just opened a crack when a ferocious golden light emitted from it! That golden light almost made Liu Qiang unable to open his eyes! The thin martial artist was shocked. “Damn?! A golden light?!” Everyone also craned their necks. There were people buying ten boxes every day, but it was very rare for them to see a golden light. 9,000 essence for a peerless golden grade item. Be it a golden skill book or equipment, it was a huge profit! Even if it was a rune, it still would not be a loss. Liu Qiang was also very happy. “Do you see that?! I’ve been telling you guys that you could get a golden grade item here! There are so many Mystery Boxes in the market. However, mine are the only ones with golden grade items!” “Alright, alright, hurry up and open it.” “I’ll buy some too. I’ll definitely buy them next time! However, you should still open the stone cocoon quickly. I can’t wait to see what’s inside!” The martial artists urged Liu Qiang. Liu Qiang kept them in suspense before carefully opening the stone cocoon. A pair of blue boots that seemed to be covered by a breeze appeared in front of everyone. Through his High-Level Observer skill, Lin Xuan immediately saw that this was a peerless golden grade foot equipment. The effect was also quite good. It had a +30% movement speed and a high dodging rate. The thin martial artist hugged the two items in his arms and was overjoyed. “Old Liu, I’ll come here to open the mystery box again next time!” The thin martial artist ran away, afraid that others would snatch his treasure from him. The other martial artists seemed to be still immersed in the golden light. They smacked their lips and were very emotional. “I wanted to choose that stone cocoon just now. Unfortunately, I still chose the one beside it in the end.” “Damn! Me too. I was only one step away from that stone cocoon! Why didn’t I choose that one?” “What a pity. If only I could get a golden grade item too.” “Stop thinking about it. There have only been seven or eight people who have obtained a golden grade item in the past month.” The martial artists talked at once, wishing they could be that person. Lin Xuan was surprised. What was the origin of this stone cocoon? It actually included equipment, skill books, and runes? He wondered if he could use his Observer skill to see through it. He squatted down and prepared to use High-Level Observer to see what was going on. “Little brother, don’t think about it. With your observation skill, you won’t be able to see through the stone cocoon. These things contain the strange rules of the Little Spirit Mountain. Even some Ninth Realm big shots might not be able to see through this stone cocoon.” Liu Qiang noticed Lin Xuan and chuckled. Lin Xuan asked, “Then what grade and level of Observer do you need to be able to see it?” Liu Qiang was stunned and subconsciously said, “How would I know…” Then, he paused and said solemnly, “I think you should be able to see it if you have the peerless golden grade Observer skill that’s at the level one Eighth Realm, right?” Lin Xuan had a strange expression. Huh? Then why was it that he could see it clearly? Lin Xuan casually used his High-Level Observer skill and immediately saw what was wrapped inside. In this short period of time just now, he had already seen seven or eight stone cocoons, but he had not seen any stone cocoon that contained a peerless golden item. “Hahahaha! Old Liu, you must be joking. Who would invest their precious experience points and essence into the Observer skill?” “I’m afraid there aren’t many people in the entire Construction Division who have peerless golden Observer skills.” Beside Lin Xuan, a fatty suddenly said, “I heard that the Construction Division once wanted to nurture such a person. They wanted this person to avoid learning any attack or defense skills and only focus on learning supplementary skills. Among these skills, there were many skills such as Observer and Perception. However, they later failed.” “Why did it fail?” the person beside him asked. Liu Qiang was also puzzled. “That’s right. The Construction Division is huge. As long as the resources are tilted, they should be able to forcefully create such a person.” The fatty shook his head. “This kind of martial artist enjoys a lot of resources. The resources consumed by such a person would be equivalent to seven or eight people, but they don’t have any combat strength and need to be protected at all times.” “The person we nurtured previously was assassinated by a spy from another organization when he had just grown to the Third Realm. After that, the Construction Division no longer brought up this plan again. They must have given up.” Many martial artists also sighed complicatedly. Liu Qiang lowered his head and discovered that this handsome young man was still staring at the stone cocoon tirelessly. He chuckled and said, “Young man, this is your first time coming to the Little Spirit Mountain, right? Do you want to buy ten boxes? I can tell that you’re new. I’ll give you a 20% discount. You can get ten boxes with 7,200 essence.” Lin Xuan said strangely, “That’s not good, right? You also spent a lot of effort getting these stone cocoons.” Liu Qiang waved his hand. “I only risked my life to find the stone cocoons in the caves underground. It’s just hard labor.” Lin Xuan coughed lightly. The other party’s generosity made him seem a little overboard. If he took away 1 peerless golden equipment and 1 peerless golden skill book from these 328 stone cocoons, it would really have a bad effect. It would also be a little too high-profile. That’s right. Just as this group of martial artists was sighing, Lin Xuan had already finished looking at the 328 stone cocoons. These stone cocoons seemed to have removed their mysterious veil and completely revealed the things wrapped inside in front of him. After a short moment of thought, Lin Xuan decided to just get a single golden grade item. Otherwise, it would seem like he was bullying this stall owner. Moreover, the effect of that equipment was very ordinary. If it was placed in Lin Xuan’s hands, it would either be traded or thrown into the smelting table. Lin Xuan stepped forward and traded for 7,200 essence. Liu Qiang smiled and said, “Let me choose ten for you. I’ve been opening stone cocoons for more than two years and have some experience.” Lin Xuan shook his head. “I’ll choose myself. This way, even if there’s no golden grade items, it’s my problem. I won’t be able to blame it on you.” Liu Qiang smiled speechlessly. This young man was quite interesting. “Alright, pick them yourself.” The martial artists beside him shook their heads repeatedly. You’re just a newbie and you still want to compete with Liu Qiang, an expert at opening stone cocoons? “I’ll choose these ten.” Lin Xuan pretended to be very hesitant and chose ten. “Young man, I advise you to throw that ugly one out. Based on my experience over the past two years, this one is most likely empty.” Liu Qiang could not help but say when he saw that one of the ten stone cocoons was especially ugly. Lin Xuan did not know whether to laugh or cry. The one Liu Qiang was talking about happened to be the stone cocoon that contained the golden grade skill book. Lin Xuan smiled and said, “I think this one is very unique. I’ll choose this one.” The surrounding martial artists were helpless again. This young man was very stubborn. If one did not listen to the elderly, one would suffer. Liu Qiang spat on his palm and picked up a short knife to remove the stone cocoon. The first one was empty. The second one had a rare blue equipment. The third had a precious purple profession scroll. “Eh? This young man is good! What’s that profession scroll?” “I have a friend who happens to be stuck at level nine Sixth Realm. He’s just short of a profession scroll. Let’s discuss later and see if we can trade.” The surrounding martial artists were interested. The newcomer was quite lucky. Liu Qiang continued to open the stone cocoon. The fourth one was empty. The fifth one was empty. The sixth one was empty. After missing three times in a row, the surrounding martial artists sighed. Liu Qiang casually picked up the ugly stone cocoon. “Do you still want to open it? I think it’s not easy for you to be a newcomer. If you don’t open the last four, I’ll refund you 4,000 essence.” At this moment, Lin Xuan displayed his acting skills that were worthy of the Best Actor Award. There was a hint of struggle, disappointment, and stubbornness in his expression. “Open! Continue opening!” Lin Xuan gritted his teeth. Liu Qiang nodded. The seventh one shot out golden light! “Damn?! Am I seeing things?” “Golden Light? This is the second time we’ve seen it in Old Liu’s stall today!” “Damn, the newbie’s luck is really awesome! I take back what I said just now. I apologize to the newbie!” The surrounding martial artists were directly dumbfounded. Usually, among the dozen stalls in the entire market, there might not even be a single golden grade item every two to three days. Old Liu’s stall had churned out two golden grade items today! Liu Qiang was also very excited, and his face turned red. “Young man, it’s as if I don’t have any experience in the past two years! How can such an ugly stone cocoon actually contain a golden grade item?!” He completely opened the stone cocoon, revealing a dazzling golden skill book. “Damn, it’s even a skill book!” “Skill book, equipment, and runes. If I have to choose one of the three, I’ll definitely choose the skill book.” The martial artists were shocked again. It was one thing for it to contain a golden grade item, but it actually dropped a golden skill book! This was actually very easy to understand. Among golden skill books, equipment, and runes… Equipment would be worn and shattered. The effect of runes could only be maximized by gathering rune groups. However, it would always be worth it for one to learn a peerless golden skill book! A skill book would accompany a martial artist for the rest of his life and never leave him. It was even to the extent that it was an existence that was superior to your wife. “Old Liu, I want to buy ten boxes too! Today must be a lucky day!” “I, I, I, I was here first!” The martial artists rushed to pay with fanatical expressions. Liu Qiang personally handed the skill book to Lin Xuan. “Young man, you’re really my lucky star!” Lin Xuan accepted the skill book. The skill’s title was “Magic Amplification”. Every peerless golden equipment on his body could provide a 10% all-type magic enhancement. To ordinary people, providing a 30% increase in magic power was already very impressive. However, to Lin Xuan, this skill was simply a divine skill. In his happiness, Lin Xuan did not forget to ask, “Where did you get this stone cocoon?” At this moment, Liu Qiang was happily collecting the money. “It’s an underground cave to the west of Colony Three. After I finish opening these 300 stone cocoons, I’m prepared to get another batch. Do you want to go? Since you’ve helped me increase my business, I can bring you along.” An underground cave? Lin Xuan nodded. In any case, he had nothing to do. He simply squatted at the side and watched these martial artists open their mystery boxes. Some people even went crazy and started to buy twenty and thirty boxes after not getting anything from the ten boxes. Liu Qiang was overjoyed when he received the essence. Every wrinkle on his face seemed to be filled with joy. Ten minutes later. A figure suddenly appeared in the stall. “Oh? Why are you here?” The woman saw Lin Xuan squatting beside Liu Qiang and said in surprise. Lin Xuan looked up and discovered that it was an unfamiliar woman. He looked carefully and remembered that it was Ye Yuqiu. “Do you know each other?” Liu Qiang asked curiously. Lin Xuan nodded. “Friend.” Liu Qiang laughed and said, “Then I’ll give your friend a stone cocoon. Little girl, choose one yourself. It’s possible for you to get anything from the stone cocoon. Equipment, skill books, runes. Perhaps you can randomly choose one and get a golden grade item.” He was naturally teasing. The probability of getting a golden grade item was very low, so the chances of getting one from a single box was naturally even lower. Ye Yuqiu nodded as if she was familiar with him. Her gaze swept through the large pile of earthen yellow stone cocoons and she casually chose one. “This will do.” Lin Xuan looked at the thing in the stone cocoon with a strange expression. She had actually casually chosen the only golden grade item among the remaining stone cocoons. The martial artists beside him cheered. “Another newbie.” “No one knows better than me when it comes to choosing stone cocoons. She has a 90% chance to get an uncommon green grade item. As for the remaining 10%…” “10% chance of getting a golden grade item?” “10% chance of it being empty!” These martial artists had lost a lot of money because of the mystery boxes. They had been squatting here because they wanted to see others fail like them so that they could obtain a short sense of satisfaction. Although their luck was bad, they would still feel instantly better when they saw that the luck of others was as bad as theirs or even worse. Liu Qiang chuckled and said, “You guys, what if this little girl gets something above the blue grade?” He shook his head and immediately split the stone cocoon. Hua! Another golden light! The few martial artists who were waiting to watch the show were instantly stunned. “What the hell!” Liu Qiang was also shocked. No way. She could get a golden grade item by just casually picking a box? Liu Qiang trembled as he took out something from the golden light, a belt. Ye Yuqiu took it and looked at the effect. “It’s not bad. Thank you.” Liu Qiang did not know whether to laugh or cry. This young lady was actually not surprised? Could it be that she often opened mystery boxes? That’s not right. He had worked here for more than two years but had never seen this little girl. “Damn! Three golden grade items have appeared in Old Liu’s stall today! If a newcomer can get golden grade items, so can I! After all, I’m so much more experienced!” “How envious. Old Liu, give me ten more!” This golden light directly stimulated those seven to eight martial artists who had not even gotten a single item. They gritted their teeth and ran back to open the mystery box. Of course, they would definitely not be able to get anything. After all, Lin Xuan had long known that there were only two golden grade items in this batch of stone cocoons. Half an hour later, all the stone cocoons were opened. Some martial artists had lost more than 100,000 essence in this period of time. They were all dumbfounded. “Time to pack up! I’ll go and buy another batch of goods in the afternoon. Tomorrow, there’ll be more mystery boxes for you to open!” Liu Qiang waved at the many martial artists very politely. He also cleaned up the earthen yellow gravel on the ground. “Young man, don’t you want to see where the stone cocoon came from? Follow me.” Liu Qiang waved his hand, indicating for Lin Xuan to follow. Ye Yuqiu asked, “What are you guys doing?” Lin Xuan smiled and said, “The source of the stone cocoon. I want to take a look.” Ye Yuqiu hesitated for a moment and nodded. “Then I’ll go and take a look too. I’m also quite interested in the stone cocoon.” The two of them directly walked out of Colony Three and advanced. After walking for about 20 kilometers, a large black cave appeared in front of them. The hole of the cave was facing the cave, like a wide-opened mouth. As soon as the two of them arrived, they saw several martial artists crawl out of the cave. Seeing the two of them, they were not surprised. Instead, they nodded from afar as a form of greeting. “This area is a natural underground space formed by the Little Spirit Mountain. It extends in all directions. Every once in a while, stone cocoons will form in the tunnels of this underground space.” “They should also be here to find the stone cocoons. Recently, many unfamiliar faces have come to find the stone cocoons. Moreover, for some reason, the number of stone cocoons has decreased by more than half recently. Many acquaintances have complained to me that they could only get more than a hundred after exploring for an entire day.” With that said, he turned to Lin Xuan. “Young man, seeing that you’ve helped my business, I’ve brought you here. But this is where we part. I’m going to go and collect my goods.” Liu Qiang whistled and prepared to enter the ground again. Before going down, he could not help but remind. “I think the both of you are quite young. You should have just advanced to the Seventh Realm, right? The underground has been quite dangerous recently. Many people have died. It’s quite difficult for the two of you to go down alone. It’s best to find one or two more people to team up.” Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu watched as Liu Qiang entered the ground. Ye Yuqiu asked, “Have you thought of something?” Lin Xuan said, “Among the martial artists in Little Spirit Mountain, there are all kinds of people. I think it’s very likely that Indian martial artists have long mixed in and gotten through.” “But they don’t look like Easterners at all… That means that they can’t appear easily. In that case, their hiding place is very limited.” Ye Yuqiu’s eyes lit up. “The underground cave is a good place to hide.” Lin Xuan nodded. “They’re probably hiding underground and rely on the Indian spies to buy them food and water.” “Liu Qiang also mentioned just now that the number of stone cocoons has decreased a lot recently. It’s very likely that those Indian martial artists are also secretly searching for them.” “This also explains why the number of deaths among the martial artists collecting the stone cocoons increased. They probably bumped into those Indian martial artists.” Ye Yuqiu nodded seriously. She felt that Shield Ghost’s analysis was very accurate. “What do you want to do? Do you want to go down together and try to find them?” Lin Xuan shook his head. “You know that I have the Beast Speaker skill.” Ye Yuqiu immediately reacted and said in surprise, “Smart, do you want to send some demon beasts to investigate?” Lin Xuan nodded. Of course, he was lying to Ye Yuqiu. The Beast Speaker skill was not that powerful, and it was very difficult to tame demon beasts. That skill could at most allow one to communicate with demon beasts and obtain some information. However, with the intelligence of ordinary demon beasts, how could they provide anything important? Lin Xuan naturally planned to directly possess a demon beast and explore this underground cave from its point of view. As the two of them spoke, Lin Xuan saw a Little Rock Snake from the corner of his eye. It was extending its body and preparing to fall into the underground cave. He immediately rushed over and began to communicate amicably with the Little Rock Snake. The communication process naturally involved some physical contact. Hearing the noise of beating, Ye Yuqiu could not bear it. Didn’t they have to communicate well with the demon beasts and get along well before they could command the Beast Speaker skill? However, Lin Xuan’s way of getting along with the demon beasts really puzzled her. With his back facing Ye Yuqiu, Lin Xuan smashed his hammer the entire time and quickly killed this level two Seventh Realm Little Rock Snake. Then, he removed one of his training avatars from the Falling Thunder Mountain and possessed this Little Rock Snake as his new training avatar. Ye Yuqiu could not help but say, “Is the beating also a part of the communication with the demon beasts?” Lin Xuan grinned. “Friendly and peaceful communication is an old method. Now, I rely on this method to get along with the demon beasts.” “Look, hasn’t it become very obedient?” He pointed at the Little Rock Snake beside his feet that was as thick as an arm and more than two meters long. “Circle twice.” The Little Rock Snake immediately circled twice. “Form the shape of a heart.” The Little Rock Snake’s abdomen supported the ground, and its head and tail made a difficult heart gesture. Ye Yuqiu was shocked. This Shield Ghost was simply too good at controlling the Beast Speaker skill. At this moment, a Buddhist light flashed in the sky, and then a thunderclap sounded. A sandalwood smell seemed to appear in the air. The sky immediately darkened at a visible speed. This was the sign that the sky was about to turn dark. “It’s almost dark,” Ye Yuqiu said solemnly. “Let’s go back first. We’ll come back tomorrow. This Little Rock Snake will give me an answer by then.” Lin Xuan waved his hand. After they left, the martial artists who were picking up the stone cocoons in the underground cave also hurriedly ran out. “The sky turned dark so early today…” Liu Qiang stared at the sky that seemed to be dyed black and was shocked. … At Colony Three. Lin Xuan had already returned to his temporary room. The six of them went to the canteen to get food and brought it back. They gathered in Bai Xinghe’s room and discussed what they had seen during the day. Bai Xinghe, who was always working seriously, was the first to speak. “I talked to the old members of Colony Three. They said that there have indeed been a lot of unfamiliar faces recently.” “I learned from a few martial artists who have been here for more than a year that the sky seems to have darkened earlier in the day for the past month. Moreover, the speed at which it darkens has also increased greatly,” Flame Explosion said solemnly. Silver Fox said, “I discovered that the life potions here are very scarce. We can take the opportunity to make a huge profit!” Everyone :”…” Black snorted. “Can you be more reliable? I asked you to check if there’s anything strange at Colony Three.” Silver Fox sneered. “What about you?” Black chuckled and said, “I discovered that the hard liquor brewed by a stall owner is very delicious. They use fruits to brew them here.” Everyone :”…” Ye Yuqiu held her forehead. “You’re obsessed with alcohol.” Black casually took out the bottle of hard liquor and immediately asked casually, “What about you guys?” Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu told him what they had seen and heard. This time, everyone was excited. This was especially true for Black. He had previously trained on the Little Spirit Mountain and knew very well how big the space in the underground cave was. That was indeed the best place to hide. “Then what do you say? Shall we go and take a look tomorrow?” Bai Xinghe immediately sat up straight. Ye Yuqiu shook her head. “Our mission is to hide and wait for India to attack first so that we can catch them all in one fell swoop and severely injure the other party.” “We can’t expose ourselves. We just need to find out if there’s really someone hiding there.” The others immediately nodded. Ye Yuqiu looked at Lin Xuan. “Shield Ghost has already used the Beast Speaker skill to tame a Little Rock Snake and asked it to help us investigate the situation in the underground cave.” Silver Fox was very surprised. Shield Ghost was getting better and better at using Beast Speaker. At this moment, an ear-piercing alarm suddenly sounded outside. “A sudden beast tide is approaching! All martial artists, please immediately climb the city wall!” “Repeat! A medium-sized beast tide!” Everyone stood up immediately. Silver Fox scratched his head. “Didn’t they say that there was a medium-sized beast tide yesterday? Logically speaking, there should be a medium-sized beast tide every three to five days. It’s most unlikely for there to be one today.” Black said indifferently, “Recently, many strange changes have appeared on the Little Spirit Mountain. The number of beast tides has increased, so it’s reasonable.” Bai Xinghe said solemnly, “Let’s hurry to the nearest east wall to provide support.” Everyone nodded and immediately placed the unfinished food and water into the storage compartment. They pushed open the door and walked out of the room. When they walked out of the room, they saw many panicked martial artists rush out of many rooms. Some rushed out without even putting on their pants. Some of them had red spicy oil all over their mouths and mouths. Some sleepy-eyed martial artists even rushed out with broomsticks in their hands as they shouted in their pajamas, “It’s time to make a name for ourselves!” Then, he rushed towards the east wall. Most of these martial artists were civilians and had not undergone professional training. In contrast, the members of the Construction Division were in another residence. Hearing the alarm, everyone quickly put on their equipment in more than ten seconds and rushed out of the room in unison. They quickly formed a team and rushed towards the east wall. Along the way, a group of civilian martial artists also very consciously made way for them. Lin Xuan and the others followed behind these members of the Construction Division and quickly climbed up the east wall. Standing on the eastern city wall, Lin Xuan looked down. All he could see were faint green dots. On careful look, those were not green dots. They were clearly pairs of eyes! Under these eyes, the noses and mouths were almost no different from human features. Under the sparse starlight, Lin Xuan discovered that their bodies were very illusory, as if they were floating in the air. Of course, other than these human-shaped ghosts, there were also many beast-shaped ghosts. However, strangely, these ghosts gathered from all directions and surrounded the third gathering place, but they did not attack for a long time, as if they were waiting for something. The martial artists standing on the city wall instinctively felt a little scared. Being stared at by so many empty and sinister eyes, everyone was a little afraid. They kept feeling that something bad was about to happen. “A ghost?” Lin Xuan was stunned. He did not expect the ones attacking the city to be such demon beasts. Ye Yuqiu was standing beside him. Seeing that he was a little surprised, she explained, “That’s right. These demon beasts are ghosts. They’re considered a specialty of Little Spirit Mountain.” Black also said casually, “Ghosts won’t appear during the daytime. They will only hide in deep underground and abandoned buildings where there is no sunlight. However, every night, they will gather to attack the human colonies.” Lin Xuan frowned slightly. The demon beasts he had encountered in the past were at least corporeal. This was the first time he had encountered a demon beast that did not even have a body. Moreover, weren’t there too many of them? There were at least 20,000 of them. In the distance, more faint green dots seemed to be gathering. And this was only on a medium scale beast tide? How terrifying would a big scale beast tide be? Lin Xuan suddenly felt the huge pressure the Construction Division was under. In the past, he only felt that the Construction Division had a lot of people and ran a huge business. It would definitely be easy for him to rely on the Construction Division. Moreover, this was only the small Little Spirit Mountain mystic realm. The battle in Drowning City was at least ten times more tragic than in Little Spirit Mountain. The demon beasts that appeared there were only more terrifying than the ones in Little Spirit Mountain. Otherwise, the Construction Division would not have risked their lives to mobilize the members to Drowning City. No matter what, they had to stop the demon beasts that were constantly surging out of Drowning City. Other than mystic realms like the Little Spirit Mountain and Drowning City, they also had to constantly guard against the covetous eyes of other organizations. From time to time, they had to beat up some organizations that had crossed the line. Otherwise, those organizations would definitely push their luck. The director of the Construction Division in charge of the east wall shouted, “Everyone, those who have long-range skills can directly attack. Kill as many as you can!” The martial artists immediately attacked when they heard this. All kinds of skills of various colors flew down the city. However, no matter how they attacked, the ghost remained motionless. Under the first wave of attacks, hundreds of ghosts were instantly killed. But the subsequent ghosts quickly filled their gaps. From the top of the city wall, it was as if the wave of skills just now had not been released. Some of the martial artists who had just arrived at the Little Spirit Mountain mystic realm immediately revealed frightened expressions and muttered, “How are we supposed to fight them?” The supervisor of the Construction Division shouted, “Everyone, don’t panic. There are many ghosts, but we can completely keep them out of the colonies by relying on the city wall!” “In addition, because it’s a sudden beast tide, our Lightning Tower still needs time to accumulate energy. Please buy time for the Lightning Tower to charge!” Lin Xuan followed his gaze and looked at the three three-meter-tall stone towers on the east wall. “Lightning Tower?” Lin Xuan used his High-Level Observer skill and actually saw the equipment information. —- Name: Lightning Tower Level: Level Three Seventh Realm Grade: Rare Blue Effect 1: Consumes 1% of energy to shoot out a Lightning Chain with a diameter of 3 meters, causing 120% lightning damage. Effect 2: Consumes 5% of energy to shoot out a super powerful lightning chain with a diameter of 10 meters, causing 300% lightning damage and blinding everything within a 50-meter radius for 5 seconds. Effect 3: In a standby state, 10 energy points are consumed per hour. In a combat state, 100 energy points are consumed per hour. Fuel can be injected to accelerate the charging. Coal, oil, natural gas, and so on are related to the conversion of energy as follows. Click to see more. Description: A product of the Tower Defense Master, Wan Youxi. It is honest and cheap. —- Lin Xuan was slightly surprised. It was actually made by a chief of the Construction Division. No wonder it was so powerful. Ye Yuqiu said solemnly, “The Lightning Tower consumes too much energy and won’t be activated during small-scale beast tides. The person in charge of Colony Three probably didn’t expect that today’s small-scale beast tide would actually become medium-scale, so it still needs to be charged at this moment.” With that said, Ye Yuqiu suddenly stared into the distance and whispered. “The big ones are coming.” Lin Xuan also looked over and suddenly discovered two especially bright points of light quickly growing larger. Finally, they stopped 300 meters away from the city wall. The pair of faint green dots was the size of a bucket. At this moment, moonlight passed through the clouds and sprinkled on that figure. Only then did Lin Xuan see its full appearance. It was an ugly ghost more than seven meters tall. The reason why it was ugly was because Lin Xuan could not find the words to describe this ghost. It was not of any race at all. It was not in human form, bird, or beast form. Its head was that of a wolf. It had a human body and a human face on its chest, but the mouth of this human face had a snake tongue sticking out. Among its four hands, two were human hands, and the other two were wolf claws. As for its tail, it could not be called a tail at all. Instead, it was the upper half of a python. It was as if the relevant parts of the ghost in the form of a huge wolf, a human, and a python had been cut off and stitched together. Silver Fox felt a chill in his heart. “Is this a ghost that can be formed naturally?!” Black shrugged. “Previously, when I was training on the Little Spirit Mountain, it was also this kind of ghost that acted as the leader and led the other ghosts to attack.” “They’re all mystic realm kings. Since they’re here, it means that the ghosts are already prepared and are about to attack en masse.” As expected. After the sutured ghost monster appeared, the ghosts that had been standing rooted to the ground with a numb expression immediately seemed to have received a signal. They instantly became ferocious and rushed towards the city wall. Because they were ghosts, they did not need to climb the city wall at all. They only needed to mobilize their magic power and fly directly towards the city wall. A battle instantly erupted! Because the physical resistance of these ghosts was extremely high, the martial artists had no choice but to use magic and elemental skills to attack. This made those martial artists who purely focused on dealing physical damage complain incessantly. Lin Xuan multitasked. His main body took out a large shield to save the situation at all times, and his Flame Explosion avatar alternated between using Flame Explosion and Fireball. Not far from him was Silver Fox. At this moment, Silver Fox displayed the strength of an elemental mage. Although he had wasted a lot of time in order to spy on the Germinal Organization and had even failed to advance perfectly several times, he was still doing alright. After all, the precious purple profession, Elemental Mage, had already made up for a lot. At this moment, Silver Fox casually threw out four skills, including fire, frost, lightning, and poison. The four elemental spells effectively killed the ghosts. In a short period of time, a fan-shaped area with a radius of five meters in front of Silver Fox was cleared. Any ghost that entered this area would be killed immediately. The surrounding martial artists were surprised. This person was awesome! He knew all four types of elemental spells? What an expert! The mage professionals were even more envious. As mages, they knew better than anyone how difficult it was to learn four types of spells at the same time. Even the person in charge of the east wall, the level nine Seventh Realm Construction Division member, looked over and praised, “That martial artist is not bad. Everyone, learn from him.” Silver Fox laughed. “You flatter me.” Feeling the gazes from all directions, he was feeling very smug. “Hey, hey, hey, stop feeling so smug, alright?” Black sneered. Silver Fox sneered and questioned, “How many have you killed? Can you compare to me? As Construction Division members, all that matters are our battle merits! Without battle merits, can you be stubborn in front of me?!” Black gritted his teeth. Silver Fox was even more delighted when he saw this. He was usually used to the Black badmouthing him. Now that he could retort, he was overjoyed. Black sneered. “Don’t be happy too early. When Flame Explosion attacks, those envious eyes won’t be looking at you.” Silver Fox seemed to have expected this. At this moment, he chuckled. “I’m only inferior to him in terms of fire magic. However, I’m proficient in lightning, frost, and poison. Overall, I’m not inferior to him.” Then, he coughed lightly and whispered, “Moreover, have you forgotten? Teacher reminded us not to use our signature skills from before. We’ll be exposed. Of course, Flame Explosion won’t be able to keep using his Flame Explosion skill.” Flame Explosion’s signature spell was Flame Explosion. Although many mage professions had this skill, it was very likely for Flame Explosion recognized by the spies hiding in the dark if he used it too frequently. After all, its lethality was very high. Black’s expression changed slightly. Silver Fox was telling the truth. If the other party could not use Flame Explosion, he would probably not have much of an advantage. Damn, this Silver Fox would actually be able to keep showing off! Could it be that the limelight on the east wall was about to be snatched away by Silver Fox? Black casually slashed a ghost that had rushed up the city wall a few meters away. He approached Flame Explosion and asked in a low voice, “Do me a favor?” Lin Xuan was stunned. Why did Black want his help at this time? He immediately asked through his avatar, “What favor?” Black snorted. “Look, Silver Fox is feeling very smug. If he had a tail, it would probably be wagging endlessly by now. I want you to steal his limelight away with your strength!” With that said, he asked hesitantly, “You can’t use Flame Explosion. But how about your other spells? Can you suppress him?” Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. So this was the reason? This Silver Fox and Black sure seemed like really good friends. Black immediately made Flame Explosion look troubled, but Flame Explosion still nodded. “Alright, but my other spells are slightly weaker than my fire spells.” Seeing Black approach Flame Explosion, Silver Fox had long been peeking over. When he saw Flame Explosion reveal a difficult expression, he was even more delighted. Black was even trying to find external help? Flame Explosion would not be able to suppress him! Flame Explosion was only impressive with Flame Explosion. How could Flame Explosion’s other elemental spells compare to his spells? At this moment, after the sutured ghost monster roared again, the ghosts suddenly accelerated their attack in groups. In just a few seconds, hundreds of ghosts gathered and attacked. A martial artist had just used his skill and his magic power was exhausted. Before he could catch his breath, he was targeted by the ghost and was hit by the “Chaos Technique”. Chaos Technique would cause one to be in a “chaotic” state. In a chaotic state, one would be delirious and not be able to decide whether they should attack or defend. They would also be unable to decide whether they should release their skills or replenish their health and magic power. Because of this short second of chaos, this martial artist was surrounded by three ghosts. Two ghosts sucked away his health points, and the third ghost even crawled in through his nose and mouth! In an instant, this martial artist was controlled by the ghost and actually raised his weapon to crazily attack the martial artist beside him. Because the nearby martial artists were all his friends, they did not dare to be ruthless and had no choice but to retreat. In this way, a defensive loophole was formed. A large number of ghosts rushed in and devoured the health points of the martial artists, occupying their bodies and controlling them to attack the other martial artists. The seemingly unbreakable east wall immediately expanded because of the small flaw here. It was as if the small gap on a complete white paper was getting bigger and bigger! If this continued, the ghost would definitely bite onto this flaw and directly rush into the third gathering place! The pupils of the person in charge of the east wall suddenly constricted as he roared, “The martial artist who was occupied by the ghost is already dead! Don’t hold back!” This kind of thing had happened before. Usually, these martial artists would also be given pamphlets with relevant precautions. However, when it came to the real battle, these civilian martial artists were still timid. Silver Fox also subconsciously retreated. The distance was too close. As an elemental mage, he was very unsuitable for close combat and could be easily injured by these martial artists. Even if he dared to release a spell, he would still injure himself. He was a mage, but that did not mean that his elemental resistance was high. On the contrary, his elemental resistance was very low! Due to the special effect of his equipment, his elemental resistance was even negative! As the other martial artists retreated, Flame Explosion directly released Lightning Wind and rushed over. Ye Yuqiu, Bai Xinghe, Black, and the others instantly exclaimed. Damn! Why was a mage like him charging forward?! The next moment, Flame Explosion suddenly threw out a Lightning Storm! The lightning storm with a diameter of eight meters directly enveloped most of the ghosts and bodies! Lightning Storm was a rather powerful AOE skill among lightning spells. It did not consume a lot of magic power, but its damage range was very wide. It also dealt two consecutive rounds of damage! Many mage professions could use it from Sixth Realm to Ninth Realm. Xiang Tianxiu had also invested a lot of experience points and essence into this skill and used it as a signature skill. All the nearby martial artists saw that the first round of damage from the Lightning Storm had directly killed more than ten level one Seventh Realm ghosts. The paralyzing effect of the lightning storm even made many of their bodies tremble and fall to the ground. Then, the lightning storm landed on the ground, forming a circle with a diameter of eight meters. Any ghost that rushed into this range would immediately be electrocuted. After taking at most six electric shocks, their health points would be exhausted and they would die on the spot. The paralyzed bodies stopped in this range and could not walk out at all. They also died one after another. A Lightning Storm actually killed more than a hundred ghosts and more than ten possessed martial artists! Black’s mouth fell open. You call this weak? Silver Fox was dumbfounded. Didn’t they say that Flame Explosion’s signature move was Flame Explosion?! Why was this Lightning Storm so powerful?! This was even comparable to Xiang Tianxiu’s Lightning Storm! When the other martial artists saw this scene, their shock was even greater. He was a Seventh Realm martial artist like them? They would even believe that this was an Eighth Realm martial artist! Lin Xuan was also rather surprised to see such a result from the Lightning Storm. However, after carefully looking at his skills and equipment, he had a rough idea why this happened. Firstly, he had eaten many attribute items and had 10% additional lightning damage. Secondly, the skill “Lightning Demon King” was similar to “Demon King of Fury”. When it was not activated, it would cause 15% lightning damage. When the skill was activated, it could also increase lightning damage by 25%. In addition, he had a ring and some accessories. Although they were all precious purple grade, the effect was not bad and also increased the lightning damage. In addition, there was also the more important “Magic Amplification”. The more peerless golden equipment there were, the greater the enhancement! After being stacked, the additional lightning damage actually reached 140%! Of course, it was definitely not as powerful as the Demon Flame Set, the Blazing Fire Codex, the Demon King of Fury, the Demonized Body, and so on. However, the additional 140% lightning damage had already surpassed many Seventh Realm mage professions. The person in charge of the east wall saw this from afar and could not help but cheer. “Little brother, well done! The Construction Division will not forget your contribution today!” “Everyone, seize the opportunity. Block the gap and chase the ghosts down the city wall!” The person in charge shouted at the other martial artists. Only then did the martial artists hurriedly recover from their daze. A few Construction Division members carrying shields rushed over without hesitation and blocked in front of them, facing the many ghosts. Standing behind them, the martial artists were much more at ease and immediately began to unleash all kinds of skills. In this way, they finally suppressed the ghosts that rushed up the city wall. However, this mistake caused more than 30 martial artists to directly die and more than 50 martial artists to be injured. This still cast a huge shadow on the hearts of the people on the city wall. Silver Fox threw spells as he approached Flame Explosion. “How many trump cards have you hidden behind our backs? Why do I feel that you’re even better at hiding than Shield Ghost?” Silver Fox whispered, “Don’t tell me you’re also proficient in frost magic and poison magic?” Flame Explosion smiled. “I really don’t know any poison spells.” “Oh, that’s good… Wait, does that mean that you’re proficient at frost magic?” Silver Fox’s eyes widened. It seemed that his only advantage was his poison magic. Damn it! He had just been given the limelight before it was snatched away by Flame Explosion. The battle continued, and a full hour had passed. However, the number of ghosts under the city still did not decrease. These ghosts were like a tide, surging wave after wave. The person in charge of the east wall checked the charging state and reminded loudly, “It will take about ten minutes for the three Lightning Towers to be fully charged! Everyone, work harder. We can’t let the ghosts rush up again!” Hearing this good news, the martial artists all felt relieved. The Lightning Tower was the most impressive. As long as the Lightning Tower was fully charged, they could immediately start killing. By then, they could even slack off. Lin Xuan also sensed that the atmosphere on the city wall had changed, as if everyone had relaxed. At this moment, the sutured ghost monster suddenly opened its mouth and let out a silent growl. The roar swept across the battlefield like an invisible wave. In an instant, all the ghosts seemed to have been injected with chicken blood, and their desire to fight increased crazily. They directly abandoned the target in front of them. At this moment, a mage’s staff was sent flying, and the mage’s throat was exposed to the ghost claw. However, the ghost directly gave up. Moreover, two warrior professionals were accidentally thrown off the city wall, but they were actually not swallowed by the ghosts. A large number of ghosts directly brushed past them and rushed in three directions with extreme intent. It was the three Lightning Towers! The person in charge of the east wall was already prepared. The well-trained members of the Construction Division immediately took out their shields and covered their bodies tightly. Their bodies were the defensive line of the Lightning Tower! However, these ghosts did not attack. Instead, they directly stopped in front of these members of the Construction Division. It was as if there was crazy energy surging in their bodies. The person in charge of the east wall was stunned. What kind of battle strategy was this? It had never appeared before. Lin Xuan was also stunned and hurriedly used his High-Level Observer skill. “Self-destruct! Quickly dodge!” After seeing the skills of these ghosts, Lin Xuan immediately roared. As soon as he finished speaking, the ghosts expanded like they were blowing air. The next moment, they exploded crazily on the city wall like grenades! Self-destruction: Consumes 100% of one’s health points to cause 300% magic damage within a five-meter radius! Ye Yuqiu muttered, “In the past… ghosts never self-destructed.” Bang bang bang! The Construction Division members with large shields could not resist at all and were blasted into pieces by the self-destruction of a large number of ghosts. However, even so, no one retreated. They forcefully blocked these ghosts with their bodies! The person in charge of the east wall’s eyes were red as if he had gone crazy. He cursed, “Is it still not fully charged? No?! This damn Lightning Tower!” The low-level martial artists in charge of shoveling the coal into the boiler of the Lightning Tower below wished they could grow eight pairs of tentacles and use all means to throw the coal in. However, they really could not do it. Last night, these three Lightning Towers had just resisted a medium-sized beast tide. They only had 10% of their energy left and their coal was almost exhausted. At dusk today, a new batch of coal had just been transported in! Even though the low-level martial artists were already working very hard, the charging speed was still surprisingly slow. Moreover, the Lightning Tower was an early work of Wan Youxi. There was naturally a flaw in its design, which was that it had to be filled before it could be used! The better Lightning Towers created by Wan Youxi had to be given priority to Colony One and Colony Two. The towers that were left in Colony Three were only early works. Wan Youxi also wanted to make more Lightning Towers, but the materials needed for this thing were very difficult to find. Some of them were produced in the Kunlun Ruins, and some were imported from the large mystic realm controlled by the Knights of Truth and the World Salvation Society. However, in recent years, because the overall strength of the Construction Division had increased, the relationship between the Knights of Truth and the World Salvation Society and the Construction Division had plummeted. The export of the relevant materials had almost been cut off, which immediately caused Wan Youxi to be unable to create more Lightning Towers. Little Spirit Mountain’s Colony Three could only make do with these defective Lightning Towers. Bang bang bang! The self-destruction of the ghosts continued. The martial artists did not dare to fight these reckless ghosts head-on at all and instinctively retreated. The Lightning Tower was also affected by the self-destruction. The outer wall was blasted into stone fragments, and the charging immediately became unstable. Ye Yuqiu, Bai Xinghe, and the others looked at each other and immediately rushed to support. Lin Xuan also rushed over. “Is there any other way to accelerate the charging of the Lightning Tower?!” Lin Xuan was indeed very powerful, but he also knew that it was impossible for him to resist so many ghosts alone. He also knew that he could not save the others. At most, he could only escape alone. If they wanted everyone to survive, they had to think of a way to completely charge the Lightning Tower. Otherwise, Colony Three would definitely be broken through tonight! “Take out all the items you obtained from the mystic realms. They have to be related to lightning. They also have to be at least of precious purple grade! Golden grade items would be even better!” Lin Xuan immediately thought of the Thunder Rock Marrow he had obtained in the Falling Thunder Mountain. When Ye Yuqiu and the others heard this, they took out their remaining Thunder Rock Marrow from the storage compartment without hesitation. “We’ll block here. Quickly charge the furnace.” Lin Xuan nodded heavily. “Hang in there!” He directly jumped off the city wall and rushed to the furnace. Lin Xuan rushed to the furnace of the Lightning Tower. The heat here soared, and the temperature was scorching. More than ten low-level martial artists were shoveling coal here. Although the Little Spirit Mountain was a large mystic realm, there were still many low-level martial artists. Their jobs were basically in the fields of catering, odd jobs, and other services. Some were also in charge of forging and creating potions. If they wanted to recruit high-level martial artists to do such a thing, he would have to spend essence instead of general coins. The Construction Division could not afford it, so they simply recruited some low-level martial artists from outside. At this moment, the eyes of these low-level martial artists were already red from the smell and tears fell randomly. However, the coal supply was already empty. “We’ve used up all the coal!” “What should I do? The Lightning Tower still has more than 20% left before it gets fully charged. We won’t be able to make up for the difference at all!” “Let’s run. In any case, we’re low-level martial artists. Even if the city wall is broken, it won’t be our fault.” When Lin Xuan rushed here, a few low-level martial artists had already run away, leaving only a few anxious people pacing around. Under their shocked gazes, Lin Xuan directly rushed to the furnace, picked up a blue item, and stuffed it in. The martial artists shook their heads in despair. “It’s useless. Other than coal, oil, and natural gas, only golden grade items produced by large mystic realms can be used as energy. We’ve already tried everything we had on us just now.” A Fourth Realm martial artist had a solemn expression. “I’ve thrown in a few pieces of my equipment, but there’s no reaction.” Lin Xuan looked at him. “Are you a member of the Construction Division?” “No.” “Then why are you working so hard? You even threw in your equipment to see if it worked?” The Fourth Realm martial artist sighed. “If the city wall is broken, a lot of ghosts will surge in and we definitely won’t be able to stop them. By then, as low-level martial artists, we will have no one to protect us.” “Therefore, I’ve tried everything I had on me. After all, our fate is already sealed with the colony’s.” Lin Xuan nodded. “You’re someone who can see things clearly.” The low-level martial artists who had escaped and the high-level martial artists who had quietly retreated from the city wall were all short-sighted. If the city wall was broken, the entire colony would be doomed. The way to ensure that the city wall was not broken was to activate all the Lightning Towers! Colony Three was dozens of kilometers away from Colony Two. Very few Seventh Realm martial artists could escape to Colony Two at night under the attack of the ghosts. “What did you throw in just now? Can it be used as energy?” the Fourth Realm martial artist asked. Lin Xuan threw another High-Level Observer skill onto the Lightning Tower and nodded. “Not only can it be used as fuel, it can even speed up the charging process.” The Thunder Rock Marrow actually provided 10% of the energy! “Another one, directly fill it up!” Lin Xuan threw another one in. The next moment, the Lightning Tower suddenly let out a violent roar as if it was filled with energy. The martial artists on the city wall looked up in shock and immediately shouted excitedly, “The Lightning Tower is fully charged!” The person in charge of the east wall was also extremely surprised. “Well done! Everyone, rely on the Lightning Tower and beat down all the ghosts!” The ghosts that rushed into the vicinity of the Lightning Tower and tried to self-destruct were electrocuted into smoke by the lightning of the Lightning Tower without even having the chance to self-destruct. Wan Youxi’s design also allowed the Lightning Tower to filter humans on its own and only attack ghosts. In this way, human martial artists could unite under the Lightning Tower and quickly obtain an advantage. Boom! Boom! Boom! A lightning chain landed, and a large number of ghosts were hit, their bodies frozen on the spot. Seeing this, the martial artists took the opportunity to attack. Even the martial artists who wanted to retreat rushed back when they saw this and hurriedly threw skills down the city. Boom! The Lightning Tower directly sent a super powerful lightning chain down the city wall. Half of the ghosts within a 50-meter radius were dead and the other half were severely injured! The heavily injured ones also fell into a blinded state and were unable to counterattack. They quickly died under the various skills of the martial artists. When the Fourth Realm martial artist heard the surprised shout on the city wall, he was also extremely surprised. “It actually worked?!” He wanted to thank the young Seventh Realm martial artist, but he discovered that the other party had already disappeared. Lin Xuan activated Lightning Wind and quickly rushed to the other two Lightning Towers. He did the same thing and threw the two Thunder Rock Marrow into the furnace. These two Lightning Towers were also quickly filled with energy in an extremely short period of time. Terrifying lightning surged crazily down the city! The person in charge of the east wall was also somewhat stunned when he saw this sudden increase in power. “Why is the power of this Lightning Tower even stronger than usual? How strange.” At this moment, Lin Xuan had already invested the Thunder Rock Marrow into the three Lightning Towers on the east wall. Soon, he arrived in front of the person in charge of the east wall. “Other than the east wall, were the other walls also attacked by the ghosts?” The person in charge of the east wall shook his head. “I didn’t receive their request for help. Only our side should have been attacked like this.” Only then was Lin Xuan relieved. “Reinforcements are here!” At this moment, the person-in-charge discovered that many martial artists were surging over from the other three walls. The person in the lead was Old Wu, who had been in charge of registration at the entrance of the gathering place. “We’re here! We’re not too late, right?! Eh?” Old Wu rushed up the city wall with a huge axe, but he was immediately shocked when he saw that the ghost tide had actually been repelled. “Your Lightning Tower seems to have charged up very quickly… Did you rely on the Lightning Tower to send the ghosts back?” Old Wu put away his axe. The person-in-charge nodded. “It’s all thanks to this martial artist with the code name Shield. I don’t know what golden grade item he took out and threw into the Lightning Tower furnace. However, after he threw his items in, the Lightning Tower sped up its charging. Thankfully, we were able to salvage the situation before the entire defensive line collapsed.” Old Wu looked at Lin Xuan in surprise. “I remember you. You’re one of the few Old Li brought.” Lin Xuan nodded. “What golden grade item did you take out? Don’t worry, the Construction Division won’t forget your contributions. They will tabulate your battle merits tonight,” Old Wu said in relief. “The Thunder Rock Marrow of the Falling Thunder Mountain.” Lin Xuan did not want to hide it. The news that the Falling Thunder Mountain had advanced to a large mystic realm had already spread throughout the entire Construction Division. The martial artists also knew about the items produced by the Falling Thunder Mountain. “So it’s the Thunder Rock Marrow. No wonder! This thing is indeed very suitable to be used as fuel for the Lightning Tower.” Old Wu nodded repeatedly. “It’s not just me. Some of the Thunder Rock Marrow was provided by my friends.” Lin Xuan pointed at Ye Yuqiu and the others who were still fighting the ghosts seriously on the city wall. Old Wu laughed loudly. “Good! The people Old Li brought are indeed not bad! Don’t worry, I won’t forget your battle merits!” He patted Lin Xuan’s shoulder in relief and turned around to patrol the other city walls. The three Lightning Towers on the east wall immediately displayed extremely powerful lethality. The ghosts could not even get within ten meters of the city wall. In the distance, the sutured ghost monster stared fiercely at the Lightning Tower and roared before disappearing into the darkness. After it left, the combat strength of the ghosts decreased greatly. Although they were still tirelessly attacking the city wall, they no longer had the high desire to fight. An hour later, all the ghosts that had attacked Colony Three were destroyed. All the martial artists heaved a sigh of relief. They felt as if they had survived a calamity. However, after the battle, the number of casualties made many people fall silent. 14 civilian martial artists died and 32 were seriously injured. 37 members of the Construction Division died and 11 were seriously injured. These were all Seventh Realm martial artists! In particular, the members of the Construction Division were all well-trained martial artists. However, in order to protect the Lightning Tower, many of them had died under the self-destruction of the ghosts. After the battle ended, the person in charge of the east wall arranged for the members of the Construction Division to be on night duty. The other martial artists dragged their tired bodies back to their residences. On the way back to his residence, Lin Xuan and the others accidentally checked their bracelets. They discovered that their battle merits they accumulated in the Little Spirit Mountain had soared greatly. Everyone obtained at least 2,000 battle merits. Due to the shocking lethality of Flame Explosion, he even obtained 3,000 battle merits. “The Thunder Rock Marrow is really good stuff. It’s too suitable to be used as fuel for the Lightning Tower. I reckon the Construction Division will increase the excavation of the Thunder Rock Marrow in the future,” Silver Fox said with a smile. Everyone nodded. At first, they only felt that the Thunder Rock Marrow was a life-saving trump card for mages who were good at lightning magic. It was only when the person in charge spoke that they finally reacted. Wasn’t the Thunder Rock Marrow a golden grade item with the lightning attribute?! It was the perfect fuel for the Lightning Tower! “Everyone, rest. We still have to secretly investigate the abnormal situation in Colony Three tomorrow.” Ye Yuqiu greeted the others and entered her room. Lin Xuan and the others also entered their rooms. They washed up and lay down to rest. The night was long. Lin Xuan was not sleepy after experiencing a battle. He simply checked the situation in the underground cave through the perspective of the Little Rock Snake. When he focused on the perspective of the Little Rock Snake, he was immediately stunned. Damn, what the hell was this?! The Little Rock Snake looked over. This gloomy underground space was actually filled with ghosts! These ghosts had empty eyes and numb expressions. They floated on the spot in a daze and did not move at all. However, the Little Rock Snake was not attacked by the ghosts. Lin Xuan’s scalp turned numb. Had he stirred up a ghost nest? Were there really so many ghosts in Little Spirit Mountain? Lin Xuan simply controlled the Little Rock Snake to crawl towards the ground. First, he wanted to know how many thousands of ghosts were gathered in the underground cave. The Little Rock Snake slithered towards the ground without stopping. Along the way, they encountered fewer and fewer ghosts. In the end, they completely disappeared. After more than two hours of snake travel, Lin Xuan finally saw the moonlight. “At the speed of the Little Rock Snake… those ghosts are probably gathering at a depth of more than a thousand meters underground.” “The closer we get to the ground, the fewer ghosts there are.” “Does the Construction Division know about the existence of these ghosts? Or did they only appear recently? They should have only appeared recently. Otherwise, the Construction Division will definitely send experts to clean them up.” The more Lin Xuan thought about it, the more he felt that something was wrong. This Little Spirit Mountain was too strange. The sky now darkened faster than before. The ghosts also gained the ability to self-destruct. Moreover, there was also a huge number of ghosts that were gathered 1,000 meters underground. Finally, there was also a group of Indian martial artists and Indian spies infiltrating the Little Spirit Mountain and getting ready to cause destruction With so many factors gathered together, Lin Xuan felt like something big was about to happen one day. “Oh? Is that a human voice?” Lin Xuan suddenly heard someone speak through the perspective of the Little Rock Snake. However, it did not sound like Chinese at all. Instead, it sounded like Hindi. Lin Xuan controlled the Little Rock Snake to approach the direction of the voice. Finally, he heard a very clear conversation near a very shady underground cave. Lin Xuan listened carefully. Then, he realized… He could not understand the other party! Damn it, why do language barriers exist! “In any case, it’s not Chinese. that guy is definitely not one of us.” Lin Xuan nodded and continued to control the Little Rock Snake to approach. Soon, the Little Rock Snake quietly approached and saw two figures talking. The other party’s wide nose and mouth were very similar to the Indians Lin Xuan had seen before. “They’re indeed hidden here!” Lin Xuan was overjoyed. He did not expect to find the hiding place of the Indian martial artists so easily. However, just as he was about to continue, the two Indian martial artists suddenly discovered the Little Rock Snake. The two of them let out strange cries and suddenly attacked without hesitation. After all, the Little Rock Snake was only at level two Seventh Realm. In the Little Spirit Mountain mystic realm, it was considered a weak batch of demon beasts and was at the bottom of the food chain. Half a minute later, Lin Xuan retracted his gaze. “Fortunately, I placed everything I obtained from my previous training into my consciousness space. Otherwise, I would have suffered greatly.” Lin Xuan cursed. He did not expect the perception of those two Indian martial artists to be so powerful. They had easily discovered and killed the Little Rock Snake. “Looks like I have to go down there myself tomorrow and get more training avatars.” After Lin Xuan made his plan, he fell asleep. The next day. Bai Xinghe woke up very early and brought breakfast for the five of them. Breakfast was very simple. Soy milk, fried dough sticks, and fried onion pancakes. Lin Xuan did not mind and ate it. After breakfast, the six of them separated again and entered various places in Colony Three to continue searching for abnormal events. “Do you want me to go with you?” Ye Yuqiu asked. Lin Xuan shook his head. “I can go alone.” With so many people around, it was not convenient for him to display his true strength. After leaving Colony Three, Lin Xuan quickly arrived near the underground cave. However, he did not walk over casually. Instead, he found an abandoned temple nearby and used the High-Level Avatar Technique to create an avatar. He also made the avatar wear the Vicious Poison Set and bring the corresponding weapons. “I want to hide in the Little Spirit Mountain and not expose myself too early. Using my avatar to investigate the underground cave is the best choice.” “Moreover, Poison Blade is good at close combat assassination. Coupled with the High-Level Disguise Technique and the Vicious Poison Set, his existence can also be reduced. He is perfect for a dark environment like the underground cave.” Lin Xuan watched as Poison Blade entered the underground cave and sat cross-legged in this abandoned temple. He directly switched over to Poison Blade’s perspective. With the High-Level Disguise Technique, the Vicious Poison Set, and the Assassin Ring, Poison Blade was like a bat in the night, easily escaping into the dark underground cave without causing any commotion. Along the way into the underground cave, Poison Blade discovered many martial artists searching for stone cocoons. However, under Lin Xuan’s control, Poison Blade did not alarm anyone and quietly continued downwards. After entering about 300 meters into the underground cave, the number of martial artists picking up the stone cocoons decreased greatly. Poison Blade had only taken a few steps when he saw a martial artist fall to the ground with a purple-black face and a stiff body. Lin Xuan swept his gaze over and knew that this person had definitely been bitten and was injected by poison in the underground cave. Moreover, from the looks of the wound, it was attacked by multiple beings. Otherwise, it would not have died without any traces of fighting. “Wait… The items on his body should have dropped randomly after he died. Why isn’t there any?” Lin Xuan suddenly noticed something serious. “Could it be that he was killed by a martial artist? It’s even possible that he was killed by an Indian martial artist.“Please reading on N?WN0V?L.0?G”? After all, Indian martial artists are good at taming beasts. It’s very likely that there are poisonous snakes, poisonous bees, and other demon beasts among them.” Lin Xuan narrowed his eyes, even more certain of his guess. The number of Indian martial artists hidden in this underground cave was definitely not a small number. These people had probably sneaked into the Little Spirit Mountain silently through the item in Dart’s hand! Lin Xuan controlled Poison Blade to continue downwards. 400 meters, 500 meters, 600 meters… He walked all the way to 800 meters. The temperature here dropped drastically, and the air was filled with a damp and cold aura. The surroundings were also very dark and quiet. There was almost no sound, and only the underground water dripped, making it especially terrifying. Poison Blade walked silently. With 260 Agility and his weakened presence, he did not make a sound. At this depth, after taking a few steps, he suddenly discovered a deep pit. There was a rustling sound in the pit, as if many things were squirming. Poison Blade took out a lighter and looked in with the help of the flames. His scalp immediately turned numb. In this deep pit was actually a large group of earthworm-like insects. However, they were slightly larger than the earthworms. Even their heads were the size of a fist. Their overall size should be two to three meters. What was even more terrifying was that these insects all opened their mouths wide, and their sharp teeth glowed coldly under the flames. Lin Xuan hurriedly controlled Poison Blade to dodge. What the hell was this? It was too ridiculous. Under such circumstances, he suddenly heard light footsteps not far away. Lin Xuan’s heart trembled. He had found the other party! Poison Blade slid into the darkness like a ghost and indeed saw two figures. These two people were guarding in front of a cave, pacing back and forth as if they were patrolling. As they patrolled, the two of them even muttered softly. Perhaps they were talking about something funny. Lin Xuan scratched his head. “Damn, I don’t understand the Indian language.” He originally wanted to learn Indian. The ability to learn languages was related to one’s Spirit. If one’s Spirit was high enough, one’s memory and learning ability would also become stronger. With his current Spirit attribute, it was not difficult for him to quickly learn a language in a short period of time. At the very least, he could only reach a level where he could understand but not be able to write. However, when he asked Ye Yuqiu, he was shocked to discover that India actually did not have an official language. Or rather, there were too many official languages, so there was no true common language. These Indians also used English, Indians would not use English with one another when they were together. Instead, they used their own languages. Lin Xuan could only give up on the idea of learning any Indian languages. Lin Xuan also noticed that one of them had a slender green snake wrapped around his hand. “The martial artist we encountered just now was very likely killed by this small snake.” “How should I deal with them?” Lin Xuan began to think. These two Indian martial artists were not very vigilant. There were no more Indian martial artists nearby. Clearly, they were patrolling here. The two of them were not powerful and were only at level two Seventh Realm. With Poison Blade’s ability, he could kill the two of them in a short period of time. Lin Xuan quietly circled around them and quickly discovered that more footsteps were coming from ahead. He listened attentively and roughly estimated the number of martial artists. Clearly, this was a nest of Indian martial artists! There were at least 30 hidden martial artists! After a short moment of thought, Lin Xuan suddenly had an idea. Ghosts! Many ghosts gathered in the deeper levels. If he could lure these ghosts over, he would be able to make the Indian martial artists suffer heavy losses in a short period of time! Moreover, the Indian martial artists could only swallow their anger. This was because the ones attacking them were not humans at all, but ghosts! “What can lure ghosts? Living people!” Lin Xuan immediately thought of a characteristic of ghosts… Ghosts were attracted by the scent of humans. There were a total of 7,000 people in Colony Three. Even if the ghosts were in a distant underground cave, they would still instinctively approach. How did these Indian martial artists ensure that they were not attacked by the ghosts? What special items did they have? Lin Xuan immediately made a judgment. Among these two patrolling Indian martial artists, he would kill one and capture the other. Soon, Poison Blade quickly approached and waited quietly in the darkness. He had plenty of time to waste, but these two Indian martial artists had been patrolling the entire time and were definitely tired. As expected, one of the martial artists seemed to be tired of patrolling. He stretched and casually found a rock to sit down, teasing the little green snake wrapped around his arm. The other martial artist approached the corner of the wall and prepared to excrete the liquid waste. Lin Xuan immediately knew that his chance had arrived! Poison Blade appeared behind him like a ghost. He covered the other party’s mouth with his left hand and cut the other party’s throat with his right. The effect of the Vicious Poison Set was activated! Melee damage+40%, melee attack speed+45%, poison attack damage+30%! The Evil Demon King effect was activated! Poison damage+15%! After activating the skill, poison damage+25%! The One with the Sword rune group effect was activated! Sword damage+30%! Attack from behind, triggering the sneak attack effect! Critical hit damage increased to 300%! Critical Hit! Critical Hit Damage! Critical Hit! Critical Hit Damage! 20% chance of ignoring 100% physical resistance! There was a click. The Indian martial artist was instantly killed and could not even make a sound. After killing him, Poison Blade pounced towards another Indian martial artist. The Indian martial artist was still lowering his head to tease the little green snake, completely ignoring the killing intent coming from behind. The little green snake reacted even faster than him and instinctively bit Poison Blade. However, most of its poison was immediately resisted by the extremely high poison resistance of Poison Blade. It had to be known that all the avatars created by the High-Level Avatar Technique inherited 100% of the qualities of the main body! This included attributes, skills, professions, and so on. Poison Blade’s avatar was only wearing equipment that was more conducive to wandering and hunting in the underground cave. In fact, he himself also had extremely high poison resistance. The little green snake was stunned as it bit Poison Blade. It was puzzled. Shouldn’t the other party collapse in three seconds? Why did this person still act as if nothing had happened? The next moment, Poison Blade covered this person’s nose with his left hand and placed his short sword directly on this person’s throat. The little green snake was cut into two by his sword and was directly thrown into his consciousness space before it even landed on the ground. Then, Poison Blade carried two Indian martial artists on each side and quickly arrived at the deep pit. The surviving Indian martial artist was dumbfounded. The two of them each weighed about 100 kilograms each. They were both muscular men. Since this mysterious person was so proficient in assassination, shouldn’t he be someone who focused on Agility? He could actually carry two people so easily?! Could it be that the martial artists of the Construction Division were all this awesome?! Under the gaze of the Indian martial artist, the corpse was directly thrown into the deep pit by Poison Blade. Soon, the sound of chewing could be heard from below. The living Indian martial artist’s eyes widened. It was as if he did not know that there was actually such a terrifying demon beast in this underground cave. Poison Blade pointed at him and then at the deep pit. Everything was obvious. The Indian martial artist nodded repeatedly, afraid that this mysterious person would throw him in. Lin Xuan nodded, very satisfied. He carried this Indian martial artist again and ran deeper. The Indian martial artist’s expression gradually turned into complete fear. Further down was where the ghosts gathered. What was this mysterious person doing? A thousand meters underground. It was dark, cold, and damp. It was as if no life was willing to survive here. Even the number of demon beasts had decreased greatly. Lin Xuan followed the path of the Little Rock Snake and easily found the place where the large group of ghosts gathered. He was now standing at the edge of a cliff. Under the cliff were pairs of dark green eyes. Most of the ghosts were as numb and motionless as last time. However, this time, seemingly because they had smelled a living person, the ghosts closest to Lin Xuan suddenly became restless. Greed appeared on their numb faces, like hungry wolves. The Indian martial artist swallowed. Why did this person bring him here? The Indian martial artist could not help but speak, wanting to beg this person for mercy, hoping to use India’s information to exchange for his life. India had originally relied on using force to integrate the nearby forces before forming the current India. Therefore, Indian martial artists were famous among the various large organizations for having a lot of different factions. It was normal for political orders to not be obeyed outside the capital. In India, the two major factions, the nobles and the officers, opposed each other. The nobles represented the upper level, and the officers represented the lower level. These two factions frequently fought each other. The only thing they lacked was a coup from time to time. These two factions could still be further divided. Some of them were friendly with the Knights of Truth, some were friendly with the Arctic Army. Others were closer to the World Salvation Society, and some were even on good terms with High Heaven Plains. In addition, there was a small group of Indian martial artists who were clamoring for independence every day and did not obey the orders of the capital at all. This Indian martial artist was from the officer faction and was naturally at odds with the noble faction. If handing over the information could save his life, he could not wait to expose India’s secrets. He looked at Poison Blade expectantly, waiting for this mysterious person to say something. Lin Xuan frowned slightly. What the hell was the other party talking about? He could not understand! Lin Xuan controlled Poison Blade and held the Indian martial artist in one hand as he slowly descended along the protruding rock wall. He was looking for a dividing line. A dividing line that was enough to attract most ghosts without putting himself in danger. As Poison Blade and the Indian martial artists slowly descended, more and more ghosts’ nostrils twitched as their green eyes stared fixedly in a certain direction. Finally, at a certain moment, the ghost closest to the two of them pounced over instinctively. Its actions immediately became the fuse to ignite the gunpowder barrel. In an instant, all the ghosts under the cliff surged over crazily. Countless green and greedy eyes stared at the two of them, wishing they could skin them alive. The Indian martial artists were frightened out of their wits. The mystic realm of Sunrise City was much safer than the mystic realm of the Little Spirit Mountain. He had never seen such a terrifying scene. Lin Xuan knew that his goal had been achieved. He jumped up and the strength in his legs erupted. Soon, he returned to the top of the cliff. He turned around and saw that the ghosts were still chasing after him. After a rough count, the number of ghosts also exceeded 20,000. It was not much different from the number of ghosts that had attacked Colony Three last night. Lin Xuan nodded in satisfaction and headed straight for the cave where the Indian martial artists were gathered. His Agility was very high, and his presence was weakened. Even if he ran, he would not make a sound. Needless to say, the ghosts roared silently and flew silently. He led the large group of ghosts and quickly arrived at his destination. Then, he directly knocked out the Indian martial artist and threw him in. He used Lightning Wind to quickly distance himself from the ghosts and quickly hid. The ghosts smelled an even denser human smell. Like flies that had smelled rotten meat, they completely ignored Lin Xuan and directly surged into the cave where the Indian martial artists were gathered. Soon, panicked cries sounded, followed by wails, screams, roars, and desperate struggles at the moment of death. All kinds of sounds intertwined and echoed in the underground cave more than 800 meters deep. Boom! An explosion suddenly sounded. Then, a frost dragon suddenly killed many ghosts and even blasted open a portion of the rock wall. A figure escaped in fear. The other parts of his body had not changed at all, but his entire right arm was shriveled and thin. The flesh and blood had almost disappeared, leaving only a thin skin stuck to his bones. Just now, his right arm had been targeted by a ghost. In less than three seconds, the other party had sucked away all the life force in his right arm. Fortunately, his staff had its own Ice Dragon Technique. It blasted open the ghosts that blocked his path and the rock wall, allowing him to escape. The ghosts did not chase after him. Instead, they continued to enjoy the feast of flesh and blood. Between a fleeing food and a group of food that had not escaped, the ghosts made a judgment based on instinct. Only then did the other party escape. “How can this be?! Logically speaking, since we have that thing, it’s impossible for the ghosts to find us!” This Indian martial artist had a frightened expression. The sounds of his compatriots dying continuously sounded in his ears. He turned around and saw a ghost enter his companion’s body through its mouth and nose. It quickly transformed the person into a puppet and used him to pick up weapons and kill the other martial artists. “Escape, we have to escape immediately! I want to tell the headquarters about this!” The Indian martial artists did not dare to turn around. Giving up on their comrades was not a big deal. The sudden attack of these ghosts was what was worth the headquarters’ attention. “Escape? Where do you think you’re going?” Then, he felt a cold wind brush past his neck. An intense pain quickly spread from the wound to his entire body. A sense of powerlessness swept through his limbs, and darkness covered his eyes. He suddenly felt sleepy and numb. The only Indian martial artist who had escaped was also killed by Poison Blade, who had long been hiding nearby. Soon, these ghosts left the cave in satisfaction and returned to a thousand meters underground. After all the ghosts left after eating the buffet, Lin Xuan controlled Poison Blade to enter the cave. The scene in the cave could not be said to be quiet and peaceful. At the very least, it could be said to be tragic. Corpses were scattered on the ground, and their flesh and blood were completely shriveled. Their vitality had been plundered, and they were like dried corpses. What was even more strange was that there was almost no blood on the ground. Lin Xuan also felt a chill in his heart. The only possibility was that the blood had been licked clean by the ghost. As for the various equipment and skill books that dropped on the ground, Lin Xuan suppressed his greed and did not take them all. He only chose a few peerless golden skill books and equipment that were suitable for him. He wanted to disguise this scene as a ghost invasion and use it to explain why no one survived. In this way, the Indian martial artists would not be too vigilant. At most, they would only be heartbroken about how they had suddenly provoked the ghosts. Then, Lin Xuan discovered something important. The crystal skull of a strange bird. Lin Xuan was slightly surprised. “I see. I used this thing to restrain the smell of humans here and prevent it from dissipating. This way, they won’t be targeted by ghosts.” “There are so many treasures in India.” Lin Xuan did not touch this thing. Ghosts only plundered vitality and would not touch this crystal skull. If he took it, he would be exposed. After doing this, Lin Xuan mentally retraced his steps. He did not find any loopholes and quickly left. “Unfortunately, I didn’t find any useful information. If only they had marked the caves where all the Indian martial artists gathered and recorded them on a map.” Lin Xuan felt a little regretful. However, he felt that the Indian martial artists should not be so stupid. The risk was too high. If a group was really discovered by the Construction Division, the enemy could directly follow the clues and kill all the hidden Indian martial artists. Then, Lin Xuan got Poison Blade to take off all his equipment and place them in his consciousness space before directly removing his avatar. The 800-meter-deep underground cave returned to silence, but this time, it really became dead silence. On the ground, in an abandoned temple, Lin Xuan checked his spoils of war excitedly. Peerless golden skill, Magic Power Burst! Peerless golden equipment, Hermes Boots! The effect of Magic Power Burst was: Consumes 30% of magic power, causing the magic power consumption of all spells to decrease by 30% for 20 minutes. The cooldown time of all spells is reduced by 30%. The effect of the Hermes Boots was: Movement Speed+30%, and a random gain state that lasted for 1 hour every 24 hours. The current gain state was “Blessing”, and all attributes+2%. Be it the Magic Power Burst or the Hermes Boots, they were both rather good. No wonder India had arranged for them to be sent to the Little Spirit Mountain. They had some strength. “These Hermes Boots seem to be produced in the mystic realm of the Knights of Truth, right? I wonder how these Indian martial artists obtained it… Could it be that they secretly made deals?” Lin Xuan learned Magic Power Burst and equipped the Hermes Boots before getting up to return to the third gathering place. When Poison Blade was working in the underground cave just now, he had also possessed another demon beast. After learning his lesson from the Little Rock Snake, he simply tamed a Bloodsucking Mosquito this time. It was only the size of a palm and was even more silent than the Little Rock Snake. With this Bloodsucking Mosquito, he might be able to discover more Indian martial artists hiding in the underground cave. “If there are such underground caves near Colony Three, there must also be such caves near Colony One and Colony Two. I’m afraid I have to hurry and also pay a visit to these Indian martial artists in those two underground caves.” Lin Xuan returned to Colony Three not long after. Of course, he was not idle after returning. Instead, he was planning to earn some essence from his side business. “Silver Fox said that the price of the Life Potion in Colony Three is quite high. I can buy the materials and make the Life Potion to earn money.” “In this way, my level can also increase quickly.” A day later. A figure appeared in the 800-meter-deep cave. This person was a standard Chinese martial artist and not an Indian martial artist. He hummed a tune and headed straight for the cave. “Everyone, I brought the curry you wanted…” Before he could finish speaking, he froze on the spot, and great fear rose on his face. A huge hole was actually blasted open in the cave. His heart skipped a beat. He was incomparably nervous and hurriedly walked towards the cave. The next moment, an incomparably tragic scene appeared. The Indian spy could not help but hold his breath. So many Indian martial artists, all of whom were elites, were actually all dead! Moreover, their life force had undoubtedly been sucked away by the ghosts! “This is bad! Something big has happened!” The Indian spy hurriedly left to report to the others. In another underground cave, more than 700 meters deep. There were more than 40 Indian martial artists here. The leader was a level nine Eighth Realm Indian martial artist with the code name Garuda. The spy found him in a panic and told him everything he had seen. Garuda understood the seriousness of this matter and immediately headed to the scene of the incident with the spy. Seeing the dried corpses everywhere, the leader frowned deeply. He instinctively felt that this matter would not be that simple. Why would the ghosts suddenly attack the hiding place of the Indian martial artists? His first reaction was that there must be someone behind this matter! However, after careful investigation, he discovered that the deceased’s items did not show any signs of being touched. Most importantly, the crystal skull was also left safely in place. If a martial artist had used some method to lure the ghosts to attack the Indian martial artist’s hiding place, then this person would definitely not ignore the peerless golden items on the ground! Peerless golden skill books, equipment, and runes were all treasures to anyone. Some weak people might only have one peerless golden skill and one peerless golden equipment on them. In fact, some had it even worse and didn’t even have a single one. However, now, there were as many as 30 golden skill books and equipment on the ground! In addition, there were more than 60 precious purple items. Who would not be tempted? Who would not want to take it away after seeing it? The spies beside Garuda could not help but gulp at this moment. They pretended to squat down and tie their shoelaces, but in fact, they hurriedly took a few golden equipment and stuffed them into the storage compartment. Garuda saw everything, but he did not expose them. Greedy people were even more useful. If a person did not like power, money, and women, in his opinion, that was a truly terrifying person. Garuda exclaimed, “There are a total of 28 people in this hiding place, but there are only 26 corpses. What about the other two?” If a ghost killed someone, they would not destroy the corpse. They would leave after eating the life force in the martial artist’s body. The spy hurriedly said, “Perhaps they escaped? They could have died halfway.” Garuda immediately used “Examine”. This was a supplementary skill dropped from a Sixth Realm mystic realm in India. It was similar to “Perception”, but it was an active skill with a larger detection range. After carefully investigating three times, Garuda suddenly discovered a deep pit around him. In the deep pit was a group of Seventh Realm demon beasts. He took out his flashlight and shone it in, only to discover many terrifying mouths. The spy walked over. “Lord Garuda, these are carnivorous insects. They’re native to the Little Spirit Mountain and would eat anything.” “The Indian martial artists in this hiding place use it as a trash can and throw in all kinds of trash.” “Although they look ferocious, they’re actually very safe when kept this way. As long as we don’t enter, they won’t take the initiative to attack.” Garuda suddenly pointed at the clothes beside a carnivorous insect. “There’s a piece of clothing there. Can you guess who it belongs to?” This spy would deliver food to the Indian martial artists in this hiding place every few days. His familiarity with these Indian martial artists was even higher than Garuda’s. The spy looked around and suddenly seemed to have thought of something. “I remember now. It’s him. He even specially instructed me to bring more curry over.” Garuda said, “If the hiding place was attacked by a ghost, then why did a piece of clothing appear beside the mouth of the carnivorous insect? There’s something suspicious about this matter. I still suspect that this incident was caused by a human.” The spy scratched his head. “Then what do you think we should do?” Garuda stood up straight and said indifferently, “Wait.” The spy was puzzled. “Wait?” Garuda said, “If it’s caused by a human, the other party might still attack again. I’ll get the martial artists in the other hiding places to be prepared. We want to… catch him in action!” The spy nodded obsequiously. “Sir, you’re indeed smart!” The spy suddenly thought of something and hurriedly said, “By the way, Sir, an Eighth Realm martial artist has arrived in Colony Three recently. You should know him too. It’s that stubborn old man.” Garuda revealed a trace of disdain. “Li Weiguo? I knew about this before I came. He lost a leg in the Drowning City because of the High Heaven Plains. He came here to recuperate and guard Colony Three. Don’t worry about him. An Eighth Realm martial artist without a leg will definitely die in three moves at most.” The spy nodded and bowed. “Our Indian intelligence network is indeed powerful!” Garuda looked at him strangely. “The Construction Division did not hide this matter at all. If we don’t even know about this, how can we call ourselves a large organization?” The spy :”…” He had failed to bootlick this time. “There’s another thing. Something strange has been going on in the Little Spirit Mountain recently. The people in charge of the three colonies will definitely buy a batch of potions. I plan to rope in more potion makers and continue to increase the price of the potions! In this way, we can cheat the Construction Division of a large sum of essence! This will help our India gain an advantage!” “It’s just that…” The spy smiled awkwardly.” The essence I have on me is not enough for me to rope in those potion makers. ” Garuda nodded slightly and casually exchanged 500,000 essence. “This idea of yours is not bad. I’ll provide you with the essence. Go ahead and do it.” The spy nodded repeatedly. … Colony Three, market area. The market area was filled with small stalls set up by martial artists. Some people sold their own equipment, some traded ores, some sold potions, and some discussed the transaction of essence and experience points. There were shouts and noises everywhere. Every time he came here, Lin Xuan felt as if he had arrived at a market. He could hear a large group of old men and women bargaining. He quickly arrived at a place that specialized in selling potions. The places where potions and equipment were sold were relatively similar. There was usually a stall in front, and behind the stall was a place for making potions and forging. Usually, the stall owners would only come out after someone shouted. Lin Xuan walked around and discovered that there were not many stall owners selling potions. There were only twenty or so. The potions sold by these twenty or so potion makers were also rarely repeated. Everyone seemed to be selling different potions. Among these shops, only one shop sold the Life Potion. The other potion makers did not make the Life Potion. Lin Xuan asked them why they didn’t make the Life Potion and these potion makers only shook their heads in response. “The grade of the Life Potion made by Mu Yang is better, and the effect is also better. We can’t compete with him, so we might as well not sell them.” Everyone had the same answer. Lin Xuan could not help but be somewhat surprised. Who was this Mu Yang? He could actually make all the potion makers shake their heads and directly give up? Could it be that he had obtained the Great Potion Master scroll? Potion maker was a rare blue profession scroll. The Great Potion Master profession scroll, on the other hand, was a precious purple profession scroll! The profession skill of the Great Potion Master was: There is a 25% chance for the grade of every potion made to increase by one level. In other words, if ordinary white grade materials were used to make potions, the potion maker could at most make ordinary white grade potions. However, the Great Potion Master had a 25% chance of directly making uncommon green potions. This was very impressive. After all, the other party would be using ordinary white materials to make an uncommon green potion. Moreover, this skill effect was also effective on higher grade materials. In other words, there was a 25% chance of making a golden potion with purple materials! At this moment, Lin Xuan suddenly saw a wretched-looking middle-aged man beside the stall. The other party was also choosing potions. However, he only asked about the potions and did not buy them. The potion maker was furious and almost chased him away. This person was Silver Fox. “What are you doing?” He walked over and smiled. Silver Fox was also stunned for a moment and laughed. “You’re here too? Are you here to buy potions? You don’t seem to be short of potions.” Lin Xuan said, “No, I’m here to do market research.” Silver Fox scratched his head. “Are you planning to get a piece of the pie?” “We have a good relationship. I’ll tell you the truth. Yesterday, I discovered that the Life Potion is indeed very profitable, but today, I realized that although the price of the Life Potion here is high, it… has already been monopolized by a single person.” Lin Xuan casually said, “Mu Yang?” Silver Fox nodded helplessly. “That’s right. I heard that that guy is a Great Potion Master! He’s best at making Life Potions and Big Life Potions. Therefore, all the potion makers in Colony Three simply gave up on making this potion and stopped competing with Mu Yang.” “In addition, many potion makers seem to have a good relationship with Mu Yang. They joined forces to increase the price of other potions! They even ostracized those potion makers who did not join them.” Lin Xuan smiled and said, “You don’t want to compete either?” Silver Fox scratched his head. “Let alone competing with Mu Yang, I can’t even compete with these ordinary potion makers.” He had a very vexed expression. “These people have officially changed their professions to the potion maker profession and aren’t interested in upgrading their combat skills at all. I, on the other hand, have the elemental mage profession and only have a basic medicinal skill. How can I compare to them?” Lin Xuan chuckled and said, “I want to compete with them.” Silver Fox did not know whether to laugh or cry. “I admit that you’re good at making Fire Wound Potion and Ice Resistance Potion, but there aren’t any materials in the Little Spirit Mountain for you to make Fire Wound Potions and Ice Resistance Potions. Moreover, you should have also discovered that the demon beasts here are least resistant to lightning damage. Moreover, they rarely use frost magic.” “Fire Wound Potion and Ice Resistance Potion are useless on the Little Spirit Mountain. The best sales are actually Thunder Wound Potion and Magic Resistance Potion.” Silver Fox directly analyzed the situation for Lin Xuan. With that said, he said earnestly, “Shield, listen to Uncle’s advice. Potions are complicated. You won’t be able to grasp it!” Lin Xuan’s expression did not change at all. Silver Fox was at a loss whether to laugh or cry. Seeing Shield Ghost’s expression, he knew that he had wasted his breath just now. Silver Fox’s face was filled with helplessness. “Young people nowadays are really stubborn. I want to see how an amateur like you can compete with a professional.” Lin Xuan smiled mysteriously. “Just you wait.” After bidding farewell to Silver Fox, he returned to his residence. He entered his consciousness space and arrived in front of the three medicinal tables. All the workstations in his consciousness space had already been upgraded to level 4 by him. After upgrading to a level 4 workstation, their work efficiency would increase by an additional 100%. In addition, there was a 10% chance of producing high grade items. This high grade referred to blue grade and above. Now, Lin Xuan needed to increase this 10% chance to a higher level. “Upgrading a Level 4 workbench to level 5 requires 10,000 essence.” “Level 5 to level 6 requires 100,000 essence.” “Level 6 to level 7 requires 1,000,000 essence.” Lin Xuan looked at the requirements and immediately clicked his tongue. He had not saved much essence now. He did not expect these workstations to consume so much of his essence. However, when he saw the effect of the level 5 medicinal table, he immediately revealed a satisfied expression. Level 5 Workstation: The probability of producing high grade items increases to 20%, and the number of materials consumed decreases by 20%. “Then let’s upgrade the three medicinal tables to level 5 first. I’ll worry about the forging tables later.” Lin Xuan invested 30,000 essence into it. The three medicinal tables in his consciousness space immediately became brand new, becoming even more green. There was even a faint fragrance of vegetation floating out. The next morning, Lin Xuan arrived at the market early in the morning. He casually found a stall and sat down, laying out a cloth. Then, he marked the prices of the various potions refined on the medicinal table. What was placed on the cloth was not the real potion, but the projection of the potion. The real thing was still in Lin Xuan’s storage compartment. This was also a convenience brought by the global digitization. In this way, as long as he placed the projection of the item at the place where it was sold, he would not have to guard here at all times and could go out to train and explore. On the other hand, the buyer could see the detailed information of the item from the item projection. If they felt that the price was suitable, they could leave a message here and the two parties would arrange a time to trade. This was very convenient for both parties. Lin Xuan only had a few potions. Lightning Damage Potion. Magic Resistance Potion. Basic Strength Potion. Basic Spirit Potion. The Life Potion and the Big Life Potion. Its grade was rare blue and precious purple. Depending on the grade and type, the price varied from 100 essence to 1,000 essence. The prices were all the results of Lin Xuan’s market research yesterday. Other than the Life Potion and the Big Life Potion, the prices of the other potions were slightly lower than the average price of Colony Three. As for the Life Potion and the Big Life Potion, Lin Xuan’s prices were very low. It was not that he had deliberately lowered the prices. Instead, it was because Mu Yang’s prices were just too high, making his prices seem low in comparison. Under the full work of the three medicinal tables, Lin Xuan had more than 1,000 bottles of each potion. However, he did not really reveal that he had 1,000 bottles. Instead, he set an upper limit of 50 bottles and urged his customers to buy quickly. After all, 1,000 bottles was indeed a little ridiculous. Then, Lin Xuan placed a projection of a few other items beside him. Warm fruit pulp, 10 essence. Life Mushroom, 30 essence 1. Lightning Withered Tree, 35 essence. … These were all the materials needed to refine various potions. There was no upper limit and Lin Xuan would buy as much as the other party had. It was not that he lacked these things, but because he had to seem like he needed the materials. Otherwise, others would think that he was very strange. After all, others would be suspicious if he kept churning out potions without ever buying any materials. If others asked, how was he supposed to explain the source of the materials? After doing this, Lin Xuan finally wrote a time and said that he would appear at the stall at 5 PM to discuss the transaction with all the customers. Only then did he leave in satisfaction. “I’m serious about earning essence!” Essence was definitely a basic necessity that Seventh Realm martial artists needed the most. It was the currency of martial artists above the Seventh Realm. It was also an important item for martial artists to increase their cultivation, skills, and rune levels. If he could earn a lot of essence through potions, Lin Xuan’s leveling speed would increase. At the same time, he could also increase his skills. Many of his skills had stopped at level one Seventh Realm and had not advanced much. Some of the uncommon skills were even at the Sixth Realm. Since he wanted to become stronger, his skill level had to keep up with his cultivation. After Lin Xuan left, the market area gradually became lively. Soon, some martial artists discovered that there was actually an additional stall selling potions in the market area. “A new potion maker has arrived at Colony Three?” “Not bad. Thunder Wound Potion and Magic Resistance Potion. This new potion maker seems to know all kinds of potions. Moreover, the price is lower than the average price.” “Eh, why are there also Life Potions and Big Life Potions? Moreover, the prices are so low!” The martial artists passing by suddenly stopped and stared at the red potion bottle with raised eyebrows. Mages lacked magic power potions the most, but they also needed a few bottles of life potions in case of emergencies. As for armored soldiers, warriors, and assassins, they needed these potions even more. After all, they needed to charge at the front line and their health points would easily decrease. Without the Life Potion, they would be easily killed. Therefore, no matter where and no matter which organization it was, the Life Potion was always the fastest to be consumed and was also the most in demand. In addition, the pressure on their survival was too great. Many people were unwilling to change their profession to potion maker, forger, rune forger, and other life-skill professions, which led to the scarcity of potions. “Looks like this newcomer doesn’t know how powerful Mu Yang is. He actually dares to compete with a Great Potion Master?” A tall and thin martial artist only glanced at the Life Potion and laughed without looking carefully. “That’s right. The effect of the Life Potion made by Mu Yang is too good. It even made the other potion makers directly give up on competing.” Many martial artists echoed. “However… Mu Yang’s Life Potion also has a weakness. It’s just too expensive…” A martial artist shook his head helplessly. A female martial artist carefully checked the potion projection and suddenly exclaimed, “Look, the lowest grade of the Life Potion he placed here is blue grade. Moreover, the price is also one-fifth lower than Mu Yang’s.” The other martial artists were stunned and also leaned over to take a look. When they saw the detailed effect of the potion, they were even more shocked. They were both rare blue grade potions, but the effect of the Life Potion made by this new potion maker was actually better than the Life Potion made by Mu Yang! The effect was good and it was even cheaper! They were shocked! “That’s impossible. Mu Yang is a Great Potion Master. How can this person compare to Mu Yang?” “Could he be selling the best potions he had refined?” “That’s also possible, but can he earn money like this?” The martial artists discussed with dumbfounded expressions. Some people did not believe it and took out a bottle of Life Potion from the storage compartment to compare. “That’s true. The effect of the Life Potion sold by this potion maker is about one-fifth better than the one sold by Mu Yang.” The others also took it out to compare and nodded repeatedly. The effect was one-fifth better. However, the price was almost one-third cheaper. Then what was there to think about? They naturally had to buy it! “I can’t be bothered with this newbie potion maker. It’s a waste not to buy it! I’ll buy ten bottles first!” A burly martial artist walked over and immediately left a message. With the first person taking the lead, the others also picked up their pens and left messages. In less than half an hour, 50 bottles of Life Potion and 50 bottles of Big Life Potion were sold out. Many people even left messages saying that they wanted to buy tomorrow’s Life Potion in advance. “Speaking of which, these Thunder Wound Potions and Magic Resistance Potions seem to be quite good. They are divided into two grades, rare blue and precious purple. The effects are also better than those refined by other potion makers and are also cheaper.” The burly martial artist saw the other potions and touched his head in surprise. “Enough nonsense. I’ll buy it!” The martial artists immediately followed and quickly bought all the potions. Just like the Life Potion, there were also many pre-ordered messages under the other potions. “Do you think this new potion maker can really take out so many high grade and cheap potions? We won’t be fooled, right?” the female martial artist said worriedly. The thin and tall martial artist beside him laughed strangely. “Don’t worry about that. If he can’t take it out, we’ll directly look for Old Wu. This guy will directly deduct 3,000 battle merits from his account and he will also be expelled from the Little Spirit Mountain. He won’t be allowed to enter for the next two years.” After all the potions were ordered, the martial artists slowly dispersed. However, there were still many martial artists who passed by. After discovering the shocking effect and low price of these potions, they were rather shocked. However, when they discovered that all 50 bottles of potions had been ordered in advance, they pounded their chest and stomped their feet again. After a while, Silver Fox, who was wandering around the market area, also arrived. When he saw the potions here, he was shocked. If nothing unexpected happened, these potions should be made by Shield Ghost. When he saw the grade and effect of these potions, he was even more shocked. “It’s true that Shield Ghost’s potions are of peerless golden grade, but can he really make so many potions?” Silver Fox scratched his head. It had only been a day since Shield Ghost told him that he planned to earn money by selling potions. However, there were a total of 300 bottles of potions here. How could Shield Ghost take out so many potions?! Silver Fox felt a little worried and decided to wait here. He was worried that Shield Ghost would not be able to take out enough potions and would be targeted or even attacked by these martial artists. If that was the case, it would be impossible for Shield Ghost to survive without help. Time passed quickly, and soon, it was five in the afternoon. Martial artists that had ordered the potions all gathered here. “Where’s the potion maker? Why isn’t he here yet?” “Could he be scared of returning?” “Damn, could it be that he was messing with us? I would be so angry.” At this moment, Lin Xuan passed through the crowd and walked in. “Sorry for the long wait.” Lin Xuan stood in front of the stall and looked around with a smile. “Eh, it’s you? I remember that you were the one who activated the Lightning Tower last time and saved many people.” “I remember too. It’s this guy with the code name Shield. My brother is a member of the Construction Division and was almost shattered by the ghost’s self-destruction. Fortunately, the Lightning Tower finished charging in advance and he was able to survive.” “Don’t you have a big shield? Why do you know how to make potions?” The martial artists looked at him in surprise. It had only been a few days since the last ghost attack. Almost all the martial artists guarding the east wall that night knew about “Shield”. Lin Xuan smiled. “I have to earn some essence. This is my side profession.” The burly martial artist was impatient and shouted, “Stop talking nonsense. Hurry up and take out the potions. Don’t tell us that you don’t have enough potions.” Lin Xuan compared it to the message book. “Feng Zhuang?” “Yes, I ordered ten bottles of blue grade Big Life Potion.” Lin Xuan nodded and took out a potion from the storage compartment. “Take them.” Feng Zhuang carefully looked at the effect of every bottle of the Big Life Potion. It was no different from the medicinal projection he had seen previously. He immediately nodded in satisfaction and traded the essence over. “You’re not bad as a newcomer!” After paying, he quickly left. Seeing this, the other martial artists immediately rushed over. “I was the second to leave a message. I ordered three bottles of purple grade Life Potion and three bottles of blue grade Life Potion.” “I was the third to leave a message. I ordered a bottle of purple Big Life Potion and a bottle of purple Lightning Wound Potion.” “I…” Lin Xuan smiled from ear to ear. He received the money with one hand and handed it over with the other. “Everyone, don’t be anxious. Everyone will get what they ordered.” Soon, the 300 bottles of potions were sold out. Lin Xuan counted and discovered that he had earned nearly 80,000 essence in one go. This was naturally far inferior to the gains of his training avatar, but it was still very good. Moreover, only 50 bottles of each potion were sold today. After increasing the number of potions the next time, the income should be even greater. “Shield, I wrote in the message book that I’ve reserved 20 bottles of blue grade Life Potions. Can you deliver them in two days?” “Hey, hey, hey, I also reserved 15 bottles of blue grade Big Life Potion. Can you deliver them in three days?” “I need ten bottles of purple grade Thunder Wound Potion. They have to be delivered in a day. I’m willing to increase the price by 30%.” The martial artists obtained their respective potions but did not leave. Instead, they reminded Lin Xuan that they had reserved more potions. Lin Xuan swept his gaze over and nodded slightly. Lin Xuan smiled and said, “You guys ordered quite a lot. However, I might not be able to make all of them. Moreover, I don’t have many materials left.” Of course, he could make them. However, if he made so many potions at once, it would attract the attention of others. Therefore, he did not want to be too high-profile. “That’s simple. Our team has accumulated a lot of Life Mushrooms! I also know a place that often produces Life Mushrooms. I’ll bring them to you tomorrow morning. I can bring you at least 100. How about 8 AM?” Feng Zhuang patted his firm chest, indicating that he would take care of this matter. The other martial artists also stepped forward and expressed that they could also bring some materials. They also hoped that Shield Ghost would give them a discount on account of this. Lin Xuan nodded repeatedly. He would buy raw materials at a low price and make potions through the medicinal table before selling them at a high price. It was a perfect cycle. Moreover, he did not need to do anything himself. Soon, the martial artists scattered. Lin Xuan also put away this piece of cloth. At this moment, he discovered that Silver Fox was also here. Silver Fox said in surprise, “You actually can take out so many high grade potions.” Lin Xuan smiled and said, “I’ve been lucky recently and rarely make white grade potions. The failure rate is also not too high.” Silver Fox sighed. “You’re much stronger than me and your combat strength is also powerful. In addition to that, you can even make potions. Your growth speed definitely far exceeds others.” “However, you might still have to worry about Mu Yang. Your Life Potion is of good grade and is sold at a low price. It will definitely affect Mu Yang’s business. He will definitely come and find trouble with you.” Silver Fox said solemnly, “Although fighting and killing are strictly prohibited in the gathering place, if he indirectly uses some despicable methods, I’m afraid you really won’t be able to retaliate.” Lin Xuan smiled. “Since I want to earn this money, I was naturally aware that this will affect his interests. A conflict is inevitable. I’ve long expected this.” Seeing that Shield Ghost seemed to be prepared, Silver Fox did not say anything else and turned to leave. At the same time, on the other side of the market area. The middle-aged man sat in front of the medicinal table and frowned slightly. The number of Life Potions he refined every day was limited, but every time, they would be sold out at three or four in the afternoon. However, it was already five in the afternoon today, and there were actually more than ten bottles that had not been sold. “What’s going on? The Life Potion is actually not selling. Aren’t these martial artists fighting to buy my potions every day?” Mu Yang was very puzzled. In fact, he could make more Life Potions every day than he could sell now. However, he deliberately chose not to use his full strength. This was because according to Garuda’s request, he had to control the number of life potions. He could not let everyone have a large number of Life Potions. Sometimes, lacking a bottle of Life Potion might make the difference between life and death. He wanted to use this method to reduce the number and strength of the martial artists in Colony Three as much as possible. This was a subtle method that was difficult to see through . At this moment, Mu Yang saw an old customer pass by in front of him. He hurriedly asked, “You’re not buying the Life Potion today?” The old customer was the burly Feng Zhuang. He smiled faintly and said, “The Life Potion you have here is too expensive. I bought some from another place.” Mu Yang was shocked. “There’s someone who can refine a better Life Potion than me?” Feng Zhuang sneered and said, “Not only is the effect of his Life Potion better than yours, but the price is also lower than yours! Let me give you a piece of advice. In the future, don’t be so smug. Otherwise, you won’t be able to earn a single cent!” He originally did not have a good impression of Mu Yang. However, there were not many people in Colony Three who could make the Life Potion. In the past, he could only buy it from Mu Yang at a high price. The Construction Division did have Life Potions. However, those potions were reserved for the members of the Construction Division and could not be distributed to outsiders. Now that there was a better and cheaper alternative, he simply stopped pretending and could not be bothered to pretend to be polite with Mu Yang. Seeing Feng Zhuang turn around and leave unceremoniously, Mu Yang stood up in anger. “In the future, if you want to buy my Life Potion, you have to pay at least three times the price of others!” Feng Zhuang did not even turn his head. “Don’t worry. In the future, not only me, but a lot of your customers will also stop buying Life Potions from you in the future. Don’t flatter yourself.” Mu Yang was furious. In the past, other than the members of the Construction Division, almost all the other martial artists had to buy life potions from him. He could increase the price if he wanted to. If any martial artist made him unhappy, he could directly increase the price by two to three times. The other party could only grit his teeth and suffer the consequences. But now, someone actually dared to go against him! “No, I need to have a monopoly on this business! No one can compete with me!” Mu Yang gritted his teeth. Mu Yang immediately grabbed a martial artist and asked about the situation. The other party was originally unwilling to tell him, but Mu Yang expressed his sincerity by offering to provide ten bottles of the Big Life Potion for free. The other party immediately beamed and told him the situation in detail. “Do you still have the Life Potion you bought there? I’ll use two Big Life Potions to exchange for it,” Mu Yang immediately said. The man nodded and handed over a bottle of Life Potion. After seeing the effect of this bottle of Life Potion, Mu Yang frowned deeply. It was really as Feng Zhuang had said. The effect was much better than the Life Potion he made and was also cheap. No wonder Feng Zhuang said that he could no longer keep his monopoly. “These are the ten bottles of Big Life Potion I promised you.” The person received the Big Life Potions with a smile and looked at the information. He was suddenly stunned. “Why are they only ordinary white grade?” Mu Yang sneered. “I didn’t say I was going to give you high grade potions.” That person looked furious. “Hmph! No wonder the other party was able to snatch your customers! You totally deserve it!” Mu Yang watched as this person left cursing, and a cold smile flashed across his face. “Snatch my customers? What right does a mere newbie potion maker have to snatch business from me?” Mu Yang sneered. He already had a series of plans in his mind that were enough to suppress that reckless newbie to death. What he wanted to do was actually very simple: rope in other potion makers and spend a lot of money to buy materials. He could do this because he was very rich! Every once in a while, India would give him “activities funds”, which were basically essence. Now that Garuda was here, this level nine Eighth Realm martial artist was even more generous. Every time, he would give 100,000 to 200,000 essence. This time, after Garuda heard about Mu Yang’s plan, he nodded in satisfaction and gave Mu Yang 500,000 in one go! In addition, Mu Yang had also saved up a lot of essence by selling the Life Potion at a high price! His total savings exceeded 4 million! He had enough essence to lower the price and occupy the market. In the end, when that newcomer was pushed out and the entire market belonged to him, he could increase the price and continue to monopolize the business. This was not the first time he had done such a thing. Every time, his plan would work as expected. No one could resist this powerful financial attack. … At dawn, Lin Xuan rolled out of bed. Actually, before he transmigrated, he was a man who struggled to wake up every day. However, at the thought of making money, he immediately had a powerful motivation. “The mere comfort of a blanket can’t seal my iron will.” Lin Xuan looked at the eight training avatars and muttered the word “collect”. [Current Training Area: Peak of the Falling Thunder Mountain (30 essence per minute)] [Rushing Thunder Lion has been training for 10 hours and has already reached the upper limit of its training time. Obtained 18,000 essence, 4 Seventh Realm skill books, 2 Seventh Realm equipment, 5 runes, 1 Thunder Rock Marrow, 1 Mystic Realm Pearl, 6 Thunder Rock, 7 Black Frost Flowers… Do you wish to collect?] [Fiery Mane Wolf (Male) has been training for 10 hours and has reached the training time. Obtained 18,000 essence…] [Fiery Mane Wolf (Female) Training for 10 hours…] […] [Current Training Area: Little Spirit Mountain periphery (25 essence per minute)] [Bloodsucking Mosquito has been training for 10 hours and has reached the upper limit of its training time. Obtained 15,000 essence, 5 Seventh Realm skill books, 3 Seventh Realm equipment, 1 rune, 1 Sarira, 29 Life Mushrooms… Do you wish to collect?] [Earth Lizard has been Training for 10 hours…] Crash. A large number of items appeared in Lin Xuan’s consciousness space. “Sarira? After training for a few days, I’ve finally obtained a specialty of the Little Spirit Mountain.” Lin Xuan was very happy and hurriedly took out the Sarira to carefully observe. This Sarira was the size of a thumb and shone brightly. Buddhist light flowed from it, and an exotic fragrance lingered. If one closed their eyes and sensed carefully, they would feel as if they had appeared in a temple. It was as if he could hear monks chanting scriptures. His entire body and mind seemed to have entered a transcendent realm. Then, he opened his eyes and returned to the small room. —- Name: Sarira Level: Level Nine Seventh Realm Grade: Peerless Golden Effect: Consumes 10% of one’s health to use the Sarira. It can make ghosts not dare to approach the area within 10 meters of the holder of the Sarira. Duration: 30 minutes. Current usage: 20/20. —- Lin Xuan nodded slightly. “It’s just as the martial artists said. With this thing, it’s equivalent to having absolute protection against the ghost lightning demon beasts. However, the drop rate is very low. There aren’t many Sariras in the entire Colony Three. However, Old Man Wu, the person in charge of Colony Three, seems to have one.” He did not believe it in the beginning. After all, how could the drop rate be so low? But now, he believed it. It had been a few days since he came to the Little Spirit Mountain, and he had also created four training avatars. However, this was still the first Sarira he obtained. “Compared to these things, I still care more about essence.” Lin Xuan counted and discovered that after these 10 hours of training, his eight training avatars had obtained a total of 130,000 essence. He looked at his essence again. “Not bad. I’ve already advanced once. I still have nearly 4 million essence.” Lin Xuan was very happy. He washed up and ran to the canteen to eat something before arriving at the stall again. When he arrived, he suddenly discovered that someone had actually arrived earlier than him to wait for him The burly martial artist, Feng Zhuang, was among them. Seeing Lin Xuan arrive, Feng Zhuang immediately welcomed him with a smile. “158 Life Mushrooms. These are the materials our team has accumulated over the past half a month.” The other martial artists also stepped forward. “Here are the Lightning Withered Trees, 143.” “This is the rare blue Water Source I found on the Little Spirit Mountain. If you need more, I can bring you 300 portions every day.” The martial artists were very enthusiastic. Compared to that ruthless Mu Yang, this young man called “Shield” was much more handsome and pleasing to the eye. Lin Xuan also nodded repeatedly and bought these materials. He had obtained a lot of materials through his training avatar, but he had to buy the materials from the outside world. Otherwise, outsiders would be suspicious. In any case, the materials were not expensive. Lin Xuan did not care about paying such a small price. It was always good to be cautious. Soon, the martial artists scattered. However, Feng Zhuang did not leave. Instead, he whispered, “Mu Yang has asked about you. He might make a move soon.” “It’s not easy for a newbie potion maker like you to come to Colony Three. You have to be careful.” Lin Xuan was slightly surprised. This martial artist was quite kind to actually remind him. Feng Zhuang smiled. “I’m only reminding you because you’re a businessman with a conscience. If you can completely take down Mu Yang, I’ll be even happier than you. Moreover, I can tell you with certainty that the other martial artists have the same thoughts.” Lin Xuan watched as Feng Zhuang left. This burly martial artist was surprisingly meticulous. Lin Xuan did not take Mu Yang and the others seriously. No matter what move the other party wanted to do, he was confident that he could handle it. Lin Xuan smiled. Just like yesterday, he set the projections of various potions on the cloth. This time, he did not only set 50 bottles like yesterday. Instead, he set 200 bottles for each potion. Then, he continued to lower the price of the potion. Yesterday, he asked for 100 essence for each bottle of blue grade Thunder Wound Potion. Today, he only asked for 80 essence. Similarly, he asked for 1000 essence for each bottle of purple grade Big Life Potion yesterday. Today, he only asked for 800 essence! After doing this, he quickly left. He still had to find other underground caves, so he naturally did not have time to stay here. Not long after Lin Xuan left, as time passed, the market area gradually became lively. The martial artists arrived in front of Lin Xuan’s stall and were shocked. “Yesterday, there were still 50 bottles. Today, there are 200 bottles?” “Don’t tell me this guy’s profession is even more impressive than the Great Potion Master profession?” “That’s impossible. I remember that this person used a big shield. He even blocked many ghosts in the medium-sized beast tide that night. If he’s a Great Potion Master, his combat strength should actually be very weak.” A female martial artist suddenly said solemnly, “Is it possible? I mean, is it possible that this guy is actually someone arranged by the Construction Division?” As soon as these words were spoken, all the martial artists were shocked. However, on careful thought, this explanation seemed very reasonable. It was very difficult for a single person to take out so many potions at once. This person must have a team behind him. In this Little Spirit Mountain, the Construction Division had the largest team! Moreover, the Construction Division always prepared in advance. Every once in a while, they would buy potions and stockpile them. If this person was backed by the Construction Division, then everything would be very easy to explain. “Perhaps the Construction Division sensed that Mu Yang and the others were working together to increase the price of the potions and decided to use this method to suppress them,” the female martial artist analyzed. “Very likely! Then we should respond more to the Construction Division! We should take down those bad guys from Muyang as soon as possible.” The other martial artists nodded repeatedly. The martial artists left messages in an orderly manner according to the order they arrived, explaining how many bottles of potions they wanted to buy. Some of the richer martial artists bought 50 bottles in one go and were almost beaten up by the martial artists behind. “If you buy so many, what are we supposed to do?!” “At most 20 bottles per person, no more!” The martial artists even formed an agreement that each person could only buy 20 bottles at most. Less than three hours after Lin Xuan left, all the potions in the stall had been pre-purchased, just like yesterday. The latecomers could only curse and shake their heads. They secretly swore that they would come early tomorrow! On the other side. In the most prosperous area of the market. Because there were the most people here, the rent here was also rather expensive. However, Mu Yang was not short of money and had always rented this land for a long time. At this moment, Mu Yang crossed his legs and leaned back leisurely. Relying on his powerful financial resources, other than a few stubborn people, he had already roped in most potion makers. These potion makers unanimously reduced the price by at least a fifth. In addition, Mu Yang also took out the Life Potions he had secretly made some time ago and put it all into the market. He had increased the number of potions and reduced the price of potions! It was a two-pronged attack! In this way, the martial artists would definitely run over to buy his potions immediately. How many bottles of Life Potion could a martial artist consume in a day? Therefore, after the martial artists bought enough Life Potions from him, they naturally would not go to the newbie potion maker to buy more potions. If this continued for three to four days, the newbie potion maker would definitely lose! In a price war, it was a competition of who had more funds! In this aspect, Mu Yang had never lost. Soon, his stall welcomed a martial artist. Mu Yang nodded in satisfaction. Although it was a little later than he had expected, his customer had finally arrived. “The price has decreased?” The other party seemed to be surprised. Mu Yang nodded indifferently. “It’s a huge discount. In the past, a bottle of blue grade Life Potion cost 300 essence. Now, it only costs 240 essence.” The martial artist had a pained expression. “240 essence… It’s still so expensive.” Mu Yang said disdainfully, “If you don’t like it, don’t buy it. I already have the cheapest Life Potion here.” The martial artist frowned. “If not for the fact that the Life Potion at Shield’s place has been sold out, I wouldn’t have come to your place.” With that said, the martial artist bought a bottle of blue grade Life Potion and turned to leave. Mu Yang frowned. What was going on? It was still so early… And yet the potions on the newbie potion maker’s side had all been sold out?! Then, more martial artists came to his stall. Without exception, the expressions on these martial artists’ faces were filled with regret and helplessness. It was as if they were very unwilling to come to him. “Even after the discount, you’re still asking for 240 essence? You call this a discount?” “In comparison, the prices of the potions at Shield are really reasonable.” “I have to wait there before eight tomorrow. I can’t miss it again.” The three martial artists whispered. The veins on Mu Yang’s forehead throbbed when he heard this. “Get lost! I won’t sell you these Life Potions!” The three martial artists also had furious expressions. “If not for the fact that the potions on Shield’s side were sold out, do you think we would be willing to come over?” “You deserve to have your business snatched away.” “We won’t come again in the future. Do whatever you want.” The three martial artists said a few words and quickly left. Mu Yang took a few deep breaths and calmed down. “What’s going on? That guy actually lowered the price again?” Mu Yang decided to leave the stall and discuss with the other potion makers to go and take a look. Soon, he found the potion maker he trusted. The potion maker knew where Lin Xuan’s stall was and immediately led him over. Mu Yang’s jaw almost dropped when he saw the price of the potion. “What’s going on?! Could he be losing money by selling at this price?” Mu Yang had a shocked expression. The potion maker who had brought him over was also dumbfounded. Although 1 Life Mushroom was only 10 essence, one still needed 3 Life Mushrooms and 1 portion of water to refine the Life Potion. Moreover, one also had to consider the failure rate and the final grade. The effect of an ordinary white grade potion was very poor. It could almost be considered a failure. The effect would only be better if it was at least a green grade potion. Even though Mu Yang was a Great Potion Master and had been doing this for seven to eight years, his failure rate was still as high as 20%. However, this failure rate was definitely very low among potion makers. Many of the potion makers in Colony Three had a failure rate of more than 40%. When newbies first entered the industry, their failure rate was even more tragic. It was very likely for them to have a failure rate of more than 50%, even 70%, or 80%. In addition, the cost of time had to be considered. After the failure of the potion, one would lose both materials and time. With the addition of these two costs, the price of the potions would naturally increase. The potion maker beside him pondered carefully. “Brother Mu, I suspect that this kid is losing money. As long as we hold on for a few more days, he definitely won’t be able to last longer than us.” Mu Yang agreed. How could someone’s medicinal success rate and high grade probability be so high while keeping the price so low? Impossible. It was absolutely impossible. The other party must be losing money with the intention of squeezing out his market share. The more Mu Yang thought about it, the more reasonable his prediction sounded. The shock on his face was gradually replaced by a sneer. “Let’s go. We’ll prepare to buy the materials at a high price. I want to see how long this kid can last!” The potion maker beside him nodded repeatedly. The two of them left casually. At the same time. Mu Yang’s competitor had already arrived near Colony Two. However, Lin Xuan did not enter Colony Two. Instead, he headed straight for the underground cave near Colony Two. There were many underground caves in the Little Spirit Mountain. Some were filled with danger, some did not even have many demon beasts, some produced stone cocoons, and some produced Life Mushrooms. The underground cave near Colony Three that produced stone cocoons was one of the largest underground caves. The one near Colony Two was a little smaller, but not by much. Moreover, because there were no stone cocoons here, very few people usually came here. Lin Xuan had long felt that the probability of Indian martial artists hiding here was higher. As expected, a few hours ago, his training avatar had discovered that there were Indian martial artists in the underground cave here, confirming his guess. After coming here, he decided to use the same method. He first found an abandoned temple and then created the Poison Blade avatar. Then, he immediately controlled Poison Blade to descend. “The Bloodsucking Mosquito I previously possessed is now at a depth of 600 meters. It’s good for me to let it scout the way and see how these Indian martial artists are doing.” Lin Xuan changed his perspective. Two perspectives appeared in front of him. One was Poison Blade’s perspective, and the other was the Bloodsucking Mosquito’s perspective. However, after flying for a while, Lin Xuan saw something strange from the Bloodsucking Mosquito’s perspective. If one had to describe it, it was a murderous aura. These Indian martial artists were not as lazy as before and seemed to be on guard. Lin Xuan chuckled. It seemed that not all Indian martial artists were stupid. He guessed that the enemy had probably found out that something was wrong, but they were not completely sure. They could only defend against possible enemies by strengthening their defense and increasing their vigilance. “Unfortunately, you don’t even know who I am.” How were they supposed to guess that a small Bloodsucking Mosquito would actually be the eyes and ears of a member of the Construction Division? How were they supposed to guess that someone would actually be so bold as to lure the ghosts to attack the Indian martial artists? “This time, I might as well use myself as bait to attract the ghosts.” “As long as I bring them to the dining area, I won’t have to do anything.” Lin Xuan controlled Poison Blade to quietly advance. Poison Blade entered the darkness like a fish sliding into water. His sense of existence was almost reduced to zero! Lin Xuan had long tested it. With the activation of various equipment and skills that weakened one’s presence, Poison Blade was almost like a chameleon. No matter where he was, he could quickly integrate into the environment and advance at high speed under the other party’s eyes. After passing through a thousand meters, Poison Blade quickly arrived. There were more ghosts gathered here than in the underground cave near Colony Three. Poison Blade slowly descended and used the same move. Soon, a large number of ghosts were attracted by the smell of human flesh. Poison Blade did not hesitate and activated Lightning Wind to rush towards the hiding place of the Indian martial artists. It was time for the ghosts to eat! Tens of thousands of ghosts surged out and washed the Indian martial artists’ hiding place with blood again. Although these Indian martial artists were very vigilant and the number of people they patrolled had already doubled, However, the appearance of so many ghosts was completely unexpected. In the past, no one had appeared in this underground cave at all. Why did the ghosts suddenly appear again and rush straight for them? Could it be that the ghosts were not lured? Were they simply rioting? However, they would never have the chance to find out. Most of the Indian martial artists died in the mouths of the ghosts. Facing this number of ghosts, no matter how powerful an individual was, it was difficult for them to escape death. The few who escaped were all heavily injured and were easily killed by Poison Blade. The entire process lasted for less than an hour. Satisfied with their meals, the ghosts left. Poison Blade entered the hiding place and walked around. He did not find any equipment that was suitable for him, but he did discover two equipment blueprints. They were both of peerless golden grade. One was a ring blueprint, and the other was a large shield blueprint. “I have a lot of ores. I’ll start forging now. I should be able to finish forging in two to three hours.” After doing this, Lin Xuan looked around as usual and swept away any traces that might have been left behind. Only after doing all this did he quickly leave. Another Indian martial artist’s hiding place had been broken through. Lin Xuan was very satisfied. If he destroyed a few more hiding places now, the pressure they would face in the future would be much smaller. At 5 PM, Lin Xuan arrived at the market area of Colony Three on time and arrived in front of his stall. Feng Zhuang and the other martial artists were already waiting here. What surprised Lin Xuan was that he actually saw Ye Yuqiu, Bai Xinghe, and the others. “Everyone, it’s time for the delivery again.” Lin Xuan took out bottles of potions from the storage compartment and handed them over to the martial artists one after another. However, when it was time to buy the materials, the martial artists all revealed embarrassed expressions. Feng Zhuang took out more than 80 Life Mushrooms and handed them to Lin Xuan. He snorted and said, “These guys are all a group of greedy weaklings. They said that they wanted to overthrow Mu Yang, but Mu Yang suddenly increased the purchase price of various materials by twofold. These guys swarmed over and sold the materials they originally planned to sell to you to Mu Yang!” The other martial artists’ expressions became even more embarrassed when they heard this. They were not in the right and could not retort after being scolded. To them, there was no situation more embarrassing than this. Ye Yuqiu, Bai Xinghe, Silver Fox, Black, and Flame Explosion stepped forward and took out their materials. “We also heard about this and specially found some materials for you.” Ye Yuqiu said solemnly. She had long heard from Silver Fox that Shield Ghost planned to start a medicinal business. It could be considered a side business to earn some essence. This was a very normal thing. However, she did not expect that the medicinal market of Colony Three had long been occupied by Mu Yang and the other potion makers. Shield Ghost’s actions had encroached on the interests of Mu Yang and the others. However, they didn’t expect Mu Yang’s counterattack to arrive so quickly! Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. So that was how it was. Mu Yang had already begun to buy the medicinal materials. Since Mu Yang had bought the materials at a high price, the martial artists naturally would not go against money. They would definitely go out and find various materials to sell to him. If he used this method to punish ordinary potion makers, he would be able to get rid of them one by one. Without materials, it was impossible to make potions. In a few days, if the potion maker could not make ends meet, they would either have to compromise and make peace with Mu Yang, or they would have no choice but to scram from Colony Three. However, this method was ineffective to Lin Xuan. It could only be said to be absolutely useless. Materials? He had a lot of them in his consciousness space. Essence? He still had millions of essence left. In fact, Lin Xuan was not in a hurry to level up because he had considered the price war tactic the other party might adopt. He could now use these millions of essence as his counterattack. A female martial artist was a little nervous. “I’m sorry. Although we also hate Mu Yang, the price he offered… is really irresistible.” “That’s right, that’s right. No one will go against money.” The thin and tall martial artist beside him could not help but nod. Feng Zhuang pointed at their noses and cursed, “It’s because of you people that Mu Yang can do whatever he wants. He has always monopolized the Life Potions. This is why he’s able to deliberately raise the price!” Lin Xuan smiled. “I was wondering what it was about. That’s all.” Feng Zhuang was stunned and said anxiously, “How are you going to compete with Mu Yang without the materials? At this rate, how are you going to survive in Colony Three?” Lin Xuan waved his hand. “Simple, I’ll pay a higher price than him.” Feng Zhuang was completely stunned. All the martial artists were also dumbfounded. What the hell? This guy was even a small tycoon? “From today onwards, everyone, remember this. No matter what price Mu Yang offers, I will pay one-third more than him.” “If I can’t take it out, please deduct all my battle merits from the Construction Division! There should be members of the Construction Division present, right? Please inform Old Wu.” Lin Xuan shouted. Swoosh! Swoosh! Swoosh! Several members of the Construction Division raised their hands. Feng Zhuang was shocked. “Are you crazy? Mu Yang is so rich. How can you compete with him?” Ye Yuqiu also frowned slightly. “Shield, you might not have a direct understanding of the essence accumulated by a Great Potion Master over the years.” Black gulped a few times and also said seriously, “Because we martial artists want to increase our levels as soon as possible, we rarely accumulate essence. As long as we have enough essence to advance, we will use it to advance immediately.” “However, potion makers are different. Their essence is money and liquid funds. It’s not an exaggeration to say that the essence accumulated by Mu Yang alone is two to three times that of the six of us combined.” Seeing that Lin Xuan’s expression still did not change, Silver Fox was helpless. Why was this child so stubborn?! Lin Xuan did not know whether to laugh or cry. Ye Yuqiu and the others were really concerned about him. They were worried that if he fought Mu Yang head-on, he would definitely be the one to suffer a crushing defeat in the end. “Don’t worry, I have a friend who’s coming to Little Spirit Mountain recently. He’s also slightly talented in medicine and has a little money. If I join forces with him, it shouldn’t be a problem for me to deal with Mu Yang.” Lin Xuan had long prepared an excuse. At this moment, he simply said it. “Who… is that friend of yours?” Bai Xinghe asked curiously. Lin Xuan smiled and looked at Ye Yuqiu, Black, and Silver Fox. “The three of you have met him before. We’ll see tomorrow.” Ye Yuqiu and the other two were confused. Who was it? And it was even a Seventh Realm martial artist they’ve seen before? Moreover, the other party was coming to the Little Spirit Mountain? Why didn’t they know about this? It wasn’t long before Mu Yang learned of this. After hearing this, he only sneered and said sarcastically. “How talented can one be with medicinal skills? Could he have a peerless golden medicinal skill?” “How much money can he have? How much more than me?” Mu Yang was very confident in himself. Forget about a friend. Even if the other party had three, five, or ten friends… Even with the essence of ten Seventh Realm martial artists combined, it was still very difficult for them to compete with him! As for his medicinal skill, it was even more obvious. Mu Yang’s medicinal skill had long been at the precious purple grade. It was still a distance away from the peerless golden grade, but it was enough for him to look down on most potion makers. “The more confident that new kid is now, the worse his fall will be in a few days! I can’t wait to see his incomparably vexed expression.” Mu Yang sneered. … At dusk, the night gradually approached. Logically speaking, no one would enter Colony Three from the outside at this time. However, the members of the Construction Division really saw a figure striding over. “Stop and register.” Today, the person in charge of the levels was not Old Wu, but a middle-aged man. The person was very cooperative and immediately stopped. The middle-aged man asked, “Name?” “Lin Xuan.” “Level.” “Level one Seventh Realm.” “Profession.” “Life-skill profession. I won’t go into the details of the profession.” The middle-aged man nodded and let them in. Many people would not talk about their professions in detail. After all, some people had weak professions. They were worried that others would look down on him. On the other hand, if one had a powerful profession, he would be targeted by bad people. In that case, he might as well not say anything and just say something vague. The main classes were naturally the four professions of armorer, warrior, mage, and assassin, as well as the life-skill profession. In Lin Xuan’s room. Ye Yuqiu was shocked. “Is this the friend you were talking about?” Black was dumbfounded. “I remember that this guy was only a Third Realm martial artist.” Silver Fox was the most shocked. “I really didn’t expect him to be the friend you were talking about.” Lin Xuan coughed lightly and pointed at the person beside him. “Let me introduce everyone. This is Lin Xuan, a friend of mine. He’s also Flame Explosion’s friend.” After saying this, he immediately felt strange and even wanted to laugh. He pointed at his avatar and said that this person was Lin Xuan. It was really a little difficult for him to keep up with his lies. Ye Yuqiu held her forehead. “No wonder the two of you weren’t surprised when I told you that Lin Xuan was missing in Dragon Sea City.” Black walked over and pinched the avatar. He asked suspiciously, “Are you really at the Seventh Realm?” The avatar smiled and said, “After Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion went to Dragon Sea City, I also left White Crane Town. Actually, I was already at the Sixth Realm at that time, but I didn’t deliberately expose myself.” Hiss… The others gasped. He was already at the Sixth Realm at that time? Damn, these three good friends were all geniuses. Silver Fox had a strange expression. “If I remember correctly, Lin Xuan was in the Germinal Organization in the past. He was a wasteland reclaimer under Lu Luo, right?” “Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion were also in East Lake City at that time. They were also basically under the Germinal Organization.” Lin Xuan and his two avatars nodded. Hiss… The cold air that he had just inhaled spat out again. Was a small Germinal Organization really that impressive? Three Sixth Realm martial artists appeared at the same time! No, they were all Seventh Realm experts now! “If Manager Number One knew that you guys were so powerful, his intestines would probably turn green from regret.” Silver Fox did not know whether to laugh or cry. Ye Yuqiu said solemnly, “Lin Xuan, Shield Ghost said that you have a bit of talent in medicine and you’ve also accumulated quite a fortune. Is that true?” The avatar scratched his head. “Sort of. My medicinal skill has barely reached the peerless golden grade.” Everyone was speechless. “???” You call this a bit of talent? The avatar smiled and said, “Actually, I also know how to forge. It’s also of peerless golden grade. The equipment Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion are using were also forged by me.” Everyone: “!!!” Damn, this guy sure was an exceptional logistician! Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion definitely struck out by having such a friend! Everyone quickly accepted “Lin Xuan”. Bai Xinghe, who had never seen “Lin Xuan”, was even more interested in him. Bai Xinghe found it difficult to imagine. How could a person have a peerless golden grade forging skill while also possessing a peerless golden grade skill? “I remember Shield Ghost once said that he was taught medicinal skills by a very powerful old man. Could it be…” Bai Xinghe said curiously. The avatar nodded. “That’s right. We have the same teacher.” Only then did Bai Xinghe nod in understanding. Although it was still somewhat unbelievable, it was still acceptable. Night fell. Lin Xuan and his avatar were squeezed into the same room. For the sake of convenience, Lin Xuan simply swapped his appearance with his avatar. From now on, Lin Xuan would be an all-rounder logistician with peerless golden grade medicinal and forging skills. On the other hand, one of his avatars would be Shield Ghost and the other would be Flame Explosion. “Perfect, the two pieces of equipment have been forged. Let’s see the effect.” Lin Xuan entered his consciousness space and discovered that two pieces of equipment emitting golden light had already appeared. The first equipment was called the “Lion Heart Tower Shield”. As the name suggested, it was a tower shield that was 1.7 meters long. When placed down, it could cover everything below the neck. If he lowered his head, it would be equivalent to covering his entire body. On the surface of this tower shield was a huge golden lion head. Its mouth was open and appeared to be roaring at the sky. It seemed very domineering. The second equipment was called the “Shadow Ring”. It was a ring made of purple-black crystal. Its appearance was somewhat evil, and it gave off a cold feeling. —- Name: Lion Heart Tower Shield Level: Level One Seventh Realm Grade: Peerless Golden Effect 1: Constitution+6% Effect 2: Physical Resistance+60%, Magic Resistance+50%, All Elemental Resistance+45%, reflective damage+40%. Effect 3: If the other party’s attack hits the Lion Heart Tower Shield, the other party’s highest attribute will decrease by 20%. —- In Lin Xuan’s opinion, the effect of the Lion Heart Tower Shield was simple and practical. Especially the third effect, it was definitely a big killing move for those martial artists who added points to the limit. The only person who could cause a certain amount of damage to Lin Xuan was someone who increased their points to the limit. —- Name: Shadow Ring Level: Level One Seventh Realm Grade: Peerless Golden Effect 1: Agility+15. Effect 2: Presence -30%. Effect 3: When in the shadows, one’s presence will be decreased by 25%, and one’s health and magic power recovery speed will increase by 60%. —- Lin Xuan’s eyes lit up. Good stuff! This was definitely a top-notch weapon for Poison Blade Avatar. In this way, his presence would decrease by 100%, and he had already reached the upper limit. The third effect of this item was also very ridiculous. As long as one stood in the shadows when injured, their health and magic power recovery speed would directly double, regardless of whether Lin Xuan was injured or not. If he was injured, he would be able to enter the battle again in a few minutes. “These Indians sure have a lot of treasures on them. They can make me rich every time.” Lin Xuan laughed unkindly. … In the underground cave near Colony Two. Garuda and Mu Yang appeared and saw such a miserable scene. Their expressions instantly turned solemn. Garuda took a look and realized that it was the same as last time. The deceased’s belongings were not missing. The crystal skull was not lost either. There were no weapons or signs of fighting on the ground. The only problem was that two people were missing. Moreover, the two missing people were the strongest people in this hiding place. Logically speaking, if the ghosts had really erupted and suddenly attacked the hiding place, these two people should be the ones with the highest chances of escaping. “They have already increased the patrol according to my instructions, but they still haven’t discovered any outsiders,” Garuda said coldly. Not long ago, he had received a distress call from the Indian martial artists here. The other party’s words were very urgent. However, he did not mention any outsiders. He only said that a large number of ghosts had suddenly attacked the hiding place. From the beginning to the end, it didn’t seem like any outsiders had appeared. As powerful and resolute as Garuda was, he also rubbed his temples. “Could it be that I’ve really done too much? Is it really just a ghost riot? What do you think?” Mu Yang had never dared to speak. Hearing this, he also said carefully, “I also think that it’s because of the ghosts. How can anyone reach a thousand meters underground under the noses of these martial artists and lure the ghosts to attack the hiding place?” “The Indian martial artists sent to the Little Spirit Mountain this time are all powerful and are outstanding among those of the same level. It’s impossible for the other party to bypass them.” Garuda nodded. Mu Yang’s analysis matched his thoughts. “I’ll request the headquarters to give the next batch of martial artists something that can resist the ghosts,” Garuda said slowly. He had originally wanted to do this in the beginning, but the drop rate of the “Sun Key” that opened the door of light was too low. Ever since the incident with Dart, the higher-ups had been extremely strict with the Sun Keys. They did not allow any Sun Keys to be leaked and did not allow anyone to use the Sun Key in private. Once someone obtained the Sun Key, they had to hand it over. Otherwise, they would be charged with treason. At that time, Dart had been extremely lucky and obtained the Sun Key in the Seventh Realm mystic realm. He could not help but use it and happened to open the door of light to the Falling Thunder Mountain. Other than Dart’s Sun Key, most of the subsequent Sun Key were gathered and used on the Little Spirit Mountain. Garuda suddenly asked, “How’s your matter going?” Mu Yang’s forehead was covered in cold sweat. Under normal circumstances, ordinary potion makers would be forced to compromise by him in at most three days. However, this new potion maker was really beyond his expectations. He was forced to fight a price war and increase the price of the materials to suppress this person. Mu Yang thought for a moment and said, “I’m preparing to raise the price, but a new potion maker is going against me and I’m currently suppressing him.” Garuda frowned slightly. “Since I gave you the funds for the event, you have to do it well. Otherwise, I can easily find someone else to replace you.” Mu Yang’s forehead was covered in bean-sized sweat. He was most afraid of Garuda saying this. If Garuda said this, it meant that he was no longer useful and was about to be abandoned. “Sir, don’t worry. The results will be out in at most three days! If he doesn’t compromise by then, he would have to pack his bags and leave Colony Three,” Mu Yang said solemnly. Garuda said indifferently, “What if he wins?” Mu Yang hesitated and said, “Then…” Garuda frowned. “Then kill them. Do you still need me to teach you this?” Mu Yang’s neck shrank. “I’m just a potion maker. How can I kill people?” Garuda had a disappointed expression. “Don’t you know how to hire people? If you hire people, even the killers won’t know who you are.” Mu Yang nodded repeatedly and did not dare to say anything. Garuda shook his head secretly. This spy was quite capable. However, the other party was greedy and timid. Garuda still had to teach him such things. “Go back.” Garuda waved his hand. Mu Yang could not help but ask, “Don’t we have to collect their corpses?” Garuda sneered. “Collect their corpses? They’re just a group of low-level people from the officer faction. It’s their honor to die for India.” Mu Yang nodded vigorously. … The sky gradually brightened. Lin Xuan stretched his back and arrived at the market area half an hour early with Shield Ghost. They arrived at the old place where he had set up the stall last time. To his surprise, there were already dozens of martial artists waiting here! Lin Xuan swept his gaze over and discovered that many people had dark circles under their eyes. Could it be that they had come to queue at three or four in the morning? Moreover, as the time approached 8 AM, more martial artists were rushing over. Seeing that there were already dozens of people waiting in front, these people all revealed vexed expressions. “Damn, what time did you guys come? I came at 7:30, but there are actually more than 40 people queuing here.” “I came at five.” “I came at 4:30.” “How can I compete with you if I don’t come early? Hehehe.” The martial artists who were staring at the line with dark circles under their eyes had tired expressions and sleepy eyes. At this moment, all of them chuckled unkindly. Feng Zhuang pounded his chest and stomped his feet. “Damn! I’ll bring a blanket next time!” The previous few times, he had been one of the first few people to arrive. However, this time, about sixty people had arrived before him. According to the queue, he probably would not even be able to buy a single bottle of potion. Lin Xuan smiled and let Shield Ghost speak. “Everyone, let me introduce you to the person beside me. He’s Lin Xuan. He’s my friend. In addition, he’s also a martial artist with peerless golden grade medicinal and forging skills.” As soon as these words were spoken, everyone was shocked. “Huh? Did I hear wrongly?” “Golden! Medicinal Skill! Forging Skill! Double skills!” “Damn, is there really such an omnipotent logistician?” “Therefore, the number of potions we have today has increased from 200 bottles each to 500 bottles each! My friend brought in a lot of potions from outside. Everyone, don’t worry about the potions running out,” Shield Ghost said with a smile. The short shock the martial artists experienced quickly turned into ecstasy! “Damn! 500 bottles each?!” “Awesome, two martial artists with golden medicinal skills are freaking awesome!” “Wuwuwu, from now on, I don’t have to buy high-priced and low grade life potions from Mu Yang anymore.” “I love it, I love it. Mom, you don’t have to worry about me being unable to take drugs anymore.” The martial artists immediately began to buy crazily. Of course, because the upper limit for individual purchases was 20 bottles, there were a lot of people who successfully bought the potions in the end. Feng Zhuang scratched his head. “You’re Lin Xuan, right? Do you really have a peerless golden grade forging skill?” Lin Xuan looked at this rough-looking but actually meticulous martial artist and smiled. “What do you want to forge?” “I have a peerless golden grade blueprint, but the craftsmen in our Colony Three told me that he might not be able to forge it. Even if he does succeed and barely forges it, the grade might very well decrease. Therefore, I haven’t dared to forge it for fear of wasting it.” Feng Zhuang was a little hesitant. Lin Xuan directly said, “As long as you prepare the relevant materials, there’s nothing I can’t forge.” “If you fail, the materials will be returned. I’ll personally compensate you with two precious purple grade blueprints.” When Feng Zhuang heard this, he instantly cried. This was great! What kind of VIP treatment was this? It was too noble. In comparison, Mu Yang was totally a black-hearted businessman! Lin Xuan was a true businessman with a conscience! Feng Zhuang hurriedly took out the blueprint and materials, plus 50,000 essence. 50,000 essence was the average forging price of a peerless golden equipment. “I prepared it long ago. Can you forge it now?” he hurriedly asked. Lin Xuan nodded. “It’s not convenient here. I’ll bring it back to forge. I’ll deliver it at 8 AM tomorrow.” Feng Zhuang nodded gratefully. “Alright, alright, alright. You don’t have to rush it. I’m not in a hurry.” The female martial artist and the thin martial artist also hurriedly stepped forward and took out their trump cards. They also had the same thoughts as Feng Zhuang. The forgers in Colony Three were not good enough. If the forging failed, they would be extremely sad. It was better for them to keep it. Now that Lin Xuan had said that he had a golden grade forging skill and had made such a promise, they naturally trusted him and stepped forward. In less than an hour, Lin Xuan received 18 forging commissions and also obtained 900,000 essence. Even Black, Bai Xinghe, and the others took out the blueprints on their bodies, hoping that Lin Xuan could forge good equipment for them. At this moment, Ye Yuqiu pulled Lin Xuan to the side. “I have a set of blueprints. Each of them is of peerless golden grade. The enhancement of the set has even reached the legendary dark gold grade. I haven’t been able to find a trustworthy forger. I wonder if you can…?” she asked seriously. Lin Xuan was slightly surprised. A set consisting of peerless golden grade items could actually reach the dark gold grade! Ye Yuqiu was really lucky! “Don’t worry, as long as it’s not a dark gold equipment, I can forge it.” He smiled and nodded. It was not difficult to forge a single golden grade item. It was fine as long as he upgraded the forging table. After doing this, Lin Xuan bade farewell to the martial artists. “I still have something to do. Let’s meet again at 5 PM.” The martial artists also watched Lin Xuan leave with smiles. “Lin Xuan is really a good person.” “An all-rounder logistician! His personality is also so approachable. It’s difficult for him not to earn money!” “I want to see how long Mu Yang can last! Do you want to bet that Mu Yang will definitely lose?!” The martial artists discussed with smiles on their faces. In the crowd, a martial artist slowly left and soon appeared at Mu Yang’s stall. Mu Yang was originally leisurely making potions. When he heard the news from this martial artist, his hand trembled and he added an extra set of materials. The potions were instantly scrapped. Mu Yang said in shock, “Golden medicinal skill and golden forging skill… Where did that newbie potion maker find this big shot?!” The martial artist who informed him scratched his head. “I don’t know either, but he seems really powerful.” “By the way, that Lin Xuan also said that no matter what the price you offer for the materials, he will always offer a price that is one-third higher than yours.” There was a click. Mu Yang almost shattered the glass spoon in his hand. “You’re too much! You only have a little money. Do you really think you can compete with me?” Mu Yang took a deep breath and slowly calmed down. “Alright, fine! Let’s continue this price war. Let’s see who can hold on for the longest!” “This is your reward.” With that said, he threw over five bottles of blue grade Big Life Potion. The martial artist grinned and left. … Colony Three, Construction Division camp. Old Wu and Li Weiguo sat opposite each other and drank warm alcohol. “Those little guys you brought in from outside have been stirring up trouble recently,” Old Wu chuckled. Li Weiguo said indifferently, “Isn’t that good? You said it yourself. You’ve long disliked Mu Yang’s monopoly.” Old Wu nodded. “I really can’t stand it, but we still have to follow the rules. The Construction Division can’t use their power to suppress others. Otherwise, others will secretly criticize them.” “However, this Lin Xuan is really interesting. He and Shield actually joined forces to compete with Mu Yang.” Li Weiguo smiled faintly. “Are you worried that they won’t have the money?” Old Wu said, “To be honest, I’m a little worried. You don’t know how much money Mu Yang has saved! That guy is too ridiculous.” Li Weiguo smiled and said, “Then why don’t we add fuel to the fire?” “Alright, the next stage of the procurement plan for Colony Three has already been released. I don’t plan to give Mu Yang and the others a share. I’ll give them all to Lin Xuan.” Old Wu smiled slyly. “In this way, I’ll definitely be able to deal a heavy blow to Mu Yang’s so-called Potion Maker Alliance.” Li Weiguo nodded. “Recently, I discovered something interesting.” “Oh?” “This Mu Yang would disappear for most of the day every few days. He announced to the public that he was going out to find materials, but he could directly buy them. Why would he still need to go out and find them himself?” Li Weiguo said indifferently. “Therefore, I followed him once.” “What did you find?” “He got rid of me before I could find anything.” Li Weiguo was helpless. Old Wu was stunned for a moment before he laughed loudly. “I’m dying of laughter. You’re only an Eighth Realm martial artist, but you were actually shaken off by someone with a life-skill profession who doesn’t know how to fight at all.” Li Weiguo was helpless. “It’s true that he has a life-skill profession, but that doesn’t mean that he hasn’t learned any skills other than life skills. For example, Invisibility? Traceless Technique?” “Besides, as much as I hate to admit it, I’m only good at frontal combat. Stalking really isn’t my forte.” Old Wu smiled even more happily, like an old urchin. “Indeed.” “This Mu Yang is worth investigating. Just colluding with the other potion makers to deliberately increase the price is already worth pondering over. This move of his indirectly caused many martial artists to lack potions,” Li Weiguo said solemnly. Old Wu waved his hand. “There’s no hurry. There might be a large-scale beast tide in five days at most. At that time, India will definitely make a move. If this Mu Yang is a spy, he will definitely make a move. We’ll wait and see.” … Four days later. Mu Yang’s eyes were red and bloodshot. He had been having nightmares for several days. Did Lin Xuan and Shield have endless funds? Why was it that no matter how he raised the price, the other party was still able to offer a higher price? This was too ridiculous! Mu Yang even guessed that it was very likely that the Construction Division was directly supporting Lin Xuan and Shield. Otherwise, it was impossible to explain why they had such a huge amount of money. The five potion makers gathered beside him with frowns. “Is there any essence left?” Mu Yang slowly said with a hoarse voice. A potion maker looked up and said helplessly, “Brother Mu, you know me. I never spend my money overnight. Any money that I earn in one day will be spent on the same day.” Mu Yang stared at the next potion maker, who scratched his head. “Brother Mu, you know me. My money… is all in the Construction Division. They even pay interest.” Mu Yang gritted his teeth. “Trash! You guys can’t even take out any essence when I need you to!” The potion makers all shrank their heads and did not speak. They cursed in his heart. Didn’t Mu Yang himself also lack the essence? They didn’t understand how he could be so shameless. “How many people left today?” Mu Yang asked in a hoarse voice again. A potion maker stood up and said, “Two. They don’t want to fight a price war with Lin Xuan anymore. They said that they were prepared to be neutral. Including them, eight people have already left us to remain neutral.” “Before I came here, Little Li told me that he’s not coming. He asked me to tell you that he feels that the Construction Division must be supporting Lin Xuan and the others from behind. We really can’t compete with them,” another potion maker whispered. The other potion makers also nodded silently. The Construction Division handed all the orders to the potion makers standing on Lin Xuan’s side, but they did not leave any for those on Mu Yang’s side. On the surface, the reason was that Lin Xuan could give an even lower price. However, who did not know the actual reason? The Construction Division had long been dissatisfied with the monopoly of the Muyang Alliance! This time, it was just that many factors had gathered and erupted at the same time. Mu Yang’s heart was bleeding. He had spent a lot of money to rope in these potion makers. The unbreakable Iron Alliance had collapsed on its own after only a few days! “Continue to make potions. As for the funds, I have another way.” Mu Yang turned around and left, preparing to ask Garuda for money. Not long after leaving Colony Three, Mu Yang sensed that someone was following him. He sneered. It was that crippled Eighth Realm martial artist again. Although Mu Yang was a Great Potion Master. However, before he became a Great Potion Master, he was a true mage! It was only because of India’s request that he changed his profession to become a Great Potion Master. Therefore, he had combat skills that were enough to guarantee that he would not be helpless in battle. In addition, he had also mastered the Anti-Tracking Technique. He had learned this early on before becoming a spy. Li Weiguo was not good at tracking at all. He only accelerated a few times and quickly lost to the other party. Li Weiguo was helpless and could only turn back. Without any evidence, he could not accuse the other party of anything. Soon, Mu Yang found Garuda and explained his intentions. Garuda frowned deeply, his face filled with anger. During the price war, Mu Yang had already asked him for money. He had even asked him twice. In the first two times, Garuda had patiently given him money. Moreover, each time, he had given the other party four to five hundred thousand essence. However, this was the third time! Garuda wondered if this Mu Yang was useless and whether the other party had pocketed all the money that he had received. “Trash, you can’t even do this well!” Garuda berated. Mu Yang lowered his head in fear. The anger of a level nine Eighth Realm martial artist was far from what he could endure. After a while, Garuda snorted. “There’s no point in continuing the price war.” Mu Yang was first stunned, then he was incomparably surprised. “Are we going to fight?” Garuda was satisfied. “In at most a day or two, the ghosts will attack the three colonies on the Little Spirit Mountain. According to my guess, the strength of the three colonies are at most capable of blocking a large-scale beast tide. They will definitely suffer heavy casualties.” “At this moment, we can successfully complete the combat mission by killing our way out.” “At that time, we can bring Little Spirit Mountain under the control of India!” Mu Yang hurriedly flattered, “Sir, what a good plan!” Then, he hesitated for a moment and asked, “Lord Garuda, did the death of the two Indian martial artists from the previous hiding spots affect the overall situation?” Garuda sneered. “It’s just a few dozen Seventh Realm experts. It won’t affect the overall situation.” “Don’t be too high-profile for the next two days. Just play your role in peace.” “Yes!” Mu Yang hurriedly nodded. From the looks of it, Little Spirit Mountain would soon be under Indian control. Moreover, he was soon going to be above everyone! Night fell. After a busy day of work, Master Lin Xuan packed up and went home. During this period of time, he had bought a large number of materials at a high price and had already caused huge pressure to Mu Yang and the other potion makers. The potion orders given to them by the Construction Division were the last straw that broke the camel’s back. As expected, he had won this price war. “The Construction Division’s orders are quite intense. They had even asked for 1000 bottles of Basic Thunder Wound Potion…. Moreover, the grade has to be above the rare blue grade.” Lin Xuan smiled. Thanks to the orders from the Construction Division, he directly earned more than 8 million essence. Coupled with the essence of the forging equipment, his earnings exceeded 10 million! Although he had also spent a lot of essence to buy the materials at a high price, Lin Xuan had already made a name for himself. In the future, Mu Yang and the other potion makers would no longer have any room for survival and their reputation would also be ruined. “Let’s level up first.” Lin Xuan invested 3 million essence to increase his level to level three Seventh Realm. As usual, he invested all nine free attribute points into his Constitution. As a result, his Constitution reached 460 points. At the same time, he also took out the 100 Mystic Realm Pearls he had accumulated recently and directly increased the grade of the High-Level Avatar Technique. After upgrading to the legendary dark gold grade, the effect of the High-Level Avatar Technique changed again. The number of avatars he could create directly increased from three to five! “Oh? Something’s wrong!” At this moment, Lin Xuan’s training avatar suddenly saw something. He was also stunned and immediately changed his perspective. He was surprised to discover a tall man appear from the underground cave and stride into the wilderness. A wandering ghost nearby smelled the smell of human flesh and immediately pounced at him. However, the tall man only casually slashed out before the other party turned into smoke that scattered in the air. The tall man walked to a certain place and stopped, casually dealing with the nearby ghosts. He stood there and took out a red key from his pocket and gently inserted it into the air. The next moment, red light suddenly surged from the key and quickly condensed into the outline of a door of light. Then, this door of light appeared out of thin air! The door of light expanded and contracted indeterminately, as if it would close at any moment. The tall man did not stop. He took out two more keys from his pocket and inserted them into the air. In the same manner, he opened two more doors of light. Lin Xuan’s eyes trembled. Was that the treasure India used to open the connection between the mystic realm and the mystic realm? In less than a few seconds, a large number of Indian martial artists surged out. These martial artists all bowed respectfully to the tall man. After a while, two similarly tall men passed through the door of light. The three men looked at each other and nodded as a form of greeting. Lin Xuan sensed an extremely dangerous smell from their bodies. The other party was at least an Eighth Realm martial artist and was very likely above level seven Eighth Realm! Then, he counted the Indian martial artists who had entered through the three fluctuation doors. “Damn… a total of 179 people! All of them are Seventh Realm martial artists!” Lin Xuan clicked his tongue. The various large organizations would not reveal the true number of their high-level combat strength. Moreover, even if the enemy wanted to investigate, it would be very difficult. After all, aside from the Seventh Realm martial artists that needed to guard the various cities, most Seventh Realm and above martial artists stayed in the mystic realm for a long time. They needed to train and become stronger in the mystic realm. The various large organizations also needed them to maintain the overall number of demon beasts and prevent the demon beasts from surging out of the mystic realm. Lin Xuan also discovered something shocking. When these martial artists appeared, the ghosts not far away clearly saw them and also smelled the smell of human flesh, but they seemed to be shocked by something and actually did not dare to come over. “Could it be that they’ve already learned their lesson after being tricked by me twice?” Lin Xuan scratched his head. “However, India sent 179 Seventh Realm martial artists over at once. There’s definitely going to be a huge operation!” Lin Xuan controlled this Bloodsucking Mosquito to quietly follow behind them. He discovered that these 179 people were divided into three groups. The three tall men each led a group as they entered the underground cave separately and hid in different places. Lin Xuan was pleasantly surprised to discover that there were already Indian martial artists hiding in these three hiding spots. Including these 179 people, there were already more than 300 people! “Good! I discovered three hiding spots this time! I’ve profited greatly!” “If we can kill all 300 of them, India’s plan to destroy the Little Spirit Mountain Construction Division from the inside will definitely fail!” Lin Xuan paced back and forth in the room. Old Wu had mentioned this to him when they were distributing the medicinal orders for the Construction Division. It was said that a large-scale beast tide might appear in a day or two. As a result, the Lightning Tower was in a charging state the entire time. Old Wu also communicated with the people in charge of the other two colonies. He believed that if India made a big move, they would very likely take advantage of the large-scale beast tide to attack. This time, India directly sent 179 people through the door of light, confirming the words of Old Wu and the others. The big fight was coming! “But what should I do to hurt these people as much as possible?” Lin Xuan’s battle plan quickly flashed through his mind. The first plan that came up was naturally to lure the ghosts to attack. However, he quickly rejected this plan. It was unknown what those Indian martial artists had brought in that could actually make the ghosts retreat. “India only controls one large mystic realm, right? Could it be another treasure produced by the Sunrise City? This Sunrise City is really impressive…” Lin Xuan did not know whether to laugh or cry. A single Sunrise City actually produced three treasures, including the Bloodline Fruit, the Sun Key, and the crystal ball that could disperse ghosts! It had to be known that the Falling Thunder Mountain only had the Thunder Rock Marrow and the Little Spirit Mountain only had the Sarira. There were more treasures in the Kunlun Ruins. For example, there was the Protection Runes, Green Blood Pills, and so on “I heard that the danger level of Sunrise City is not high. It’s simply too good. No wonder India’s strength has been steadily increasing. Moreover, they’re even crossing the line and attempting to encroach on the Little Spirit Mountain and the Kunlun Ruins…” Lin Xuan sighed in his heart. “Since the ghosts are useless… it seems that there’s only one last way.” Lin Xuan quickly took out a pen and paper and wrote an anonymous letter. He wrote down the number of people in each hiding place as well as the location and depth of the three hiding places in detail. He even specially mentioned that there should be at least one Eighth Realm martial artist leader in each of the three hiding places. After doing this, he created an avatar and equipped him with Poison Blade equipment. He then controlled this avatar to immediately enter the night like a fish entering the water. The reduction of presence brought by the various equipment had already reached the upper limit of 100%. With his presence -100%, as long as he traveled in the shadow, he could almost sneak past under the noses of martial artists of the same level. With a few leaps, Poison Blade quietly arrived at Old Wu’s residence. He stuck the anonymous letter to Old Wu’s window and then tapped the glass lightly. After doing this, he disappeared into the darkness again. The entire process lasted for less than three seconds. By the time Old Wu crawled out of the blanket and opened the window, Lin Xuan was already hundreds of meters away. “Tsk! Which immoral person would knock on the window in the middle of the night? As an old person, I don’t have a lot of energy… Why can’t they let me sleep in peace…” “Eh, a letter?” Old Wu was stunned for a moment. He opened it and his expression instantly turned solemn. Then, he was somewhat happy. “If this letter is true, it will definitely be a fatal blow to India!” “However, we have to investigate in advance before we can come to a conclusion.” Originally, Old Wu was already not very energetic. After reading this letter, he was instantly energetic and immediately felt that the lively version of him from more than 20 years ago had returned. Old Wu changed his equipment and immediately found Li Weiguo. After explaining his intentions, the two of them headed straight for Colony Two and Colony Three. Neither of them were good at reconnaissance. However, the people in charge of Colony Two and Colony One were all assassin professionals and were very good at reconnaissance operations. It was best to leave this matter to the two of them. The person in charge of Colony Two and Colony One was also sleeping. At this moment, he was woken up and immediately cursed back. However, after hearing the other party’s description, these two people in charge had the same reaction as Old Wu. They immediately became energetic. Their waists and legs were no longer sore, and they wished they could rush to the three hiding places to investigate. Under the night sky, Old Wu and Li Weiguo watched the two people in charge leave, feeling uneasy. They were shocked by the boldness of the Indian higher-ups. They had actually sent more than 300 Seventh Realm martial artists to ambush the Little Spirit Mountain. They were also amazed by the strength of the person who sent the anonymous letter. How powerful was this person? He could actually obtain such detailed information. It even included the location and depth of each hiding place! This was awesome. More than two hours later, the news brought by the two people in-charge completely shocked them. The situation they had discovered was identical to the information provided by the anonymous letter provider! “This anonymous letter provider is definitely an Eighth Realm martial artist. Moreover, his reconnaissance ability is even above ours.” The person in charge of Colony Two said solemnly. He even left out some of the details because he was too embarrassed. Because the other party’s anti-reconnaissance ability was also very powerful, he did not dare to get too close and only roughly observed the other party’s numbers. However, the anonymous letter provider could accurately provide the number of people, location, and depth. How powerful did the other party have to be to do this? The person-in-charge of Colony One scratched his head. “Eighth Realm martial artists… I know almost all of them. I’ve even seen every assassin. Who is this person? Could he be deliberately teasing us?” Old Wu also scratched his head. That’s right. There were many Seventh Realm martial artists. In particular, there were more than 3,000 Seventh Realm martial artists in every mystic realm. There were even more people in Drowning City. As the front line of the battle between the Construction Division and the demon beasts, more than 5,000 Seventh Realm martial artists had gathered there. However, there were not many Eighth Realm martial artists. There were only about a thousand of them. Old Wu said solemnly, “Could it be a trap set by the Indian spies?” “I don’t think so. The other party didn’t sense me approaching at all.” “Could it be that this anonymous letter provider has just broken through to the Eighth Realm and happened to discover the situation of the Indian martial artists?” Li Weiguo asked curiously. “In that case, it’s very likely.” The person in charge of Colony Two nodded. “But how do you explain his unwillingness to directly appear and instead use an anonymous letter?” The four Eighth Realm martial artists scratched their heads crazily, not understanding what the anonymous letter provider was thinking. Li Weiguo said solemnly, “Then let’s think about what to do.” “I have a bold idea…” Old Wu whispered. “I have an immature suggestion for your idea…” the person in charge of Colony Two whispered. “I have a plan that’s not perfect…” The person in charge of Colony One nodded. The four Eighth Realm martial artists gathered together to communicate. Those who did not know better would think that they were conducting a private transaction. After a series of intense exchanges, the four of them finally reached an agreement. They would beat them at their own game! It was not that they had not thought of sending people to attack these hiding places now. However, after attacking one hiding place, the people from the other two will definitely sense that something was wrong. However, if they were to attack three hiding spots at the same time, they would not have enough manpower. The manpower here naturally referred to martial artists with powerful combat strength and high loyalty. This kind of surprise attack naturally could not be casually organized and consist of some civilian martial artists. Who knew how many of them were spies? Even if they were not spies from India, they could still be spies from other organizations. These spies would definitely be very happy to see the Construction Division suffer serious damage. They would most likely inform the Indian martial artists at the hiding place. Excluding these civilian martial artists, there were naturally still a lot of people from the Construction Division. However, it was even more difficult to mobilize them secretly without alerting the others. The other party had more than 300 people and at least three Eighth Realm martial artists. If they wanted to destroy them with lightning-fast methods, they would need to mobilize at least 600 Seventh Realm martial artists and more than six Eighth Realm martial artists. The mobilization of 600 people was definitely not easy. Moreover, they still lacked two Eighth Realm martial artists left. Either way, it would attract the attention of others and leak the news. Therefore, the four of them still used the method of beating the enemy at their own game and did not act. They quickly applied to transfer two Eighth Realm martial artists with powerful combat strength from the outside. Only when the number of high-level combatants increased could they be at ease. Old Wu recalled the situation of the medium-sized beast tide and reminded, “By the way, I still have to apply for more Thunder Rock Marrow to be brought in. This thing is very suitable for charging the Lightning Tower. It can increase the power and killing range of the Lightning Tower for a short period of time.” The other three nodded repeatedly. The four of them exchanged a few more words before scattering again and quietly returning to their respective colonies, as if nothing had happened. At dawn, the two Seventh Realm martial artists arrived at Colony Two and Colony One through the registration path. Seventh Realm martial artists entered the Little Spirit Mountain every day. Their appearance did not cause any waves. However, other than Li Weiguo, Old Wu, and the other two, no one knew that they were actually two level six Eighth Realm martial artists! Time passed bit by bit. At 3 PM, Lin Xuan arrived early today to deliver the forged equipment. He had long agreed to meet the other martial artists at this time. Actually, he had long finished forging. However, in order to not appear too high-profile, he deliberately delayed for a few days. Otherwise, it would really be a little shocking for him to finish forging so many golden equipment in a day. Feng Zhuang was already the first to line up. Seeing Lin Xuan appear, he immediately chuckled. “Lin Xuan, these are the skill books you wanted. There are more than a hundred of them. I’ve brought them all.” He smiled and handed over a bag of skill books. “However, that skill book is too difficult to find. I went to Colony Two yesterday but couldn’t find it.” Lin Xuan was very surprised. “I had only mentioned it casually. You actually went to look for it?” Feng Zhuang smiled in embarrassment. “You and Shield have done so much for us and even defeated that bloodsucker Mu Yang. I’ve always wondered if there was a way for me to repay you. This is just a small matter that’s not worth mentioning.” Lin Xuan’s heart warmed. Feng Zhuang had a good personality. When he was selling potions, the two of them would chat when they had nothing to do. Back then, Lin Xuan casually mentioned that he needed some skill books if Feng Zhuang was willing to help him gather the relevant skill books. Lin Xuan did not expect Feng Zhuang to remember this. He could already create five avatars. Other than Shield Ghost, Flame Explosion, and Poison Blade, he also needed to equip the other two avatars. Lin Xuan pondered for a while and decided to make one of them an ice mage and the other a healer. The skill books he got Feng Zhuang to collect were all related to these two professions. “Lin Xuan, how’s… my golden equipment?” Feng Zhuang rubbed his hands nervously. He was a little worried that Lin Xuan would not be able to successfully forge that equipment. Lin Xuan took out a huge hammer from his consciousness space. The hammer was more than 1.8 meters tall, and its entire body emitted a cold aura of steel, filled with pressure. “This is the equipment you entrusted me to forge. Keep it well.” Feng Zhuang was overjoyed and hurriedly held the huge hammer that was glowing with golden light. His rough hand caressed the cold body of the hammer, as if this was not a hammer but his nonexistent wife. “I didn’t expect you to really forge it successfully!” Feng Zhuang’s eyes were filled with tears. This was the first Seventh Realm golden equipment he had obtained! Although he had obtained one or two previously, However, as his level increased, the effect of these equipment became too weak, so he had no choice but to entrust others to sell these equipment to lower-level martial artists. Most martial artists were not like Lin Xuan, who had enough equipment essence to strengthen their equipment. Unless it was an especially good equipment, they would not consume the essence of the equipment to increase its strength. They would use it if they could and sell it if they could not use it. Aside from his peerless golden hammer, Feng Zhuang only had three Seventh Realm purple equipment. The rest were all Seventh Realm blue. Now that he could finally obtain a Seventh Realm golden item, he was overjoyed. The martial artists behind were also very happy when they saw this golden light. They all went up to receive the equipment they had been entrusted to Lin Xuan to forge. All kinds of golden light spread out, and everyone’s faces seemed to be blooming. Only after all the martial artists in the queue had received their equipment did Feng Zhuang, who had been watching from the side, react. All of the equipment had been forged successfully! A peerless golden grade forging skill was simply awesome. The success rate of forging was actually so high! Lin Xuan smiled and greeted these martial artists one by one. At this moment, he raised his head slightly and a warning sign suddenly rose in his heart. This warning sign did not indicate a huge danger. Instead, it was a premonition of imminent danger. As expected, he looked up at the sky and immediately felt that the overall atmosphere of the Little Spirit Mountain was very unusual. It was as if some disaster was brewing. Every cubic meter of air seemed to be soaked in an indescribable cold aura. However, most martial artists did not have such sharp senses. Everyone was doing their own thing. Feng Zhuang noticed his solemn expression and asked, “Lin Xuan, what’s wrong?” Lin Xuan shook his head, not knowing what to say. At this moment, a dazzling Buddhist light suddenly came from the distant sky. A continuous and urgent Sanskrit sound sounded in the air. A Buddhist fragrance gradually rose in the air, but for some reason, he felt that this Buddhist fragrance made him somewhat anxious. “Buddhist light?! It’s getting dark?!” A martial artist stopped what he was doing and instinctively cried out. His words seemed to have become a signal for the martial artists to be shocked. Everyone instinctively looked up. As expected. The sky that was still bright a moment ago quickly darkened at a visible speed. It was as if someone was splashing ink into the sky and gradually dyeing it black. Old Wu, the person in charge of Colony Three, immediately turned on the radio. “All martial artists, climb up the city wall! I repeat, all martial artists, climb up the city wall!” “A large-scale beast tide is about to appear!” This voice sounded like thunder in the ears of every martial artist. Oh my god. A large-scale beast tide? Ever since the Construction Division completely controlled the Little Spirit Mountain, how many years had it been since a large-scale beast tide had appeared? Many martial artists thought that the medium-sized beast tide a few days ago was already filled with danger. They did not expect an even more dangerous beast tide to appear now. “Damn, I had a friend who told me that he wanted to go to the Falling Thunder Mountain to buy goods. He said that the Thunder Rock Marrow must be very easy to sell on the Little Spirit Mountain. He even asked me if I wanted to go with him. I didn’t go because I found it troublesome. Damn, I really regret it now!” Not far from Lin Xuan’s stall, a martial artist shouted in frustration. “Is it too late to go to the mystic realm door of light now? Hurry up and escape!” a martial artist said with a terrified expression. “Forget it. It’s already dark. Where do you think you’re going? If we can’t guard the city wall, everyone will be doomed!” Feng Zhuang waved his huge hammer and sneered. “That’s right. At this point, you still want to run? We’re already grasshoppers tied to the same rope. If we can’t guard the city wall, we’ll all die together.” A martial artist beside him was also a sensible person. He sneered and also ran towards the city wall with his weapon. The martial artists who wanted to escape immediately blushed. Not far away, the members of the Construction Division immediately rushed to the nearby city wall when they heard the broadcast. Their formation was orderly and there was no fear on their faces. Among the chaotic martial artists, this sight was especially reassuring. “Do you see that? The members of the Construction Division are even ahead of us.” Feng Zhuang snorted and followed the members of the Construction Division up the city wall. Seeing the members of the Construction Division charge forward without hesitation and without any complaints, the martial artists behind naturally could not say anything. More martial artists seemed to be infected by this atmosphere and immediately followed. The timid martial artists were immediately speechless. Lin Xuan sighed. At the critical moment, the situation still depended on the Construction Division members leading the charge. Lin Xuan also put away his stall, but he did not rush up the city wall immediately. Instead, he ran to a deserted place nearby and created the remaining three avatars. Poison Blade naturally changed into his usual set. The other two avatars wore the Ice Mage and Healer sets respectively. These sets had long been embedded with relevant rune groups. The random golden rune groups that kept getting forged on the forging table were finally useful. Then, he instructed these three avatars to rush to the other three walls while he rushed to the east wall. Last time, he had also resisted a medium-sized beast tide at the east wall. At this moment, a large number of martial artists had already gathered on the east wall. The members of the Construction Division and the civilian martial artists could be distinguished at a glance. The members of the Construction Division were calm and silent. The civilian martial artists were noisy and undisciplined. Lin Xuan looked around and quickly saw Ye Yuqiu and the others. Seeing Lin Xuan appear, no matter what the martial artists on the city wall were doing, they all greeted him kindly. This was an all-rounder logistician who made golden potions and equipment! More than 70% of the potions in Colony Three were supplied by him and Shield! More than 50% of the equipment in the hands of the martial artists in the entire third gathering place was forged by him alone! Moreover, he had never failed to forge any golden equipment! No matter who it was, as long as they had done business with Lin Xuan, they would only praise him. When the members of the Construction Division saw him, they also smiled and nodded at him as a form of greeting. The order of potions in Colony Three was handed over to Lin Xuan and Shield. Most of the potions in their storage compartment were made by Lin Xuan. They naturally admired this big shot potion maker. Ye Yuqiu saw him and asked curiously, “Why are you here?” Silver Fox, Bai Xinghe, and Black also scratched their heads. “The logisticians and low-level martial artists don’t have to come to the city wall. You should stay below. We can just stay above.” In their eyes, Lin Xuan, who knew how to make potions and forge, was definitely a logistician. He almost did not have the ability to protect himself. There was no need for such logisticians to go up the city wall. This was because even if they came up, they would not be able to help much. Instead, they might even be affected by the AOE at the edge. This was even more true for low-level martial artists. A battle between a Seventh Realm martial artist and a ghost was a battle of life and death. If a low-level martial artist came up, they would probably not even have the chance to speak. It would be extremely easy for them to get injured and die. They would not even have the chance to participate in the team battle. They would just die for no reason. Lin Xuan commanded Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion to walk over. Shield Ghost smiled and said, “Everyone, Lin Xuan is not as weak as you think. Not only does he have the golden medicinal skill and the golden forging skill, but he also has a bit of combat ability.” Flame Explosion also echoed, “He also has some attainments in magic.” Ye Yuqiu and the others were immediately stunned. Their eyes were filled with suspicion, shock, and distrust. Wasn’t Lin Xuan only an all-rounder logistician? Silver Fox muttered, “You have a bit of combat ability? You’re also somewhat proficient in magic?” “I think I’ve heard of this before…” Report chapterUse arrow keys (or A / D) to PREV/NEXT chapterContact &#8211; Sitemap<br> Privacy &amp; Terms of use Ye Yuqiu said helplessly, “Alright, in any case, with Shield Ghost protecting you, it shouldn’t be a big problem. Lin Xuan, you have to protect yourself. As long as you stay alive, your contributions will be greater.” Ye Yuqiu said this from the bottom of her heart. Sometimes, an additional bottle of the Big Life Potion might be able to save his life. Black smiled and said, “With Lin Xuan’s logistic skills, even the heads of the Construction Division have to treat him as a treasure.” Silver Fox chuckled. “It’s more than that. This guy has a golden medicinal skill and a golden forging skill. I think he will even become an honored guest of the chiefs…” Bai Xinghe shook his head. “Golden forging skill and medicinal skill are indeed powerful, but it’s still not dark gold. He’s still a little far from becoming an honored guest of the chiefs. However, I estimate that if one of his skills can reach the legendary dark gold grade, he will definitely be protected as an important person by the chiefs.” Ye Yuqiu and Black nodded repeatedly. Silver Fox scratched his head. “I heard that the third president, Wan Youxi, seems to be a big shot who has a legendary dark gold grade mechanism technique.” Ye Yuqiu’s eyes lit up. “President Wan is my idol! Not only is his combat strength extremely powerful, but he’s also proficient in using various materials to create mechanisms.” “These Lightning Towers in Little Spirit Mountain are all his masterpieces. Other than that, he also made war machinery in the Kunlun Ruins and Drowning City.” After saying this, the surrounding martial artists also sighed slightly. Wan Youxi’s skill had helped the Construction Division save a lot of manpower and resist countless demon beasts. He was indeed worthy of the title of the Third Chief. Shield Ghost took out a huge Lion Heart Tower Shield. “Don’t worry, I’ll protect Lin Xuan.” Silver Fox glanced at the shield and said in surprise, “You changed your equipment?” Shield Ghost nodded. “This is made from the equipment blueprint I obtained a while back. I asked Lin Xuan to forge it for me.” Lin Xuan nodded and said to Ye Yuqiu, “By the way, the set you asked me to help forge is already done.” Ye Yuqiu was stunned and said in surprise, “Really? That’s a nine-piece set that includes the pieces for the head, chest, hands, waist, legs and feet. Moreover, there’s also the necklace, the ring , and the weapon! I was even feeling a bit down because I thought that you definitely won’t be able to forge them in time.” Lin Xuan smiled and took out the set of equipment from the storage compartment. This was a tight-fitting ice-blue set. Every single piece was suffused with a faint golden color. After gathering together, they actually flowed with a dark golden light. The martial artists beside him also widened their eyes. Damn. Could this be the legendary dark gold set?! Even Bai Xinghe, who was usually extremely serious, could not help but tremble. “Dark gold set made of golden grade items?” Ye Yuqiu nodded excitedly. “Yes! With this set of equipment, my combat strength will definitely increase greatly. Thank you! Before the beast tide arrives, I’ll quickly change into this set of equipment.” She immediately ran down the city wall and changed into her equipment in the nearby bathroom. When she returned, everyone could not help but be attracted by her ice-blue suit. This set seemed to emit a biting cold air. Just by approaching, the temperature dropped. The huge sword in Ye Yuqiu’s hand also seemed to be forged from profound ice. It was as if as long as it pierced into one’s body, one’s limbs would instantly freeze. Lin Xuan nodded slightly. Among the people present, other than Ye Yuqiu, he was the only one who knew how powerful this set was. This set was called the “Frost Valkyrie Set”. It was made up of nine items: the Valkyrie Laurel, the Frost Silk Armor, the Frost Armor, the Frost Belt, the Frost Leg Armor, the Frost Boots, the Frost Dragon Scale Necklace, the Frost Dragon Blood Ring, and the Valkyrie Frost Blade. If he took away the Valkyrie Laurel, the Valkyrie Frost Blade, the Frost Dragon Scale Necklace, and the Frost Dragon Blood Ring, the other five items would also be a set called the “Frost Descendant Set”. Of course, the effect of the Frost Descendant Set would be far inferior to the Frost Valkyrie Set. The reason why the Frost Valkyrie Set was powerful was that it had a total of six effects! Effect 1: All attributes+10%. Effect 2: Critical Hit Rate, Dodge Rate, Block Rate+50%, Critical Hit Damage+150%. Effect 3: Health Points Recovery Speed, Magic Power Recovery Speed+100%. Effect 4: Killing the enemy will cause a negative “Frost Assault” status. (Frost Assault: Movement Speed, Attack Speed -60%) Effect 5: Killing the enemy will allow you to obtain a positive state of 1 level of “Frost Valkyrie”. At most, it will increase by 20 levels and last for 1 hour. (Frost Valkyrie: Frost Damage+10%, Physical Damage+10%, Health Points Limit+5%.) Effect 6: Every time you kill an enemy, you will accumulate strength in the Valkyrie Frost Blade. Every time you kill 10 enemies, the Valkyrie Frost Blade will release its strength forward, forming a 7-meter-long frost shock wave. At that time, after forging the “Frost Valkyrie”, Lin Xuan was a little shocked when he saw these effects. Where did Ye Yuqiu get such an awesome set blueprint? Moreover, this set was too suitable for Ye Yuqiu’s profession. Her profession was the “Ice Sword Baron”. Its grade was only precious purple, but with this set, her combat strength would definitely increase by several times! Ye Yuqiu walked in front of Lin Xuan and nodded heavily. “Thank you!” Lin Xuan’s eyes also revealed anticipation. With this set, Ye Yuqiu would definitely be able to unleash combat strength that far exceeded her previous strength in the upcoming city defense battle. At this moment, the air temperature slowly decreased. Lin Xuan suddenly discovered that white frost had appeared on his breath. “When a large number of ghosts are about to appear, the air temperature would drop very drastically. However, in the past, it had only decreased by two to three degrees. This time, it’s actually approaching the freezing point. Looks like the number of ghosts is indeed extraordinary.” Bai Xinghe gripped his sword tightly with a solemn expression. All the martial artists were prepared. The Lightning Tower had already been completely charged and was waiting to let out a thunderous roar. Everyone held their breaths. The next moment, dark green dots appeared in the distant night sky. At first, there were only a dozen or so. Then, they increased at a terrifying speed. 100, 200… 1,000, 2,000… 10,000, 20,000! After exceeding 20,000, even a Seventh Realm martial artist would find it difficult to quickly determine the number. Lin Xuan swept his gaze over and estimated that there were more than 100,000 ghosts under the city wall. One of the east city walls was facing at least 100,000 ghosts. The four city walls combined had to face 400,000 ghosts in total! At this moment, the countless ghosts under the city wall stared fixedly at every martial artist on the city wall. Everyone’s hair stood on end. “Kill!” The person in charge of the east wall suddenly roared angrily and drew his bow in one go. A huge arrow as thick as a bowl and burning with flames shot out and exploded in the middle of the ghosts, quickly illuminating the surroundings. This was not a thin bow, but a huge arrow that was even taller than a person. This arrow directly shattered three or four nearby ghosts. The surrounding ghosts did not hide and just stood there numbly. The martial artists were excited. The ghosts did not seem very powerful. However, the flames on the huge arrow did not burn for long before they were quickly extinguished because the surrounding temperature was too low. A huge ghost foot stepped on it and broke the huge arrow with a crack. The martial artists suddenly discovered that the one who had stepped on the huge arrow was the sutured ghost monster that had commanded the ghosts to attack the city during the last medium-sized beast tide! Roar! The sutured ghost monster pointed at the city wall and shouted. The ghosts that were still empty and numb just now immediately rushed towards the city wall as if they were on steroids! A huge battle erupted! Flame Explosion chanted for a short moment and immediately threw out a Lightning Storm downwards, instantly killing a large number of ghosts and leaving behind lightning that continued to kill. The other martial artists also exerted strength. For a moment, various long-range skills, elemental spells, and magic skills poured down the city wall. It was a magnificent sight. Lin Xuan also took out an equipment from the storage compartment. It was a somewhat exaggerated equipment. Giant Thunder Spear! “Ever since I obtained this equipment, I haven’t been able to find a suitable opportunity to take it out. Today, I can finally use it.” Lin Xuan picked up the Giant Thunder Spear. The muscles on his right arm erupted as he ruthlessly threw it down the city wall. Black and Silver Fox both looked at Lin Xuan with interest. Could such a logistician actually take advantage of such an exaggerated weapon and cause effective damage? However, after the Giant Thunder Spear landed, they immediately discovered that they shouldn’t have doubted him. The huge thunder spear landed and instantly exploded. Lightning spread like a spider web, crushing all the ghosts within a three-meter radius! An instant kill effect was triggered! An huge illusory thunder spear instantly condensed in Lin Xuan’s palm. He threw it again. Boom! The huge illusory thunder spear caused another explosion with a diameter of three meters. Most of the ghosts in the range were killed, and the remaining few ghosts were almost crippled. Boom! Boom! Boom! Because he could trigger the instant kill effect every time, Lin Xuan could almost continuously throw the illusory thunder spear down from the city wall. Moreover, because there were too many ghosts, he did not need to aim at all. He kept throwing them down. Although he had to consume 20% of his magic power every time he used the illusory thunder spears, Lin Xuan had deliberately made himself stand in the shadows of the fire basin on the city wall, triggering the effect of the Shadow Ring. His health and magic power recovery speed had increased by 60%. Coupled with the recovery speed of his high Constitution, various equipment, and rune groups… It could not be said that his magic power was endless. At the very least, it could be said that it was inexhaustible. As long as he could instantly kill the ghosts, he could continuously to bombard the enemy with illusory thunder spears!Q+ Black and Silver Fox looked at each other and saw the shock in each other’s eyes. The golden medicinal skill and forging skill were already impressive enough. Now, they even learned that this guy was able to use such an exaggerated weapon without stopping. Silver Fox Man was numb. “I knew it. The other party was just being modest when he said that he had a little bit of combat ability.” Black nodded. “His combat ability is ridiculously high.” Lin Xuan’s continuous rumbling also attracted the attention of the surrounding martial artists. Even the person in charge of the east wall looked over. The exaggerated huge thunder spear and the exaggerated killing effect attracted most of the attention. “To be able to throw out such a huge weapon, this person’s strength can’t be low.” “Did you see that? He even caused lightning damage when his attacks landed. This means that this person’s Spirit is not low.” “But doesn’t that guy sell potions? Why is he so ferocious in battle?” The martial artists discussed animatedly, their eyes staring straight. Feng Zhuang, who was not far away, was also stunned. “Lin Xuan… isn’t he a logistician?! Am I seeing things right?” Report chapterUse arrow keys (or A / D) to PREV/NEXT chapterContact &#8211; Sitemap<br> Privacy &amp; Terms of use Boom! A huge illusory thunder spear exploded five meters above Feng Zhuang’s head. Lin Xuan instantly killed the two ghosts that tried to pounce on Feng Zhuang while he was distracted. The ear-piercing roar made Feng Zhuang’s eardrums ache. “Deal with the enemy properly!” Lin Xuan shouted. Feng Zhuang nodded gratefully and hurriedly raised his hammer. Bang bang bang. Wherever the huge hammer passed, the ghosts that flew up the city wall were immediately sent flying far away. This was not all. The head of the huge hammer suddenly flew out while still being connected to the body by chains. Bang bang bang! The hammer head waved in the air and actually sent the ghosts in a radius of three to four-meter flying, relieving the pressure on many martial artists. “Damn, this weapon is awesome! It can be used for close combat and long-range combat!” The martial artist beside him felt the pressure decrease and immediately shouted in admiration. Feng Zhuang chuckled. “Fortunately, Lin Xuan made it for me. Otherwise, I could only use a purple weapon to deal with the ghosts that rushed to the city wall. Now, the attack range has increased greatly, and the number of ghosts I can kill has also increased.” On the east wall, many martial artists kept shining. Some martial artists carried heavy firearms and kept spitting out various bullets. There were countless different types of bullets. Flame, ice, lightning, and poison were only the most ordinary four elemental bullets. In addition, there were also bullets that caused negative statuses like sleep and paralysis. Some martial artists waved their spears. The spears were only 1.7 or 1.8 meters long, but the spear light they spat out could shoot out for 4 to 5 meters. Often, a single spear light could pierce through several ghosts. The latter could only roar unwillingly and explode, dissipating into the air. Some martial artists were even more interesting. They each held staffs on both their hands as they unleashed small spells. Small spells consumed a lot of magic power and had a short cooldown. It was also a good choice. Most of the weapons with shocking damage and attracted cheers were peerless golden grade equipment forged by Lin Xuan. It was precisely because they had changed their weapons that these martial artists could unleash stronger combat strength. The most eye-catching was Ye Yuqiu, who was wearing the Frost Valkyrie Set. Within ten meters, no ghost could approach. They would all be killed by the Valkyrie Frost Blade. She could also reduce the speed of the ghosts, making it easier for them to be exposed to the attack range of other martial artists. In addition, every once in a while, she would release a shocking shock wave. Wherever the shock wave passed, all the ghosts would be cut in half! However, what was even more impressive was the members of the Construction Division. These members were arranged to be in the center of the east wall, as were the other three walls. In the center of every city wall, the ghost attacks were also the fiercest. These members of the Construction Division attacked and defended in an orderly manner. The first batch of mages released large-scale powerful spells. After entering the cooldown time, they immediately retreated and were replaced by the second batch of mages. In front of these mages were armored warriors guarding with large shields. These armored warriors were not only defending passively. They carried large shields in their right hands and often had long-range weapons in their left. These weapons could be a small pistol, a crossbow, or a blow dart. Although the damage was not high, it was still better than them receiving damage passively. When a group of armored warriors were injured for too long and their health points decreased, another group of armored warriors immediately stepped forward to replace them. The healers at the back would then immediately rush to recover the health points of these injured armorers. They cooperated very well and did not panic at all. Lin Xuan threw out the Giant Thunder Spear and also consciously took care of the area in front of the Construction Division members. Every time a large number of ghosts surged forward, he would throw two illusory thunder spears from afar to disrupt the attacks of the ghosts. The person in charge of the east wall was extremely touched. The more he looked at Lin Xuan, the more he liked Lin Xuan. He wished he could recruit this guy on the spot and make him a member of the Construction Division. On the tower in the center of the third gathering place, Old Wu and Li Weiguo stood and observed the entire situation. After seeing the situation on the east wall, the two of them smiled in satisfaction. Old Wu could not help but say, “Old Li, these people you brought are really not bad. We can recruit them all.” Li Weiguo revealed a strange expression. He had long brought these people to be members of the Construction Division. They had just changed their identities. He wondered what kind of exciting expression Old Wu would have when he found out. The two of them continued to stay on the tower. Once they discovered that the city wall was in a critical situation, they would immediately issue an order for the reserve team to provide support. The two of them were both Eighth Realm martial artists and would not easily join the battle. If they were participating in the battle, it would mean that there were also Eighth Realm demon beasts among the ghosts! This was not because they did not care about the lives of the Seventh Realm martial artists, but because the reality was just that cruel. If an Eighth Realm martial artist wasted their health, energy, and magic power to kill these Seventh Realm ghosts with Seventh Realm martial artists, it could indeed reduce the casualty rate of Seventh Realm martial artists. However, what if an Eighth Realm ghost attacked? How could an Eighth Realm martial artist whose health, energy, and magic power had decreased greatly and was not at his peak resist the surprise attack of an Eighth Realm enemy? If they lost their Eighth Realm martial artists, it would be equivalent to them losing the battle. The suppression of an Eighth Realm ghost on a Seventh Realm martial artist was fatal! Old Wu keenly sensed that the number of ghosts on the east wall had increased and immediately ordered, “The number of ghosts on the east wall has increased. Activate the Lightning Tower!” The three Lightning Towers on the east wall had long been charged and were ready. Now that they had received the order, the low-level martial artists guarding under the Lightning Towers immediately pressed the switch. Boom! Boom! Boom! Lightning roared and flashed. Every time the Lightning Tower attacked, dozens of ghosts would definitely be directly destroyed, not even leaving behind a trace. The three Lightning Towers had a basic attack algorithm. According to the density of the ghosts, they would either release “Lightning Chains” or “Super Lightning Chains”. These towers did not require any control from outsiders. This was also an important function that Wan Youxi had specially refined after working hard. As the towers attacked, the energy in the Lightning Tower also slowly and firmly descended. A large number of ghosts died, but they were always kept outside by the martial artists on the city wall. Occasionally, a few ghosts would rush up the city wall, but they were unable to cause a large number of casualties. They would be quickly killed by the martial artists. Not far from the east wall, Mu Yang and the three potion makers stayed here with a peace of mind and did not participate in the battle. These three potion makers had a close relationship with Mu Yang and could be said to be Mu Yang’s trusted aides. Even if Mu Yang had already been completely ostracized by Lin Xuan and was unable to integrate into the medicinal market of Colony Three, they were still united by Mu Yang’s side. When they were asked to contribute, they would use the excuse that they were logisticians to hide behind the city wall. Mu Yang immediately saw Lin Xuan, who was constantly throwing huge thunder spears at the city wall. He gritted his teeth until they creaked. “He’s just a potion maker, yet he still wants to show off at the city wall. He’s probably going to end up dying without a corpse!” Mu Yang cursed viciously in his heart. The potion maker beside him chuckled and said, “Brother Mu, let’s go and drink some wine and eat some small dishes. There’s no need to waste time here.” “That’s right. We shouldn’t be standing here foolishly.” Mu Yang snorted. Even if they could guard these three gathering places, the seriously injured Construction Division would still have to face the attack of the Indian martial artists. At that time, the Indian martial artists would be able to take advantage of the situation! It would be difficult for them not to win. As a spy planted by the Indian martial artists on the Little Spirit Mountain, he would definitely be rewarded heavily! Instead of wasting time here, it was better for him to think about his future life! “I heard that the girls in India are not bad. They’re beautiful and have good personalities. Should I find one or two? What a troubling decision.” Mu Yang thought of those charming scenes and was immediately excited, throwing Lin Xuan and the others to the back of his mind. In the tower in the center of Colony Three. Li Weiguo suddenly saw an especially large beast ghost appear on the western city wall. Previously, most of them were ghosts in human form. However, the ghosts that appeared on the western city wall were all more than three meters tall and moved ridiculously quickly. The appearance of these black panther-shaped ghosts caught the martial artists on the western city wall off guard. In the blink of an eye, a martial artist had already died under the mouth of a black panther ghost. The martial artists beside him tried their best to save him, but they were still helpless. That same black panther ghost killed three people in a row before dying under the siege of the martial artists. Due to the attack of these black panther ghosts, a small hole appeared in the defense line of the martial artists on the west wall. This small hole was instantly filled by the five black panther ghosts that surged in consecutively! An ordinary mage in white was directly surrounded in the center and was about to die. “This is bad! I’m afraid we’ll lose a lot of people this time.” Li Weiguo raised his eyebrows. Then, in the next moment, he discovered that the staff in the ordinary mage’s hand suddenly emitted a cold light. The cold air that filled the sky was crazily released with this person as the center, instantly freezing the five black panther ghosts! Li Weiguo was stunned. What kind of ice spell was that? How could he instantly freeze five black panther ghosts? “Seventh Realm spell, Great Ice Seal!” Old Wu suddenly exclaimed from beside Li Weiguo. “You know that spell?” Old Wu nodded repeatedly. “Although I don’t mainly focus on Spirit and don’t have many elemental spells on me, I’ve seen this Great Ice Seal before. It was dropped by those Snow Apes in the northern area of the Little Spirit Mountain after they died.” “However…” Old Wu frowned. “What? Don’t keep me in suspense.” Old Wu smiled awkwardly. “If it’s only an ordinary white grade Great Ice Seal, it can only freeze one target within a ten-meter radius. However, this person can freeze five at the same time. That means that the skill grade is at least peerless golden.” Li Weiguo exclaimed. A peerless golden grade Great Ice Seal? No wonder it was so powerful. Old Wu scratched his head. “But as far as I know, Little Spirit Mountain doesn’t have such a powerful ice mage.” Li Weiguo said, “Perhaps that guy has enemies and has been deliberately hiding his strength?” Old Wu nodded. “That makes sense.” As the two of them conversed, the martial artists around the western city wall had already recovered. Taking advantage of the precious time when the five black panther ghosts were frozen, they immediately rushed forward and killed the five ghosts one by one! With the death of these five panther ghosts, the small gap in the west wall was immediately made up for. These martial artists hurriedly looked at the mage with gratitude. This person was awesome! The release of his suppression skill was very timely! Old Wu smiled happily. “No matter what, this person saved many people on the western city wall. Moreover, he also stopped the possible chaos.” “If he hadn’t frozen the five black panther ghosts just now and allowed them to kill indiscriminately, they would probably have caused a huge commotion. At that time, it wouldn’t be a matter of a few people dying.” Li Weiguo nodded in agreement. “I’ll send someone to ask what that guy’s name is.” Old Wu was somewhat happy to see this and sent a low-level martial artist over to ask. After a while, the low-level martial artist rushed back and brought back a code name. “Cold Domain? This code name…” Li Weiguo scratched his head. “To be honest, it reminds me of the childish code names we gave ourselves back then.” Old Wu suppressed his laughter. “Is he from Colony Three?” Old Wu recalled carefully. “No, I don’t remember such a person.” Li Weiguo was suspicious. “Is it possible that… I mean, this is just a possibility… But could it be that your memory is deteriorating because you’re old?” Old Wu was furious. “No matter how bad my memory is, it’s impossible for me to forget such a powerful martial artist! He definitely hasn’t used such a powerful Great Ice Seal before.” “Let’s talk about it after the battle. It’s always a good thing to have powerful martial artists appear now.” Li Weiguo laughed. “Phew…” Lin Xuan heaved a sigh of relief. When he was multitasking just now, he had been throwing the Giant Thunder Spear at the ghost while controlling his Cold Domain avatar to release the Great Ice Seal. The demand for his brain was so high that he almost did not react. “However, it seems that this avatar of mine is still quite powerful. I was able to immediately suppress the five black panther ghosts that rushed up the western city wall. Otherwise, who knows how many martial artists would have died under these ghosts?” Lin Xuan was very satisfied with Cold Domain. The peerless golden Great Ice Seal could freeze six targets at once for 5 seconds. Moreover, after advancing to the peerless golden grade, the chanting time also became very short. The only weakness was that it consumed a lot of magic power. The cooldown time was also 10 minutes. This was even when the skill was of the peerless golden grade! If this skill was only of the ordinary white grade, it could only freeze one target at a time. It required 90% magic power consumption and had a cooldown of 30 minutes. It was precisely because of this that very few people would learn this skill unless they could obtain a Great Ice Seal that was precious purple grade and above. This was because there were many suppression skills that were more valuable than this skill. Therefore, there were many Great Ice Seal skill books in the entire Little Spirit Mountain, and the price was relatively low. After analyzing the situation, Lin Xuan chose the Great Ice Seal as one of the signature spells of Cold Domain Avatar. He had entrusted Feng Zhuang to buy a lot of it and had also obtained a lot. After that, he successfully upgraded it to the peerless golden grade. Other than the Great Ice Seal, the equipment and rune groups Lin Xuan had prepared for Cold Domain were also almost the best. The equipment was the “Snowfield Set” that had been obtained in the northern area of the Little Spirit Mountain. The equipment was only blue grade and the entire set was purple grade. The effect was simple and crude. While providing a high magic power recovery speed, it also increased the additional frost damage by 80%. Lin Xuan had bought the staff when he was shopping in the market area. It was not produced in Little Spirit Mountain but in the Kunlun Ruins. The staff was only of a precious purple grade. Its effect could not be said to be too good. It could only be said to be ordinary. The only thing that made Lin Xuan’s eyes light up was that it could directly engrave a spell! As long as he inputted the spell, it would be ready to use. In critical situations, it could be directly released. It did not consume any magic power and did not need to be chanted. It could really be released instantly. After releasing it, he could store another spell during his free time. As for the rune group, it was the “Icebound Thousand Miles” rune group. It was of peerless golden grade and also provided high frost damage. It was impossible to buy this equipment without millions. However, Lin Xuan could rely on his huge resource reserves to forcefully create such a powerful ice mage that was good at freezing and suppression. At this moment, on the western city wall. The martial artists saved by Cold Domain all looked at him gratefully. “Thank you, big brother with the freeze spell!” “Brother, you’re awesome! This is the Great Ice Seal, right? Could it be that you obtained one with a precious purple grade? You can actually freeze so many at once.” “Impressive, impressive, impressive. Our Colony Three still has such an impressive mage! Hehe, I bet even the big shots of the Construction Division are shocked, right? There are also powerful civilian martial artists!” The martial artists kept releasing their skills below the city wall, but their mouths did not stop at all. They shouted and praised Cold Domain. These words naturally fell into Lin Xuan’s ears. He did not know whether to laugh or cry. These martial artists were too good at flattering. In the Central Tower. Li Weiguo and Old Wu were constantly paying attention to the four walls. The two of them suddenly stared at the south and north walls and stopped, stunned. Then, the two of them said at the same time, “Hey, another powerful martial artist has appeared.” With that said, the two of them were stunned and could not help but laugh. Li Weiguo said, “Tell me first. What did you see?” Old Wu pointed at the northern city wall. “Look at that healer in white who’s releasing spells. With his muscles, I originally thought that he was a strength-type martial artist. I didn’t expect him to be a healer!” Li Weiguo looked over and indeed saw a fierce man. This fierce man’s muscles were very impactful and were very similar to his. However, such a ferocious martial artist was actually holding a staff and constantly releasing various supplementary spells. The only spells that Li Weiguo could recognize were the Regeneration Technique, the Recovery Technique, and the Life Shield. There were also spells that provided physical attack and magic power enhancement. Among those spells, there were also some spells that he had never seen before. Every time the ferocious male martial artist waved his staff, a large amount of light would enter the bodies of the martial artists, recovering their health points, magic power, and increasing their damage and defense. Li Weiguo also saw that a martial artist’s arm had been accidentally corroded by a ghost. His entire arm was almost completely shriveled from the root, and his life essence had been completely plundered. Given such a situation, his arm would not recover without two to three months. Moreover, he had to release a recovery spell every day for two to three months. This was a fatal blow to a martial artist. However, under the spell of the ferocious martial artist, the martial artist’s shriveled arm was actually recovering at a visible speed. His muscles grew again, his blood surged from his heart, and his skin regained its elasticity. The martial artist was overjoyed and almost rushed forward to hug and kiss the ferocious healer. “That’s the Great Regeneration Technique. Its grade is at least precious purple. Otherwise, it would not be enough to recover the arm that had its flesh essence taken away,” Old Wu said solemnly. Li Weiguo clicked his tongue in wonder. “Impressive. Before I came, I didn’t expect Colony Three to be so full of crouching tigers and hidden dragons. Other than the members of the Construction Division, there are also such powerful civilian martial artists!” Old Wu stroked his beard smugly. Although he did not know how this ferocious healer had suddenly appeared, he was naturally very proud of Li Weiguo’s praise. After all, he was in charge of Colony Three! “What about you? What did you see just now?” Old Wu asked happily. Li Weiguo pointed at a man in a dark green tight suit on the southern city wall. “Just now, I saw a python ghost rush up the southern city wall. That man rushed up and killed that ghost in a few seconds!” Old Wu stared at the man in shock. “Damn, really?” “I think he should be using a poison spell. I just didn’t expect his poison to actually be effective on ghosts.” Li Weiguo sighed slightly. Most of the poison could only be used on demon beasts with physical bodies. Ghosts did not have physical bodies and were naturally immune to most poisons. Old Wu smiled and said, “It might be a neurotoxin. In any case, there are many types of poison.” Li Weiguo pondered for a moment and said, “If I’m not wrong, this person’s main attributes should be Agility and Spirit. That’s why he can attack several times in a second. He might have even triggered a critical hit just now. Otherwise, he wouldn’t have been able to instantly kill that python ghost.” Old Wu nodded slightly. “Your analysis is very accurate.” Then, he sighed and said, “There are still capable civilian martial artists. I’ve underestimated them in the past.” “All the human-shaped ghosts on the east wall have already died. The ghosts that rushed over from behind are all in various beast forms!” Li Weiguo keenly sensed the approach of more ghosts. Old Wu looked over and was shocked to see various ghosts charging crazily under the lead of the ghost. There were already very few human-shaped ghosts. They were all ghosts in the forms of giant pythons, giant turtles, black panthers, lions, ferocious tigers, and giant apes. With powerful combat strength and huge bodies, they could often rush to the city wall in the blink of an eye. In this short period of time, several martial artists on the east wall had already been pulled down by these ghosts. The martial artists who pulled down the city wall were instantly swallowed by the ghosts. In the blink of an eye, only dried corpses were left. The other martial artists did not have the time to feel sad and afraid. The only thing they could do was attack and attack again. After a large number of beast-shaped ghosts appeared on the east wall, the beast-shaped ghosts on the other three walls also followed. Casualties appeared on the four walls one after another, and the frequency of casualties appearing was also higher than before. “The energy consumption of the Lightning Tower on the east wall is the fastest. Originally, we estimated that it would consume at most 10% in an hour, but now, on average, it has already consumed 16%. The energy consumption of the Lightning Tower in the middle of the east wall is even more ridiculous. After two hours, it has already consumed 42%!” Old Wu’s expression was solemn. “How many Thunder Rock Marrow did they bring in?” Li Weiguo asked. Old Wu smiled bitterly and said, “30.” Li Weiguo’s mouth widened. “Only 30?” Old Wu said, “We still have to split these 30 rock marrow evenly among the four city walls. There are less than 8 rock marrow for each wall! One Thunder Rock Marrow can only provide about 10% of energy.” “You don’t know how low the drop rate of the Thunder Rock Marrow is! The martial artists sent to the Falling Thunder Mountain are all helpless. They can’t even get one a day!” Li Weiguo sighed. A single Lightning Tower was at least comparable to 100 Seventh Realm martial artists. Now, martial artists could be on par with ghosts because the energy of the Lightning Tower was still there. Once the energy of the Lightning Tower was exhausted and the Thunder Rock Marrow were all used up, they would probably start to lose the battle. “Let’s take a look first. If the situation is wrong, we’ll collect various materials that contain lightning from the martial artists and make up for it with battle merits,” Old Wu said solemnly. Li Weiguo nodded. “That’s a solution.” On the east wall. Lin Xuan also acutely sensed this situation. It was only 5 PM now. Only two hours had passed since the beast tide attacked the gathering place! If 6 AM was considered dawn, then there were still 13 hours! The martial artists were already at a slight disadvantage and there had been casualties. If the energy of the Lightning Tower was exhausted, there would probably be a huge problem. Under the east wall, the sutured ghost monster stared at the huge thunder spears that were constantly being thrown out with a resentful expression. It pointed at Lin Xuan on the city wall and suddenly screamed. In an instant, the ghosts that were attacking the middle of the east wall suddenly changed their target. They no longer fought to rush towards the Lightning Tower but instead rushed towards Lin Xuan. The ghosts at the front even self-destructed! Boom! The martial artist in front did not expect this move at all and was directly sent flying. His chest collapsed and his health points instantly decreased. After he flew out, a gap immediately appeared in the defensive line, and a large number of ghosts surged in! They all stared fixedly at Lin Xuan, as if they wanted to drink his blood and eat his flesh. Bai Xinghe’s pupils constricted and he subconsciously wanted to rush over. However, he was too far away from Lin Xuan. Even if he had invested all his points on Agility, he still wouldn’t be able to rush over in a short period of time. There was no need to mention Silver Fox, Black, and the others. If they rushed over, it would be equivalent to them dying with Lin Xuan. Some martial artists were very grateful to Lin Xuan and instinctively rushed over to help. However, Ye Yuqiu stopped them. “There’s no need to go over. The person in front of him will be able to block these ghosts.” As their comrade, Ye Yuqiu trusted Shield Ghost very much. Back then, Shield Ghost could protect Flame Explosion and kill his way through the Falling Thunder Mountain to save Bai Xinghe and the others. Thus, he definitely could also protect Lin Xuan from the self-destruction of these ghosts! If even Shield Ghost could not stop these ghosts, then it was meaningless for the other martial artists to approach. “No one can rush past me!” Shield Ghost carried the Lionheart Tower Shield in front of Lin Xuan like a majestic wall! Boom! Boom! Boom! The ghosts rushed forward fearlessly and directly self-destructed. The terrifying explosion made the surrounding martial artists feel fear and have no choice but to subconsciously retreat. The sound wave formed by so many ghosts self-destructing at the same time was too terrifying. The martial artists did not doubt that if they were involved, they would instantly shatter into dozens of pieces. When that happened, even their biological mother would not be able to recognize them. Feng Zhuang saw this scene from afar. This burly man was so anxious that tears almost fell. “Lin Xuan, you absolutely can’t…!” He roared and sent the ghosts in front of him flying. Since he was too far away and could not rush over, he would vent all his anger and smash these ghosts in front of him! The surrounding martial artists dealt with the ghosts while staring at the smoke formed by the explosion of the ghosts in surprise. The bodies of these ghosts were just turbid air. After they exploded, they would naturally form smoke. The smoke obscured the situation inside, and he could barely see two figures still standing. All the martial artists hoped that the two of them were still alive. The martial artists subconsciously gritted their teeth. The dust settled. Everyone was pleasantly surprised to discover that Shield Ghost was standing firm and Lin Xuan was unscathed! However, there were some dents on the surface of the Lion Heart Tower Shield. However, these dents could be easily repaired. Under the city wall, the sutured ghost monster’s pupils constricted. Even after so many ghosts self-destructed at the same time, they were still unable to kill those two! Their defense was too powerful. Roar! Roar! The sutured ghost monster shouted again and commanded the ghosts to attack Lin Xuan again. Some of the ghosts were clearly about to climb the city wall, but under the command of the sutured ghost monster, they actually directly gave up. Some ghosts were about to kill the martial artist in front of them. However, when they heard the order, they immediately gave up. They all gave up on their previous goal and headed straight for the southern part of the east wall where Lin Xuan was. After them, more beast-shaped ghosts rushed over from below the city like a surging tide! The martial artists’ scalps turned numb as they instinctively retreated. There were too many! With a casual command, the sutured ghost monster could mobilize a large number of ghosts to attack a section of the city wall. If that happened, the pressure on the city wall would increase greatly in a short period of time. Moreover, the other martial artists on the city wall would be unable to provide support in time! If the martial artists hurriedly abandoned the one or two meters of city wall they were guarding and ran to support the southern part of the east wall, it would definitely cause chaos on the city wall! Chaos was the last thing that could happen in such a large-scale battle! The person in charge of the east wall was furious. In the past, ghosts would not self-destruct at all! A month ago, there had never been a sutured ghost monster. These sutured ghost monsters had only appeared recently. Moreover, before this, they had never shown much command ability. In the past, the sutured ghost monsters had never commanded the ghosts. They only watched silently from the back. If a martial artist tried to attack them, they would immediately retreat and hide in the darkness. After a while, they would come out and continue to watch the battle. What had happened to Little Spirit Mountain?! “Can we only watch as the east wall collapses?!” The person in charge of the east wall almost gritted his teeth. In the tower in the center of Colony Three. Li Weiguo and Old Wu had solemn expressions. They did not expect the east wall to encounter such a serious crisis. The sutured ghost monster was personally commanding these ghosts to attack a certain part of the city wall! “No, I can’t watch as the east wall is broken. I’m going to attack.” Old Wu immediately jumped down from the tower and rushed towards the east wall. Li Weiguo clenched his fists, but at this moment, he suddenly saw the change in the east wall and was immediately pleasantly surprised. “Old Wu, stop, stop! Look!” Old Wu was stunned and hurriedly returned to the tower and looked at the east wall. He was shocked to see that a terrifying lightning storm had actually enveloped all the ghosts within a 15-meter radius! Because the ghosts were too dense, in just a few seconds, more than a thousand ghosts were cut into pieces by the terrifying lightning. There were even a large number of ghosts that were severely injured and were in a blinded state. They were running around like headless flies. The martial artists were not stupid and immediately attacked. A large number of powerful skills landed on these ghosts. Boom! Boom! Boom! They had actually taken away nearly 10,000 ghosts in a single wave! This was not all. The mage, whose entire body was almost wrapped in lightning, was actually floating in the air under the effect of the lightning. Lightning storms were thrown out of his staff one after another and landed below the city. Without exception, these lightning storms formed a circle with a diameter of 15 meters on the spot. They were like meat grinders made of lightning that crazily cut all the ghosts in their range! Old Wu was dumbfounded and his jaw could not close. “What… what the hell is going on?!” Li Weiguo was extremely excited. “I think I know what’s going on. It’s because of the Thunder Rock Marrow!” Old Wu was stunned and immediately recalled the effect of the Thunder Rock Marrow. After it was used, all lightning spells would be increased by 200% for 10 minutes! This was an extremely terrifying increase! “That guy… his code name is Flame, right? I thought he was good at fire magic. I didn’t expect him to be so proficient in lightning magic!” The wrinkles on Old Wu’s old face relaxed because of joy. Li Weiguo was even more delighted. This was because he knew that this guy’s true identity was actually Flame Explosion. Previously, he was best at Flame Explosion. “I didn’t expect him to actually have Lightning Storm in addition to Flame Explosion! The effect of this Lightning Storm is even comparable to Little Xiang.” Xiang Tianxiu’s appearance immediately appeared in Li Weiguo’s mind. The other party’s Lightning Storm was so powerful that he could not help but want to compare them. After comparing, he discovered in disbelief that the Lightning Storm Xiang Tianxiu used seemed to be even weaker than the one Flame Explosion used! While Li Weiguo and Old Wu were shocked, the martial artists on the east wall were even more shocked. Oh my god. Was this a lightning mage? This was the damn Thunder God! At this moment, Flame Explosion’s eyes were silver-white and dazzling, making people not dare to look straight at him. It was as if lightning was rumbling in his eyes. Lightning interweaved on the surface of his skin. Wherever he approached, sparks would definitely fly. This was the huge increase brought about by using the Thunder Rock Marrow! Of course, if it was only the 200% increase brought by the Thunder Rock Marrow, it would still be far from the current jaw-dropping effect of Flame Explosion. In order to achieve such killing ability, one had to increase the power of their spells, reduce the cooldown time, and reduce the magic consumption. Lin Xuan had eaten many attribute items and had +10% lightning damage. After activating the Berserk Lightning Demon King, he received another 45% lightning damage! He also wore the “Lightning Mage” set, and it increased lightning damage by 45%. This was a precious purple set that Lin Xuan had gathered through transactions on the Little Spirit Mountain. He also had the skill “Spell Amplification”. Every time he equipped a peerless golden equipment, he would receive a 10% all-type magic enhancement! This would increase the lightning damage by another 40%! Lastly, there was the rune group “Lightning Shattering the Darkness”, which increased it by 40%! In this way, the additional lightning magic damage reached an astonishing 380%! In addition, Flame Explosion also activated the skill “Spell Burst”. For 20 minutes, the magic power consumption of all spells would decrease by 30%, and the cooldown time would decrease by 30%! Only with the support of these skills, equipment, and rune groups, coupled with the short-term high magic enhancement brought by the Thunder Rock Marrow… could such a shocking scene be created! “I heard that there’s a genius in the Construction Division called Xiang Tianxiu. His signature spell is also Lightning Storm, and he’s even ranked ninth on the Little Spirit Mountain’s battle merits list. I think Flame is not much weaker than him!” A martial artist sighed. “He’s not weaker at all! I think if that Xiang Tianxiu were to compete with Flame, he would probably feel ashamed!” The martial artist beside him retorted. Under the city wall, the sutured ghost monster revealed an ugly and vengeful expression. It had commanded so many ghosts to gather their strength and attack fiercely, but all the ghosts were actually killed by the other party! The ghosts gathered so densely, giving Lightning Storm a chance to attack. The number of ghosts that had been directly and indirectly killed by Flame Explosion had already exceeded 20,000! As a result, empty areas even appeared on the east wall! This was a scene that was difficult to see on the other three walls! On the battle merits list, the person with the code name “Flame” was quickly surpassing all the martial artists in front of him! 3200th! 2005th! 1,000th! 509th! 100th! 32nd! It was not until Flame reached the 18th place that the increase gradually slowed down. The martial artists from Colony One and Colony Two were stunned when they saw this situation. What the hell? This guys’ battle merits soared like a rocket. After transforming into the Thunder God for 10 minutes and killing tens of thousands of ghosts, the lightning wrapped around Flame Explosion’s body gradually disappeared, and his body slowly landed on the ground from midair. A martial artist who happened to be free and beside him hurriedly came over to support him. “Damn, damn, looks like my ten minutes of glory has passed.” Flame Explosion smiled helplessly. The martial artists all looked at him with respect. The person in charge of the east wall ran over quickly. “Healers, quickly heal him. Armored soldiers, protect him. We can’t let the meritorious people on our east wall be injured!” “Yes!” With Flame Explosion’s lightning maneuver, the morale of the east wall soared crazily, as if all the martial artists had been injected with chicken blood. Originally, the ghosts had all rushed up the city wall, but they were beaten back by the martial artists! The battle continued to be dragged out. The energy of the Lightning Tower also decreased bit by bit. Time passed steadily and slowly. It was already 1 AM, the darkest time. Old Wu saw that the energy of all the Lightning Towers was almost below 20%. Some Lightning Towers had already used the Thunder Rock Marrow to replenish their energy once. “Pass the order to collect items containing lightning power from all the martial artists. All the items will be registered and exchanged for battle merits,” Old Wu immediately ordered without any delay. The members of the reserve team split into four groups and headed towards the four walls. Old Wu paced back and forth nervously in the tower and muttered, “This is my mistake. If only I had collected these items before the battle began. I shouldn’t have done this so late.” Li Weiguo comforted him, “No one expected the energy of the Lightning Towers to be consumed so quickly. This is not your fault…” “I’m a little worried. After all, Little Spirit Mountain doesn’t produce items that contain a large amount of lightning power. Even if the martial artists are willing to cooperate, I’m afraid we won’t be able to charge the towers to 50%.” Old Wu sighed. At this moment, Mu Yang had already drunk wine and eaten his fill with his three trusted potion makers. He seemed slightly tipsy. They drank and played cards as they walked out of the canteen. The logistics martial artists in the canteen looked at them and wanted to say something, but did not dare to. No matter what, those people on the city wall had risked their lives to protect this colony, but they were eating and drinking at the back. This was too much. Mu Yang suddenly saw the people from the reserve team running towards the four walls. He had an excited expression and immediately shouted, “Hey! Over there, what are you doing? Is the city wall about to be broken? Why is everyone from the reserve team all here?!” The reserve team captain saw his expression and was somewhat dissatisfied, but he still replied, “No, we’re going to obtain items that contain lightning power and use them as fuel for the Lightning Tower.” Mu Yang frowned. He thought the city wall was about to break. If the city wall was really about to be broken, it would be the time for the Indian martial artists hiding in the dark to attack! “It’s not that I want to discourage you, but if you go and obtain items that contain lightning at this time, you won’t be able to obtain anything!” “Moreover, Little Spirit Mountain doesn’t produce anything that contains a large amount of lightning. I’m afraid even if you throw in all the things you collect, it won’t be enough to fill a Lightning Tower!” Mu Yang was not stingy with any opportunity to attack these members of the Construction Division. The reserve team captain gritted his teeth and did not respond as he continued to run towards the east wall. Mu Yang actually followed and sneered. “I already told you that it’s not possible. Why waste your energy?” The truth was just as Mu Yang had expected. Hearing the reserve team captain’s words, the martial artists shook their heads repeatedly. Even if they ended up collecting any usable items, they would all be items produced in Fourth Realm and Fifth Realm mystic realms. If these things were thrown into the furnace of the Lightning Tower, they would probably only increase energy by 1%. It was pitifully small! The more items they obtained, the more the reserve team captain gritted his teeth. The smile on Mu Yang’s face grew wider and wider, and he even deliberately raised his voice. “Are the members of the Construction Division of Colony Three all so uncoordinated? This kind of collection should have been carried out long before the beast tide appeared. Now that it’s done at the last minute, not only will it distract the martial artists, but it might also cause a huge disaster and delay the reserve team members.” “I really can’t stand it anymore.” Mu Yang had a hypocritical expression. When the surrounding martial artists heard this, their hearts also sank. After all, it was evident why Old Wu was asking them to collect items that contained lightning. It meant that the Construction Division did not have much fuel left. The Lightning Tower was the main force against the ghosts. If the Lightning Tower could not operate without energy, what followed would definitely be the beginning of the massacre of the ghosts! Thinking of this, the martial artists’ morale could not help but fall. All kinds of tragic scenes flashed in their minds. Mu Yang sensed the atmosphere and sneered in his heart. Yes! This was what he wanted. It was best if an extremely high mortality rate could be maintained until dawn. In this way, even if they won, it would be a tragic victory. At that time, the invincible Indian martial artists would massacre the three colonies and completely control Little Spirit Mountain! At this moment, a voice sounded. “I have some Thunder Rock Marrow here. Not much, just 25.” The reserve team captain looked up in surprise and saw Lin Xuan throw out a huge thunder spear as he spoke to them after turning his head. Thunder Rock Marrow! Moreover, he had 25 of them! The Thunder Rock Marrow was already recognized as the most suitable item to be used as fuel for the Lightning Tower. However, there were only two ways to obtain this thing. One way was to search carefully in the belly of the Falling Thunder Mountain and find the Thunder Rock Marrow that condense naturally. Another way was to find them in the bodies of powerful demon beasts. For this matter, Old Wu and the others had a headache for a long time. However, why was it that this guy could actually take out so many at once?! Mu Yang’s laughter also stopped abruptly. He said suspiciously, “I remember that you only took out a few Thunder Rock Marrow in the last medium-sized beast tide. Do you still have more?” Beside him, Black, Silver Fox, and the others also asked curiously, “That’s right, Lin Xuan. You still have more Thunder Rock Marrow?” Lin Xuan chuckled. “To be precise, it’s not me, but Shield Ghost. However, he can’t find the time now, so I’ll speak for him. In any case, the three of us are good friends.” Shield Ghost quickly chimed in. “Take out my portion of the Thunder Rock Marrow and give it to the reserve team captain.” “At that time, I got lucky in the Falling Thunder Mountain and found a mine that produced Thunder Rock Marrow.” Lin Xuan walked over and took out 25 Thunder Rock Marrow from his consciousness space and handed it to the reserve team captain. The 25 shiny Thunder Rock Marrow illuminated the excited face of the reserve team captain. Mu Yang’s expression suddenly darkened. “Damn, how can our luck be so good?!” He gritted his teeth. Flame Explosion, who was resting at the side, suddenly said, “Lin Xuan, give my share to the reserve team captain. At this moment, maintaining the energy of the Lightning Tower is the most important.” The reserve team captain looked excited. “You have them too?” Flame Explosion nodded. “Both Shield Ghost and I keep our Thunder Rock Marrow with Lin Xuan. We trust him.” Lin Xuan smiled and said, “Alright.” Then, he took out 28 Thunder Rock Marrow. “Take it. This is the last of our Thunder Rock Marrow,” Lin Xuan said solemnly. The reserve team captain was so excited that tears welled up in his eyes. “Thank you, thank you! The Construction Division will not forget your contribution!” Mu Yang almost gritted his teeth. Damn! Why were there so many Thunder Rock Marrow? He could not help but ask, “Did you also find a mine that produces the Thunder Rock Marrow in the Falling Thunder Mountain?” Flame Explosion smiled faintly. “Don’t you think that it’s possible that Shield Ghost and I found the same mine?” Mu Yang was speechless. Black sighed and said, “Look at their unbreakable brotherhood. They even placed something as precious as the Thunder Rock Marrow in Lin Xuan’s storage compartment. What about you? Why don’t you leave your Mystic Realm Pearls with me? I’m stronger than you. I’ll help you take care of it. This way, you can be more at ease.” Silver Fox :”…” Ye Yuqiu and Bai Xinghe also sighed. Lin Xuan, Shield Ghost, and Flame Explosion simply had an unbreakable alliance. Mu Yang cursed and ran down the city wall in exasperation. However, he quickly reacted. There were only 53 pills in total. The 53 Thunder Rock Marrow still had to be distributed to the 12 Lightning Towers, and in the end, there were only a few for each tower. Eventually, the energy of the Lightning Tower would still be exhausted. So what if Lin Xuan and the other two contributed the Thunder Rock Marrow? It was only a waste of precious resources! Thinking of this, Mu Yang became smug again and immediately followed these reserve team members to the other city walls. As a potion maker, Mu Yang could choose not to go up the city wall. However, now that he insisted on following, the reserve team members also could not say anything and could only let him follow. After walking down the east wall, the reserve team captain rushed to the north wall. At first, the situation of the northern city wall was almost the same as the eastern city wall. The reserve team couldn’t collect many items. However, they were able to obtain a few Thunder Rock Marrow. This was because some of the martial artists had previously bought a few Thunder Rock Marrow in the Falling Thunder Mountain and planned to sell them to the Construction Division in the Little Spirit Mountain. Since the situation was urgent, they decided to contribute. Mu Yang smiled. It was just a few Thunder Rock Marrow. It could not change the situation of the battle. “Is this all we’re able to get?” The reserve team captain sighed. However, he was actually already very happy. The 53 Thunder Rock Marrow on the east wall had already far exceeded his expectations. At this moment, a fierce man stepped forward. “I have something. I hope it can help you.” The reserve team captain looked up. The other party had already reached 1.9 meters and was already very tall. However, this ferocious man was even a head taller than him. He was 2.1 meters tall. The most impressive thing was the muscular man’s chest muscles. They were very big. The reserve team captain’s first reaction was to think that this ferocious man was someone who focused on Strength. However, this person was holding a staff. Compared to his huge chest muscles, the small staff was no different from a fire poker. The ferocious man took out some Thunder Rock Marrow and handed it to the reserve team captain. The reserve team captain counted and said in surprise, “19 Thunder Rock Marrow!” He asked, “May I know your name? I’ll record all the Thunder Rock Marrow I collected and return it to you in the form of battle merits.” Muscle Man said somewhat embarrassedly, “They… all call me Brother Milk.” The reserve team captain could not help but laugh. “Alright, I’ll register then. Brother Milk, 19 Thunder Rock Marrow.” Mu Yang’s mouth fell open. Where did these 19 Thunder Rock Marrow come from? Mu Yang wanted to ask, but the ferocious healer had already returned to the battle. The martial artists beside him looked at Mu Yang coldly. “Get lost. Don’t waste Brother Milk’s time!” Mu Yang was furious. However, he was only a potion maker and did not dare to compete with these burly martial artists. He could only leave dejectedly with the reserve team and head to the next city wall. On the south wall. As soon as the reserve team captain arrived, a tall young man in dark green suddenly appeared in front of him. “Who are you? Why did you come to the south wall? Are you here to provide support?” A long string of words directly came out of the young man’s mouth. The reserve team captain was speechless. What kind of high-speed speech was this? “We’re here to collect items that contain lightning power and use them as fuel for the Lightning Tower. We’ll compensate everyone according to the grade of these items,” the reserve team captain said solemnly. The young man with the sword said, “How many battle merits will I get if I give a white item? How many battle merits will I get if I give a green item? How many battle merits will I get if I give a blue item? How many battle merits will I get if I give a purple item? How many battle merits will I get if I give a golden item?” The reserve team captain: “…It would be a waste of time to tell you all this.” Mu Yang sneered. “In any case, just answer this simple question. Do you have any Thunder Rock, Thunder Rock Marrow, and the like? Lightning Withered Tree won’t do. The lightning elements contained in them are too little. If not, we’ll have to go to the next city wall.” The martial artists shook their heads repeatedly. They only had a few Lightning Withered Trees. They did not have any Thunder Rock and Thunder Rock Marrow. Moreover, there were only a few items that contained lightning in the Little Spirit Mountain. However, these were all inferior to the Thunder Rock. There were very few items with lightning elements. The reserve team captain looked helpless and prepared to leave. “Hey, don’t go. You haven’t asked me.” The young man with the sword stopped him. The reserve team captain did not know whether to laugh or cry. “I’m still in a hurry to go to the western city wall. Stop teasing me.” Mu Yang also laughed strangely. “If you don’t have the Thunder Rock Marrow, don’t waste time.” The young man with the sword directly took out dozens of Thunder Rock from the storage compartment. “Although I don’t have the Thunder Rock Marrow, I have the Thunder Rock.” Mu Yang was stunned, but he quickly said, “What can a few dozen Thunder Rock do?” The young man with the sword laughed and directly threw out the Thunder Rock in the storage compartment. In an instant, it formed a small mountain. “There are more than a thousand Thunder Rocks here. Is that enough?” He smiled. Mu Yang :”…” The reserve team captain’s eyes lit up. “It’s enough! More than enough!” Although the Thunder Rock was inferior to the Thunder Rock Marrow, the energy contained in the 50 Thunder Rock was almost comparable to a Thunder Rock. These thousand or so Thunder Rocks were equivalent to more than 20 Thunder Rock Marrow. When Mu Yang saw this, he was dumbfounded. “Where did you get your Thunder Rocks?” The young man with the sword chuckled and said, “I have a friend called Brother Milk. Previously, after the Falling Thunder Mountain advanced to the Seventh Realm, Brother Milk and I went in to take the risk. We accidentally fell off the cliff and accidentally discovered a large number of Thunder Rock at the bottom of the cliff.” “After digging out all the Thunder Rock, he discovered a lot of Thunder Rock Marrow in the depths. I took the Thunder Rock, and he took the Thunder Rock Marrow.” “Speaking of which, Brother Milk is really my lucky star. As long as I follow him, I can get lucky wherever I go.” The young man with the sword chuckled and maintained a smile the entire time. The reserve team captain was stunned. “Brother Milk, is that the ferocious healer from the northern city wall?” “Yes, yes, yes! Have you seen him? You must have a deep impression of him.” The young man with the sword smiled. The reserve team captain nodded. The impression was indeed very deep. The reserve team captain thought of something and hurriedly asked, “What’s your name? I’ll also record it for you.” The young man with the sword thought for a moment. “I don’t want to use my real name, but I didn’t give myself a code name either. However, other people call me Poison Blade.” The reserve team captain nodded. “Alright, Poison Blade. We will definitely not forget your and Brother Milk’s contributions to the Construction Division!” With that said, the reserve team captain led his team members straight to the last city wall, the western city wall. Mu Yang gritted his teeth. What was going on? Why were there people who could take out items that contained lightning power on every city wall? Soon, on the western city wall. The reserve team captain explained the situation as usual. The martial artists shook their heads repeatedly. Only a few people took out items like the Lightning Withered Tree. No one even took out the Thunder Rock. Mu Yang calculated carefully. Currently, he had collected about 80 Thunder Rock Marrow from martial artists. They needed to distribute 80 Thunder Rock Marrow to 12 towers. There would be less than 7 Thunder Rock Marrow for each tower. However, with the current energy consumption speed of the Lightning Towers, these were far from enough. Moreover, now that beast-shaped ghosts have appeared, the energy consumption will increase faster and faster! Mu Yang sneered in his heart. Unless someone from the western city wall took out 40 to 50 Thunder Rock Marrow at once, it was impossible for them to turn the tide. The energy of the Lightning Tower would definitely be exhausted before dawn! The martial artists from the three colonies would have no choice but to fight the ghosts. In that case, they would definitely suffer heavy casualties! “I have a bit of Thunder Rock Marrow.” At this moment, a tall young man in white with a cold expression raised his hand. “Cold Domain? You actually have the Thunder Rock Marrow?” The martial artist beside him was very surprised. Cold Domain nodded. “Before coming to Little Spirit Mountain, I once stayed in Dragon Sea City for a period of time. I was lucky and obtained some Thunder Rock Marrow and Thunder Rock.” With that said, he took out 29 Thunder Rock Marrow and more than 1,000 Thunder Rocks. The reserve team captain said in surprise, “So many!” The Thunder Rock was naturally inferior to the Thunder Rock Marrow. However, with so many Thunder Rocks, their energy was comparable to the energy released by 20 Thunder Rock Marrow. In total, it was equivalent to 49 Thunder Rock Marrow! Mu Yang was dumbfounded. “How did you get this?” He was very dumbfounded. Why had they all been to the Falling Thunder Mountain? Moreover, all of them had fortuitous encounters. Cold Domain felt it absurd that the other party was questioning him. Cold Domain said indifferently, “Who are you? Do I need to explain things to you?” Mu Yang was immediately furious. “I’m a Great Potion Master!” Cold Domain said calmly, “However, I heard that the most powerful potion maker in Colony Three is called Lin Xuan. Moreover, he doesn’t have a sharp mouth and angry cheeks, unlike you.” Mu Yang was furious. Some time ago, he had been unable to sleep because of Lin Xuan. This Cold Domain was even more ruthless and said that he had a sharp mouth and monkey cheeks. Mu Yang rolled up his sleeves and prepared to punch him. However, he quickly reacted. He was only a potion maker, and the other party was a proper ice mage. Mu Yang said fiercely, “Just you wait! You won’t be able to act cocky for long!” The martial artists beside him cheered loudly. “This is Cold Domain’s personality. He’s cold on the outside but warm on the inside. That Mu Yang actually dared to provoke him. He deserves to be scolded!” “Well said, Cold Domain. I’ve long felt that Mu Yang doesn’t look like a human. Instead, he looks like a ghost!” The reserve team captain bowed deeply to Cold Domain. “Thank you!” “Wait!” Cold Domain stopped them. “At this moment, all the martial artists are fighting the ghosts on the city wall. What they need is to be motivated. However, you’re being sarcastic and reducing their morale. What are your intentions?!” Cold Domain pointed at Mu Yang’s nose and shouted. Mu Yang’s heart skipped a beat as he forced a smile and said, “I’m a logistician. Why should you care what I do or where I go?” Cold Domain said coldly, “I don’t care where you go. Your nonsense and sarcasm are disrespectful to all the martial artists and an insult to those martial artists who died for the colonies!” Before Mu Yang could quibble, he shouted again, “I implore the members of the Construction Division to detain Mu Yang. It’s true that he has special privileges as a logistician, but he shouldn’t cause chaos to the army! I even have reason to believe that he’s a spy sent by another organization!” When the reserve team captain heard this, he stared coldly at Mu Yang. When Cold Domain said this, he also reacted. Mu Yang had always been so eccentric. It was really difficult for people not to think of him as a spy. Mu Yang hurriedly argued, “No, I’m not. Don’t talk nonsense!” The person in charge of the western city wall walked over and said solemnly, “Lock him up! If Old Wu asks, tell him that I gave the order.” The reserve team captain nodded heavily. “Yes!” The two reserve team members immediately dragged Mu Yang away. Mu Yang was shocked and frightened. “Framed! I was framed!” The martial artists on the western city wall all laughed happily. They had long endured Mu Yang’s high-priced potions. Cold Domain’s accusation really made them feel extremely good! The reserve team captain immediately rushed to the central tower with the Thunder Rock Marrow and Thunder Rock. On the tower. Old Wu and Li Weiguo were pacing back and forth anxiously. “They’re back!” Li Weiguo realized that the reserve team had all run back. Old Wu’s heart skipped a beat as he hurriedly asked, “What’s the situation?” He was already prepared. He expected that the items they obtained were probably pitifully few! The reserve team captain said solemnly, “Boss, it’s not a small number, but a big number! A huge number!” With that said, he directly took out a large pile of Thunder Rock Marrow and Thunder Rock from the storage compartment and directly blinded Old Wu and Li Weiguo. “Damn…” Old Wu swept his gaze over and was overjoyed. There were more than 2,000 Thunder Rock! There were more than 80 Thunder Rock Marrow! Li Weiguo was extremely shocked. “What’s going on?” The reserve team captain sighed and said, “Someone has provided us with a lot of Thunder Rock Marrow and Thunder Rocks from all four walls!” “Who are they?” Old Wu immediately asked. The reserve team captain stood high and pointed at the four walls as he spoke. “On the east wall, Lin Xuan, Shield, and Flame provided a total of 53 Thunder Rock Marrow.” “On the western city wall, Cold Domain provided 9 Thunder Rock Marrow and more than 1,000 Thunder Rocks.” “Brother Milk provided 19 Thunder Rock Marrow on the northern city wall.” “On the south wall, Poison Blade provided more than 1,000 Thunder Rocks.” After learning about the people who contributed from the reserve team captain, Old Wu and Li Weiguo looked at each other and saw the shock in their eyes. Weren’t those three people the ones who had shone in the battle against the ghosts? There was Cold Domain! With the Great Ice Seal, he froze five black panther ghosts and saved more than ten lives, indirectly stopping the possible defeat of the western city wall. There was that ferocious healer! He used various recovery spells and enhancement spells to recover the health points of countless people and increase the positive status of countless people, helping them kill many more ghosts. There was also the man wrapped in a dark green suit on the northern city wall. He wandered around the city wall like a firefighter. He appeared wherever there was danger and saved countless people! Old Wu was so happy that he was about to cry. “These people must all be recruited into the organization after the war. I’ll help recommend all of them!” Li Weiguo was also very excited. “Alright! I also agree to recruit them into the organization, but I want to make some changes. I’ll be the one to recommend them.” Old Wu: “…You’re even stealing this away from me? How shameless are you?” The reserve team captain looked at them and did not know whether to laugh or cry. “Boss, for the Thunder Rock Marrow, should we…” “Immediately use them to charge the 12 Lightning Towers!” “Yes!” The reserve team captain suddenly said, “By the way, I realized that there seems to be something wrong with Mu Yang. He has been following behind us and going to every city wall. He was even being sarcastic and disturbing the morale of the soldiers.” Li Weiguo nodded. “I’ve long suspected that something was wrong with this guy.” The reserve team captain smiled and said, “Cold Domain wanted us to temporarily detain Mu Yang. The person in charge of the northern city wall also agreed.” Li Weiguo laughed and said, “Alright! You guys did well.” “I know that you can’t attack these civilian martial artists because of your status as members of the Construction Division, but you also have to know that we’re members of the Construction Division. We protect the general public and not the scum of the people.” The reserve team captain was enlightened. Old Wu also nodded in relief. “Go, wait for the order at any time. If any of the city walls can’t hold on, it’ll be your turn to fight.” The reserve team captain saluted and immediately went below to prepare. Soon, the Thunder Rock Marrow and Thunder Rocks that were collected from the four walls were sent into the furnaces of the 12 Lightning Towers. With the Thunder Rock Marrow as fuel, it could increase the destructive power and range of the Lightning Tower. The martial artists on the four walls were happy to discover that the Lightning Tower behind them had become even more ferocious! Their morale also increased. Seeing the energetic looks of the martial artists, Lin Xuan also nodded slightly. There seemed to be many people who contributed the Thunder Rock Marrow, but they were all him. The Thunder Rock Marrow had been kept in his consciousness space. His consciousness space was like a public warehouse for all his avatars, and all of them had access to it. “It would be too ridiculous for me to take out too much Thunder Rock Marrow alone. It’s much better to split it between six people.” The person in charge of the east wall said happily, “Everyone, thanks to the Thunder Rock Marrow contributed by Lin Xuan, Shield, and Flame, the Lightning Tower can be recharged! Everyone, continue to persevere. Dawn is coming!” The martial artists shouted and looked at Lin Xuan with admiration. Boom! Boom! Boom! The Lightning Tower displayed its might, and a large number of ghosts died. Moreover, there were a lot of Thunder Rock Marrow! It was so much that Li Weiguo and Chief Wu were overjoyed. If nothing unexpected happened, they would be able to guard this place for the night. Time passed minute by minute. The long night was about to end. Dawn was about to arrive. Everyone felt that they were about to see the dawn. At this moment, the order from the tower was transmitted to the person in charge of every city wall. The martial artists on the four walls needed to retreat in batches. Moreover, they had to be carried down on stretchers! If the stretchers were not enough, the martial artists would need to be dragged down. It was best if they could appear more tragic and if the martial artists could spread the blood on the ground on their faces. In addition, they would stop throwing in more Thunder Rock Marrow into the Lightning Tower for the time being. Instead, they would let the Lightning Tower transition from its strengthened state to its normal state. The people in charge of the four walls were dumbfounded. What kind of order was this? Now that the attacks of the ghosts had weakened, shouldn’t they rush down and kill all the ghosts in one go? Why did they have to hide and withdraw their martial artists? However, although the four people in charge were very dumbfounded, they still quickly carried out the order. However, the martial artists were even more puzzled. This was especially true for the civilian martial artists. They were not as loyal as the Construction Division members. Hearing such an unreasonable order, some people even wanted to turn hostile on the spot. At this moment, people stood out from all four walls. On the east wall were Lin Xuan, Shield Ghost, Flame Explosion, Ye Yuqiu, and the others. The western city wall was Cold Domain, the northern city wall was Brother Milk, and the southern city wall was Poison Blade. They stepped forward in unison to speak up for the Construction Division. Because they had contributed greatly in this city defense battle, they had directly and indirectly saved many people and enjoyed a huge reputation. Therefore, the civilian martial artists listened to their words. “If not for Cold Domain speaking up for the Construction Division, I wouldn’t have carried out this stupid order!” “Poison Blade saved me twice. Since Poison Blade trusts the Construction Division, I’m also willing to carry out his orders.” “I really don’t understand why they’re doing this. Isn’t it better to settle this once and for all? Forget it, forget it. Brother Milk saved my life. I’ll listen to Brother Milk!” “…” Although the martial artists were unwilling, they still followed the orders and walked down the city wall in batches. Moreover, they hid under the city and did not move. The number of martial artists on the city wall and the number of ghosts decreased. They were probably in a stalemate. Lin Xuan naturally knew why Old Wu and Li Weiguo gave these orders. This was to trap those Indian martial artists! If the Indian martial artists discovered that there were not many casualties in the three colonies, they would naturally be suspicious. On the other hand, if they discovered that there were much fewer martial artists on the city walls of the three colonies, they would pounce at the opportunity to take advantage of the situation. The sky was getting brighter as dawn approached. The sutured ghost monster roared angrily and disappeared into the darkness before the sunlight shone on the ground. All the ghosts wailed and gradually died. The martial artists were stunned before laughing in relief. “We won! We won!” “We defeated a large-scale beast tide! We are the victors! We are invincible!” The entire Colony Three was cheering. Everyone’s faces were filled with joy. Lin Xuan also smiled and looked around, feeling rather gratified. At this moment, a powerful horn sounded in the distance. Everyone focused their eyes and suddenly saw a large number of martial artists who looked very different from the people of Xia Country rush over. A martial artist exclaimed, “It’s the Indians!” Ye Yuqiu stared at the tall and majestic Indian martial artist at the front with a furious expression. This was the first time she had lost her composure. “I’ve seen the leader before. He’s a level nine Eighth Realm Indian martial artist with the code name Garuda!” The martial artists on the city wall of Colony Three looked out and discovered that more than a hundred Indian martial artists were quickly approaching the gathering place. Although there were not many of them, every one of them was brave and good at combat. “Many of those Seventh Realm martial artists are famous experts from India!” “I know 18 of them alone. They were already at level seven Seventh Realm a year ago.” “Damn, these people are probably all experts above level seven Seventh Realm!” The martial artists’ faces turned pale. The higher the level, the greater the difference between each small level. At the First Realm, there was only a difference of 3 free attribute points between each level. However, at the Seventh Realm, the difference in attribute points between levels had already reached 9. Moreover, this was even when the attribute items, perfect advancement, and profession advancement were left out of the equation. Since these Indian martial artists were sent to attack Colony Three, it meant that they were probably experts of the same level! It was impossible for India to send weaklings in. That would be suicide. “I seem to have heard of that Garuda. He’s extremely powerful. Someone even said that if he became a Ninth Realm martial artist, he would probably be able to directly become a higher-up of India and participate in the decision making.” “I remember too! Previously, India and High Heaven Plains seemed to have a small conflict because of the Bloodline Fruit. They each sent three martial artists to challenge each other at sea. Garuda fought two people in a row. He injured one and killed another! His opponents were all level nine Eighth Realm martial artists.” Hearing these words, the martial artist beside him swallowed and instinctively took a few steps back. What kind of monster was Garuda? He had probably advanced perfectly and obtained a golden profession. Other than Garuda, the other Indian martial artists were probably also ferocious people who could fight five to six level one Seventh Realm experts. What was even worse was that these martial artists from the colonies had just ended their battle with the ghosts. His health, magic power, and energy were not at their peak. More importantly, they were extremely tired. They had not slept since 3 PM yesterday! He had been fighting the ghosts, and they were constantly tense. Now that he had defeated the ghost, they finally relaxed. At this moment of exhaustion, the sudden appearance of the Indian martial artists was simply a fatal killing move! “What’s there to be afraid of?! Did you forget the order from above? There’s still a large group of martial artists hiding in the city!” Feng Zhuang roared angrily. The martial artists beside him were stunned and immediately reacted. That’s right! Almost two-thirds of the martial artists had already retreated in batches. There were only a third of these people on the city wall, and they looked very few. The casualties also seemed very heavy. However, even if these Indian martial artists approached, they would definitely not have a good time! Lin Xuan nodded in relief. “Feng Zhuang is right. The person-in-charge should have been prepared long ago. We just need to do our job.” Lin Xuan’s words immediately caused many people to nod in agreement. While they were puzzled, the person-in-charge had long considered this. Since they withdrew the martial artists in batches, it meant that they had definitely predicted this. “But I still find it very strange. How did so many Indian martial artists get in? It’s impossible for them to be spies. They look too different from us.” “Yes, how did they get in?” “Have you forgotten what happened in the Falling Thunder Mountain a while ago? An Indian genius inexplicably entered and even wanted to tame the experienced mystic realm king of the Falling Thunder Mountain. He was almost successful, but in the end, he was interrupted by a few especially powerful members of the Construction Division. In the end, that genius opened a door under their noses and ran away!” Feng Zhuang sighed. “Damn? There’s such a thing? I never knew.” Feng Zhuang sighed and said, “That genius can at least be ranked in the top five in India. He’s the same as Xiang Tianxiu. Unfortunately, he didn’t stay.” He changed the topic. “However, those members of the Construction Division are really powerful. They actually successfully interrupted his taming. If he really manages to tame them, this person will definitely become a huge problem for the Construction Division in the future.” The martial artist beside him asked, “What are the names of the members of the Construction Division? Are they Xiang Tianxiu?” Feng Zhuang shook his head. “I remember their code names. I think they were called Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion.” Lin Xuan was not far away. Hearing them discuss excitedly, he could not help but laugh. Below the city. Garuda rode a huge golden lion and strode over. This huge lion was his pet and had once been a mystic realm king that he had tamed. Most of the mystic realms in India produced the skill book “Beast Taming Technique”. Therefore, most Indian martial artists would tame a demon beast as their pet. In this way, it would be equivalent to having your combat strength multiplied by two. The mystic realm of the Construction Division rarely produced such skill books. Thus, very few martial artists could tame demon beasts. “Everything is going according to plan.” Garuda looked at the panicked martial artists on the city wall with a cold smile. He had watched almost the entire battle between the ghosts in Colony Three. In the beginning, he was still somewhat puzzled. Powerful martial artists actually appeared one after another in the colonies and blocked the attacks of the ghosts. However, as the beast-shaped ghosts appeared, a large number of martial artists died in the colonies. They were even carried down by the logisticians in batches on stretchers. Later on, there were not even enough stretchers. They could only be dragged down. In addition, the Lightning Tower had originally used the Thunder Rock Marrow, causing it to enter an strengthened state. Its killing power and killing range had also increased greatly. However, when dawn arrived, the Lightning Tower had already retreated from its strengthened state. It was obvious what this meant. It meant that the colonies no longer had any Thunder Rock Marrow! If there had been more, they would definitely kill all the ghosts in one go! Seeing this, Garuda knew that it was time to attack. In the end, he was the one who benefited from the battle between the ghosts and the colonies! Before dawn, Garuda was already prepared and also communicated with the other two Eighth Realm martial artists. Three Eighth Realm martial artists each led more than a hundred Indian martial artists to attack three colonies. Garuda and the other two Eighth Realm martial artists were all level nine Eighth Realm! Other than a few dozen Indian martial artists who were in charge of logistics, the rest were all above level seven Seventh Realm! Garuda was very confident in himself. There were only two Eighth Realm martial artists in Colony Three, and they were two old men. When one was old, even if one’s level was higher, one’s physical strength would gradually decline. Moreover, one of them was even crippled! Although he had installed a prosthetic leg, it was definitely still different from his original leg. Not to mention two, even if four or five of these old things came, Garuda would still be able to firmly crush them with his huge lion! In the Central Tower. Old Wu and Li Weiguo looked at each other and smiled. Old Wu said, “They’re indeed here.” Li Weiguo said, “Then what should we do? Pretend first before attacking?” Old Wu chuckled. “I haven’t had the chance to use the new equipment that the Chief has recently made.” Li Weiguo rubbed his hands. “My hands are also itching. It’s finally time to take out this new equipment!” The two of them jumped down from the central tower at the same time and quickly arrived at the east wall before landing below the city. The Indian martial artists wanted to attack them, but they were reprimanded by Garuda. “These two people are mine!” The Indian martial artists hurriedly scattered and continued to rush towards the east wall. This empty space was left for the three Eighth Realm martial artists. Garuda was two meters tall. Li Weiguo was still fine. He was as strong as Schwarzenegger from the neck down, but he was only 1.8 meters tall. Old Wu was even more depressed. When one was old, their body would shrink. He was only 1.7 meters tall. In front of Garuda, who was more than three meters tall, he seemed very weak. When the martial artists on the city wall saw this scene, they could not help but worry for Li Weiguo and Old Wu. Could they beat the other party? It would have been fine if Li Weiguo was at his peak, but he was missing a leg. Now, he only had a mechanical prosthesis. Silver Fox, Black, Bai Xinghe, and the others could only sigh when they saw this. They wanted to help, but they were powerless. They were easy targets. Garuda could crush them effortlessly. Ye Yuqiu’s eyes flickered. Bai Xinghe was puzzled. “You don’t seem to be worried.” Ye Yuqiu smiled. “I’m worried, but when I thought about how these two deliberately let the martial artists retreat from the city wall and even used a stretcher to carry the martial artists down in such a strange way, I knew… that they were definitely prepared.” This was not difficult to guess. It was just that sometimes, people would get confused when they were concerned and their brains would freeze for a short period of time. They would not be able to think of this. After Ye Yuqiu pointed it out, Bai Xinghe immediately reacted. That’s right. They were definitely prepared. If so, what was their “preparation”? “I’ll give you a chance. Betray the Construction Division and join India. Not only will you not die, but you will also be able to live very comfortably in India.” Garuda crossed his arms and looked down at them. Old Wu sneered. “Although I’m old, I have no intention of being a slave.” Li Weiguo said indifferently, “You don’t understand what this land means to us. It’s impossible to shake the will of the senior members of the Construction Division.” Garuda said calmly, “I was only advising you out of goodwill. Since you guys insist on courting death, I’ll fulfill your wish.” He directly jumped down from the huge lion and a huge golden spear suddenly appeared in his hands, stabbing towards Li Weiguo. The golden lion under him roared, its voice shaking the world as it tried to bite Old Wu crazily. Li Weiguo laughed loudly. “I won the bet. Garuda looks down on you and sent a lion to fight you.” Old Wu had an indignant expression. “Damn, the other party actually sent his beast to fight me. This is too much.” Garuda did not care about the words of these two old men at all. In his opinion, this was only their last joke before death. “Die!” The nearly three-meter-long golden spear seemed to have descended from the sky and smashed over with a huge force. Even the air made a sound of being overwhelmed. Li Weiguo was about to be hit by the golden spear and explode into pieces. However, in the next moment, a sound of metal rumbling erupted from Li Weiguo’s body. Armored armor suddenly surged from all the joints in his body. A huge fist formed outside his arms. A thick protective mirror formed on his chest. Equipment also extended out from his legs and covered his soles. In an instant, a set of huge metal equipment was instantly formed. It was very similar to the single-man exoskeleton armor described in science fiction novels. “Get lost!” Li Weiguo suddenly exerted strength in his arms, and his metal exoskeleton also erupted with strength. It actually directly collided with the golden spear! Boom! Golden light and cold air collided. The golden light flew out and landed more than ten meters away. The cold air exploded into ice fragments. However, Li Weiguo only took seven to eight steps back. Garuda’s pupils constricted. What kind of strange equipment was this?! At this moment, the miserable cry of the huge golden lion suddenly sounded from the side. He looked over and was surprised to see that his huge golden lion had been beaten up by Old Wu with a stick. Old Wu was also wearing a huge metal equipment. The claws and teeth of the golden lion were unable to break through Old Wu’s defense. However, Old Wu’s Dog Beating Staff could cause huge damage to the golden lion. Less than half a minute after Garuda and Li Weiguo fought, the huge golden lion was already beaten by Old Wu until blood flowed from its mouth and nose. Garuda was shocked and furious. What was going on? This golden lion was a mystic realm king. Its attributes were 15% higher than demon beasts of the same level, so it was naturally more powerful than martial artists of the same level. Now, he was being pressed to the ground by Old Wu. It must be because of that huge metal equipment! Old Wu and Li Weiguo looked at each other and smiled. “This equipment is really freaking useful!” At this moment, screams erupted from the city wall again. The Indian martial artists originally thought that there were only this many people on the city wall. They had expected there to be a small number of martial artists who had suffered heavy casualties! As long as they reached the top of the city wall, they would be able to kill the enemy easily! However, when they reached the top of the city wall, the people on the wall immediately scattered. Before they could scratch their heads and wonder, a large number of various skills had already enveloped them! Although the level of the martial artists in the colonies was not as high as these Indians, there were many of them! Moreover, they had long been guarding under the city wall and had accumulated powerful skills in advance. They were waiting for these Indians to walk into their trap. In this first encounter, three unlucky Indian martial artists had died miserably under the bombardment of a skill! The other party had probably triggered critical hits, bleeding, and other negative statuses at the same time. Seeing this scene from afar, Garuda was even more shocked and furious. What was going on?! There were actually martial artists in Colony Three? Moreover, there were many of them! However, didn’t he clearly see those martial artists being carried down the city wall on stretchers in a panic? What the hell happened?! Garuda’s thoughts were like a pot of porridge. It was all a mess. The martial artists on the west, south, and north walls had also arrived at the east wall. The pressure on the Indian martial artists increased. They originally thought that they would be able to directly attack the east wall in less than three minutes and enter the city to fight in the alleys. This way, they would be able to use their stronger individual combat strength. However, they were now firmly restricted to the city wall. Stuck on the city wall, they were living targets. The martial artists below the city wall bombarded the sky. All kinds of negative statuses hung above their heads. Paralysis, blindness, confusion, speed reduction, armor penetration… If all these negative statuses were displayed above his head, the list would probably be longer than a meter. “Everyone, move aside. Cold Domain is about to use the Great Ice Seal!” A loud cold voice sounded from the crowd. The martial artists who had long seen the strength of the Great Ice Seal hurriedly scattered. Boom! A cold aura descended. The strongest and fiercest Indian martial artists were directly frozen on the spot. Of course, because of the difference in levels, the freezing time was not that long. It was only 1.2 seconds. However, these 1.2 seconds were still enough for them to deal a lot of damage. “I’ll be the one to harvest!” The young man wrapped in a dark green suit said and immediately rushed into the cold air like a ghost. Sword light flashed crazily. A fatal dark green light flashed past the throats of these five Indian martial artists. After 1.2 seconds of being frozen, the five martial artists fell to the ground with a tragic cry. The four of them had suffered critical hits, bled, and were poisoned, directly dying. Only one person was relatively lucky and did not suffer a critical hit. Fortunately, he still had about 25% health. However, the bleeding damage and poison damage were also crazily reducing his remaining health points. He wanted to take out the antidote from the storage compartment with a frightened expression. However, just as the antidote was brought to his mouth, a sword light flashed. The sword light directly shattered the medicinal liquid. The Indian martial artist roared angrily. He raised his saber and slashed towards his side, wanting to kill the young man with the sword. The surrounding martial artists retreated repeatedly and only dared to use long-range skills to attack. This was a Seventh Realm martial artist. Even if he was severely injured, he could still severely injure or even kill them. However, they could all see that every time this Indian martial artist swung his saber, it was in vain. The young man’s figure completely fused into the shadows like a ghost. Every time, it would coincidentally brush past the powerful blade. The young man could fool this Indian martial artist every time. After seven to eight seconds that felt both long and short, the Indian martial artist bled dry. In the end, what flowed out was even dark green poison blood. The Indian martial artist could no longer hold on and fell heavily to the ground. Boom! Boom! Boom! Another Indian martial artist took out bombs from his storage compartment and threw them forward. This kind of bomb contained poison fragments and had an explosion range of up to eight meters. Any martial artist who was affected by the bomb would immediately be poisoned. Their health points would drop crazily like a waterfall. In a short period of time, more than 30 martial artists had fallen to the ground. In order to protect the injured, many members of the Construction Division were also poisoned and their lives were in danger. That Indian martial artist continued to throw out bombs as they smiled sinisterly. At this moment, a majestic figure rushed out of the crowd before taking out a tower shield with a huge golden lion head carved on it. He used this shield to block all the bombs and defended the poisoned martial artists. The Indian martial artist sneered and actually stopped bombing the others. He took out one poison bomb after another with both hands, wanting to bomb this martial artist with the tower shield to death. He cursed out rampantly in his native language. “Let’s see how many more you can take!” At this moment, a muscular man suddenly rushed out with a small staff. A holy white light descended from the sky and enveloped most of the poisoned martial artists. Immediately after, an emerald green light that seemed to contain life energy descended. Purification! Great Recovery! After the two support spells were cast, the poison state of the poisoned martial artist was completely removed, and their health points also increased by a lot. The Indian martial artist who threw the bomb was stunned. What kind of purification skill was this? It even removed the poison effect? “As a long-range martial artist, didn’t you ever learn not to get too close to the enemy?” The ferocious healer suddenly rushed over with large strides. The small staff swung like a golf club and ruthlessly struck the Indian martial artist’s head. Bang! The latter was immediately sent flying by a huge force. Blood sprayed wildly in the air, and his teeth shattered in fear. Was this really a healer? As soon as the Indian martial artists landed, a group of martial artists gathered. “You’re the one who threw the bomb, right?” “I’ll kill you!” The martial artists rushed forward and did not use their skills at all. They all used their fists to punch. “Brother Milk, good job!” Poison Blade gave him a thumbs up. The surrounding martial artists exclaimed. “I didn’t expect this, Brother Milk. What’s this move called? Healers even have such a skill?” The Muscle Healer nodded in embarrassment. “I created it myself. I call it the Resting Staff Technique.” In the prison of Colony Three. This place was usually used to imprison martial artists who did not listen to orders and did not keep their word. Mu Yang was also thrown into one of the prisons. He leaned idly against the railing. At this moment, he heard a battle cry. Among them was the unique horn of India. Mu Yang stood up immediately. He was extremely happy. He knew that his Supreme Master had arrived! “Hehehe, from the sound of it, our India is definitely going to win!” Mu Yang had a happy expression. Under the east wall. Garuda’s expression had already changed from being confident of victory to being gloomy and solemn. Li Weiguo and Old Wu were wearing huge metal equipment. This was still fine. After all, it was not unreasonable for the other party to have a life-saving trump card he had never used before. However, the sudden appearance of a large number of martial artists in the colony was simply inexplicable! “You guys… knew long ago!” Even a stupid person would realize this, let alone Garuda. Moreover, Garuda was not stupid. Li Weiguo teased, “Of course. Did you only just realize?” Garuda took a deep breath, his eyes bloodshot. He knew that this battle had definitely failed. Moreover, since Colony Three was already prepared, Colony Two and Colony One were definitely also prepared. Since he was unable to kill Li Weiguo and Old Wu, it meant that it was impossible for him to take down Colony Three. The only thing he could do now was… Run! Garuda even abandoned the huge golden lion and turned to run. Compared to the two Eighth Realm martial artists who attacked Colony Two and Colony One, he was from a noble faction and one of the rulers of India. Garuda knew very well that the reason why he had participated in this battle was only so that he could gain more achievements. As long as he had the huge honor of conquering the Little Spirit Mountain, it would not be a problem for him to become a deputy leader or even compete for the position of leader in the future. The leader had also long told him that if anything unexpected happened, his first priority was to save his own life. Therefore, he turned around and ran without any psychological obstruction. He still had a Sun Key in his storage compartment. As long as he ran to a safe distance and opened the fluctuation door, he could escape back to Sunrise City! “Damn, he doesn’t have any morals at all!” Old Wu was shocked. Didn’t they say that Garuda might compete for the position of the leader of India in the future? Shouldn’t a future leader at least try to save face? “You’re not injured at all. If you fight again, you might be able to defeat us.” Old Wu shouted as he chased. “That’s right. We’re very weak. If you really don’t think you’ll be able to handle it, we’ll take off our huge metal equipment and fight you!” Li Weiguo directly used his skill to chase after the other party. Garuda was so furious that he vomited blood. As if he would believe them! These two old men were very naughty! “This is bad. This guy is too fast. We can’t catch up,” Old Wu whispered. Li Weiguo also frowned deeply. If he could kill Garuda, it would definitely be a powerful blow to the higher-ups of India. However, they could only watch as Garuda ran away. They felt very uncomfortable about this. “Open!” Seeing that he had already run out of the other party’s attack range, even if he only had a short second, it would still be enough. Garuda decisively took out the Sun Key and inserted it into the air in front of him. The next moment, a flickering door of light suddenly opened. Garuda was overjoyed and even had one foot in the door of light. However, at this moment, time seemed to slow down. A blade light suddenly shot out from the mystic realm door of the Little Spirit Mountain. This path cut through the sky and was dozens of meters long. It was as if the heavens and the earth were connected, as if all the light had disappeared in the Little Spirit Mountain. Click. The door of light broke! Boom! Garuda’s right leg was sent back. However, the rest of his body still remained in the Little Spirit Mountain. Garuda was in extreme pain. “Did I give you permission to leave?” A clear and vast voice sounded. The next second, a refined middle-aged man suddenly appeared in front of Garuda. Garuda endured the pain and looked over, his pupils constricting. Old Wu and Li Weiguo were surprised and happy. “Chief Lu.” The saber that caused the light of the world to disappear also landed in the eyes of Lin Xuan and the other martial artists. When the saber shot over, everything in Lin Xuan’s vision seemed to disappear, leaving only this saber that cut through the world. After the door of light was shattered, Lin Xuan suddenly reacted. He was actually deeply attracted by the light of that saber just now! Lin Xuan could not help but ask, “Who is that?” Ye Yuqiu slashed out a shock wave and said in admiration and joy, “That’s Lu Pinghai, the fourth chief and a Ninth Realm martial artist guarding the Little Spirit Mountain. Isn’t there a Spirit Mountain City outside the main door of the Little Spirit Mountain? He guards the city there.” Only then did Lin Xuan nod. No wonder he had never seen Lu Pinghai before. Black could not help but lean over. “That slash just now was too ferocious. I wonder if I can unleash such a slash in the future.” Silver Fox said solemnly, “You should focus on improving your morals. Don’t always think about stealing my Mystic Realm Pearls. Only then will you be able to unleash such a move.” Black was puzzled. “If you don’t give me the Mystic Realm Pearl, how can I become stronger? Have you forgotten? I’m your bodyguard! You haven’t paid me my salary this month.” Silver Fox :”…” Lin Xuan sighed. This was the first time he had seen the power of a Ninth Realm martial artist. It was even more powerful than the rumors. With a casual slash, the saber light reached dozens of meters. The other party directly shattered the door of light. Garuda did not even have a chance to escape. “Don’t even think about getting any secrets from me.” Garuda endured the pain and stood on one leg, glaring at Lu Pinghai. Lu Pinghai was puzzled. “Did I say that I wanted to obtain India’s secrets from you?” Garuda was stunned. “Then… then don’t you need to capture me to exchange for the hostages? We also captured a spy from your Construction Division.” Lu Pinghai said indifferently, “Of course we have to exchange hostages, but we won’t use you to exchange.” With that said, Lu Pinghai slashed again and again. No one present could react to this extremely fast attack. “It took me some time to fight my old opponent. I cut off his arm and leg before he escaped into the forest,” Lu Pinghai said casually. “I’m going to Colony Two. You guys clean up the battle and listen to my next orders.” He threw out another sentence and left, instantly disappearing. Old Wu and Li Weiguo nodded repeatedly. They knew that the old opponent Lu Pinghai was talking about was a Ninth Realm martial artist from India. In order to restrain Lu Pinghai and prevent him from entering Little Spirit Mountain, India must have also mobilized Ninth Realm martial artists to attack Spirit Mountain City. Garuda wanted to speak, but he realized that he could not make a sound. Then, he felt something hot and wet flowing out from his neck. He subconsciously touched it and realized that his hand had been soaked red. “Cluck… cluck…” Blood foamed from Garuda’s mouth as he instinctively asked the people beside him for help. Li Weiguo lowered his head and praised, “Chief Lu’s saber technique is even more exquisite. The door of light of the mystic realm shattered with a bang, but the weak neck remained for a full five seconds before blood appeared.” Old Wu also took a look and discovered that beads of blood were gradually appearing on Garuda’s neck. He nodded slightly. Garuda stretched out his hand, but he could not grab anything. Darkness and coldness quickly swallowed him. His head was separated from his body, and blood sprayed. A level nine Eighth Realm martial artist and a powerful competitor for the future leader of India, Garuda… had been killed with a single slash! On the east wall, Lin Xuan could not help but praise in his heart when he saw Garuda’s outcome. Lu Pinghai’s decision was too decisive! A person like Garuda was indeed not suitable to be used as a hostage. Killing him as soon as possible was the best choice. “Surrender! We surrender!” Seeing that Garuda was dead, these Indian martial artists were defeated. They howled and knelt with their hands on their heads. Some of the stubborn Indian martial artists were also quickly surrounded and killed. “Seal the ones who surrendered with shackles and throw them into the prison,” Old Wu immediately instructed. The shackles were equipment that Wan Youxi had developed when he was bored. This thing was similar to the Germinal Organization’s wasteland reclaimer collar and the Construction Division’s battle merits bracelet. This equipment could also be called a curse equipment. After equipping it, one’s highest two attributes would be directly sealed, which meant that they would be reduced to 0. The shackles could not be opened by the person who was being restrained. Only those who had the password could open them. This also prevented the prisoner from trying to open the lock himself. Soon, the battle at Colony Three ended. All the Indian martial artists either died or surrendered. The healers shuttled through the martial artists and prioritized treatment for those who were more seriously injured. In the prison, Mu Yang had already begun to hum happily. He even knocked on the railing as he hummed. It was as if he was not in a prison but a music hall. It was as if he was drumming the prelude to the destruction of the Construction Division. At this moment, he heard the shouts outside gradually calm down. Soon, footsteps sounded from the entrance of the prison. Mu Yang was overjoyed. He leaned in front of the railing and stared at the entrance of the prison with anticipation. Since the shouts had stopped, it meant that the battle was over! The Supreme Master he had been waiting for would also finally arrive! However, what appeared in front of him were members of the Construction Division. Every member of the Construction Division was escorting an Indian martial artist in shackles. Mu Yang felt terrible. Why… Why had the Supreme Master become a prisoner?! “What are you looking at? Squat down obediently. You’re still suspected of being a spy!” The member of the Construction Division pointed at Mu Yang and berated loudly. Mu Yang laughed dryly and hurriedly squatted down to cover his face. Many of these Indian martial artists had seen him before. At this moment, he couldn’t help but feel very nervous. He was probably doomed. On the city wall. Old Wu and Li Weiguo removed their huge metal equipment and walked in front of the martial artists. They looked around in relief. “Everyone, we’ve defended against the large-scale beast tide and the sneak attack of the Indian martial artists! This is not only a victory for the Construction Division, but also a victory for everyone!” Old Wu said loudly. The martial artists cheered. “In this battle against the ghosts, there have been many experts who have contributed generously. I believe everyone knows who I’m referring to. The Construction Division will reward these people.” Li Weiguo smiled and said. The martial artists smiled kindly and looked at Lin Xuan and the others. “The one who contributed the most in this battle is definitely Yan! He’s too powerful. He killed so many ghosts alone!” “Who is Flame? I’ve never heard of him. Cold Domain of our western city wall is the true eternal god! You guys haven’t seen that Great Ice Seal. It even froze a level seven Seventh Realm Indian martial artist, saving countless lives!” “Hey, hey, hey, if we’re comparing the number of lives saved, then you have to mention Brother Milk from the northern city wall! Brother Milk’s healing is simply amazing. At least a hundred people have been healed by him, and at least 400 people have been healed by his enhancement spells. Isn’t he awesome?” “Flame, Cold Domain, and Brother Milk were only enjoying themselves. The one who was truly impressive was Poison Blade from our southern city wall. He was like a firefighter! A master of speed! Wherever there’s danger, there’s always Brother Poison Blade!” The martial artists spoke one after another. In the end, their faces even turned red and even seemed like they were about to fight each other. Old Wu and Li Weiguo laughed loudly. They were the most happy to see such a scene. The more powerful such figures there were, the better. They wished that everyone present was a top-notch expert. At this moment, Lin Xuan was already laughing uncontrollably. No matter who they decided on, he would still be the winner. At this moment, a strong wind blew from the depths of the Little Spirit Mountain. The wind brought a loud voice. “All martial artists, gather at Colony Two! Follow me… to counterattack the Sunrise City!” When Lin Xuan heard this, he was first stunned before his heart skipped a beat. Counterattack on Sunrise City! Lu Pinghai sure was bold! However, Lin Xuan thought about it carefully and immediately reacted. Now was indeed the best time to counterattack against Sunrise City! In order to seize Little Spirit Mountain, a large number of elites among the Seventh Realm Indian martial artists had been mobilized. However, they either died or surrendered. In this way, almost all the people who stayed in Sunrise City were weaker Seventh Realm martial artists. With a Ninth Realm martial artist like Lu Pinghai leading the way, they could definitely make a huge profit by counterattacking Sunrise City! When the martial artists heard this, they also acted as if they were on steroids. He had long heard that Sunrise City was extremely rich and was not dangerous, but the treasures produced were ridiculously abundant. When Old Wu and Li Weiguo heard this, their eyes suddenly lit up. “I didn’t expect to fight for the country at my age.” Old Wu straightened his back. Li Weiguo laughed happily. “India has extended their dirty hands to spy on the Little Spirit Mountain and the Kunlun Ruins many times. Now, it’s finally time for us to counterattack!” The two of them looked at each other and said loudly, “All martial artists! Follow!” Soon, a mighty martial artist team headed straight for Colony Two. Other than those who were missing limbs and were seriously injured, most of the martial artists had joined the team. Along the way, the healers seized the time to treat the injured martial artists. Soon, they arrived at Colony Two. Thousands of people had already gathered here! Lu Pinghai nodded slightly and took out a Sun Key he had obtained from the Indian martial artists and inserted it into the air. After seizing it, he had already looked at the method to use the Sun Key. Each Sun Key could only be used twice. This Sun Key was like a round-trip bus ticket. After using it once on the way back, it would run out of energy and self-destruct. Lu Pinghai now had three Sun Keys that he had obtained from these three Eighth Realm Indian martial artists. All three of these Sun Keys had already been used once. After he inserted the Sun Key into the air. The air hummed. Boom! The door of light immediately opened. As the door of light opened, the Sun Key slowly disappeared after exhausting its energy. Lu Pinghai was the first to step into the door of light. “I’ll be responsible for killing. As for the rest, I’ll leave it to you guys.” All the martial artists were excited. As expected of the chief, his words were so domineering! “Charge!” Old Wu, Li Weiguo, and the other Eighth Realm martial artists roared. Many martial artists entered in a single file! Lin Xuan also stepped into the door of light, and his surroundings spun. After a short period of discomfort, an extremely foreign world appeared in front of him. The building was magnificent and angular. There were decorations made of gold everywhere. Golden light spread as far as the eye could see. This was the largest colony in the mystic realm of Sunrise City. It was also called the “Royal City” by many Indian martial artists. With the Royal City as the center, there were eight satellite cities guarding in all directions. However, from the day the mystic realm of Sunrise City fell under the control of India, the eight satellite cities had always been in ruins. No matter how they were rebuilt, they would return to their original state the next day. India simply ignored them and focused on expanding the Royal City. “Slash!” Lin Xuan had just stabilized himself when he saw a blade light flash in the air. The two Eighth Realm Indian martial artists did not even have the time to react before they were cut in half by Lu Pinghai. “Gather here in an hour to leave the Sunrise City. I won’t wait for you!” With that said, Lu Pinghai rushed out like a violent wind. Report chapterUse arrow keys (or A / D) to PREV/NEXT chapterContact &#8211; Sitemap<br> Privacy &amp; Terms of use Lin Xuan nodded in understanding. Now, they were just catching the Indian martial artists off guard and using the shortest time possible to kill as many Indian martial artists as possible and plunder as many resources as possible. However, when the Ninth Realm Indian martial artists received the news, they would definitely rush over immediately. With more Ninth Realm martial artists, it would be difficult for them to retreat. An hour was the limit. “Let’s disperse too!” Black roared and immediately rushed out. Silver Fox, Bai Xinghe, Shield Ghost, and Flame Explosion all rushed towards the places they were interested in. Lin Xuan rushed out a few steps and scratched his head. “I don’t know much about Sunrise City.” Ye Yuqiu waved her hand to signal for him to follow. “I do. Follow me. We’ll go straight to the rune warehouse.” Along the way, they saw the corpses of Indian martial artists. The Eighth Realm martial artists had no ability to resist at all and were casually killed by Lu Pinghai. As for the stronger Seventh Realm martial artists, he would leave them to Old Wu, Li Weiguo, and the other Eighth Realm martial artists to deal with. Lu Pinghai would not stoop so low as to kill Seventh Realm martial artists. On the way, Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu encountered Black. Seeing that a martial artist was actually grabbing the ruby in the statue’s eye, Black immediately kicked the other party away and said resentfully, “Idiot, don’t you even know how to rob? Go to the warehouse!” “That’s right, rob the warehouse!” The martial artist seemed to have woken up from a dream. “And the armory! The rune warehouse! There are so many good things to snatch! You’re really embarrassing yourself by snatching the ruby here.” Black cursed. The martial artist scratched his head awkwardly and hurriedly identified the direction before running towards the armory. The surrounding martial artists also seemed to have been exposed by Black and followed. Watching these martial artists leave, Black laughed strangely. “In that case, no one will snatch alcohol from me, right? I heard that the divine bull wine in Sunrise City is very strong. Where is it?” He smelled something and ran in a certain direction. Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu :”…” Damn, there were so many good things. Why was it that he only wanted to steal alcohol? In the rune warehouse. When Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu arrived, more than 20 Seventh Realm Indian martial artists were guarding here with their backs against each other. There were already many corpses lying on the ground. There were fewer Indian martial artists, but more martial artists from the Little Spirit Mountain. “The martial artists guarding the warehouse are indeed stronger,” Lin Xuan said. “The big shot is here!” At this moment, when the martial artists saw Ye Yuqiu, they immediately made way in reverence. Many people had seen Ye Yuqiu’s battle results on the east wall. She was simply like a Valkyrie, killing her way in and out. Although it was not as exaggerated as Flame Explosion’s Lightning Storm, she was still definitely outstanding on the east wall. Ye Yuqiu raised the Valkyrie Frost Blade and rushed in like a cold wind. Wherever it passed, all the Indian martial artists were affected by the cold air, and their attack speed and movement speed decreased greatly. Lin Xuan also threw the Giant Thunder Spear from behind to provide long-range firepower support for Ye Yuqiu. In less than three minutes, the Indian martial artists guarding the rune warehouse were all killed. Ye Yuqiu gathered her strength and slashed open the warehouse door. The martial artists’ eyes lit up as they rushed in and took as much as they could. However, they were also very self-aware. They did not go to the peerless golden rune first and instead left them for Ye Yuqiu and Lin Xuan. Lin Xuan swept his gaze around and chose two sets of golden runes. Ye Yuqiu only chose a set of golden runes. They only needed what was suitable for them. “Everyone, I’ll leave these to you.” Lin Xuan waved his hand and left with Ye Yuqiu, heading straight for the next location. “How nice of them!” The martial artists shouted excitedly and immediately stepped forward to fight for the golden rune groups. Next, there were the armory, armor, accessories, blueprints, skill books… Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu had visited every place. On the way, there was no danger. There was no longer any systemic resistance in Sunrise City. Lin Xuan chose many good things. He did not even have the time to look at the effects carefully before throwing them all into his consciousness space. After all, he had five avatars. All five avatars needed equipment, skills, and rune groups. As long as they were suitable, he would take them all! Soon, almost an hour passed. Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu had long found what they needed. Lin Xuan was also very lucky to find a Sun Key and two Bloodline Fruits. The two of them returned to the Sunrise City in advance and waited here in advance. Soon, the other martial artists also gathered from various corners of the Royal City. Because time was tight, they did not leave the Royal City and only searched for various treasures in the Royal City. The martial artists were excited and discussed their gains from this trip. “I found a golden set! I’m rich!” “I obtained a set of golden runes and four sets of purple runes. I can definitely earn a lot of essence by selling them!” “What a pity. If I could go to those satellite cities, my gains would definitely be greater.” “Indeed. After all, we only have an hour. However, I’m already satisfied with these gains.” More and more martial artists gathered from all directions. Black hugged a bottle of wine and chuckled strangely. He had probably found the divine bull wine he wanted the most. Old Wu, Li Weiguo, and the other Eighth Realm martial artists also returned. Their old faces were actually filled with vigor. Soon, a saber light flashed in the sky. Following that, the cry of a roc sounded. Lin Xuan looked into the sky and saw two Ninth Realm martial artists fighting! There was also a green roc attacking Lu Pinghai. However, after taking a few looks, he realized that Lu Pinghai still had the upper hand even though he was surrounded by a man and a bird. Lu Pinghai’s energetic voice sounded from the sky. “Open the door.” Then, a Sun Key descended from the sky and landed in Li Weiguo’s hand. Li Weiguo nodded and hurriedly inserted the key into the air to open the door of light to return to Little Spirit Mountain. “Everyone, return in order!” “The civilian martial artists will leave first. The Construction Division members will cover the rear!” All the martial artists returned to the Little Spirit Mountain in an orderly manner. The Ninth Realm martial artist from India was incomparably furious. He cursed viciously and wanted to attack the martial artists on the ground. However, he was completely blocked by Lu Pinghai every time. He could not even spread out the aftershock of the battle. Seeing that most of the martial artists had already returned to the Little Spirit Mountain, Lu Pinghai smiled and said, “I’m done playing. See you later.” With that said, an extremely powerful saber light suddenly shot out from the black saber in his hand. The saber light was not powerful, but it had an extremely powerful blinding effect. The Indian Ninth Realm martial artist screamed and his vision went blank. By the time he reacted, Lu Pinghai had already escorted the last martial artist back to the Little Spirit Mountain. The door of light slowly closed and completely disappeared. “Ah! Damn the Construction Division!” The Ninth Realm martial artist roared crazily, his voice spreading throughout the ruined Sunrise City. … Little Spirit Mountain. Li Weiguo and Old Wu chuckled and leaned in front of Lu Pinghai. “Chief, how was your harvest?” Lu Pinghai smiled. “I snatched seven Sun Keys and more than twenty Bloodline Fruits. I destroyed six mines in Sunrise City and killed more than 50 Eighth Realm martial artists. At the same time, I also killed all the experienced mystic realm kings and mystic realm kings.” Old Wu gave him a thumbs up. “Awesome!” Lin Xuan heard this voice not far away and his face also revealed a strange expression. As expected of the chief, he was still ruthless. This time, a large number of Eighth Realm and Seventh Realm martial artists had died in India, and their vitality had been greatly injured. It would take them more than ten years to recover. Ye Yuqiu also clicked her tongue in wonder. “The destruction of those six mines is probably what dealt the most damage to them. Back then, a lot of manpower and resources were invested just to build them. I heard that more than 20 Eighth Realm martial artists and 400 to 500 Seventh Realm martial artists died just for it to be barely established.” Lin Xuan was surprised. “Are the mines in Sunrise City very famous?” Ye Yuqiu nodded. “The minerals in Sunrise City are also top-notch in all the large mystic realms. They’re comparable to the Falling Thunder Mountain.” “The key is that the six mines are all underground. The demon beasts on the ground of Sunrise City are not powerful. The powerful ones are the underground demon beasts. A large number of people have been spent to explore and eliminate the demon beasts where the six mines were established. Now, these mines have been destroyed by Chief Lu. It will be extremely difficult for them to rebuild them.” Lin Xuan nodded slightly. Lin Xuan was completely unaware of this. He still had too little information. If he had time, he would definitely read more about the relevant information. “Everyone, go back and rest. Rest well.” Li Weiguo smiled and shouted. The martial artists scattered. This long battle finally ended. After experiencing the large-scale ghost riot, the sneak attack of the Indian martial artists, and the counterattack of the Sunrise City, everyone was extremely exhausted. Lin Xuan also wanted to leave, but he was stopped. “The few of you, as well as Cold Domain, Poison Blade, and Brother Milk, wait.” Old Wu smiled and approached. Li Weiguo had followed behind them with a strange smile. Old Wu chuckled and said, “I’m a straightforward person. I’ll ask directly. Are you willing to join the Construction Division?” Lin Xuan also revealed a strange expression. Not only him, but Ye Yuqiu, Silver Fox, Black, and Bai Xinghe also did not know whether to laugh or cry. Li Weiguo laughed loudly. “Alright, alright. Old Man Wu, let me do the talking.” Old Wu was furious. “No! I have to be the one to rope in these people. Get lost.” Li Weiguo crossed his arms and waved his hand. “Take off your disguises. Since India’s plan has been foiled, there’s no need to continue pretending.” Old Wu was stunned. What disguise? Lin Xuan, Ye Yuqiu, and the others immediately removed the disguise on their faces and revealed their true appearances. “Let’s get to know each other again. Ye Yuqiu, Silver Fox, Black, Bai Xinghe, Lin Xuan, Shield Ghost, and Flame Explosion.” Li Weiguo pointed at them and showed them off in front of Old Wu. “Old Wu, it’s not that I want to snatch them from you. They’re already members of the Construction Division to begin with.” “Other than them, many Seventh Realm martial artists have also entered Little Spirit Mountain in disguise.” Old Wu was dumbfounded and wanted to cry. He had wanted to play the role of the person who roped these people in. Unfortunately, because of Li Weiguo, he had failed miserably. Damn! Li Weiguo waved his hand. “Your battle merits will be credited to your original identities. You’ll be able to see it later. Go back and rest now.” He casually placed his hand on Old Wu’s shoulder. “Let’s go and drink too.” Old Wu shook his hand angrily. “Get lost! You actually lied to me for so long!” Li Weiguo hooked his arm around his shoulder and walked towards the canteen of Colony Three. “Isn’t this the organization’s request? I was also following orders. Let’s go, let me treat you to a drink. Don’t be angry…” The two of them bickered as they walked further and further away. “Let’s go, let’s go. I want to quickly go back and taste this divine bull wine.” Black chuckled and directly activated his skill to run to his room. Poison Blade walked over and greeted everyone. “Are you Lin Xuan, Shield Ghost, and Flame Explosion? I’ve long heard of you.” “Brother Milk, come and introduce yourself too. Didn’t you say that you admire people who can make potions the most?” Only then did Brother Milk step forward in embarrassment. The sight of a shy muscular man really made people want to laugh. Only Cold Domain still had a cold expression. Before he left, he said, “You guys are indeed not bad. You guys are worthy of being my rivals.” Lin Xuan blinked. “These few people have extraordinary personalities, right?” Ye Yuqiu nodded repeatedly and felt the same way. Report chapterUse arrow keys (or A / D) to PREV/NEXT chapterContact &#8211; Sitemap<br> Privacy &amp; Terms of use The night in Little Spirit Mountain was different from the night in other places. There were always ghosts attacking the city here. Of course, the large-scale ghost attack had just ended. Large groups of ghosts could no longer be seen. There were only some scattered ones. The patrolling members of the Construction Division also didn’t need too much manpower and could rely on the terrain advantage to kill the ghosts and ensure that the other martial artists could sleep well after the battle. However, Lin Xuan could not fall asleep. He had gained too much today. He could not help but take out all his gains and flip through them. First was the essence and the Mystic Realm Pearl. When Ye Yuqiu brought him to the treasure vault of Sunrise City, many martial artists had already gathered here. The two of them did not snatch much. However, along the way, he had killed many Seventh Realm martial artists from India. After they died, the items in their storage boxes would randomly drop, allowing Lin Xuan to pick up a lot of stuff. Just the essence alone was nearly 13 million. There were more than 350 Mystic Realm Pearls. In addition, Lin Xuan still had some to begin with. In total, he had 400 and a few extra. With this, he could directly upgrade his four golden skills to the dark gold grade. After a short moment of thought, Lin Xuan chose the four skills, Magic Amplification, Magic Power Burst, Omnipotent Bone Armor, and Flash, and upgraded them to the dark gold grade. Previously, every golden equipment provided a 10% increase. Now, it directly soared to 20%. The cooldown time of Flash was greatly reduced, and the restriction that kept him from flashing outside his field of vision was also removed. The three skills, Magic Power Burst and the Omnipotent Bone Armor, had also more than doubled their original strength. Other than the essence and the Mystic Realm Pearl, there were also a large number of equipment, sets, rune groups, and skill books. Not only did Lin Xuan obtain a lot for himself, he also obtained a lot for his five avatars. Shield Ghost’s equipment was almost all top-notch. There was nothing to improve. It was the same for Poison Blade. The Vicious Poison Set and the One with the Sword rune group were simply tailor-made for Poison Blade. However, the equipment of Flame Explosion, Cold Domain, and Brother Milk had changed greatly. Flame Explosion’s Demon Flame Set had been changed to an even more powerful peerless golden “Holy Flame” Set. The Holy Flame Set was equivalent to an enhanced version of the Demon Flame Set. In addition, it had an additional effect. When casting fire spells, the set would automatically absorb the fire elements and condense a fire shield around his body. This effect greatly increased his survival ability. Next was Cold Domain. Cold Domain’s equipment had changed greatly. Previously, he had only obtained the purple set from the Little Spirit Mountain. Now, he had obtained the golden set “Eternal Winter”. Not only did this set have an equipment piece for the head, body, foot, and hand. It even had a ring and a staff called “Eternal Winter’s Gift”. As everyone knew, the more pieces a set contained, the more ferocious the set was. Ye Yuqiu’s Frost Valkyrie Set was a good example. It contained a total of nine pieces, and the overall grade had reached the dark gold level! Cold Domain’s Eternal Winter Set was not bad either. It contained six single pieces and was considered outstanding among the golden sets. Lastly, Brother Milk also changed into a new set. The set was called “Maiden’s Tear”, and its healing effect was greatly increased. This set was very pink and suitable for a fierce man like Brother Milk. “These two Bloodline Fruits are not bad. Why don’t I find a chance to use them?” Lin Xuan could see with his High-Level Observer that there was a chance for this Bloodline Fruit to stimulate the bloodline in the demon beast. The specific probability was related to the strength of the demon beasts. Ordinary demon beasts, mystic realm kings, and experienced mystic realm kings would naturally have different results. An experienced mystic realm king had the highest chance of activating their bloodline after eating the Bloodline Fruit. “Now that the matter has calmed down, I can peacefully find a good experienced mystic realm king in Little Spirit Mountain. I’m also looking forward to it. Is this Bloodline Fruit really as magical as the Indians say?” Lin Xuan was somewhat impatient. Then, he cast his gaze into his consciousness space. After obtaining so many equipment and skill books, he seemed to have more things to synthesize again. When he arrived at the synthesis table, many new synthesis formulas indeed appeared on the synthesis list. Flame Sovereign (Dark Gold Set) = Demon Flame+Holy Flame+Fire Dragon Heart Shadow Cloak (Dark Gold Equipment) = Shadow Ring+Shadow Pearl+Shadow Dragon Scale Emperor Engine (Dark Gold Skill) = Omnipotent Bone Armor+Dragon Heart+Giant Tiger Heart+Giant Lion Heart Maiden’s Wish (Dark Gold Set) = Maiden’s Tear+Maiden’s Healing Pearl+Maiden’s Magic Staff Ice Domain (Dark Gold Skill) = Great Ice Seal+Great Ice Dragon Technique+Frost Assault … “Most of the previous synthesis formulas were golden. Now, many dark gold equipment and skill books have appeared!” Lin Xuan was overjoyed. With his current wealth, he could obtain these things as long as he kept looking. If there was really no other way, he could also spend money to get other martial artists to help him find it. “It won’t be long before my body is covered in dark gold equipment!” At the same time, the news of India being severely injured swept across the world like a storm. For a moment, the various large organizations were in an uproar. The World Salvation Society in North America was the first to jump out and criticize the cruel war behavior of the Construction Division. The Knights of Truth and the High Heaven Plains followed closely behind. They claimed that the Construction Division’s war behavior was outrageous and accused them of deliberately provoking a battle between large organizations. They criticized the Construction Division for being extremely evil and inhumane. Other than these three large organizations, the small organizations that followed them also condemned the Construction Division. Attacks and accusations came from all over the world like snowflakes. However, before they raised these accusations, they all pretended as if India’s harassment of the Construction Division border for several years was non-existent. Among the five major organizations in the world, only the Arctic Army stood firmly on the side of the Construction Division. The World Salvation Society, the Knights of Truth, and the High Heaven Plains were even prepared to send some Ninth Realm and Eighth Realm martial artists to India to provide support. However, before their people could board the plane, another news spread. The people from the Construction Division had retreated… The entire battle only lasted for an hour, causing thousands of Indian martial artists to die, a large number of resources to disappear, and a large number of buildings to be destroyed. India had fallen from a top organization to a first-rate organization in almost a day. If not for the fact that there were still many Ninth Realm martial artists, they might even be reduced to a second-rate organization. The Construction Division was unmoved by the condemnation of the various large organizations and continued to do their work in an orderly manner. Of course, as the World Salvation Society and the Knights of Truth spoke up for India, they immediately took advantage of India’s current weakness and forced India to sell them many Sun Keys and Bloodline Fruits at unfair prices. In order to obtain their support, India could only endure the pain and sell them at low prices. There was something Lin Xuan did not understand at the beginning. The Construction Division clearly had the ability to completely occupy Sunrise City. Why did they not? However, he quickly reacted. If there were only the Construction Division and India in the entire world, they could naturally occupy Sunrise City. The problem was that in addition to the Construction Division and India, there were also the World Salvation Society, the Knights of Truth, and the Arctic Army. The Construction Division originally only had two large mystic realms. However, after the advancement of the Falling Thunder Mountain, there already had three, just like the World Salvation Society. If they completely controlled Sunrise City, they would have four of them! This would definitely attract the fear of all parties. In the end, it was very likely that the other organizations would attack together. Without absolute strength, such behavior was definitely irrational. Therefore, the chiefs should have long made a plan. The goal of the counterattack on Sunrise City was not to completely occupy it, but to kill as many middle and high-level martial artists as possible and plunder as many resources as possible. The news of India being severely injured gradually spread. The five large organizations did not fight each other like some people had guessed. The World Salvation Society and the Knights of Truth had received the benefits but did not do anything. They only threatened the Construction Division verbally, infuriating India. The martial artists’ focus also changed from the five large organizations to the specific details of this battle. Only then did some people realize that the war was not as India had described. The story of the evil Construction Division invading India’s Sunrise City was completely untrue. Instead, the truth was that India had sent a spy to Little Spirit Mountain. They wanted to take advantage of the large-scale beast tide that erupted in Little Spirit Mountain and take advantage of the situation. In the end, they were attacked by the Construction Division and their Sunrise City was even invaded! The truth gradually spread, and the martial artists all laughed. As expected of India. The invasion battle turned into a defensive battle. In this battle, India had lost a large number of martial artists, including the leader’s powerful competitor, Garuda! As a result, some people from the Construction Division also became famous. Lin Xuan, Shield Ghost, Flame Explosion, Cold Domain, Poison Blade, Brother Milk, Ye Yuqiu, and the others gradually entered the sight of the various large organizations. Arctic Circle, snowfield. A figure was fighting the polar bear bare-chested. This polar bear was a full six meters tall and was larger than the polar bear before the global digitization. However, at this moment, it was beaten by this young man until it cried out and retreated repeatedly. The young man did not say a word and continued to punch fiercely. Bang! The last punch directly hit the fat belly of the polar bear. If one looked closer, they could even see the fat swaying like a wave. The polar bear roared angrily. The young man thought that the other party was going to counterattack with all its might, but it lay down and even waved its bear claws like a human. The young man laughed and took out a bottle of vodka from the storage compartment and drank most of it. “Little Bear, you’ve become lazy.” The polar bear was furious. It snatched the vodka and drank it in a few mouthfuls before howling. Although it did not understand the other party, it growled, as if it was cursing. The young man laughed again and leaned forward to stroke the polar bear’s snow-white fur. At this moment, the bracelet on his wrist suddenly lit up. “Nelko, a large number of Seventh Realm experts have recently appeared in the Construction Division. Look at the global Seventh Realm rankings.” A voice sounded from the bracelet. The young man swept his gaze over and discovered a large group of mages. He shook his head in disdain. “A group of cowards actually occupied the Seventh Realm rankings. How laughable! Only cowards become mages. Real men fight in close combat!” At this moment, he suddenly discovered “Shield Ghost” and a short introduction. “Shield Ghost, level unknown. Suspected to have a golden armored warrior profession with high defense and high reflective damage. Moreover, he also has physical, magic, and elemental defense. At the same time, he can protect himself from dozens of ghosts and remain safe and sound.” The young man immediately perked up. “Interesting, I happen to lack such an opponent!” He turned around and rode on the polar bear. He said to his bracelet, “Help me tell Father that I’m going to the Construction Division to find someone to fight. Don’t worry about me!” Report chapterUse arrow keys (or A / D) to PREV/NEXT chapterContact &#8211; Sitemap<br> Privacy &amp; Terms of use Little Spirit Mountain. “Flame Explosion, you’ve entered the global Seventh Realm rankings!” At dawn, Silver Fox ran to Flame Explosion’s door and knocked loudly. Flame Explosion was stunned. “The global Seventh Realm ranking? Why haven’t I heard of this?” Silver Fox smiled and said, “This was arranged by the idlers of the six large organizations. The rankings are also relatively neutral. We can take a look.” “After our counterattack on Sunrise City ended, the Seventh Realm rankings were reshuffled. Many old names disappeared, and many new names appeared on the rankings.” “Look, your name has appeared in the 82nd place. There’s also Shield Ghost, Ye Yuqiu, Bai Xinghe, Black, and so on!” Silver Fox pressed his battle merits bracelet, and a blue light was projected onto the wall. Immediately, a list appeared. Flame Explosion, 82nd Ye Yuqiu, 84th. Cold Domain, 90th. Poison Blade, 91th Shield Ghost, 108th. Brother Milk, 411th. … Silver Fox said somewhat smugly, “Given my age and the fact that I’m only at the first level of the Seventh Realm, I didn’t expect to enter the rankings at all. However, I was actually able to enter the global Seventh Realm rankings. Moreover, I’m ranked 3,000th on the rankings for the first time!” At this moment, Black also approached and sneered. “You’re still smug about being in the top 3,000. Do you have any shame?” Silver Fox was anxious. “Look, you’re only ranked 2850. It’s not like you’re much higher than me.” Black smiled in disdain. “You should know that it’s not easy for an assassin like me to perform well in a city defense battle. Otherwise, my ranking would be higher than the 2,850th place.” Silver Fox sneered. “Excuses!” In front of Flame Explosion, the two of them started arguing. Flame Explosion could not help but laugh and continued to check the global Seventh Realm rankings. He scrolled up and quickly found Dart, ranked 44th. Flame Explosion continued to look up and saw the top six. Sixth place, Sharma, belonged to India. Fifth place was Nelko, who belonged to the Arctic Army. Fourth place was Xiang Tianxiu, who belonged to the Construction Division. Third place went to Bruno, who belonged to the Knights of Truth. Second place was Yoshichi Fujiwara. He belonged to High Heaven Plains. First place, Adamson, belonged to the World Salvation Society. There was a short introduction for everyone. For example, Xiang Tianxiu’s introduction was: Has an extremely high Spirit and is very good at lightning magic. His signature spells are Lightning Storm and Lightning Chains. He likes to challenge experts. Lin Xuan also walked out of his room, feeling rather gratified. All his avatars were actually on the rankings. It seemed that his combat strength was still quite powerful. “By the way, Teacher also asked me to tell you something.” Silver Fox patted his head and suddenly said, “There’s a Zen temple under Little Spirit Mountain called the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple. The last time it opened was five years ago. For some reason, a dragon roar suddenly sounded after the large-scale beast tide ended. Perhaps it’s about to open.” “Teacher said that all martial artists can spend 3,000 battle merits to sign up for the trial of the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple.” When Lin Xuan’s main body heard this, he was shocked. He had heard of the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple. He had heard that there were nine trials inside. One could obtain the treasures of the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple after passing every trial. If one could pass the nine trials, one could even choose two treasures from the final treasures. However, the last time the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple had opened was five years ago. Recently, there had been no signs of it opening. Because of this, he gave up his attempt to understand the information regarding the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple. “I understand.” Flame Explosion nodded. At this moment, a shout sounded from the third gathering place. “I’m looking for Flame Explosion and Cold Domain! Where are these two?!” Lin Xuan had a strange expression. He was familiar with this voice. Wasn’t this Xiang Tianxiu? At this moment, a large group of people had already gathered at the entrance of Colony Three. The martial artists stared at the young man and clicked their tongues in wonder. “Xiang Tianxiu actually came to Little Spirit Mountain?” “I didn’t expect to be in the same frame as such an expert one day!” “Did he just say that he wanted to find Flame Explosion and Cold Domain? Could he be looking for trouble with them?” The martial artists began to discuss. Although Shield Ghost, Brother Milk, Poison Blade, Ye Yuqiu, and the others had outstanding performances, Flame Explosion and Cold Domain were undoubtedly the two most outstanding people in the battle. It was just like how supporting characters in games were rarely liked. People only paid attention to the one that killed the enemy and not the one that assisted in the killing. Mage professions were undoubtedly the most powerful professions among all the professions. Many people even began to compare Flame Explosion to Cold Domain. Some people said that although Cold Domain’s best skill was the Great Ice Seal, which focused on suppression, if Cold Domain used an ice spell with powerful output, the number of kills might not be lower than Flame Explosion. Some people also said that Flame Explosion only had a high kill count because lightning spells were better at AOE damage. If Flame Explosion switched to using a suppression-type spell, it might not even be as good as Cold Domain’s spell. Because of this, two groups of fans even formed around Flame Explosion and Cold Domain. They were only short of publicly fighting. The outside Xiang Tianxiu seemed to have also come just to provoke Flame Explosion and Cold Domain. This made the martial artists of the Little Spirit Mountain even more excited. If they could defeat Xiang Tianxiu, the reputation of Flame Explosion and Cold Domain would definitely be even more resounding than before! “Flame Explosion! Flame Explosion!” “Cold Domain! Cold Domain!” The two groups of loyal fans shouted at the top of their lungs, trying their best to use their voices to drown the other party. Xiang Tianxiu stood in the middle, enduring the decibel bombardment. He was a little shocked. The reputation of Flame Explosion and Cold Domain was even higher than he had imagined! It had to be known that the last time the martial artists of Little Spirit Mountain shouted and cheered was when he was training on Little Spirit Mountain a few years ago! After a short shock, the battle intent in his eyes became even stronger. This was a good thing. This meant that Flame Explosion and Cold Domain were really powerful! Defeating the strong would allow him to grow faster. This was what his teacher, Li Weiguo, had taught him. Soon, Lin Xuan and the others also arrived. Xiang Tianxiu’s eyes immediately lit up when he saw Flame Explosion. Those who did not know would think that there was some emotional bond between the two of them that surpassed the concept of gender. “Flame Explosion, congratulations. You actually made such a huge contribution! You must have grown a lot. I’ve also grown a lot during this period of time. Let’s fight!” Xiang Tianxiu was eager and had already begun to warm up. Flame Explosion could not help but laugh. “I never said that I wanted to fight you.” Cold Domain still had a cold expression. “I don’t like to do unnecessary things.” Xiang Tianxiu directly took out a skill book and said to Flame Explosion, “I long guessed that you wouldn’t want to fight me. That is why I specially exchanged for this from the headquarters. Seventh Realm spell, Blazing City, peerless golden grade.” “As long as you agree to fight me, this skill book will be yours. If you win…” Xiang Tianxiu took out another box from the storage compartment.” The Fire Dragon’s Heart is a golden item that can only be eaten once. Even if you have already eaten all the attribute items that increase your fire damage, after eating this, you can still permanently increase your fire damage by 10%. ” The surrounding martial artists had envious expressions. As long as he agreed to fight, the other party would directly give him a golden skill book. If he won, he could even obtain such a precious golden item! Damn, they wanted to fight him too! They wanted that golden skill book! Xiang Tianxiu turned to Cold Domain and smiled. “If you agree to the battle, I’ll give you 100 Mystic Realm Pearls. If you defeat me, I’ll give you another Ice Dragon Heart. It has the same effect as the Fire Dragon Heart.” Flame Explosion’s expression immediately became solemn. “How do we fight?” He did not care much about that golden skill book. However, this Fire Dragon Heart was very precious! After the new synthesis formula appeared on the synthesis table, Lin Xuan had specially checked. The Fire Dragon Heart would only drop after killing the Fire Dragon. The Fire Dragon only existed in the “Dragon Mountain Range” mystic realm controlled by the Knights of Truth. A large number of dragons, wyverns, and dragon beasts lived in that mystic realm, providing the Knights of Truth with countless precious items like dragon blood, dragon scales, dragon hearts, and dragon bones. Cold Domain, who usually had a cold face, also seemed to be slightly moved, as if he was considering. However, everyone could tell from the subtle expression on his face that Cold Domain was tempted. Lin Xuan also wanted Cold Domain to directly agree. However, he could not destroy the avatar persona he had created. He still had to put on an act. “The Ice Dragon Heart is still useful to me. I agree.” After pretending to think for a long time, Cold Domain slowly nodded. Xiang Tianxiu chuckled. “There’s a special place in Little Spirit Mountain. Do you know where it is?” “Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple?” Flame Explosion and Cold Domain said in unison. Xiang Tianxiu smiled. “That’s right! The Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple! In any case, we’re all going to enter. Why don’t we compete to see who can pass more trials?” The surrounding martial artists were all very surprised. “Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple? Didn’t I hear that it hasn’t been open for five years?” “Could it be that Xiang Tianxiu and the others have some insider information? However, it makes sense. An expert like Xiang Tianxiu is even valued by the Chief. He must have received some insider information in advance.” “I wonder if we have a chance to enter the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple. Even if we only pass one trial, it will still be a huge profit!” The martial artists discussed excitedly. “Alright, we agree.” Flame Explosion and Cold Domain looked at each other and nodded. Xiang Tianxiu laughed loudly. “Alright, I’ll see you at the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple! I want to see Teacher.” With that said, Xiang Tianxiu ran towards the core area of Colony Three. “Teacher, Teacher, I missed you so much…” Lin Xuan and the others also scattered. However, the martial artists were still discussing the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple enthusiastically. This was an opportunity to become stronger. If one had a chance to enter, one had to fight for it. “Eh…” Lin Xuan saw two pieces of information that shocked him on the avatar interface. [Little Spirit Mountain News: The Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple has absorbed enough ghost energy and is about to open in 9 days, 18 hours, and 33 minutes. The difficulty of the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple has increased by 200%, and the reward is 200% rarer.] [News from Little Spirit Mountain: In 9 days, 22 hours and 19 minutes, the first Ghost Mother will give birth in the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple.] The first piece of information was mixed with bad news and good news. As the difficulty increased, the rarity of the rewards also increased. From this, Lin Xuan also knew why the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple would open again after five years. This thing actually absorbed the energy of ghosts to recharge. On the other hand, the second piece of information made Lin Xuan feel a sense of danger. Ghost Mother? What the hell was this?! “The ghosts of Little Spirit Mountain often riot. The sky darkens faster than before, and the number of ghosts is increasing. Could it be because of this Ghost Mother that’s about to give birth?” “If that Ghost Mother really gives birth, I’m afraid it won’t be a large-scale beast tide, but an enormous-scale beast tide!” Lin Xuan’s gaze was solemn. The Little Spirit Mountain would probably be destroyed because of this! In comparison, Sunrise City was really freaking comfortable. There were many treasures, and there were no powerful demon beasts lurking around on the ground. It was infuriating. Lin Xuan could not tell anyone this news because he could not explain how he found out that the Ghost Mother was about to give birth in the Heavenly Dragon Zen Academy. Even if he dared to tell them, Old Wu, Li Weiguo, and the other Eighth Realm martial artists still would not be able to enter the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple. This place only allowed Seventh Realm martial artists to enter. If an Eighth Realm martial artist wanted to enter, they would also face the same situation as the Falling Thunder Mountain. In the Falling Thunder Mountain, those with a higher cultivation would be struck by lightning. In the case of the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple, they would be pierced by a dragon’s roar that could directly explode their heads! Report chapterUse arrow keys (or A / D) to PREV/NEXT chapterContact &#8211; Sitemap<br> Privacy &amp; Terms of use Lin Xuan thought for a moment. It seemed that the only solution was for him to enter the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple and deliberately lead others to discover the Ghost Mother. “I’ll figure it out after entering the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple. I’m quite curious about the treasures that are inside.” Lin Xuan turned around and left, continuing to sell potions in the market. Soon, news spread from the mouths of the Construction Division members. The Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple was about to open. All martial artists could spend 3,000 battle merits to obtain the right to enter the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple. These 3,000 battle merits were neither little nor a lot. It could still be gained if one worked hard. However, one could also buy a good purple equipment with 3,000 battle merits. However, after entering the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple, one still had to at least pass the first trial in order to obtain the reward. In other words, if one felt that they could not even pass the first trial, it was better not to enter. It would only be a waste of battle merits. Even so, many people still signed up. Everyone followed suit and wanted to take a gamble. Lin Xuan and the others also went to register. Next, he quietly waited for the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple to open. In the past few days, Xiang Tianxiu had been challenging Flame Explosion and Cold Domain every day, but he would always be rejected. Eight days later, it was finally time for the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple to open. In the past few days, Lin Xuan had already read through all the records of the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple that the Construction Division had made five years ago. He remembered all the things to take note of. As usual, everyone was doing their own things. However, all of a sudden, a shocking dragon roar sounded from the ground and resounded in the sky. The entire Little Spirit Mountain seemed to be trembling, as if something was about to surge out from the ground. Rumble! The ground trembled and the rocks collapsed. The martial artists were very surprised. This dragon roar was a sign that the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple was about to open. The martial artists rushed towards the sound. Lin Xuan also put away his stall and immediately rushed over. From Colony Two and Colony One, Seventh Realm martial artists also rushed over one after another. Soon, they discovered a zen temple that suddenly stood more than 100 kilometers away from the third gathering place. They could see Buddhist light surging out from the antique temple. The walls of the Zen temple were even engraved with countless divine dragons. The door of the Zen temple was more than five meters tall and was made of sandalwood. It was heavy and thick. Some martial artists stepped forward to break it open, but the door did not budge at all. “I didn’t know that the Zen Temple was so small. What kind of Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple is this? Can the nine trials really be carried out in there?” “Idiot, it looks small, but there’s actually a small world inside.” “Why isn’t the door opening? Could it be that it’s not time yet?” The martial artists discussed excitedly. Lin Xuan had a strange expression. It was indeed unexpected for the Ghost Mother to give birth in such a solemn place. Moreover, it was even stranger for the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple to suddenly open when the Ghost Mother was about to give birth. “I won’t get eaten by this temple, right?” A terrifying thought rose in Lin Xuan’s mind. Five years ago, when the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple opened, more than 5,000 martial artists had entered to train. More than 500 people had died, and even more people were injured. The Construction Division had a rather terrifying description of the corpses of the deceased. “The body will disappear quickly in various ways in a minute.” However, because many martial artists had at least passed the first trial and obtained many treasures, no one thought too much about where those corpses had gone. “I have to be more careful.” Lin Xuan became even more vigilant. At this moment, Old Wu and Li Weiguo passed through the crowd and arrived in front of the crowd. The two of them looked carefully at the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple and said solemnly, “The Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple has just risen from the ground. It probably hasn’t absorbed enough energy. The door will open later.” With that said, Old Wu turned to the martial artists. “Everyone, I think you should know that the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple is not a place filled with treasures. There are nine trials here. The further you go, the more difficult and dangerous it will be! Moreover, every trial might lead to death!” “If you want to leave the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple, you can’t leave halfway. you have to at least pass the first trial in one piece.” “Therefore, I’ll give you one last piece of advice. If you’re not confident enough in your strength, it’s best to give up. We’ll return the battle merits you previously spent to sign up.” Old Wu’s expression was solemn. Be it the members of the Construction Division or the civilian martial artists, they were all from the Xia Country. He naturally did not want too many people to die inside. Seeing Old Wu so serious, many martial artists immediately wanted to retreat and chose to give up. Three to four hundred people left one after another. However, most people still gritted their teeth and continued to persevere. He decided to give it a try. If he did not seize this opportunity, he would definitely regret it in the future! Old Wu sighed and did not insist. “Lin Xuan, you want to go in too?” Ye Yuqiu was somewhat surprised to see him. That night, Lin Xuan had used the huge lightning to kill many ghosts. Ye Yuqiu no longer treated him as a logistician who was powerless to protect himself. However, she still felt that it would be too dangerous for Lin Xuan to enter. Lin Xuan smiled, knowing that she was just worried for him. “I’m just going in to take a look. I might come out after passing two or three trials. I know my limits.” Only then did Ye Yuqiu nod in relief. It was fine if Lin Xuan was only an ordinary logistician. However, it was rare to see a logistician like Lin Xuan who had golden medicinal skill and golden forging skill. It would be a pity if anything happened to him in the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple. Everyone waited quietly for the door to open. Lin Xuan looked at the message. He could see the exact time the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple opened through the news of the Little Spirit Mountain. When the last second passed, another world-shaking dragon roar sounded from the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple. Everyone was in awe from the bottom of their hearts. Although they had never seen a real divine dragon, when this sound entered their ears, coupled with the name of the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple and the relief on the wall, they instinctively felt that it was a dragon roar. Boom! The door creaked and slowly opened, as if two giants were struggling to push it open. A screen of light appeared in front of everyone, dreamlike and like a bubble. “The Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple has opened. It’s time for you guys to begin your trials,” Old Wu said loudly. It was unknown who led the way, but everyone immediately rushed into the light screen. Lin Xuan was not so anxious and followed the crowd in. The world around him spun. By the time Lin Xuan reacted, he was already standing on solid ground with four bridges in front of him. The four bridges were huge and wide, and they did not seem to be dangerous at all. The river below seemed very calm, but Lin Xuan could sense the danger with just a glance. Lin Xuan looked in all directions and discovered that his surroundings were filled with fog. Some people walked into the fog and returned to their spots in confusion. Seeing this, Lin Xuan nodded slightly. The fog had also appeared five years ago. The purpose of their existence was to let the trainees train and not cause trouble. In front of him was the first trial, the Gale Bridge. The martial artists had to resist the wind and walk to the other side to successfully pass the first trial. The winds of the four bridges were different. The wind of the first bridge would cut one’s body, causing one to keep bleeding. The violent wind of the second bridge carried sand. The sand would gather on one’s body and decrease one’s speed. Every once in a while, one had to shatter the sand with a huge force. The wind of the third bridge would corrode one’s mind. Only those with high spirit could successfully pass. The local wind speed of the fourth bridge was different. Moreover, it was sometimes fast and sometimes slow. One needed to react extremely quickly to avoid the high-speed wind. These four bridges clearly took care of the martial artists with four different attributes. Lin Xuan swept his gaze over and knew that the trial of the Gale Bridge had not changed much compared to five years ago. Of course, the only small change was… the difficulty had increased by 200%. Lin Xuan looked ahead. There were already martial artists who had chosen a bridge that was suitable for them. Ye Yuqiu looked at them. “Everyone, let’s go on the bridge too.” Xiang Tianxiu rubbed his fists and said confidently, “I’ll wait for you in front. Flame Explosion, Cold Domain, don’t forget our agreement!” With that said, he headed straight for the third bridge. Xiang Tianxiu strode on the bridge. The wind that corroded his mind did not threaten him at all. After walking for a while, he even began to jog. This speed made the other martial artists on the third bridge envious. These martial artists all covered their heads and felt as if something was about to drill into their brains. Lin Xuan nodded slightly. It seemed that even if the difficulty increased by 200%, it would be no different for powerful people. However, this was only the first trial. He wondered how difficult the subsequent trials would be. Lin Xuan and his avatars each chose a bridge that was suitable for them. Of course, to him, all four bridges were the same. After all, his avatar had inherited 100% of his attributes and skills. The only thing his avatar did not inherit was the High-Level Avatar Technique. This was because his avatar was created through the High-Level Avatar Technique after all. It could not be used indefinitely. However, in order to maintain his persona, it was better for each of them to choose a suitable bridge. Shield Ghost and Brother Milk took the first bridge. Shield Ghost had a high Constitution, and the speed of the bleeding could not keep up with his recovery speed. Brother Milk could use his skill to recover his health. Flame Explosion and Cold Domain took the third bridge. The two of them both had high Spirit and could resist the violent wind that corroded their minds. Poison Blade took the fourth bridge. His superb Agility allowed him to quickly dodge the wind that was sometimes fast and sometimes slow. Lin Xuan thought for a moment and also walked onto the fourth bridge. On the first bridge, martial artists kept howling because their skin was cut by the wind. Many people even walked with blood all the way and were rather miserable. Shield Ghost walked at the front. Some people tried to hide behind him and used Shield Ghost’s Lion Heart Tower Shield to avoid the wind. Feng Zhuang was also on the first bridge. When he saw this scene, he shouted angrily, “Don’t you care about your image anymore? This will make the wind that lands on Shield Ghost even stronger!” The martial artist could not help but snort. “Shield Ghost is so kind. What’s wrong with him blocking the wind for us?” The next moment, Shield Ghost jogged and disappeared from the sight of these martial artists in large strides. “Sorry, I’m not used to playing the role of a kind person.” The martial artist was immediately dumbfounded and could only continue to bleed as he advanced. After a while, this martial artist saw a healer beside him. From time to time, this healer would cast a recovery spell on himself and actually got quite far. The martial artist said shamelessly, “Brother Milk, everyone says that you’re a kind person. Can you use a recovery skill on me too?” Brother Milk smiled in embarrassment. “Aren’t you embarrassed to say such a thing?” The martial artist :”…” Feng Zhuang and the others laughed when they saw this. This was the trial of the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple, and the difficulty had even increased by 200%. Although the Gale Bridge was not difficult, who knew if it would become more difficult later? Moreover, with a time bomb like Ghost Mother, Lin Xuan naturally had to maintain his peak state at all times. Report chapterUse arrow keys (or A / D) to PREV/NEXT chapterContact &#8211; Sitemap<br> Privacy &amp; Terms of use Lin Xuan took a few more steps forward and heard a scream from behind. A martial artist had bled too much and slipped, falling to the edge of the bridge. The wind blew violently, almost blowing this martial artist off the bridge. Because he had lost too much blood, he had already exhausted a lot of his strength and could not grab anything at all. “Catch me!” One of the martial artists beside him shouted and forced himself to grab him. The outcome was obvious. The two of them were already exhausted and could not grab anything at all. The others could only watch as they fell off the bridge. The two of them were blown off the bridge and into the seemingly calm river below. The next moment, the calm river surface actually boiled like boiling water. “Ah!” A tragic cry sounded again. Lin Xuan subconsciously looked towards the river and was surprised to see piranhas with sharp teeth crazily devouring these two martial artists. The sharp teeth of the piranhas were as sharp as razors. Although they could only bite down a little each time, a large number of piranhas swarmed over and instantly ate the two martial artists clean. Blood dyed the river! These were also the two people who had died first in the Gale Bridge trial! All the martial artists who witnessed this scene were shocked. From the looks of it, if one did not have the ability, they definitely could not bother saving others. Otherwise, one might even lose their life. Lin Xuan also shook his head slightly. The martial artist who saved the guy who fell had good intentions. Unfortunately, he had overestimated his ability. On the third bridge. Xiang Tianxiu had already jogged all the way to the middle of the bridge. Immediately after were Flame Explosion and Cold Domain. After that, there were still Silver Fox and the others. “No way, no way. Is the Gale Bridge this simple? Does this mean that anyone with feet can easily cross it?” Xiang Tianxiu shook his head repeatedly. Before coming, he had thought that the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple’s nine trials were very difficult. Teacher Li Weiguo also instructed him not to underestimate these trials. He did not expect it to be so surprisingly simple. At this moment, Xiang Tianxiu saw the piranhas begin to jump on the river. “Stop jumping. No matter how you jump, you won’t be able to jump up.” Xiang Tianxiu sneered. At this moment, a piranha jumped higher and higher and finally jumped onto the bridge! “Damn.” Xiang Tianxiu was fast and dodged lightly. The piranha fell onto the bridge and swayed its tail weakly. Soon, it died because of lack of water. Flame Explosion and Cold Domain looked up at the corpse of the piranha. Indeed, in less than a minute, the corpse of the piranha evaporated and disappeared. “If these piranhas can only scare people, that would be too boring.” Xiang Tianxiu shrugged and even looked back at Flame Explosion and Cold Domain. “Gentlemen, don’t you think so?” As soon as Xiang Tianxiu finished speaking. A large number of piranhas began to jump persistently. Moreover, they were jumping higher and higher. In the end, some could actually jump more than five meters high and directly jump over the bridge! “Ah!” On the second bridge, a martial artist was wrapped in a large amount of sand. His body became extremely bloated and his speed decreased. He was working hard to smash the sand and rocks on his body, but he did not know that a piranha had already jumped up and landed on his head. With a click. A large portion of this martial artist’s scalp and hair were directly bitten off, and blood flowed non-stop. The martial artist screamed and casually stepped on the piranha to death. However, by the time he reacted, he was already at the edge of the bridge. There was also a large patch of sand that was headed towards him. He lost his balance and fell into the river. The piranhas immediately swarmed over and ate, instantly turning him into a white skeleton. On the four bridges, screams sounded continuously. Martial artists were constantly attacked by the piranhas and a large piece of flesh was bitten off their bodies. The sneak attack of the piranhas worked really well with the four different violent winds on the Gale Bridge, causing martial artists to fall into the river from time to time. Every time, it would dye the river red! The martial artists were all in danger and did not dare to underestimate this trial at all. Lin Xuan’s expression did not change. Indeed, this was the Gale Bridge with a difficulty that had increased by 200%. Xiang Tianxiu also became cautious at this moment. As he advanced, he would pay attention to the piranhas above his head, on his left, and on his right. Moreover, he also discovered that as he walked further and further on the bridge, the violent wind that corroded his mind had already taken effect on him and pierced his nerves slightly. In this situation, he still needed to multitask. He also needed to pay attention to the sneak attacks of the piranhas. Of course, this was already a common occurrence for Lin Xuan. “Aside from testing if my corresponding attribute points are high enough, this trial also tests my ability to multitask. This trial is indeed not difficult for me.” Lin Xuan chuckled. Multitasking was already a common occurrence for him. Time slowly passed. The first batch of martial artists of the four bridges had already arrived on the other side. Lin Xuan deliberately delayed for a few minutes and arrived on the other side after Ye Yuqiu. On the other side was a firm and flat limestone ground. There was also a light screen in the center. That was the light screen that would teleport them out of the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple. At this moment, Lin Xuan suddenly discovered that everyone around him had disappeared and he was completely enveloped by the fog. Lin Xuan was not surprised. This was because he had seen the records of the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple five years ago. Every time he passed a trial, he would be wrapped in fog. Then, a treasure would randomly appear. As expected, the fog in front of him suddenly dispersed, revealing a treasure chest flickering with golden light. Lin Xuan stepped forward and knocked lightly. The treasure chest opened, and golden light shone brightly. What appeared in front of him was a fist-sized green irregular ball. Wind kept howling around the ball, as if there was wind lingering around it. Lin Xuan used his High-Level Observer skill to check and immediately understood what this was. Storm Core! A golden item! When used to forge equipment, it could increase the speed of the equipment by 10%. However, this item could only be used for feet equipment. He looked at his avatars and discovered that the things they obtained were all very strange. There were skill books that increased movement speed, short knives with shocking bleeding effects, and runes that increased attack speed. “Looks like it’s completely random.” Lin Xuan was deep in thought. At this moment, the fog beside him had already completely disappeared. He discovered that he was still standing on the spot, and beside him were Xiang Tianxiu, Ye Yuqiu, and his avatars. “What did you guys obtain? I’m really lucky to have obtained the Lightning Core!” Xiang Tianxiu chuckled. “When you use this thing to forge a staff, it can increase the staff’s lightning damage by 10%. I’m already planning to forge a new staff after leaving.” “By the way, the rewards of the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple this time are so generous!” Ye Yuqiu said, “I obtained a ring that increases my strength by 5 points. It’s neither good nor bad.” As they conversed, some martial artists had already arrived at the resting area through the Gale Bridge. Some martial artists were already covered in injuries. After careful consideration, they decided to leave through the light screen. In any case, they had already passed the first trial and had already profited. They decided to stop while they were ahead. However, many martial artists still decided to continue to the second trial. If one did not work hard, one would be no different from a salted fish! At this moment, the fog dispersed on its own, and two tall mountains and a long and narrow passage appeared in front of them. At this moment, a large number of rocks rolled down from the high mountain from time to time. Some were big and some were small, but every one of them would cause a huge noise when they smashed into the ground. This was the second trial, the One-Line Sky. No matter what method the cultivators used, it was fine as long as they could pass through the One-Line Sky. According to the records of the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple five years ago, this line was not difficult. He could either use his superb movement speed and reaction speed to directly run over. This method was also the fastest. Or they could blast their way through and destroy all the falling rocks. Of course, they rely on brute force to pass through. As long as one’s Constitution was high enough, being hit by a few rocks was nothing. They could use their shields to resist. These three methods were suitable for various professions. “Forward!” Xiang Tianxiu was the most enthusiastic. He rushed into the sky and a rock the size of a head smashed towards him as soon as he entered. Xiang Tianxiu raised his hand and threw a lightning ball. Boom! The rock exploded. “This is nothing. It’s very simple!” Xiang Tianxiu continued forward. Lin Xuan and the others also followed closely. Everyone displayed their own abilities. Ye Yuqiu directly slashed out with her sword light and shattered the rocks. Flame Explosion and Cold Domain shattered it with spells. Lin Xuan took out the Giant Thunder Spear and threw it. Every illusory thunder spear could cause the rocks to explode Poison Blade dodged at an extremely fast speed. As for Brother Milk, he took out a shield under everyone’s shocked gazes. Poison Blade said in surprise, “You even use a shield?” Brother Milk said embarrassedly, “I’m just a healer and don’t have much self-protection ability, so it shouldn’t be hard to guess why I carry a shield, right?” The others thought for a moment. This seemed reasonable, so they nodded. The trial seemed to be very simple at the moment. If that was the case, it was only a matter of time before they passed the One-Line Sky. However, Lin Xuan knew that it was definitely not that simple. After all, the difficulty had increased by 200%. Did they think of that as a joke? As expected. They had only traveled a third of the way when the number of falling rocks suddenly increased. Boom! Boom! Boom! Rocks kept falling. Screams could already be heard from behind. It was those martial artists who had just entered the One-Line Sky. They were probably already hit by the falling rocks. Lin Xuan and the others arrived at the halfway point of One-Line Sky. The falling rocks above changed again. A large number of rocks were actually mixed with some metal rocks! Seeing that the lightning ball did not shatter it, Xiang Tianxiu immediately cried out and hurriedly dodged. Boom! The metal rock smashed into the ground, creating a huge pit. If not for him dodging in time, he would have been turned into meat paste. Moreover, because the impact of the falling metal was too great, the ground had already become bumpy. This made everyone’s speed decrease greatly. The speed of the people in the first group slowed down, and so did the people behind. Lin Xuan even heard Silver Fox curse from behind. “Damn, how am I supposed to get there?!” Lin Xuan and the others continued forward and crossed two-thirds of the distance. At this point, falling rocks went through another change. The ordinary rocks no longer feel and they were all replaced by metal rocks. There were also various elemental rocks mixed in the metal rocks. Lightning Falling Stone, Poison Falling Stone, Flame Falling Stone, Frost Falling Stone! These falling rocks would cause a large area of the ground to change. As long as one tried to pass through, they would be injured. If they circled around, they would waste more time and might be hit by more rocks. This once again increased the difficulty of passing through. Report chapterUse arrow keys (or A / D) to PREV/NEXT chapterContact &#8211; Sitemap<br> Privacy &amp; Terms of use Lin Xuan and the others each used their own abilities to advance. About five to six minutes later, they suddenly discovered that the falling rocks on the ground had suddenly disappeared, and the bumpy ground had also returned to normal. The falling rocks on the tall mountains on both sides continued to fall. Silver Fox, Black, Bai Xinghe, and the others’ surprised voices sounded from behind. “Did the ground actually recover?” Silver Fox said in surprise. Bai Xinghe pondered and said, “Actually, after thinking about it carefully, this is normal. If the ground doesn’t recover, the situation on the ground will become worse and worse. It will be very difficult for the people in the back to pass through the One-Line Sky.” Black nodded in agreement. “That makes sense.” Hearing their words, Lin Xuan also nodded slightly. “Let’s quickly pass while the ground is flat!” Ye Yuqiu said loudly. Xiang Tianxiu chuckled and hurriedly activated a Lightning Shield for himself, wanting to rush over in one go. Shield Ghost, Flame Explosion, Cold Domain, and the others immediately used their own methods. Soon, everyone passed through the One-Line Sky safely. Lin Xuan heaved a sigh of relief. Before he could speak to the surrounding people, the fog appeared out of thin air and surrounded him. A golden treasure chest appeared in front of him. Lin Xuan stepped forward and opened it. A skill book immediately appeared, and the golden treasure chest disappeared. “Seventh Realm skill, Roar. Roar and increase the attack power of yourself and all the nearby allies.” Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. This skill was not bad. Although he could not use it, he could give it to his avatar. For example, Shield Ghost and Brother Milk were rather suitable for this skill. He looked at the treasure chests his avatars had opened again. They were also strange. Poison Blade’s item was the best. It was an Eighth Realm golden rune that was suitable to be embedded into melee weapons. High-strength warriors would like this rune very much. Li Weiguo was an Eighth Realm high-strength warrior. Lin Xuan planned to exchange this Eighth Realm golden rune with Li Weiguo after leaving the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple. Perhaps he could exchange for what he needed. Among the five avatars, Flame Explosion’s treasure was the most trashy. It was a teacup, and in the teacup contained fragrant black tea that could be refilled automatically. The effect of black tea was that one could quickly fall into a deep sleep within 5 seconds after drinking it. This thing was actually a golden item. He could only use it when he could not sleep. “If it were before I transmigrated, I would need this very much. However, now…” Lin Xuan did not know whether to laugh or cry. It seemed that the rewards for this trial were very random. He had accidentally obtained such a thing. At this moment, the fog dissipated. As soon as the fog dissipated, Lin Xuan heard Xiang Tianxiu yell out happily. “Everyone! I actually obtained a blueprint for a Seventh Realm mage set! It’s even better than the one I’m wearing now!” Xiang Tianxiu did not hide the joy in his heart at all and even stretched out the blueprint in front of Ye Yuqiu. “Look, look at how powerful it is! How does it compare to the one on you?” Ye Yuqiu glanced at it. “Not bad. It’s only slightly inferior.” Xiang Tianxiu laughed loudly as if he was very smug. He took out his set blueprint and showed it off in front of Flame Explosion and Cold Domain. Lin Xuan also looked at it with a strange expression. Xiang Tianxiu’s mage set had seven parts, but Ye Yuqiu’s Frost Valkyrie set had nine parts. It was actually much worse and not just slightly inferior. It seemed that Ye Yuqiu really understood Xiang Tianxiu’s character. She could easily brush him aside. Lin Xuan turned around again. After looking for a while, he also discovered the pattern of the One-Line Sky. Every 30 minutes, the ground would automatically level off. If he could accurately capture this pattern and use this time to advance quickly, he could reduce his consumption as much as possible and naturally avoid danger. Silver Fox, Black, Bai Xinghe, Feng Zhuang, and the others also accurately grasped this opportunity and soon arrived at the empty space. Silver Fox sat on the ground. “I’m so tired. This One-Line Heaven is really not friendly to mages.” Xiang Tianxiu chuckled. “Senior, that’s not true. It’s only unfriendly to you. Look, I’m also a mage. Do I look tired?” Silver Fox rolled his eyes at him and simply stopped talking. As a senior, he could not even compare to his young junior. The other party was like Alexander the Great. Soon, the martial artists behind also arrived one after another. These people were not comparable to Ye Yuqiu, Xiang Tianxiu, and the others in the first group. They were more or less injured. Some people were even worse. They directly lost an arm and a leg. Some of them were covered in flesh and blood. Those who did not know better would think that they were meat paste. “No, no. I’ll quit after receiving the reward.” “I’ll give up too. The second trial is already so difficult. It wasn’t like this five years ago.” “That’s right. Five years ago, I heard that martial artists who were only better than ordinary people were able to get to the fourth trial and obtained at least three golden items.” The martial artists had helpless expressions. Many of them chose to give up. Some people did not give up and wanted to take advantage of the rest time to recover and try the third trial. After passing each trial, one could rest for at most 20 minutes. After 20 minutes, one would be forcefully thrown into the next trial. They would not give the trial-takers a chance to cheat. “I’ve already recovered! Everyone, I’ll leave first!” Xiang Tianxiu was not injured after passing the One-Line Sky. He recovered to his peak state in a few minutes and immediately entered the third trial. Lin Xuan also pretended to be recovering. Soon, he also entered the third trial. The third trial was the same as the one five years ago. A vast river about 500 meters wide. On the river were large and small floating ice. What the cultivators needed to do was to reach the other side. The solution was already placed in front of the cultivators, which was to step on these floating ice. Lin Xuan had just arrived when he heard Xiang Tianxiu mutter, “Damn, this trial is not too friendly to me.” The third trial, the Floating Ice River. Ice mages or people who had mastered ice skills could all shine in this trial. The others could only slowly cross the river bitterly. Cold Domain still maintained his persona and did not show any emotions. He came to the river and casually chose an ice floe under Xiang Tianxiu’s envious gaze. He used ice magic to strengthen it before stepping on it. Along the way, he continued to strengthen the floating ice under his feet with spells and continued forward. On the way, a small vortex suddenly appeared on the river. Cold Domain instinctively felt that something was wrong and immediately used its ice magic to strengthen the floating ice a meter away as a backup. Indeed, in less than three seconds, a cold hand stretched out from the small vortex as it tried to shatter the floating ice under Cold Domain’s feet. Cold Domain frowned slightly and quickly walked onto the new floating ice. As expected, the floating ice he was standing on just now was struck until it lost its balance. Although it did not completely shatter, the area was reduced by more than half! However, thanks to this, Cold Domain quickly pulled away from the cold hand. Then, with the help of the river water, he arrived on the other side in a few minutes. Seeing that there was no one survivor on the river, the cold hand hid and did not continue to attack. The appearance of that cold hand shocked everyone. Xiang Tianxiu was shocked. “What the hell is that?! I can’t see its information with my Observer skill.” Ye Yuqiu frowned slightly. “This thing didn’t appear in the records five years ago.” Black stopped drinking and said solemnly, “In the records from five years ago, there were no piranhas in the Gale Bridge, and there were no metal or elemental rocks in the One-Line Sky.” Flame Explosion slowly said, “This all shows that the difficulty this time has increased greatly.” Lin Xuan was even more surprised. It was fine if Xiang Tianxiu could not see the information with his Observer skill. Even Lin Xuan could not see any information despite having the High-Level Observer skill! Clearly, this was a part of the trial and the trial had its own rules. Xiang Tianxiu shouted, “Cold Domain! You’ve already passed. Can you tell us how fast the river is flowing?” Cold Domain stopped and said indifferently, “The flow of the river is rapid, and the speed on both sides is relatively slow.” “Also, before the cold hand appears, small vortexes will appear on the river. That’s a sign.” With that said, he directly left the third trial and headed to the empty space to rest. Ye Yuqiu smiled and said, “Cold Domain looks cold, but he’s actually quite a good person.” Xiang Tianxiu nodded. “This Cold Domain is indeed capable!” Everyone used their own methods to cross the river. Ye Yuqiu’s method was similar to Cold Domain’s. After all, she also had many ice skills. However, their cooldowns were not as fast as Cold Domain’s, and the magic consumption of her skills was also higher. Therefore, it took a long time for her to release each skill. If anything went wrong, she could easily fall into the river. Lin Xuan did not need to think to know that there was something strange about this river. If he fell in, he might not be able to get out. As Lin Xuan and the others crossed the river, the martial artists behind had already caught up. A martial artist with relatively high Agility jumped back and forth between the floating ice. His speed was actually faster than Lin Xuan. Lin Xuan glanced at this person. This guy was the one who had tried to hide behind Shield Ghost on the Gale Bridge. After that, he even shamelessly asked Brother Milk to use a recovery skill on him. This person quickly surpassed Lin Xuan and was about to catch up to Shield Ghost. Under Lin Xuan’s control, Shield Ghost was not as fast as Poison Blade. This person passed by Shield Ghost and snorted. “Previously, you were unwilling to help me on the Gale Bridge. Now, you’re so slow. Serves you right! No one will help you!” He did not notice that a small vortex had appeared in front of him. A large cold hand had already quietly stretched out. As soon as the other party finished speaking, the floating ice under his feet was slapped fiercely by a cold hand! The martial artist shouted and was about to jump onto the nearby ice floe. However, before he could jump, the cold hand suddenly stretched out from the river and grabbed his ankle tightly. This martial artist did not even have the time to react. With a tragic cry, he was directly dragged into the river, and his body gradually disappeared. The martial artists on the riverbank all felt their scalps tingle. Five years ago, there was nothing in the river! What kind of demon was this?! Crash. After this martial artist was dragged into the river, there seemed to be a fight under the river. As a result, ripples appeared on the river. More and more small vortexes appeared. The other martial artists all swallowed in unison. Damn. There were so many! “There’s no way out. I’ll bite the bullet and charge forward!” Feng Zhuang gritted his teeth. He also wanted to take a gamble. He did not expect the difficulty of the Floating Ice River to increase so much. Report chapterUse arrow keys (or A / D) to PREV/NEXT chapterContact &#8211; Sitemap<br> Privacy &amp; Terms of use Lin Xuan looked at them and reminded, “Pay attention to the small vortex. The cold hand is definitely going to be under the small vortex. Pay attention to the middle of the river. The river flow is much faster there.” Feng Zhuang was stunned and nodded repeatedly. “Thank you!” They had arrived relatively late and did not hear what Cold Domain had said. If Lin Xuan casually gave them pointers now, they might be able to save their lives! The martial artists behind Feng Zhuang also nodded in admiration. “Thank you!” Lin Xuan waved his hand and continued forward. “This is what Cold Domain told me. If you want to thank someone, thank him.” In any case, it was just a reminder. It was nothing. Moreover, Feng Zhuang was a good person. Previously, when he was competing with Mu Yang in the medicinal market, Feng Zhuang had given him information several times. It was only right for him to help. Soon, Lin Xuan also arrived on the other side. Before heading to the open space, he heard Feng Zhuang shout, “Everyone, remember to share Cold Domain’s tip to the martial artists in the back!” “Alright!” “It’s nothing. Don’t worry.” “After all, we’re all comrades who survived the city defense battle. Try not to die. Let’s all try to survive.” The martial artists said one after another. Lin Xuan chuckled. Most of these martial artists were not bad. In the open space, Lin Xuan swept his gaze around but did not see Xiang Tianxiu. Ye Yuqiu casually said, “He was feeling energetic and continued forward.” Lin Xuan nodded. At this moment, the fog enveloped him again. The reward for passing the third trial was a sniper rifle. The effect was not bad. It could even automatically form frost bullets every once in a while. Lin Xuan casually threw it into his consciousness space. Perhaps it would be useful in the future or he could use it to trade with others. “I’ve rested enough. I’ll go first.” A few minutes later, Ye Yuqiu stood up and entered the fourth trial. Soon, the martial artists behind also arrived at this empty space. After obtaining the rewards for the third trial, they all gave up. Feng Zhuang also smiled apologetically at Lin Xuan. “I don’t dare to continue forward. This is the end. Lin Xuan, do you still want to continue?” Lin Xuan made a conflicted expression. “I still have some strength left. I’ll try again. Perhaps I’ll stop after the fourth and fifth trials.” Feng Zhuang nodded. “Since you can make so many potions, you have to make sure you don’t die.” With that said, he also stepped into the light screen and left the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple. After passing through the Floating Ice River, the number of martial artists that left was the highest. Lin Xuan alone saw more than 1,000 people leave. He estimated that another 200 people had died in the Floating Ice River. “Let’s continue forward.” Lin Xuan stood up and also entered the fourth trial after his avatar. The fourth trial, the Lightning Pool. This was a huge pool. It was not deep and its depth only reached one’s knees. However, the water density here was very high, causing one’s speed to decrease as they passed through. What was even worse was that there were lightning snakes and electric fish swimming everywhere underwater. From time to time, they would release lightning. If a martial artist was electrocuted, he would be paralyzed. Moreover, if he was targeted by a large number of Lightning Snake Lightning Fish, he would be stunned on the spot for a long time. In the end, he would have to watch as his health decreased bit by bit until he finally died! However, for people with high lightning resistance, there would be no problems Shield Ghost could directly stroll here and even jog. Xiang Tianxiu looked envious. This trial was not dangerous for Lin Xuan at all. He passed it safely. The final reward was an electric fish the size of an arm. The meat was fat and tender, fresh and juicy. After eating it, one could permanently increase lightning damage by 10% and exceed the upper limit. Silver Fox and Bai Xinghe suffered a lot of injuries when they passed this trial. It was only with Brother Milk’s recovery technique that they could complete the last part of the journey. They pondered for a moment and chose to give up and leave the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple. The two of them were rather depressed. With their strength, logically speaking, they should be able to at least reach the sixth trial. Now, they had stopped at the fourth trial. This time, the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple was indeed a little difficult. The fifth trial, Smoky Lake. Although it was called a lake, the lake water had long dried up. There were holes of various sizes everywhere, and smoke would come out of them without any pattern. This caused the entire Smoky Lake to be pitch-black and filled with thick smoke. If one’s Constitution was low, their health would continue to decrease from the moment they entered the Smoky Lake. Xiang Tianxiu suffered greatly here. Brother Milk still pulled him back and used a recovery spell from time to time. Xiang Tianxiu was extremely touched. The thick smoke was not the most dangerous. The dangerous thing was the black smoke monsters hiding in the thick smoke! They were unobstructed in the thick smoke and took advantage of the smoke to attack the martial artists. Lin Xuan had heard the screams of martial artists more than once. Many screams stopped abruptly, and even the sound of fighting could not be heard. Lin Xuan sighed helplessly. The martial artists who could come to this trial were almost all above level seven Seventh Realm. They felt that they could do it, so they gritted their teeth and entered. Unfortunately, they had still overestimated themselves. Because the Smoky Lake was too large and their vision was blocked, Lin Xuan and his avatar could only help those who were closer to him. More than two hours later, the fifth trial ended. Just the number of screams Lin Xuan heard alone had surpassed forty. This did not include the screams his five avatars heard. Clearly, many martial artists had died here. In the empty space after the fifth trial. Lin Xuan and the others recovered from their injuries here. Before coming out, he had deliberately let the black smoke monsters scratch him to obtain some injuries. Because his health recovered too quickly, he had no choice but to deepen his injuries. Otherwise… the injuries would be healed. The reward for the fifth trial was a pair of jade eyes. After using it, one’s night vision could be increased. This was also rare among attribute items. It was quite good. “Next is the sixth trial. Why do I feel that this sixth trial is filled with danger?” Ye Yuqiu frowned slightly and stared at the fog in front of her. Xiang Tianxiu was still fearless. He waved his hand heroically. “What are you afraid of?! If you don’t dare to enter, let me go first!” With that said, he directly walked in. Black held his forehead. “This guy is still too rash.” With that said, he said helplessly, “I know my limits. I won’t enter the sixth trial. Do you still want to continue?” Flame Explosion coughed lightly. “Ye Yuqiu, what do you think?” A trace of struggle flashed across Ye Yuqiu’s face, but she finally decided. “I want to go in. I want to become stronger.” Black shrugged. “Then I wish you guys luck. I’m leaving.” Black also left the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple. Lin Xuan and his avatars entered the sixth trial. It was extremely dark in front of him. He could not see the sky above. Looking down, it seemed to be an abyss. The only glimmer was the mushrooms growing on the wall. Lin Xuan looked around. There was no one beside him! “Lightless Maze? Wait, isn’t this the ninth trial?!” Lin Xuan was stunned. Logically speaking, the sixth trial should be the Mountain Climbing Step. With every step upwards, the gravity would increase. It was neither difficult nor simple. Given that the difficulty had increased by 200, he only expected various demon beasts to attack them on both sides of the mountain path. However, why were the sixth, seventh, and eighth trials directly removed? At this moment, wails sounded from the darkness in all directions. A cold wind blew, bone-chilling! Lin Xuan suddenly thought of something and looked at the news of the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple. [News from the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple: The first Ghost Mother has started giving birth.] Lin Xuan’s heart sank. The Ghost Mother seemed to be stronger than he had imagined. It actually affected the operation of the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple. It had actually taken them to the ninth trial from the fifth trial! “The others and I might have also been affected by the Ghost Mother’s power and scattered.” “In that case, this Ghost Mother definitely wants to harm us. However, why does it want to increase the difficulty? If it wants to eat people, it should reduce the difficulty and let more people appear in the Lightless Maze.” After all, Lin Xuan had never seen the Ghost Mother before and did not know its intentions. He thought for a moment and immediately looked at the perspective of the five avatars. Flame Explosion, Cold Domain, and Brother Milk were all ambushed by three ghosts. The sneak attack method was also similar. The moment they appeared, they attacked from behind. These ghosts were not the humanoid and beast-shaped ghosts from when the city was attacked, but the sutured ghost monster. They originally thought that they could kill the three of them with a single attack. After all, two of these three people were mages, and the third was a healer. They were all weak and fragile. Wouldn’t it be very easy to kill these guys? However, this ferocious attack only sent the three of them flying with a headache. “These three ghosts are very powerful. They’re at least level seven Seventh Realm! Fortunately, my avatar inherited 100% of the main body’s attributes. Otherwise, they would have been instantly killed.” After a short moment of thought, Lin Xuan immediately decided to retrieve all his avatars and recreate them beside him. In this way, he could immediately maximize his combat strength. Moreover, if nothing unexpected happened, he would also be attacked by three ghosts! Whoosh, whoosh, whoosh. Shield Ghost and the other four avatars immediately threw all the equipment into the consciousness space under the puzzled gaze of the ghost. Then… they disappeared on the spot! The ghosts were dumbfounded. Lin Xuan could tell many things from their gaze. For example, he could tell that they were very dumbfounded. Moreover, he could tell that their intelligence was relatively high! At this moment, Lin Xuan felt a dense killing intent behind him. Clearly, more than one ghost was about to launch a sneak attack! High-level Avatar Technique! Shield Ghost, Flame Explosion, Cold Domain, Brother Milk, and Poison Blade. They all appeared at the same time! Of course, they were all naked. Shield Ghost directly blocked in front and used his body to buy time. Boom! The sneak attack of the three ghosts landed on Shield Ghost without any obstruction. In an instant, Shield Ghost’s health points decreased by a third! Lin Xuan was rather surprised. Ever since he advanced to the Seventh Realm, neither his avatar nor his main body had lost so much health! Indeed, the level suppression was still ferocious. The other four avatars immediately took advantage of this time to put on their equipment as quickly as possible. Brother Milk immediately used a recovery spell on Shield Ghost. Lin Xuan and Poison Blade stepped forward to share the pressure. The death of an avatar and the removal of an avatar were very different. His avatar could indeed be revived after dying. However, the High-Level Avatar Technique would enter a long cooldown time. “Now, it’s time to counterattack!” Lin Xuan directly took out the Giant Thunder Spear and threw it over under the shocked gazes of the three ghosts. The other five avatars immediately followed and also attacked. The three ghosts were very dumbfounded. Weren’t they about to ambush this potion maker? Why did five people suddenly appear?! Report chapterUse arrow keys (or A / D) to PREV/NEXT chapterContact &#8211; Sitemap<br> Privacy &amp; Terms of use Boom! Boom! Boom! All kinds of attacks landed on the three sutured ghost monsters like raindrops. Even if their levels reached level seven Seventh Realm, under the siege of the six people, they could only resist. They felt very aggrieved. Every time they wanted to rush over, they would be stopped by Shield Ghost. A few minutes later, the three ghosts let out a sharp cry and exploded into a ball of yin energy. Only then did Lin Xuan heave a sigh of relief. Not bad, not bad. Although he was definitely unable to deal with three level seven Seventh Realm ghosts alone, he didn’t need to fight alone! “I have to find Ye Yuqiu and Xiang Tianxiu as soon as possible.” “If the two of them were also ambushed by ghosts, they would probably be seriously injured.” Lin Xuan and his five avatars immediately began to explore. As he explored, he tried his best to sense any sounds in his surroundings. It was strange that this Lightless Maze could actually suppress his high-level perception. Originally, he could at least sense the situation within a 100-meter radius. Now, he could only sense a range of 30 to 40 meters. He tried to jump up and look over the wall to see what was going on elsewhere. However, he discovered that he could only jump about half a meter high. Previously, on the outside, he was able to jump three to four meters. Forget about crossing the wall, he could not even reach half the height of the wall. “The suppression of my jumping ability is even more ruthless than five years ago.” Lin Xuan shook his head and stopped trying. In the other two directions of the Lightless Maze. Xiang Tianxiu shouted and ran crazily. The two sutured ghost monsters led dozens of beast-shaped ghosts to chase after him. “Damn! What the hell is this?! Why did the sixth trial suddenly into the Lightless Maze?! I don’t understand!” The Lightless Maze was the ninth trial and also the most difficult. The Lightless Maze was very huge and abnormally dark. It could also suppress one’s perception and jumping ability. Ghosts were wandering everywhere. There was only one way to leave the Lightless Maze. One had to find the center of the Lightless Maze! There was a screen of light there. Only by passing through that light screen could one be considered to have passed the trial. In addition, there were many illusory walls in the Lightless Maze. This so-called illusory wall was a wall that seemed to exist but actually did not. If one passed through such a wall, they might directly go from the northernmost part of the Lightless Maze to the southernmost part. They might also directly appear in front of a large number of ghosts. They might even appear beside the treasure chest. Moreover, the illusory wall would move everywhere. These walls could quickly move from one place to another. It all depended on luck. Xiang Tianxiu ran as he released spells behind him. Every time his lightning spell hit, it would basically kill a single beast-shaped ghost. However, they were still too fast! The distance between Xiang Tianxiu and these ghosts was slowly decreasing. If this continued, he would definitely be caught. “Run, run, run!” Xiang Tianxiu used all his strength. At this moment, a ghost hand suddenly appeared under his feet and tripped him. Xiang Tianxiu also did not react. A demon beast actually appeared under his feet. Caught off guard, he directly lost his balance and flew out under the huge kinetic energy. The ghost behind rushed up with a sinister smile. However, Xiang Tianxiu’s body did not stop after crashing into the wall. Instead… it directly passed through! The ghosts walked forward and also wanted to pass through the wall, but they realized that the illusory wall had already disappeared. The two sutured ghost monsters in the lead roared angrily and scattered. They could only continue to sniff out the scent of humans and keep on searching. Xiang Tianxiu’s butt hurt. He touched it gently and saw blood. “Damn, my robe is worn out.” Xiang Tianxiu cursed and slowly got up. He suddenly discovered that it was not so dark in front of him. Instead, he was enveloped by light. He looked down and was overjoyed. In front of him was actually a golden treasure chest! “I’m too lucky! Not only did I escape from the ghosts, but I even found a treasure chest!” Xiang Tianxiu was overjoyed and was about to open the treasure chest. However, a tongue stuck out from the treasure chest and wrapped around his palm. There was a click. His entire left palm was cut off! The next moment, slender arms and legs stretched out from around the treasure chest. It quickly stood up and was more than two meters tall! Xiang Tianxiu’s face was pale as he ran. “Damn! There’s even a treasure chest monster!” On the other side, Ye Yuqiu covered a long and narrow wound on her chest and quietly advanced in the Lightless Maze. Behind her, two balls of yin energy gradually collapsed and exploded. Her situation was not good either. Three long and deep cracks appeared on her equipment, revealing her snow-white skin. On careful look, the flesh around the skin had already completely died. Clearly, the life force had been taken away by the ghost. The greatest manifestation of her decreased life force was that her health limit had temporarily decreased by about 10%. Moreover, it lasted for an extremely long time, ten days. Without a high grade Regeneration Technique, it was very difficult for her to recover. “An unexpected change has happened in the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple…” Ye Yuqiu frowned. “I didn’t appear in the same place as Shield Ghost, Flame Explosion, and the others like before. Moreover, I was ambushed by two sutured ghost monsters as soon as I landed. If not for… the thing she left me, I might have already died.” Thinking of this, her frown deepened. “I’m already so heavily injured. Where are the others?” “Other than Shield Ghost, I’m afraid everyone else will be severely injured or even die.” Ye Yuqiu was worried. Compared to her own life, she cared more about the lives of others. This was especially true for martial artists like Lin Xuan who could make potions and heal others. Everyone admired experts who killed billions. However, Ye Yuqiu knew that without a huge number of logisticians preparing at the back, it was impossible for the experts to continue fighting at a high intensity. “I can only take things one step at a time. You guys better not die.” Ye Yuqiu continued forward. At the same time, outside the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple. At this moment, the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple had completely changed. The antique building was enveloped by a sinister black aura. The dragon carvings on the wall gradually became ferocious and bared their fangs and claws, as if they were about to break free from the wall and rush out to devour people at any time. What was worse was that the black aura was gathering and gradually forming a bloated and ugly figure. It had a huge belly and a terrifying appearance. The martial artists stared at this scene with frightened expressions. Silver Fox, Black, and Bai Xinghe paced back and forth worriedly. They did not know what was going on, but they knew that the people who were still in the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple were definitely in great danger! “Boss Wu, do you know what that is?” Silver Fox could not help but ask again. Old Wu sighed. “If I knew, would I still be so vexed? Such a thing did not appear in the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple five years ago!” The last martial artist to pass the fifth trial had long come out. However, after that, no one came out for more than two hours. Six to seven thousand people had entered the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple, but less than four thousand had left safely! This casualty rate was a little ridiculous. “The difficulty has increased greatly, and the rewards have also increased greatly. Now, this strange phenomenon has appeared…” Li Weiguo frowned deeply.” We can’t enter either. Now, they can only rely on themselves. ” A Seventh Realm martial artist was only a Seventh Realm martial artist. However, Eighth Realm martial artists were a high-level force in the Construction Division. Even if they were willing to enter, they could not. The death of a Seventh Realm martial artist was a loss. However, the death of any Eighth Realm martial artist was an ever bigger loss. This could be seen from the fact that India’s strength had greatly decreased and its forces had begun to shrink. In the Lightless Maze, Lin Xuan’s search continued. However, the longer he stayed here, the more he felt that there seemed to be malicious gazes everywhere. When he wanted to investigate where these malicious gazes came from, the gazes completely disappeared. Lin Xuan could only attribute this to the Ghost Mother. After searching aimlessly for a while, he was very lucky to discover a golden treasure chest. After opening it, he saw a huge, hot heart! “Fire Dragon Heart?!” Lin Xuan was pleasantly surprised. The Fire Dragon Heart could be directly eaten. It could break through the upper limit and permanently increase fire damage by 10% It could also be used to synthesize the Dark Gold Set [Flame Sovereign]. Originally, Lin Xuan had planned to win the Fire Dragon Heart from Xiang Tianxiu. He did not expect to find one here. “Alright, I’ll eat one directly and use this one to synthesize.” Lin Xuan immediately threw the Demon Flame Set, the Holy Flame Set, and the Fire Dragon Heart into the synthesis table. The synthesis table that had not worked for a long time slowly began to creak. Lin Xuan looked at the time. It would take 15 minutes. He thought for a moment and simply sat down in his original territory. With this set, Flame Explosion’s strength would increase greatly. Moreover, if he explored blindly, he would encounter danger. Thinking of this, instead of going out to explore, it was better to wait for the set to be synthesized. Nothing happened for the past 15 minutes. The [Flame Sovereign] Set was successfully synthesized. —- Name: Flame Sovereign Level: Level One Seventh Realm Grade: Legendary Dark Gold Equipment Requirement: Spirit 256 Effect 1: Spirit+15%, Constitution -10%. Effect 2: Fire Damage+100%. Effect 3: Flame Splash Range+100%. Effect 4: All fire spells can ignore 30% of fire resistance. Effect 5: 10% of the damage caused by all fire spells will form a fire shield. Effect 6: All fire spells will cause a “burn” effect. -1% health per second for 30 seconds. —- Lin Xuan was overjoyed. After putting on this set, Flame Explosion’s strength would simply increase. As expected of a dark gold set, it was awesome! Previously, when dealing with the three level seven Seventh Realm sutured ghost monsters, Lin Xuan and his five avatars had attacked together. Although they had suppressed the other party, it had still been rather difficult for them to kill the other party. With this [Flame Sovereign] Set, things would be very different. If they encountered the sutured ghost monsters again, a single Blazing City would be enough to send them to the afterlife! After all, Flame Explosion was a Sixth Realm spell and Blazing City was a Seventh Realm spell. Therefore, Flame Explosion’s most commonly used spell had already been changed to Blazing City. Lin Xuan continued forward. Before long, he suddenly discovered that something was wrong with the wall beside him. He tried to touch it gently and discovered that the wall did not exist. After passing through the wall, he saw another treasure chest in front of him. However, just as Lin Xuan was about to step forward and open it, he subconsciously used his high-level Observer skill and discovered… that this thing actually had an information panel! “A treasure chest monster? Damn.” Lin Xuan immediately retreated and let Cold Domain and Poison Blade deal with it. Cold Domain used the Great Ice Seal, and Poison Blade stabbed randomly. The treasure chest monster was killed before it could extend its limbs. The thing in its stomach also fell out. It was a skill book. “Seventh Realm skill, Potion Throw. Peerless golden grade. Allows one to throw a potion within a 30-meter radius. The damage/recovery value is related to the level of the potion.” Lin Xuan nodded slightly. “This skill is quite suitable for me. I’ll learn it!” After learning this skill, he continued forward. After walking for half an hour this time, he used his high-level perception and suddenly discovered that five sutured ghost monsters were quickly approaching him. At this moment, they were all 30 meters southeast of him. Lin Xuan was deep in thought. Since the sutured ghost monsters had come from this direction, did it mean that the Ghost Mother was also in this direction? “I’ve finally found the right direction!” Report chapterUse arrow keys (or A / D) to PREV/NEXT chapterContact &#8211; Sitemap<br> Privacy &amp; Terms of use Lin Xuan immediately faced the attack with his five avatars. Soon, the distance between him and the five sutured ghost monsters quickly decreased. However, because there were many walls in the Lightless Maze, there were also many dead ends. Therefore, even if they were close to each other, they still had to circle around. Lin Xuan and his five avatars had already found a spot and were waiting quietly. Everyone’s skills were already prepared. The next moment, five sutured ghost monsters suddenly appeared in his line of sight. “Time to attack!” Cold Domain was the first to attack. As soon as the dark gold grade Great Ice Seal was used, all five ghosts were frozen on the spot. He had leveled up the Great Ice Seal using the 100 Mystic Realm Pearls given to him by Xiang Tianxiu. After Lin Xuan learned that the difficulty of the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple had increased by 200% and that the Ghost Mother was about to give birth, he had not used them. He wanted to invest it into a certain skill at the critical moment. For example, if several people were seriously injured, then he would invest the Mystic Realm Pearls into the Great Regeneration Technique. If he needed to suppress the enemy, he would invest them into the Great Ice Seal. If he needed an AOE to clear the area, he would invest them into Lightning Storm. He left this decision for the critical moment. Now was the time for suppression. This dark gold grade Great Ice Seal directly froze the five ghosts on the spot for a full three seconds! Three seconds was enough for his main body and the other four avatars to unleash their strongest attacks. Terrifying flames surged in the air. That’s right, they were all using Blazing City! Although the other avatars were not equipped with mage equipment, However, he could not help but feel excited! The strongest Blazing City was released by Flame Explosion. Fire Damage+10%! Equipment [Burning Fire Codex]+60%! Skill [Magic Amplification]+50%! Skill [Demon King of Fury]+40%! Skill [Blazing City]+30%! Rune group [Let the Flames Purify Everything]+30%! The rune group [Scarlet Wave Rush] ignored 15% fire resistance! Set [Flame Lord]+100%! Ignore 30% fire resistance! A total of 310% additional fire damage! Ignore 45% fire resistance! “You guys can’t resist this fire!” The Blazing City descended. The terrifying flames annihilated the five sutured ghost monsters. The scorching heat crazily burned everything within a 20-meter radius! The five sutured ghost monsters wailed in pain. Their bodies gradually became illusory and bright. Finally, they completely disappeared. As they struggled in pain, Lin Xuan saw the painful face of one of the sutured ghost monsters and suddenly felt that it was a little familiar. Memories flashed in his mind. He suddenly remembered! This was the person who had shamelessly asked Shield Ghost and Brother Milk to help him on the Gale Bridge. This person mocked him again when he passed Shield Ghost on the Floating Ice Bridge. In the end, he did not pay attention to the vortex under his feet and was pulled to the bottom of the river by a cold hand. That person’s face actually appeared here! Lin Xuan was shocked. Thoughts seemed to flash through his mind. Could it be that these sutured ghost monsters were created by someone? Could the Ghost Mother be the source of the sutured ghost monsters? The flames and violent explosions here also attracted the attention of Ye Yuqiu and Xiang Tianxiu. “This fire… is very likely Flame Explosion!” Ye Yuqiu was overjoyed and immediately approached in that direction. At this moment, Xiang Tianxiu was still being chased by the treasure chest monster. He said in surprise, “Flame Explosion’s fire magic seems to have become more ferocious again!” Lin Xuan ran in the direction these sutured ghost monsters came from, the southeast direction! On the way, he met up with Ye Yuqiu and Xiang Tianxiu. “Save me, save me!” Xiang Tianxiu shouted. Lin Xuan looked behind him. The two-meter-tall treasure chest monster with slender limbs was still chasing after him. Cold Domain stepped forward and threw out a Great Ice Seal. Flame Explosion also threw out a Flame Explosion. Poison Blade flashed behind the treasure chest monster like a ghost and stabbed into its vital points several times. The treasure chest monster staggered a few times and fell to the ground. A golden skill book fell. Xiang Tianxiu picked it up and handed it over in embarrassment. Lin Xuan glanced at it. It was the [Great Lightning Shield]. He shook his head. “It’s better for you to take it.” Xiang Tianxiu smiled and stuffed it into the storage compartment. However, he still responded politely, “How can I accept this…” When Ye Yuqiu saw Poison Blade’s attack, she seemed to have recalled some distant memories. “Let me treat you first.” Brother Milk stood up and cast a regeneration spell on the two of them. The dead flesh near the wound on Ye Yuqiu’s chest was quickly replaced by new pink flesh. Xiang Tianxiu’s palm, which had been bitten off by the Treasure Chest Monster, was also slowly growing. However, even with the help of the Regeneration Technique, it would still take a day for it to grow completely. “Thank you.” Ye Yuqiu nodded gratefully. Xiang Tianxiu gritted his teeth in pain, but he still could not help but say, “You guys actually got together so quickly and even got along so well.” Lin Xuan smiled and nodded. “The places we teleported to were closer. After yelling out a few times, we all found each other and gathered.” Then, everyone communicated. Just as Lin Xuan had expected, Ye Yuqiu and Xiang Tianxiu were also ambushed. Fortunately, the two of them were quite strong and lucky. They barely escaped after suffering some injuries. “By the way, Poison Blade… did you stay in Dragon Sea City for a period of time?” Ye Yuqiu asked. Poison Blade smiled. “You noticed.” Ye Yuqiu could not help but laugh. “Really? That time, the Dragon Sea City Potion was attacked by a spy but was accidentally killed by a sword expert. Chu Pengcheng couldn’t figure out who it was no matter how he racked his brains and even asked me to help analyze it. I didn’t expect it to be you.” Poison Blade had a cynical expression. “Brother Milk and I passed by Dragon Sea City at that time and helped out.” Ye Yuqiu nodded. At that time, Poison Blade and Brother Milk should be Seventh Realm martial artists. It was not difficult for Seventh Realm martial artists to advance in the wilderness. “What are your guesses about the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple?” Lin Xuan asked. “I’m not sure. I only know that the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple is very dangerous now.” Xiang Tianxiu shook his head. This was also the first time he had encountered such a situation and was a little dumbfounded. “I saw something just now…” Lin Xuan explained the situation of the sutured ghost monster. Ye Yuqiu and Xiang Tianxiu were both shocked. “The sutured ghost monster wore the face of a martial artist who recently died?!” “I suspect that there’s a source behind these stitched monster ghosts. It’s very likely a Ghost King or a Ghost Mother.” Lin Xuan pointed to the southeast and said solemnly, “According to the direction, it’s very likely over there. If we don’t kill it, we won’t be able to leave.” “Then what are we waiting for? Let’s go!” Xiang Tianxiu immediately stood up. Everyone nodded and followed. As they advanced, they encountered more sutured ghost monsters on the way. However, Lin Xuan used his high-level Observer skill to sense that the levels of these sutured ghost monsters were each lower than the other. There were also fewer and fewer sutures on their bodies. In the end, pure humanoid and beast-shaped ghosts even appeared to stop them. Soon, an empty space appeared in front of them. In the center of the open space was a fat purple-black body. They even encountered the Ghost Mother! Beside the Ghost Mother were eight stitched ghost monsters. They had been guarding this place and had not chased after Lin Xuan and the others. At this moment, Ghost Mother’s fat stomach suddenly constricted. Then, a beast-shaped ghost suddenly jumped out of its stomach! The Ghost Mother growled. Its low roar seemed to be an order, and the eight sutured ghost monsters immediately pounced over. “I’ll resist them!” Shield Ghost shouted and rushed to the front with the Lion Heart Tower Shield, acting as the main tank. Ye Yuqiu waved the Valkyrie Frost Blade. As she attacked the ghosts, she could also reduce the attacks on Shield Ghost. Behind them, Flame Explosion, Cold Domain, and Xiang Tianxiu quickly released various spells. Lin Xuan held various potions in his hand, prepared to use them on the people in front of him at any time. Brother Milk waved his pink staff and auxiliary skills landed on everyone, increasing their attack and defense. The battle had reached its climax from the beginning. Lin Xuan did not want to give the Ghost Mother any chance to continue creating ghosts. Shield Ghost pushed forward with all his might. This allowed the three mages behind to directly attack the Ghost Mother. The eight sutured ghost monsters also attacked Shield Ghost and Ye Yuqiu with all their might. In the beginning, Ye Yuqiu was worried that she would not be able to cooperate with them. She had no choice but to be wary of her health points in case she was suddenly killed by the Ghost Gathering Fire. She had a bottle of Big Life Potion tied to her waist in case of emergencies. However, she discovered that every time her and Shield Ghost’s health points fell below half, recovery skills and health potions would immediately land on their heads and their health points would be recovered. She did not need to worry about her health points at all. Lin Xuan and Brother Milk had long calculated the timing. Ye Yuqiu praised in her heart. It was good to cooperate with such people. She did not need to be distracted at all. She only needed to fight in one go! Xiang Tianxiu was also very happy. Almost all his skills consumed a lot of magic power, so he had to use magic power potions to use four to five skills. However, Brother Milk’s skill could speed up the recovery of magic power. Lin Xuan could also throw potions from afar to help him recover his magic power. He did not have to worry about not having magic power at all. With his skills, he could just bombard everything in front of him! Xiang Tianxiu felt as if he was wearing new underwear and standing on the rooftop to welcome the first day of the new year! It was extremely comfortable! Bang bang bang! One of the sutured ghost monsters was first hit by Cold Domain’s Great Ice Seal and then severely injured by Ye Yuqiu’s shock wave. Coupled with the splash damage and burning damage of Blazing City, it did not even have the chance to retreat and directly exploded into a mist. These eight sutured ghost monsters were actually very powerful and were all level seven Seventh Realm. However, they could not defend against Lin Xuan and the others at all. The other party had the advantage of numbers, tacit cooperation, and sufficient logistics! Every single one of them was not something these ghosts could handle. The death of the sutured ghost monsters blew the prelude to the death of the ghosts. The flames of the Blazing City had also splashed onto the Ghost Mother. Every time, the Ghost Mother’s fat body would twitch crazily and let out a miserable scream. However, it was useless. Eight sutured ghost monsters fell one after another. Seeing that it could no longer survive, an incomparably venomous gaze shot out from the Ghost Mother’s eyes. Its body actually expanded like a balloon that was being inflated crazily. Xiang Tianxiu was shocked. “Is it going to self-destruct? Retreat quickly!” Lin Xuan shook his head. “It’s not self-destruction. It wants to release the ghosts in its body. The souls of the people and demon beasts who have died on the Little Spirit Mountain for so many years are all stored in the Ghost Mother’s body.” Xiang Tianxiu used his Observer skill to see the information clearly. This Ghost Mother had a skill that allowed it to sacrifice itself to release all the ghosts in its body. The ghosts would crazily attack all living things nearby for 10 minutes. Ten minutes later, all the ghosts would also die. However, the number of ghosts was extremely terrifying. Once the Ghost Mother released them, they would not be able to leave this place. In the end, they would only attack Lin Xuan and the others crazily! Roar! Ghost Mother screamed and exploded. Countless ferocious ghosts surged out. There were humanoid ghosts as well as beast-shaped ghosts. Lin Xuan even saw the ghosts of the martial artists that had died in the first five trials! Lin Xuan was familiar with quite a few of them. At this moment, these ghosts had all broken free from their shackles! Xiang Tianxiu’s face was pale. Ye Yuqiu’s expression was solemn. Even with a rough estimate, there were still 30,000 ghosts here! With so many ghosts squeezed in here, it was simply crowded. Countless venomous gazes were already aimed at Lin Xuan and the others! Report chapterUse arrow keys (or A / D) to PREV/NEXT chapterContact &#8211; Sitemap<br> Privacy &amp; Terms of use “It’s over, it’s all over!” Xiang Tianxiu wailed with a desperate expression. Ye Yuqiu: “…Do you have to act like this? You’re a genius martial artist from the Construction Division after all. Even if you die, you should have some dignity, okay?” “I’m not desperate because I’m about to die. People die eventually, but I can’t die right now…” Xiang Tianxiu shook his head with a solemn expression.” After I die, the members of the Construction Division will definitely check my belongings. What if they discover the three boxes of research materials under my bed? ” “If you were in my position, would you not despair?!” Ye Yuqiu held her forehead. Lin Xuan: “…It’s indeed quite hopeless.” Xiang Tianxiu seemed to have found a resonance. “Right? It’s very hopeless!” Lin Xuan suddenly chuckled. “But I have to tell you that we won’t die here.” Xiang Tianxiu was stunned. “You have a way?!” Ye Yuqiu looked at the ghosts that surged over from all directions. “Although I think you’re only saying this to comfort us, if you really have a way, it’s best to take it out as soon as possible.” Lin Xuan took out a round and plump bead that emitted golden light from the storage compartment. This bead was as big as his fist. As soon as he took it out, a brilliant Buddhist light flowed, and at the same time, a rich sandalwood fragrance lingered at the tip of his nose. The ghosts seemed to have sensed the aura of a natural enemy and suddenly cowered. Ye Yuqiu and Xiang Tianxiu were shocked when they saw this. “A Sarira?!” “You actually found such a rare treasure?!” Ye Yuqiu was shocked. Currently, only Old Wu seemed to have one of the Sarira in the entire Little Spirit Mountain. Moreover, he had already used his Sarira many times, and the Buddhist light on it had dimmed greatly. Ye Yuqiu had been lucky enough to see it once. She guessed that after using it twice at most, the Sarira would completely lose its ability. However, now, in front of her, this Sarira was round and plump and was filled with Buddhist light! Xiang Tianxiu was also shocked. This was because his teacher, Li Weiguo, had always wanted to find a Sarira to protect himself. However, the Sariras found on the Little Spirit Mountain would be provided to Ninth Realm martial artists and the martial artists on the front line first, which was also known as the Drowning City mystic realm. After all, the Sarira also had a good suppression effect on the demon beasts in Drowning City. Under such circumstances, it was very difficult for a martial artist like Xiang Tianxiu, who was still growing, to obtain a Sarira! “I was just lucky.” Lin Xuan smiled and did not hesitate to consume 10% of his health to use this Sarira. Boom! Health points were injected. The Sarira suddenly lit up! The Buddhist light even rushed into the air and condensed into a blurry Buddha statue. The ghosts that were illuminated by the Buddhist light screamed and turned to ashes. The ghosts behind did not dare to approach. The arrogance from before instantly disappeared without a trace. All of them curled up in the corner and were even more docile than little sheep. In an instant, the situation of life and death was reversed! Xiang Tianxiu said excitedly, “How long can the Sarira last?” Lin Xuan said, “30 minutes.” Ye Yuqiu frowned. “Can we leave the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple in 30 minutes?” Lin Xuan shook his head. “There’s no need to leave. We’ll wait here.” “Wait?” Both of them stared at him in shock. “I saw with my High-Level Observer skill that these ghosts will only exist for 10 minutes. After 10 minutes, regardless of whether the target is killed or not, they will directly collapse.” “Oh… Wait, High-Level Observer Technique?!” Ye Yuqiu and Xiang Tianxiu were dumbfounded again. High-level Observer skill? Where did this skill come from? At this moment, the Construction Division only had Observer skills, right? Lin Xuan rubbed his nose. “This was something Flame Explosion obtained . He doesn’t have a use for it, so he decided it was better to give it to me. In any case, I’m just here to provide support.” Flame Explosion immediately nodded. “Yes, Lin Xuan has learned many support skills.” Ye Yuqiu was still very shocked. This guy always brought them new surprises every once in a while. 10 minutes later, all the ghosts collapsed on their own. Lin Xuan also put away the Sarira. “Let’s go. After finding the core area of the Lightless Maze and obtaining the final reward, we can also leave this place.” Lin Xuan waved his hand, indicating for everyone to follow. Without the threat of the ghosts, everyone could carefully search for the core area of the Lightless Maze. Soon, they arrived. This was a flickering light screen. Passing through the light curtain meant passing the trial. “By the way, would we be passing the sixth trial or the ninth trial?” Xiang Tianxiu scratched his head. Ye Yuqiu shrugged. “Who knows? In any case, I’m already dumbfounded.” “Let’s go in and take a look.” Lin Xuan was the first to step into the light screen. Boom! Everything around him disappeared, and he was enveloped by endless fog in the blink of an eye. The others did the same. A few seconds later, golden light seemed to fly over from the distant fog. Not just one… but three! Soon, three treasure chests appeared in front of Lin Xuan. He also looked at the perspective of his five avatars. Similarly, there were also three treasure chests in front of them. What surprised him even more was that the three treasure chests were all glowing with a dark golden light! “Could they all be of the legendary dark gold grade?” Lin Xuan was filled with excitement as he opened the three dark gold treasure chests one after another. The first treasure chest was 500 Mystic Realm Pearls. The second treasure chest was a set of dark gold runes [Art of Throwing]. The third treasure chest was a dark gold skill book [Sealing Blood]. —- Name: Art of Throwing Level: Level One Seventh Realm Grade: Legendary Dark Gold Set Requirements: Hand equipment above level one Seventh Realm Effect 1: Agility+6%, Throw Range+30%. Effect 2: The effect of anything that is thrown increases by 30%. Effect 3: There is a 20% chance that the item will not be consumed. —- Seeing these three effects, Lin Xuan knew that this thing was very suitable for him. His main body was currently a logistician. Previously, he had found a [Potion Throw] book in the Lightless Maze. It allowed him to throw various potions from a safe distance. With this skill, he could kill, heal, and assist. Now, with this rune group, it could be said to be like adding wings to a tiger. —- Name: Blood-Sealing Level: Level One Seventh Realm Grade: Legendary Dark Gold Effect 1: The probability of bleeding from all attacks+30%, bleeding damage+50%. Effect 2: If the attack hits the other party’s wound, critical hit chance+200%, critical hit damage+300%. Effect 3: If the attack hits the other party and the other party is in a poisoned state, the critical hit chance+300%, critical hit damage+500%. —- Lin Xuan was so happy that he could not close his mouth. This skill was also very useful and was very suitable for Poison Blade. Among the previous five avatars, Flame Explosion and Cold Domain were too famous and had already overshadowed the other avatars. Now that Poison Blade had this skill [Sealing Blood], he would become even more lethal. Moreover, Poison Blade’s attack was poisonous to begin with. Coupled with his Agility, it was very easy for him to hit the wounds on the poisoned target. At that time, he would really be able to insta-kill his enemies! Compared to the three rewards Lin Xuan had given, the rewards obtained by the other five avatars were slightly inferior, but they were still relatively good. Moreover, the five avatars had all obtained very good golden materials that could be synthesized on the consciousness space synthesis table. Lin Xuan also noticed that there were many new formulas on the synthesis list. “Yes, they can all be synthesized!” The fog that enveloped him gradually retreated. Lin Xuan appeared on a wide limestone ground. In front of him was a quietly spinning light screen. As expected, after passing through to the other side of this screen, he should be able to leave the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple. They had already passed the trial. Xiang Tianxiu and Ye Yuqiu also slowly opened their eyes. The two of them were very happy. Just by looking at their expressions, Lin Xuan knew that they had definitely obtained a lot. Before Lin Xuan could ask, Xiang Tianxiu directly shouted, “Damn! I actually obtained 500 Mystic Realm Pearls and a Great Thunder Dragon Heart! Damn, damn!” The Thunder Dragon’s Heart was a golden material, and the Great Thunder Dragon’s Heart was a dark gold material! Be it directly eating it or refining it into equipment, it would directly increase lightning damage by 20%. Of course, above the Thunder Dragon Heart and the Great Thunder Dragon Heart, there was also the Ancient Thunder Dragon Heart, which directly increased lightning damage by 30%. Although it was also a dark gold material, it was far more difficult to find than the Great Thunder Dragon’s Heart. “What about you?” Lin Xuan looked at Ye Yuqiu. Ye Yuqiu naturally did not lose her composure like Xiang Tianxiu. She chuckled and said, “400 Mystic Realm Pearls, 10 million essence, and a Great Ice Dragon Heart.” Xiang Tianxiu’s smile instantly froze. The first two of his three dark gold treasure chests each had 250 Mystic Realm Pearls. In total, there were only 500. However, Ye Yuqiu got 400 of them from a single treasure chest! The second treasure chest contained 10 million essence! The third treasure chest also had a Great Ice Dragon Heart! It was really infuriating! Xiang Tianxiu immediately felt less excited about the Great Thunder Dragon’s Heart in his hand! “Let’s go. It will take some time for these treasures to be converted into combat strength. The people outside must be very worried.” Ye Yuqiu chuckled. Everyone stepped through the light screen and left the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple. The world in front of him spun and became strange. When their vision cleared, they discovered that a large number of martial artists had already gathered here. Old Wu and Li Weiguo had never left. Their eyes were bloodshot, and they seemed like two giant pandas. Seeing Lin Xuan and the others suddenly appear, the martial artists were all pleasantly surprised. “Damn! They’re out! They’re out!” “Heavens, they really came out alive!” The martial artists were overjoyed. In particular, the martial artists who had obtained Lin Xuan’s help in the trial were simply overjoyed. Feng Zhuang, the burly man, even cried. Old Wu and Li Weiguo rushed over. “You’re really… alive!” Silver Fox, Black, and Bai Xinghe also rushed over. “We were all worried to death.” Xiang Tianxiu chuckled and said, “It’s fine, it’s fine. My arm and leg are still attached. It’s just that I lost a palm.” Black rolled his eyes. “Who cares? I’m worried about Ye Yuqiu, Shield Ghost, and Flame Explosion.” Xiang Tianxiu was immediately stunned. “It’s good that you’re fine.” Li Weiguo took a deep breath. “What exactly happened in the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple?” Lin Xuan immediately described everything that had happened in the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple in detail. Old Wu and Li Weiguo were shocked. The difficulty increased exponentially! The reward increased! After the fifth trial, they directly jumped to the ninth trial! They even encountered the Ghost Mother! Moreover, they also needed to deal with the 30,000 ghosts that came out from the Ghost Mother after it exploded! At this point, everyone’s hearts tightened. How did Lin Xuan and the others survive when they were trapped in such a small sealed space with more than 30,000 ghosts?! “Sarira!” When Lin Xuan mentioned the Sarira, everyone was shocked. Old Wu could not help but compare his remaining Sarira with Lin Xuan’s. The difference was simply heaven and earth. “You must be extremely lucky!” The usually solemn Bai Xinghe could not help but exclaim. Lin Xuan shook his head. “Stop. Research has proven that the lifespan of lucky people is extremely short. I don’t want that.” Everyone laughed loudly, and the scene was filled with a happy atmosphere. “I’ll immediately report the matter of the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple. We’ll leave this troubling matter to the big shots of the headquarters.” Old Wu patted Lin Xuan’s shoulder. The nine trials of the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple ended with Lin Xuan and the others returning safely. Seven thousand people entered the trial, and more than two thousand people died. These were all Seventh Realm martial artists! However, almost all the people who survived had also improved greatly and their strength had improved greatly. It could be said that the gains had made up for the losses. Lin Xuan sorted out the things he had obtained in the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple. He also used some of the items he obtained to exchange for the rune group he needed. The wailing of a maiden! The three effects of the golden rune group were all related to healing. In this way, Brother Milk’s healing capacity could increase greatly. In addition, Lin Xuan’s main body could also act as half a healer. In this way, he would no longer have to worry about lacking health! After returning to the room, his tense nerves immediately relaxed. Exhaustion surged in his heart like a tide. Lin Xuan fell asleep. At the same time, in an underground space somewhere in the Construction Division. Ye Lijiang, Wan Youxi, and Lu Pinghai were gathered here. In front of them was a fluctuating fluctuation door, as if it would close in the next moment. “Where’s the other side?” Ye Lijiang asked. Wan Youxi held a controller in his hand. There was also a small screen attached to the controller. A completely different scene could be seen on the screen. Wan Youxi said solemnly, “According to my rich experience, it’s probably a mystic realm I don’t know much about.” Ye Lijiang and Lu Pinghai :”…” Lu Pinghai leaned over and took a few looks. At first, he could not tell anything. However, when a small flower flickering with Lightning Winded on the small screen, his mind flashed and he immediately said, “Go back and look at that small flower carefully.” The screen immediately retreated. Ye Lijiang, Wan Youxi, and Lu Pinghai all stared at the small flower flickering with lightning. Suddenly, they said in unison, “Reed Country!” Wan Youxi was so happy that his mouth could not close. “These guys hid the Reed Country so deeply that even the people from the World Salvation Society and the Knights of Truth are not allowed to enter. In the end, we actually found it!” “We sure are really lucky. The first two Sun Keys were connected to two ordinary small mystic realms, but the third one was actually connected to the Reed Country.” Lu Pinghai sighed. Wan Youxi quickly turned the controller into a Rubik’s Cube and put it away. Then, he said solemnly, “Sister Ye! Xiang Qiankan is very likely to be locked up in the Reed Country. I think we have to give it a try.” Ye Lijiang nodded slightly. Xiang Qiankan was Xiang Tianxiu’s mother. She was also a talented level nine Eighth Realm martial artist and a genius expert who had a high chance of breaking through to the Ninth Realm in a year! However, she had mysteriously disappeared during the battle in Drowning City. The Ninth Realm martial artist guarding Drowning City took the time to personally search for traces, but the clues ended on a martial artist from the High Heaven Plains. High Heaven Plains also refused to admit that her disappearance was related to them. Because they could not find any evidence, the Construction Division did not act rashly. This was because it was also possible that the other organizations had deliberately planted clues to frame the High Heaven Plains to force the Construction Division to start a war with the High Heaven Plains. This was not the first time they had seen such a scheme. “Collect the members of the Construction Division who have disguise skills. Keep a low profile and gather them for me in three days.” Ye Lijiang concluded. “Understood.” Wan Youxi and Lu Pinghai immediately nodded. It was an ordinary day. A tall woman appeared in Old Wu’s office. Her eyebrows were long, and her facial features were exquisite. She also had some makeup on. She was wearing a small black suit with a tight white cropped top and black slim-fit pants. Old Wu circled her and clicked his tongue in wonder. The woman said helplessly, “Uncle, stop looking.” Old Wu chuckled and said, “It wasn’t easy for me to accumulate enough battle merits to exchange for holy water and finally remove the curse on you. I’m just too happy.” With that said, he said, “What level have you recovered to?” The woman said, “Third level Seventh Realm.” Old Wu smiled and nodded. “Very good, very good!” The more he looked, the happier he was. The woman said solemnly, “Uncle, I heard that the headquarters is secretly recruiting martial artists with disguise skills? My face has never appeared in public before. I can respond to the headquarters’ recruitment.” Old Wu was stunned. “How did you know?” The woman pointed at the document on his desk. “It’s not like you bothered to hide it.” Old Wu :”…” He sighed and said, “The mission is very dangerous. I don’t want you to go.” The woman’s eyes burned. “Where is this mission being carried out? Is it a hidden mission in High Heaven Plains?” Old Wu was about to speak. The woman interrupted him. “Don’t randomly say a place to fool me. You know that I can tell the truth from the lie.” Old Wu sighed. “You’re right. It’s Reed Country.” The woman stood up immediately. “Add my name.” “Are you really going?” “My curse is caused by Qing Kongxing. I want to kill her.” Old Wu was very conflicted. “Your father is dead, and your mother is dead. There’s only you and me in our family. You…” “It’s precisely because of this that I have to go!” The woman’s eyes were incomparably firm. Old Wu sighed. “Go out first. Let me think about it.” “If you don’t agree, I’ll go to Colony Two. They’ll definitely agree.” With that said, the woman put on her helmet and soft armor and walked out of the office. Old Wu took out a personal file from his drawer. The profile picture of this person was that of a 13 or 14-year-old girl. However, her gaze was cold, indicating her maturity that was very inconsistent with her age. The name of the person in this personal file was Lu Luo. In the market area. Lin Xuan was selling his new potion. Life Potion and Lightning Potion were standard formulas. As long as one had the medicinal skill, they could try to make them. However, as long as one had a medicinal skill above the purple grade, they could choose their own materials to make potions. In this way, all kinds of strange potions would be born. Lin Xuan was selling such a potion. He did not rely on luck to make these potions. He relied on his strength! After all, he had the synthesis list of the synthesis table! This included the synthesis formulas for various novel potions! Moreover, they were extremely simple. For example, the Jump Potion. Many potion makers used frog legs to make jump potions, causing the effects of their potions to be inferior to the ones Lin Xuan made with bull frog legs. Another example was the Ferocious Poison Potion. It required various materials that contained ferocious poison to make. Most potion makers chose the Poison Mosquito Poison Bag that was easy to obtain on the Little Spirit Mountain. However, Lin Xuan used the effects of the Yellow Stone Ash and the Poison Mosquito Poison Bag to create an even more ferocious poison. The Ferocious Poison Potion made in this way was naturally stronger than the one made by ordinary potion makers. Since he had the Art of Throwing, Lin Xuan naturally had to think of a way to expand this skill and use it. Knowing that Lin Xuan was selling new potions, many martial artists also gathered over. Some were here to watch the commotion, and some were here to support. Feng Zhuang knew what he needed to do and bought a lot of Blood Fury Potions. The effect of the Blood Fury Potion was to consume health points to increase one’s attack power. It was a way of exchanging injuries. After Feng Zhuang was the first to come up to support, the martial artists behind him also immediately rushed up to buy. Lin Xuan immediately received a large amount of essence. At this moment, a figure enveloped in soft armor walked over. The other party was very surprised to see Lin Xuan. “You’re actually still alive?!” A familiar woman’s voice sounded from the armor. Lin Xuan was stunned. The voice came from a stranger but still sounded quite familiar. However, he could not remember immediately. He simply used a High-Level Observer skill. In any case, as long as the other party was not an Eighth Realm martial artist, he could see 100% of the information. Looking at the information, he was shocked. The information displayed actually indicated that this person was Lu Luo! Wasn’t Lu Luo a 1.5-meter-tall little girl? How could she be this 1.7-meter-tall figure in front of him? “Let’s talk somewhere else.” Lin Xuan closed the stall and brought Lu Luo to the canteen of Colony Three. It was not time for dinner, but the chefs had already prepared many hot dishes. Lin Xuan casually bought a few and placed them on the long table. The two of them picked up their chopsticks in unison. Lu Luo revealed her mouth as she ate, just like Shield Ghost. Lu Luo ate a few mouthfuls and smiled. “I’m very surprised that you actually found out who I was.” Lin Xuan also chuckled. “It’s only because I have a high-level Observer skill.” Lu Luo nodded. “It looks like your level is increasing very quickly. Moreover, your profession is not bad,” Lin Xuan asked. He observed that Lu Luo’s profession was a purple “Shadow Reaper”. She was very good at charging and assassination. Lu Luo nodded. “You should have heard the rumors about me in the Germinal Organization. I was indeed cursed. Now that the curse has been removed, my strength has also recovered.” Lin Xuan sighed. He did not expect there to be such a curse. Was it caused by a skill? Equipment? Or a special item? Lin Xuan did not know. No one knew how many special treasures were hidden in the large mystic realms controlled by the large organizations. “I’m also very curious. How did you also become a Seventh Realm martial artist? You even looked like a fish in water in Colony Three of the Little Spirit Mountain,” Lu Luo said curiously. She only knew that Lin Xuan was good friends with Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion. After Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion left White Crane Town for Dragon Sea City, Lin Xuan had mysteriously disappeared. She thought that Lin Xuan had been attacked by a wandering demon and was dead. Lin Xuan had long prepared an excuse for this and simply told it to her. “I see. Looks like Shield Ghost and Flame Explosion are really good to you. They even give you anything that’s suitable for you.” Lu Luo looked at him enviously. “Wait… Could your relationship be…” Something inappropriate suddenly flashed in Lu Luo’s mind, and her face turned red. Lin Xuan: “…It’s not what you think.” Lu Luo bit her lip. “Anyway, it pleases me to think that you guys are so nice to each other.” Lin Xuan :”…” Lu Luo took a bite of the fried pork chop and casually said, “By the way, you’re proficient in forging. Can you help me forge something?” “What?” “I previously obtained a dark gold blueprint, but I found many craftsmen who did not dare to guarantee a 100% success rate. They even said that even if they forged it, there was a high chance that it would not be of dark gold grade. Your forging skill is golden, so you should be able to give it a try, right?” “Show it to me first.” Lu Luo immediately took out an equipment blueprint from the storage compartment and handed it over. Lin Xuan swept his gaze over and was slightly surprised. This equipment was a mask. It was very special and had almost no defense, but it had extremely powerful Disguise and Concealment! Lin Xuan swept his gaze over the materials again. Other than the two that were more difficult to get, he had everything else. “I can’t guarantee it either. It’s about an 80% chance. If you’re still fine with it, I can forge it for you.” Lin Xuan raised a finger. Lu Luo was very surprised. “Those craftsmen all said that the probability was at most 20 to 30, but you directly said that it was 80%? Then I think it’s better for me to believe you.” Lin Xuan smiled and said, “Logically speaking, the forging cost of a dark gold equipment is very high. It requires at least 8 million essence. Can you afford it?” Lu Luo took out a large pile of materials and handed it over. “I’ve already gathered a lot of materials. Let me know how much the forging cost can be reduced.” Lin Xuan estimated. “In that case, I still need 6.2 million essence.” Lu Luo looked embarrassed. Lin Xuan scratched his head. “How much do you have in your savings?” Lu Luo smiled awkwardly. “If you take away a number, I might be able to take it out.” Lin Xuan nodded. “Alright, 6 million then.” “No… I mean… 620,000.” Lin Xuan: “…Then you can write me an IOU.” Lu Luo coughed lightly. “With our relationship, do we still need an IOU?” Lin Xuan said, “Even if you were a god, you would still have to write me an IOU!” After signing the IOU, Lin Xuan left with the equipment blueprint. “Help me gather these materials. If you can bring a few more, I can further reduce the cost for you.” Before leaving, he also told Lu Luo what he needed. These were all the items he needed for the synthesis list. They were very difficult to find on the Little Spirit Mountain. Lu Luo watched him leave. “This guy is quite good. Although he signed an IOU, he didn’t give me a time limit.” Her heart warmed. Lin Xuan returned to his room. For Lin Xuan, getting an IOU from Lu Luo was not a big problem. However, for the other forgers, it was absolutely necessary for them to get the forging cost. This was because they had to spend time and energy to forge. However, this was not the case for Lin Xuan. He would leave the forging to the forging table. It had nothing to do with him. The only thing he needed was forging materials. Therefore, the forging fees needed by other forgers were actually an additional benefit for Lin Xuan. Moreover, this benefit was quite large. “Speaking of which, the forging table has never forged a dark gold equipment. I wonder if it will work?” Lin Xuan swept his gaze over the three forging tables and simply chose one. He took out his essence and upgraded it. The forging table was different from the medicinal table. The medicinal table worked every day, so Lin Xuan had already upgraded the levels of the three medicinal tables to level 5. However, these three forging tables were still at level 3. Lin Xuan simply increased them to level 5 in one go. To advance from level 5 to level 6, he needed 100,000 essence. Level 6 Forging Table: -30% material consumption. To advance from level 6 to level 7, one needed 1 million essence. Level 7 Forging Table: Can be used to forge dark gold blueprints. Materials consumption -35%. Because only level 7 forging tables could forge dark gold blueprints, and because he would definitely obtain more dark gold blueprints in the future, Lin Xuan decided to upgrade one of the forging tables to level 7. “Let’s start forging!” Lin Xuan waved his hand and the forging table began to forge. All kinds of purple and golden materials fell onto the forging table. Steel fell, flames burned, and water vapor boiled. A strange mask gradually formed. Lin Xuan took out the mask from the forging table and looked at it carefully. The texture of this mask was neither metal nor skin. If he kneaded it with force, it would become hard. If he touched it gently, it would soften again. At this moment, the mask revealed the face of an unfamiliar woman. “This equipment is called [Pink Woman’s Skin]. It’s a dark gold equipment. Its effect is to disguise information, change one’s appearance, and change one’s voice to a small extent. It can only be equipped by women. If a martial artist doesn’t have a dark gold grade, level one Eighth Realm Observer skill, he won’t be able to see through it.” “What is Lu Luo planning to do?” Lin Xuan was somewhat surprised. If this thing was used well, it would definitely be very useful. It would also be very effective if it was used to infiltrate the enemy’s rear. Two days later, Lin Xuan delivered the goods to Lu Luo in the canteen. Lin Xuan said, “What do you want to do with this?” Lu Luo shook her head. “It’s a special mission. Stop asking. It won’t do you any good.” After taking the mask, Lu Luo turned around and left. For some reason, Lin Xuan could see a hint of determination in her back. “What is the Construction Division doing this time? Could it be that they’re infiltrating the enemy’s rear? I’m familiar with this!” Lin Xuan rubbed his chin, as if he had guessed something. “Moreover, I can let my avatar enter. My main body won’t be in any kind of danger at all. It’s very likely that the Construction Division will ask me or one of my avatars. I wonder what reward the Construction Division will give me.” As expected, that night, Old Wu and Li Weiguo found his avatar, Poison Blade. “Ah? You want me to disguise myself and infiltrate the country? Isn’t this too dangerous?” Poison Blade looked shocked as if he had just heard this. “Moreover, I’m not a member of the Construction Division.” Li Weiguo coughed lightly. “If you’re willing, I can recruit you into the organization.” Old Wu glared at him. “I already said that I was going to be the one to recruit him. Get lost.” “Moreover, what I don’t understand is why you chose a Seventh Realm martial artist to carry out the mission. If you have the ability to enter Reed Country, why don’t you let a Ninth Realm martial artist enter and directly unleash a massacre? Wouldn’t that be faster than a Seventh Realm martial artist infiltrating?” Poison Blade said the confusion in Lin Xuan’s heart. Li Weiguo smiled helplessly. “There have always been Ninth Realm martial artists guarding the Reed Country. Moreover, that person’s perception is extremely powerful. Once a Ninth Realm martial artist enters, he will definitely detect them. It’s simply futile. Moreover, it’s possible for them to be detained.” “Similarly, although Eighth Realm martial artists will not be immediately discovered like Ninth Realm martial artists, because the number of Eighth Realm martial artists is relatively small, it will also attract the other party’s attention to a certain extent.” Old Wu continued, “Therefore, the weakest Seventh Realm martial artist is the best choice.” Only then did Poison Blade nod. “Then why did you choose me?” Old Wu said solemnly, “Since it’s an infiltration, you have to be proficient in assassination, stealth, and many other methods. From the looks of it, you’re the most suitable candidate among the Seventh Realm assassins.” “Who else is there?” Li Weiguo coughed lightly. “We can’t reveal this. After all, we have to anticipate all the possible consequences and keep their identities a secret. Think about it. What if all the spies know of each other’s existence? What if you’re captured by High Heaven Plains? What if you can’t withstand the torture…” It was obvious what his meaning was. Poison Blade nodded with a solemn expression. “If we can’t withstand it, then it would really suck.” Old Wu: “…No, we’re afraid you’ll expose the others.” Poison Blade laughed and immediately said, “But I don’t know how to disguise myself.” Li Weiguo took out a set of cosmetics. There was foundation, essence, blush, lipstick, concealer, makeup remover, and a series of other items. Li Weiguo coughed dryly. “I know how to put on makeup. As long as you don’t run around in front of Ninth Realm martial artists for no reason, you won’t be discovered.” Old Wu continued, “You don’t have to worry about the language problem either. We will arrange a special identity for you to ensure that you can integrate into the High Heaven Plains without being discovered immediately. You can learn Japanese over there.” Poison Blade nodded slightly. Actually, learning languages was not difficult for him. As one’s level increased and one’s body became stronger, one’s memory ability would increase greatly. Almost every Ninth Realm martial artist had outstanding brain power. Moreover, Lin Xuan still had his main body and five avatars. It was equivalent to six people learning a language at the same time. In the end, the results of their learning could even be shared. If Lin Xuan was still a student, it would mean that he would be able to attend classes, write papers, do tests, play games, and play basketball at the same time. Even while he was doing all this, he would still be able to spend time with his deskmate to relive the innocence of his student days. “So, what’s the reward?” Poison Blade threw out the most important question. Old Wu and Li Weiguo looked at each other and raised three fingers. “You can suggest three items you need. We’ll do our best to help you. If Little Spirit Mountain doesn’t have them, we’ll go to the headquarters to get them. If the headquarters doesn’t have them either, we’ll change them to items of the same value.” “When you return from the High Heaven Plains after completing the mission, we will give you more rewards. You can also choose whatever you want.” Poison Blade lowered his eyes as if he was deep in thought. Old Wu and Li Weiguo thought that he was worried about the danger of the mission and sighed. “We also know that the mission is very dangerous, but there are too few people who meet the requirements…” Poison Blade looked up with a conflicted expression, as if he had experienced a huge psychological struggle. “I agree. After all, I grew up on this land and was also taken care of by the Construction Division. That’s how I grew to this day.” “However, don’t tell Brother Milk about this. I’m afraid he’ll be worried.” Old Wu and Li Weiguo were extremely touched. Poison Blade was indeed capable! Moreover, even so, the first thing that came to his mind was his brotherhood. He did not want his brother to worry. “Back then, we also had such a brotherly relationship.” Old Wu and Li Weiguo looked at each other and sighed. “Can you tell me the details of the mission now?” Poison Blade interrupted their emotional exchange and asked. “The mission is like this. Xiang Tianxiu’s mother, Xiang Qiankan…” Old Wu immediately introduced the mission in detail. “I see. She’s a martial artist who’s about to advance to the Ninth Realm. No wonder the Construction Division values her so much.” Lin Xuan did not know that it was actually such a big matter. It was no wonder the Construction Division was so anxious. It was even more surprising that Xiang Qiankan had suddenly disappeared. A Ninth Realm martial artist who was about to advance was a threat to all the large organizations. It was unknown which organization was the lead perpetrators in this matter, but it was very likely that several organizations were involved. Be it the World Salvation Society, the Knights of Truth, the High Heaven Plains, or India, which had already been injured… They did not want the Construction Division to become even stronger. Even the Arctic Army, which had always been a firm ally, could not guarantee that they would not have strange thoughts. If the ally of an organization was too powerful, would the ally break the alliance and work alone? Moreover, what if the former ally decided to launch an invasion? Li Weiguo said, “Make your request first. We’ll try our best to satisfy you within a week. During this week, you also have to grasp the information of your new identity and the basic Japanese.” Poison Blade told them what he urgently needed. They were all things needed for the synthesis list. For example, the dark gold skill [Lord of the Elements] could be synthesized now. Another example was the dark gold equipment [Shadow Cloak]. It also required the golden item [Shadow Pearl] and [Shadow Dragon Scale]. Coupled with the [Shadow Ring], it could be synthesized. The disguise and concealment effects of the Shadow Cloak were definitely better than the Shadow Ring. It was very important for infiltration. Another example was the Dark Gold Set [Maiden’s Wish]. It also required the [Maiden’s Healing Pearl] and the [Maiden’s Fairy Staff] to be combined. Another example was the dark gold skill [Emperor Engine]. It required [Omnipotent Bone Armor], [Dragon Heart], [Giant Tiger Heart], and [Giant Lion Heart]. Based on the synthesis formula, it was obvious that this thing could greatly increase one’s resistance to all aspects. Perhaps it could also increase one’s health points, health points recovery speed, and so on. With such high numbers, it would basically make the martial artist invincible among those of the same level. The enemy’s attack would not be able to break through such defenses. However, the enemy could still be pressed onto the ground and attacked. The enemy would have no chance of winning. “The things you requested are a little difficult to obtain. We’ll try our best to gather them, but some of them can only be obtained from the Knights of Truth. It will also take time for the informants over there to transport them over. We’ll have to wait.” After hearing Poison Blade’s request, Old Wu nodded solemnly. “This is your new identity. You have to remember this information firmly.” Li Weiguo took out two thick stacks of A4 paper. “This is the introductory book for Japanese grammar. You don’t have to be too familiar with it. You just need to have a rough idea. After all, your new identity is not a citizen of the High Heaven Plains, but a traitor of the Construction Division.” With that said, Old Wu and Li Weiguo left in a hurry. From the looks of it, they were probably going to call the headquarters to ask for something. Poison Blade spread out the two thick stacks of information. Damn, the information was almost as thick as half a palm. “A traitor from the Construction Division?” Lin Xuan read carefully and the relevant information immediately surged into his mind. Mu Qiang was Mu Yang’s younger cousin. He was a level three Seventh Realm martial artist with the blue grade [Shadow Warrior] profession. His signature skill was [Shadow Escape] and [Shadow Kill]. He was greedy, lustful, lazy, and cautious. His cousin, Mu Yang, had chosen to work for India, and Mu Qiang had chosen to work for High Heaven Plains. His contact was High Heaven Plains’ level six Seventh Realm martial artist, Murata. While Mu Qiang was living in the Little Spirit Mountain, he leaked a lot of information. He had even leaked some of the information about India to High Heaven Plains after obtaining the information from his cousin, Mu Yang. Even Mu Yang was unaware that his cousin was actually a spy from the High Heaven Plains. Seeing this, Lin Xuan laughed. This Mu Qiang was simply a double agent. After the Indian spies in Little Spirit Mountain were eliminated, Mu Qiang felt that he had not been discovered and planned to leave Little Spirit Mountain after a while. Little did he know that Old Wu and the others had long discovered his identity as well as the identity of his contact. However, they had not retracted their net to lure out the big fish. However, now that Mu Qiang was no longer valuable, it was better to take the opportunity to replace him. “This person’s figure is similar to mine and his profession is also an assassin. It’s not difficult for me to disguise myself as him.” “I’ll start learning Japanese next…” Three days later. Old Wu knocked on the door and brought Poison Blade three items. Shadow Pearl, Shadow Dragon Scale, and Dragon Heart. “The place with the most known giant lions is India’s Sunrise City, but our relationship with India is extremely poor now. It’s very difficult for us to obtain the Giant Lion Heart.” “We still don’t know where the Giant Tiger Heart is produced. If there’s any news, we’ll help you pay attention and notify you the moment we find out.” “As for the Maiden’s Magic Staff and the Maiden’s Healing Pearl… are you asking for the sake of Brother Milk?” Old Wu asked suspiciously. Poison Blade nodded. Old Wu patted his shoulder. “We’ll try our best to help you find it.” Old Wu sighed. This guy was even willing to give his good brother a share of the pay. Moreover, this was the pay of a job that required him to put his life on the line. Poison Blade was indeed a pure-hearted young man. Such a young man was the future pillar of the Construction Division! After watching Old Wu leave, Poison Blade closed the door. Lin Xuan entered his consciousness space and placed the Shadow Ring, Shadow Dragon Scale, and Shadow Pearl into the synthesis table. Ten minutes later, a new black cloak was produced. —- Name: Shadow Cloak Level: Level Three Seventh Realm Grade: Legendary Dark Gold Effect 1: Agility+9%. Effect 2: Evasion rate+30%, presence -60%. Effect 3: When traveling inside the shadows, your presence will decrease by 100%, and your critical hit chance will increase by 70%. Your health recovery speed and magic power recovery speed will increase by 60%. —- The Shadow Cloak was similar to the Shadow Ring. However, the effects of all aspects had increased greatly. Especially for the critical hit chance enhancement. It was extremely ferocious. The initial critical chance was based on Agility, and the critical hit chance of Poison Blade was only more than 20%. However, after adding the effects of the skills, equipment, and rune group, the critical hit chance went up drastically. If Poison Blade was in a suitable situation and attacked a suitable target, he could completely achieve a 100% critical hit chance! “I’ve also accumulated a lot of essence at the moment. I’ll first increase my cultivation by one level before leveling up the skills commonly used by Poison Blade…” Lin Xuan invested 3 million essence to increase his level from level three Seventh Realm to level four Seventh Realm. The nine free attribute points he had obtained after leveling up were all invested into his Constitution, which also increased it to 469 points. He also advanced Sealing blood, Lightning Wind, and Flash to level three Seventh Realm in one go. He also increased the grade of his skill to the legendary dark gold level. The Omnipotent Bone Armor and Demonized Body were also upgraded to level three Seventh Realm. “That should do it. Now, it’s time for me to continue earning money.” In the next few days, Lin Xuan continued to set up his stall in the market area to earn money. As he set up the stall, he also multitasked and worked hard to memorize various information about Mu Qiang. This included the information of Mu Qiang’s personality and mannerisms to details about Mu Qiang’s family and friends. The information provided by the Construction Division even recorded that Mu Qiang had dated a few people and was dumped by a few more. “Damn, is there a need to be so careful?” Lin Xuan did not know whether to laugh or cry. Soon, a week passed. Lin Xuan discovered that Black and Lu Luo seemed to have suddenly disappeared. Moreover, they had disappeared even earlier than him. It was not difficult to guess that it might also be because of this hidden mission. Soon, Old Wu and Li Weiguo found him again. This time, they also brought a young man. Old Wu casually said, “This is the person in charge of the east wall of Colony Three. He’s proficient in Japanese. We specially brought him over to test how much your Japanese has improved recently.” Li Weiguo also nodded. “Don’t feel burdened. It’s fine even if you stumble. I’ll give you a few more days.” Poison Blade smiled. “I think it’s not bad.” The person in charge of the east wall nodded and casually asked a few questions in Japanese. Poison Blade answered smoothly. He even learned how to scold people respectfully. The person in charge of the east wall was stunned. Old Wu said nervously, “What’s wrong? Is it not good?” The person in charge of the east wall shook his head and smiled bitterly. “Old Wu, this person’s learning ability is too strong. Did he really only study for a week? Why is he even more fluent than me after studying for two years?” Li Weiguo was also very shocked. The two of them stared suspiciously at Poison Blade. Could this guy be from High Heaven Plains? However, this thought was immediately dispelled by them. Impossible. It was absolutely impossible. It was impossible for High Heaven Plains to send such a powerful martial artist as a spy. The most important thing for spies was to maintain a low-profile. Moreover, even if Poison Blade was a spy from the High Heaven Plains, it was impossible for him to have made such a huge contribution in the city defense battle. A spy could not wait to see Little Spirit Mountain destroyed. Lin Xuan chuckled in his heart. He had not even used a week. In just four days, he had already mastered Japanese. On the fifth day, he could use all kinds of complicated honorifics fluently. This was reasonable… After all, six people were learning at the same time! “So, there’s no problem?” The two old men stared at the person in charge of the east wall. The man nodded. “No problem. He can definitely play his role well.” Li Weiguo took out the makeup set. “Sit down. I’ll help you put on makeup.” He picked up the cosmetics with his rough and wide fingers, looking somewhat comical like a cannon hitting a mosquito. However, Lin Xuan could not tell that he was unfamiliar with this at all. Instead, he was very familiar with it. Li Weiguo noticed Poison Blade’s expression and the corners of his mouth twitched. “I didn’t want to be so good at this either! Who asked me to inexplicably master this skill?” Old Wu was secretly happy. An hour later, Poison Blade’s face completely changed. At first glance, he looked a little handsome, but there was also a hint of greed and evilness. “It’s done!” “Your contact, Murata, has already sent a secret letter. They have prepared a ship for you. You need to escape from Little Spirit Mountain overnight and take that ship to High Heaven Plains.” “After you go to the High Heaven Plains, the other party might not let you directly enter Reed Country to train. Think of a way to get in.” “After sneaking in, use this method to find Chief Wan’s mechanical puppet. At that time, there will be further instructions.” Li Weiguo handed him a secret letter. Poison Blade opened it and saw the time and place written on it. “Understood.” Poison Blade nodded slightly. … Late at night. The moon was bright and the stars were few. Most of the martial artists in Colony Three were sleeping soundly, and only a few dozen people were patrolling the four walls. A capable figure walked in the shadows like a fish in the water. Recently, he could even jog past the patrol members without alerting them. “Visibility -100%. Too impressive.” Lin Xuan sighed. Poison Blade passed through the door of light of the mystic realm and ran in the vast wilderness under the moonlight. An hour later, Poison Blade turned around and arrived at an abandoned village. This place had been flattened by the demon beasts a hundred years ago and turned into ruins. Few people usually came. A few reckless demon beasts rushed up and were casually killed by Poison Blade. Then, he walked into a house. A moment later, an engine roared in the house. Boom! An off-road vehicle shattered the house and rushed out, instantly blending into the night. This off-road vehicle almost had no shell and was only made of steel. It was rough and dusty, but it had a different kind of wilderness beauty. This was the off-road vehicle Mu Qiang had hidden here long ago. Because the wilderness was vast, even Seventh Realm martial artists could not rely on their two legs to advance. Therefore, they had to use transportation. The most commonly used vehicle in the Construction Division was an off-road vehicle. The off-road vehicle modified by the experts of the Construction Division was even more popular. However, this kind of off-road vehicle was considered a controlled product in the Construction Division. Only members of the Construction Division could buy it. Moreover, even if they bought it, they had to record its use and itinerary. Of course, Mu Qiang could not directly buy an off-road vehicle. He had bought a large number of parts and used many discreet methods to bring the various parts here and had spent a lot of time assembling them. This guy was also a genius. He had actually taught himself how to process parts. If he got any better, a [Mechanical Processing] skill might even appear on his skill panel. He was only able to secretly build an off-road vehicle by relying on these methods. Of course, he had not actually done all this in secret. Although most of the methods were already very secretive, the members of the Construction Division still caught onto some clues and found this off-road vehicle. Moreover, through this off-road vehicle, they were able to discover Mu Qiang’s identity as a spy of the High Heaven Plains. “I have to leave the original Xia Country and pass through some of the Siberia region to reach the sea. The journey is going to be quite long.” Poison Blade looked at the location again and rushed over. At the same time. A majestic figure rode on the back of the white bear and headed south unhurriedly. Bears were not good at long-distance running, not to mention that this was a huge mutated polar bear. When the man and bear went south, they stopped constantly. They even killed demon beasts and roasted them for food. In addition, the Arctic Army base was indeed very far from the Construction Division. Therefore, he walked slowly. After walking for a long time, he finally arrived at the border of the original Xia Country. Gulp, gulp, gulp. Nelko finished a bottle of vodka and threw the bottle far away. Under the effect of the alcohol, his capillaries opened and dispersed the coldness on the surface of his body. The big bear under him roared in dissatisfaction. Nelko laughed loudly. “Sorry, I’m done.” “Let’s go quickly. When we reach the city of the Construction Division, we’ll buy a bar there.” Only then did Big Bear snort in satisfaction. At this moment, Nelko’s ears suddenly twitched, and his expression instantly turned solemn. “Someone’s here!” The big bear also became vigilant and observed nervously in all directions. “Over there, let’s go!” Nelko pointed in one direction. The big bear immediately stomped the ground and jumped six to seven meters, quickly approaching in the direction of the engine. “Is that a person?” Poison Blade on the off-road vehicle also sensed someone approaching. The dark gold grade [High-Level Perception] was not obtained for nothing. Through the rearview mirror, he could gradually see the other party’s face and the curiosity in his eyes. “A martial artist from the north… Could the other party be from the Arctic Army?” Poison Blade frowned slightly. Normally, he would not mind getting to know this person. However, he needed to keep a low profile and carry out the mission now. He could not cause unnecessary trouble. “Brother, I’m an Arctic Army martial artist. I’m heading to the Construction Division with the sole purpose of competing with Shield Ghost. What about you? Why are you wandering in the wilderness at night?” Behind him, the martial artist’s not-so-fluent Chinese sounded. Poison Blade was stunned and then did not know whether to laugh or cry. Damn, Shield Ghost’s reputation was already so great? It had actually spread to the Arctic Army! Poison Blade did not even turn around and stepped on the accelerator. This off-road vehicle was not very sturdy or stable. Its only advantage was its speed! After all, this was a car for escaping. When Mu Qiang assembled it himself, he had already considered the possibility of being chased by the Construction Division and had worked hard to increase its speed. Boom! The engine was like a dozen ferocious men roaring in unison. The distance between the SUV and Nelko instantly widened. Even if Nelko was a genius martial artist, he could not catch up to the speed of the off-road vehicle. That vehicle had four wheels and consumed oil. He only had two legs and consumed food. How could the two be the same? Nelko did not chase after him. He knew he could not catch up to the vehicle. The white bear under him was also panting. “What a fast car. It’s probably been modified.” “He’s driving away from the Construction Division to the northeast of Asia… He probably wants to head to the sea, right? Is that guy a traitor of the Construction Division?” Nelko frowned slightly and patted the white bear under him. “Let’s go. We have to quickly go to the Construction Division’s city and tell them this news.” The long night was filled with the sound of cars. After escaping from the young martial artist riding the bear, Poison Blade rushed towards the northeast. His speed increased crazily. In any case, this was the wilderness and he did not have to worry about hitting anything. In addition, Mu Qiang had long prepared enough gasoline and he did not have to worry about running out of gas. Poison Blade also brought food and fresh water. If he was hungry, he would eat. If he was thirsty, he would drink. If he was tired, he would sleep. With a person and a car, the vast wilderness inexplicably felt heroic and vast. However, the various dilapidated towns and village ruins he saw on the way always made Lin Xuan feel a little melancholic. In the past, he had almost always stayed in towns and gathering places. There were martial artists coming and going, and it was very lively. It did not seem to be much different from his previous life. However, since he was now alone, it was only at this moment that he felt the feeling of being homesick. However, Lin Xuan still had quite a lot of avatars. He still needed to take care of the other avatars and needed to multitask. As a result, he did not care too much about the situation on Poison Blade’s side. It turned out that Poison Blade also did not encounter anything special. At most, he would only encounter some small problems. For example, he encountered the pursuit of hundreds of Seventh Realm wild wolves and a small avalanche. He stepped on the accelerator. As long as he maintained a large enough distance from these things with his speed, it was not a problem. Six days later, Poison Blade arrived at the beach. Due to geographical reasons and the weather, this place was covered in thick snow. The temperature had always been below zero. However, Poison Blade did not feel anything. Every time he leveled up, his physical fitness would increase greatly. A Seventh Realm martial artist’s resistance to high and low temperatures had already far surpassed ordinary people. He could barely feel the cold even when the temperature was below -10°C. Poison Blade looked towards the sea and indeed saw a speedboat in the distance. There seemed to be no one in the speedboat. However, when the engine of Poison Blade’s off-road vehicle sounded, a sleeping man crawled out of the speedboat. “Finally,” the man muttered and stretched like a cat. A few minutes later, Poison Blade parked the off-road vehicle in an abandoned house nearby. Then, he jumped out of the car and ran to the speedboat. He chuckled and said, “Mr. Murata, we finally meet.” Murata said unhappily, “You were a few hours late.” Poison Blade smiled apologetically and said, “I encountered a small problem on the way.” “What small problem?” “Um, just a siege of hundreds of wild wolves and a small avalanche.” Murata: “…It’s really a miracle that you were still able to come here alive.” “But… when did your Japanese become so good?” he said in surprise. Poison Blade patted his chest. “Since I’m going to live in the High Heaven Plains for a long time, I naturally needed to master Japanese. This is the result of my studies during this period.” Murata nodded in satisfaction. “Get on the ship. We’ll go to the peninsula to replenish our fuel before returning to the organization.” Poison Blade nodded and stepped onto the ship. Poison Blade rubbed his hands and asked shamelessly, “Mr. Murata, I’ve provided so much information for the High Heaven Plains. You won’t treat me badly, right?” Murata said impatiently, “You’ve been saying this since you started working for the High Heaven Plains. I can’t believe you’re still repeating yourself at this moment, when you’re already on the boat and about to head to High Heaven Plains…” “The organization is about to bring you to the mainland, and you’re still not satisfied?” Poison Blade scratched his head. “I was just worried.” Murata frowned and said, “We can talk about your worries when we reach High Heaven Plains.” Poison Blade chuckled and did not say anything else. Lin Xuan deliberately let his avatar say these words to emphasize Mu Qiang’s shrewd and greedy personality. Because of this, Murata felt impatient. This was also his normal reaction to Mu Qiang. In this way, he had passed the first test. Most of the subsequent journeys were spent at sea. The two of them first went to the peninsula to replenish their fuel and changed to a larger ship. This ship was filled with martial artists from the High Heaven Plains. Their levels ranged from First Realm to Sixth Realm. They were all martial artists who were training in the mystic realm of the peninsula. In their eyes, a Seventh Realm martial artist like Murata was clearly a big shot. All of them came up to curry favor. The captain arranged the most luxurious cabin for Murata and even sent two female martial artists to serve him. As for Poison Blade… Although he was also a Seventh Realm martial artist, no one cared about him. Many High Heaven Plains martial artists even revealed a hint of smugness in their eyes when they looked at him. It was as if they were looking at a dog. Lin Xuan chuckled in his heart. That’s right. Those who betrayed their country and sold information were no different from dogs. Be it in the Construction Division or the High Heaven Plains, they were all dogs. Poison Blade did not take the initiative to provoke anyone, and no High Heaven Plains martial artist was stupid enough to provoke a Seventh Realm martial artist like him. In a few days, they arrived at High Heaven Plains. Speaking of which, it was strange that they were not attacked by the sea demon beasts on the way. The demon beasts in the sea were much stronger than the demon beasts on land. The deep sea was a good home for incomparably huge demon beasts. In his previous life, the largest creature in the sea was the blue whale. It could reach 33 meters in length and 180 tons in weight. However, now, the largest creature in the ocean might not be the blue whale anymore. Moreover, its size and weight definitely far exceeded the two numbers above. However, the area where such large demon beasts lived was in the deep sea. They would not be active in the shallow sea near the continental shelf. Poison Blade followed Murata down the ship and stepped onto the shore, stepping onto the land of Kosaka City. At the same time, he saw a prosperous scene. The situation in the High Heaven Plains was very different from the Construction Division. The High Heaven Plains was located on an island. The land area was relatively small, so it was not like the Construction Division. There was a large dangerous wilderness between cities. If one went out before reaching the Sixth Realm, they would be courting death. Almost all the wildernesses in the High Heaven Plains had been cleared by powerful martial artists, so there was no danger. In addition, they had discovered many mystic realms 50 years ago that were especially suitable for crops to grow and livestock to reproduce. The food production soared. As a result, a baby boom had appeared in the High Heaven Plains in recent years, and the population growth rate was ranked first among the various large organizations. The second was India. As the population increased, the number of experts and geniuses also increased. The two brothers, Blood Asura and Hungry Asura, were born in this baby boom. “We’ve already brought your daughter to Kosaka City in advance.” Murata handed over a set of keys and a note. “The address is written on the note. I’ve also given you the key.” “Report to the Secret Service Division in Kosaka City at 8 AM tomorrow.” With that said, Murata turned around and left. The Secret Service Division was the basic department of the High Heaven Plains that controlled every city. Poison Blade held the note and key and quickly found the apartment and went to the third floor. “The living arrangements are quite good.” Poison Blade pushed the key into the lock, turned it gently, and pushed open the door. The furniture in the house was neat, and the floor was neat without any dirt or dust. In particular, the table was so bright that one could see their reflection from it. The third floor had a total of two rooms and a living room. The second bedroom should be the room of Mu Qiang’s daughter, Mu Xiaoling. However, the door to the second bedroom was open and there was no one inside. Poison Blade swept his gaze over and did not find anything special in the room. Then, he went to the master bedroom, which was also his room. As soon as he opened the door, dust surged. Suitcases, clothes, furniture, snot-stained tissues, and blood-stained pink underwear were everywhere. “No… Is this the storeroom?” Poison Blade waved his hand and hurriedly opened the window to ventilate. “The information given to me by the Construction Division has very little to do with Mu Xiaoling. It only mentioned that this daughter’s relationship with her father is not good, and she did not come to the High Heaven Plains willingly.” At this moment, the door opened. A big loli in black walked into the house with a cold expression. She had long black hair underneath the black beret that she wore. She was also wearing a black sailor suit with white lace, black knee-length stockings, as well as small black leather shoes. Then, she saw a familiar man that felt very unfamiliar standing in front of her. “Little Ling,” Poison Blade whispered. Mu Xiaoling was first stunned before frowning. “Scum, why aren’t you dead?” Then, he immediately said, “I’ve been living quite well here on my own. This house is mine. Please leave.” Lin Xuan was amused. This was more than just a daughter being at odds with her father. It was as if she could not wait for her father to die. Could this little girl be the reincarnation of Lu Bu? “You can live here because of me. Otherwise, do you think you get to live here for free?” he said indifferently. Mu Xiaoling stopped talking and walked straight into her room, closing the door heavily. “Is this little girl in her rebellious stage? She’s quite interesting.” Poison Blade smiled and rolled up his sleeves to tidy up his room. A Seventh Realm martial artist’s Constitution was very powerful. To him, moving those heavy items was nothing. In a short period of time, the master bedroom was brand new. After doing this, Poison Blade simply made a few more dishes. Braised pork, stir-fried white pork, and stir-fried vegetables. A fragrance spread! If this was usual, it would be a home-cooked meal. However, this avatar had been floating in the wilderness and the sea for nearly two weeks. It ate compressed biscuits and canned meat. At this moment, he felt as if he had been through a long drought. This feeling was also similar to the feeling of meeting one’s friend after a long time, or even the feeling of discovering one’s wife was a man on the wedding night! Finally, he took another beer from the fridge. Then, he took out a bowl of fragrant rice to go along with the rice. He directly started eating! Halfway through, the door opened with a click. Mu Xiaoling stared at Poison Blade, who was eating happily. “You didn’t cook for me?” Poison Blade laughed. “Why should I cook for you?” Bang! The door closed again. This time, it was even more furious. After eating, Poison Blade washed the dishes and walked out. He wanted to familiarize himself with this city first. Not long after Poison Blade left, the door to the second bedroom quietly opened. Mu Xiaoling walked out, her stomach rumbling from hunger. She immediately prepared to walk to the fridge to get some instant noodles. However, she saw that there were still hot dishes on the table and the rice in the rice cooker was still warm. Mu Xiaoling’s movements froze for a moment as she muttered, “This scum… still knows how to leave some food for me.” She hurriedly sat down, picked up her bowl, and ate her food. At the same time. Poison Blade walked out of the apartment and wandered the street. His fluent Japanese made everyone think that he was a native of High Heaven Plains. The street vendor was extremely enthusiastic to him and even gave him some snacks. After shopping for a while, many snacks appeared in his mouth and hands. Soon, Poison Blade arrived at the Secret Service Division in Kosaka City. There were very few ordinary people passing by here. They were all martial artists above the Third Realm. “Since I’m already here, I might as well go in and take a look.” He stuffed the last octopus into his mouth and strode in. The Secret Service Division of Kosaka City did not occupy a large area. From the outside, it looked no different from an ordinary apartment. If not for the address Murata had given him, Poison Blade would not have been able to find this place. When he arrived, there were two guards at the door. They were both Third Realm martial artists. Due to his [High-Level Perception], he could hear their conversation from afar. “What’s going on in the Sixth Realm mystic realm, Hungry Ghost Village? I heard that the hungry ghosts have been rioting without stopping.” “I’m not sure. Recently, there have been riots in many mystic realms. Didn’t the burning earth demons appear in the Third Realm mystic realm, the Hirano Plains? They even deliberately burned the crops! The food production this year will probably decrease greatly.” “By the way, I heard that Lord Tianyu’s daughter is missing? I haven’t been able to find her for a few days.” “Shh, let’s not talk nonsense about important people. If others hear us, our career will be over!” Poison Blade was amused. They were just two guards. What kind of career did they want? Those who had a real career path were already secretaries of Eighth Realm martial artists when they first joined the High Heaven Plains. After one or two years, they would be able to leave the city and become the deputy section chief of a certain city’s Secret Service Division. After another year or two, they would directly be promoted to a section chief. This was what it meant to have a future. However, could the Lord Tianyu they were talking about be one of the deputy leaders of the High Heaven Plains, Forger Tianyu? The disappearance of the deputy leader’s daughter was not a small matter. The two guards noticed Poison Blade’s approach and immediately stopped talking. They were solemn and serious. “Stop, token.” The martial artist on the left stopped him. Poison Blade explained his identity. The martial artist on the right sized him up suspiciously. “Wait, I’ll ask Lord Murata.” Four minutes later, the martial artist returned and nodded slightly. “Lord Murata wants you to enter.” Poison Blade nodded and strode into the Secret Service Division of Kosaka City. He walked upstairs and quickly found Murata. At this moment, Murata was handling official business. When he saw who it was, he was very puzzled. “Didn’t I ask you to come tomorrow morning? Why are you here now?” Poison Blade chuckled and said, “Since I’ve already joined the High Heaven Plains, I naturally have to contribute to the organization. Since I have nothing to do, I might as well come early.” When Murata heard this, he nodded in satisfaction. Although Mu Qiang was greedy, his loyalty was still commendable. As soon as he arrived in Kosaka City, he did not interact much with his daughter and immediately came to the Secret Service Division. Poison Blade smiled and said, “What mission do you have for me now? Although I’m not powerful, I’m still a Seventh Realm martial artist.” As a traitor of the Construction Division, it was naturally impossible for him to casually enter Reed Country. Moreover, ever since the news of India invading Little Spirit Mountain through the Sun Key spread, the various large organizations had increased the scrutiny of their large mystic realms. Everyone had to register their basic information. Every few days, Eighth Realm martial artists would patrol everywhere. Under such circumstances, even if he used the Sun Key to open the door of light and sneak into Reed Country, he would be discovered in a few days. Unless he immediately hid in a very hidden place and did not interact with anyone. However, in that case, how could he find the place where Xiang Qiankan was imprisoned? The higher-ups of the Construction Division thought about it and realized that the only way was to give them fake identities. What Poison Blade needed to do now was to increase his favorability. It was best if he could immediately increase his favorability, battle merits, and even obtain the favorability of a Ninth Realm martial artist in the High Heaven Plains. In this way, he could naturally enter the mystic realm of Reed Country to train. “Mission… Recently, there have been many riots in the mystic realms, but those mystic realms are all at the Fourth Realm and Fifth Realm. Isn’t it a little wasteful for a Seventh Realm expert like you to go?” Poison Blade smiled. “It’s fine, it’s fine. I don’t care.” Murata pondered for a moment. “By the way, something happened in the Sixth Realm mystic realm, Hungry Ghost Village. The hungry ghosts rioted at night. At least ten Sixth Realm martial artists were trapped in various parts of the Hungry Ghost Village. However, many Seventh Realm martial artists are busy dealing with the demon beast riot in Reed Country. The remaining portion of martial artists are also dealing with the other Sixth Realm mystic realms. They are unable to free up their hands for the time being.” “Can you go to the Hungry Ghost Village to save those Sixth Realm martial artists?” Murata raised his head. “Rescuing a Sixth Realm martial artist will reward you with 50 battle merits. If you find out the reason for the Hungry Ghost Village’s riot, I will request the section chief to reward you with more battle merits.” Lin Xuan cursed in his heart. How freaking stingy. Saving a Sixth Realm martial artist only earned him 50 battle merits. However, he naturally did not show any displeasure on his face. Instead, he immediately nodded. “I’ll go now!” Murata nodded in satisfaction. “The mystic realm door of light in our city is in the center of the city. You will naturally see it if you walk over there.” “By the way, this is your identity token. In the future, just come in and show your token. The guards won’t make things difficult for you.” Poison Blade took the token and put it away before turning to leave. Murata looked at his back and was increasingly satisfied. “The Section Chief gave me the thankless task of saving people. I was just worried that no one would do this difficult job when this Mu Qiang came. Not bad, not bad. I can nurture him as a trusted subordinate in the future.” Soon, Poison Blade arrived at the center of the city and entered the Sixth Realm mystic realm, Hungry Ghost Village. As soon as he arrived at the Hungry Ghost Village, he felt a terrifying and miserable atmosphere. The black clouds pressed down, and the air was cold. There seemed to be all kinds of undisguised malice everywhere. However, when he looked over, he saw nothing. The place where he stood was a rural dirt road, and behind him was a dense fog. This was the edge of the mystic realm. He could not go any further. This fog was equivalent to an air wall. The country road extended forward into the misty mountain village. A low wooden house was hidden in the fog like a silent ghost, waiting for the ignorant travelers to approach. Poison Blade had only taken a few steps when he saw a corpse lying on the ground. The corpse was lying face down with three huge and deep wounds on its back. He turned the corpse over and saw that these three wounds had directly pierced through the front of the chest from the back. His heart, lungs, and trachea had been torn apart the moment he was attacked. This person was deader than dead. Based on the direction his head was facing, this martial artist had probably been attacked from behind when he was running towards the mystic realm’s door of light and had instantly died. “This Hungry Ghost Village is quite interesting.” Poison Blade continued forward. This place was terrifying and very terrifying for a Sixth Realm martial artist. However, to him, it was no different from child’s play. He could even instantly kill a Seventh Realm ghost. Moreover, the other party was only a Sixth Realm hungry ghost. The hungry ghosts here were different from ghosts. Ghosts did not have corpses and had extremely high physical resistance. However, hungry ghosts had physical bodies. They would crazily search for all living things in their sight and devour their prey alive. Therefore, they were called “hungry ghosts”. Poison Blade followed the dirt road and arrived at the village entrance. As expected, he saw many figures wandering aimlessly in the fog. Poison Blade could not be bothered to waste time and did not want to consume the durability of his equipment. He directly put on the Shadow Cloak and sneaked along. The night and the fog itself made his presence much weaker. Coupled with the Shadow Cloak, it was as if he was a drop of water that had instantly fused with the sea after entering it. These wandering hungry ghosts did not realize that a living person had slipped past within a three-meter radius. As Poison Blade advanced, he activated his high-level perception to the maximum. However, to his surprise, there were no living beings here.  Lin Xuan could not help but curse, “Murata didn’t trick me, did he? Are there really survivors here?” He continued for a while. The dirt road continued to extend until he reached the village ahead. The houses here gradually became larger. Clearly, the villagers living here were also richer. At this moment, he suddenly heard a voice in the wind ahead through his high-level perception. “Eh?” Poison Blade increased his speed and quickly advanced. Soon, he saw a scene that surprised him. “Please come out. My hungry ghost will find you soon anyway.” “What’s the point of hiding? Why don’t you just give up your life? You’re the only one left. As long as I kill you, no one will know my secret.” “Come out quickly. Please don’t cause me any more trouble.” A slender figure stood on the roof. His face was filled with abnormal fanaticism and incomparable confidence. At his feet were three hungry ghosts. They seemed to be following orders and searching for living people. “This guy can command hungry ghosts? What’s his background?” Poison Blade used a High-Level Observer skill. His avatar had inherited all the skills other than the [High-Level Avatar Technique], so Poison Blade could also observe other people’s information. “Yamamoto, level five Seventh Realm. His profession is Corpse Tamer. This profession is interesting. Although it’s only a blue profession, it allows him to control corpses.” “Yes, but he can only use 20% of the ghost’s strength before it dies. Moreover, he can only control three Seventh Realm ghosts at most.” After Lin Xuan finished reading, he was deep in thought. Why would a Seventh Realm martial artist run into the Sixth Realm Hungry Ghost Village? The other party was clearly not here to save people like him, but to kill. Could it be that the riot of the hungry ghosts in the Hungry Ghost Village’s was related to this person? Poison Blade used the night and the fog to quickly circle around. Soon, he felt extremely faint breathing in the basement of a house. The other party had already hidden very well, but Poison Blade still heard his breathing. The three hungry ghosts were already approaching. Hungry ghosts were even more sensitive to living creatures. After all, they had been born to devour living creatures. If nothing unexpected happened, something would soon happen to the person in the basement. “Saving a person gives 50 battle merits. Now… it seems that there’s only one person left.” Lin Xuan was very helpless. He originally wanted to hurry over and save more people. In this way, he could obtain more battle merits and be one step closer to entering Reed Country. In the end, he was faced with this. Just what the hell was this? The three hungry ghosts’ noses twitched crazily as they approached the house. Bang! The basement door was shattered by a slap. The scream of a young girl could be heard. Yamamoto laughed. “I found you!” Poison Blade quickly shuttled through the night and appeared ten meters behind Yamamoto in almost a few seconds. However, even after appearing at this distance, Yamamoto did not notice him at all. “I found you too.” Yamamoto was laughing wildly when he suddenly heard a faint voice from behind. The next moment, a short sword was placed on his neck. Yamamoto was shocked! Yamamoto was a very cautious person. In order to increase the effect of the [Wight Magic Pearl], he had already killed 25 Sixth Realm martial artists. Previously, he had killed them very secretly and only killed one at a time. Moreover, he had never killed the martial artists of the Secret Service Division. Therefore, he never alarmed the Secret Service Division in Kosaka City. He was only five people away from the target of 30 Sixth Realm martial artists. Therefore, this time, he planned to take advantage of the Hungry Ghost Village’s riot to kill the remaining 5 Sixth Realm martial artists at once and completely strengthen the [Wight Magic Pearl]. He was a Seventh Realm martial artist and could tame hungry ghosts to help him fight. It was only a matter of time before he killed all the Sixth Realm martial artists here. In any case, he could blame everything on the hungry ghosts in the end. After killing these Sixth Realm martial artists and destroying their corpses, the Secret Service Division would not be able to find anything. The female martial artist hiding in the basement was the last person. Since that person had seen everything, it was naturally impossible for Yamamoto to leave her alive. However, where did this person who suddenly appeared come from?! Yamamoto’s head was buzzing. His mind was filled with disbelief. “Don’t kill me. I can give you anything you want. I just want you to spare my life.” Yamamoto took a deep breath and said in a deep voice. Poison Blade chuckled. “What can you give me?” Yamamoto Tsubasa gritted his teeth. “2 million essence, 1 golden equipment, and 80 Mystic Realm Pearls.” Lin Xuan curled his lips. This guy was so poor. “Take them all out,” he said indifferently. Yamaguchi said in a low voice, “But what if you still want to kill me?” Poison Blade gave a faint smile. “Your life is in my hands. I’m the one who makes the choice, not you.” Yamamoto fell silent and slowly reached for the storage compartment. Poison Blade’s eyes were also fixed on his hand. The next moment, a smoke bomb suddenly exploded. Poison Blade suddenly felt the person he was holding become slippery. The next moment, Yamamoto actually directly escaped from him and quickly ran more than ten meters. At the same time, he immediately ordered the three hungry ghosts to pounce over and stop Poison Blade. “You want to kill me? Only in your next life!” Yamamoto sneered and fled without looking back. Bang! The next moment, he collided with a solid chest. “You have a lot of life-saving methods,” Poison Blade said with a grin. His hand rose and his sword fell! Blood splattered! Poison triggered, bleeding triggered, critical hit triggered! Yamamoto’s eyes widened in anger as he clutched his neck and fell to the ground. Before he died, he still could not understand. In order to save his life, he had specially obtained a set of equipment that increased his health points. His health points were already one-third higher than ordinary mages. Even so, he was actually instantly killed by this person in front of him! What kind of monster was this guy… However, just as this thought rose, darkness had already completely enveloped him. Three items fell from his body. 300,000 essence, 20 Mystic Realm Pearls, and a magic pearl that emitted a foul smell. “This is the Zombie Magic Pearl? After killing 20 Sixth Realm martial artists, the fourth effect will be unlocked. No wonder this guy is so determined to kill.” Poison Blade shook his head and put these things into his bag. Although it wasn’t much, it was still loot. He was not picky. “Come out. You’re already safe.” Poison Blade shouted. Only then did the girl crawl out of the basement trembling. Her face was pale, and her lips were pale. There were also wounds on his arms and legs, seemingly caused by hungry ghosts. The flesh near the wounds had already rotted, emitting a faint stench. “Thank… thank you!” The girl sobbed softly. Poison Blade sized her up and discovered that this girl was actually a little good-looking. If not for her messy appearance and the wounds on her body, she would have been even prettier. She did not give Lin Xuan the feeling that she was a heavenly fairy. Her facial features could only be considered exquisite, but for some reason, she looked very comfortable and gave off the feeling of a little sister next door. Poison Blade also used an Observer skill. Tianyu Lan was a level one Sixth Realm martial artist. “Tianyu? Could she be the missing daughter of Forger Tianyu?” Lin Xuan’s heart stirred. No way, no way. His avatar had just arrived in the High Heaven Plains and was about to earn battle merits when he actually saved the daughter of the deputy leader of the High Heaven Plains. Would he be able to immediately gain the favor of the deputy leader? “What’s your name? Let me send you away from here,” Poison Blade asked. The girl whispered, “My name is… Lan, just take me out.” Lin Xuan frowned slightly. This person did not want to expose her surname? How could that be! He wanted to bring her back to claim credit. If the other party was unwilling to expose her name, how was he supposed to receive the credit?! Thinking of this, he controlled Poison Blade and deliberately exclaimed, “Why do you look a little familiar? I remember now. You’re…” The girl smiled bitterly and said, “The eldest daughter of the Tianyu family is called Tianyu Cai. My name is Tianyu Lan. I’ve served the Tianyu family for generations. Because I made a contribution, I was given the surname Tianyu.” Lin Xuan: “???” The girl had a miserable expression. “Miss has always had a bad relationship with Lord Tianyu. She found an opportunity to escape and got us servants to pretend to be her to enter the various mystic realms to distract people. I’m one of them.” With that said, Tianyu Lan smiled miserably. “I really don’t understand why the pampered eldest daughter of the Tianyu family wants to run out every day. If I were her, I would want to stay in the Tianyu family forever.” Poison Blade sighed. Indeed. Some were born in Rome, and some were born to be powerful. This Tianyu Lan was usually ordered around by the eldest daughter as a servant. When the eldest daughter secretly ran out, she wanted these servants to pretend to be her and enter the dangerous mystic realm to divert the attention of the Tianyu family. “Let’s go. I’ll send you out of here.” Poison Blade handed over a bottle of Life Potion and gestured for her to follow. Tianyu Lan nodded. However, they had only taken a few steps when Poison Blade heard the sound of fighting in front of him. The hungry ghosts seemed to have been quickly killed by powerful martial artists and did not even have the ability to counterattack. Through [High-Level Perception], he saw three martial artists in black. He pondered slightly and his heart stirred. When Murata gave him the mission, he even specifically said that Seventh Realm martial artists were very busy and did not have the time to come to the Hungry Ghost Village to save people. However, the people in front could instantly kill the hungry ghosts. They were definitely at the Seventh Realm. Poison Blade turned around and whispered, “What do the martial artists of the Tianyu family usually wear?” Tianyu Lan was stunned. “White clothes, bird patterns.” Poison Blade’s eyes suddenly turned sharp. “Go to the basement and hide first. The one killing the hungry ghost in front is very likely not a martial artist from the Tianyu family.” Tianyu Lan nodded and hurriedly hid. Poison Blade quickly dealt with Yamamoto’s corpse and immediately relied on the Shadow Cloak to hide in the shadows. Soon, the three men in black killed all the hungry ghosts and strode towards the center of the village. “Strange, where’s Yamamoto?” “We specially led him into this mystic realm to kill anyone who might be Tianyu Cai. Could it be that he already left?” “Impossible. The signal I left on him shows that he’s still in this mystic realm, but I can’t find his exact location.” “Let’s search first. I have to silence Yamamoto and find that person from the Tianyu family.” The three men in black immediately scattered and looked around. Hearing all the conversation, Lin Xuan was shocked again. Tianyu Cai was the eldest daughter of the Tianyu family who had escaped. These three men in black actually wanted to kill everyone who was suspected to be Tianyu Cai. Lin Xuan was very shocked. Someone actually dared to touch the daughter of the deputy leader of High Heaven Plains! “Even though I just arrived, I seem to have already gotten myself involved in a conspiracy.” After a short moment of surprise, Lin Xuan was a little excited. In any case, this was High Heaven Plains. No matter how these people schemed and killed, it did not matter. He could do whatever he wanted. What Lin Xuan was happy about was that he seemed to be able to muddy this mess even more! “The three Seventh Realm martial artists have a cultivation of level six Seventh Realm, level five Seventh Realm, and level four Seventh Realm, respectively.” “A level six Seventh Realm assassin.” “The person at level five Seventh Realm is a mage.” “The level four Seventh Realm is a warrior.” Lin Xuan estimated and began to approach the mage. A fragile mage with high attack and low health was the easiest to deal with. These three men in black were all quite high-level. If he faced the three of them at the same time, the danger factor would be a little high. Naturally, he had to kill at least one of them immediately. After Lin Xuan made the plan, Poison Blade quickly carried it out. “Strange… Many hungry ghosts here have died. Where is Yamamoto?” The mage leaned down to investigate, unaware that a huge danger had descended behind him. The next moment, a hand suddenly covered his mouth and nose. The sharp poisoned dagger stabbed fiercely into his heart! Critical Hit! Bleeding! Poisoned! Critical Hit! This mage only had time to open his eyes wide and did not even have the chance to make a sound before he was instantly killed by Poison Blade! After killing this person, Poison Blade quickly fused into the darkness and approached the warrior. He did the same thing and also triggered critical hits to instantly kill the other party. After killing two people in a row, Poison Blade was very satisfied and approached the last person, the assassin. However, things did not go as smoothly this time. The other party actually also had a skill like [Perception]. When Poison Blade was about five meters away from his back, this assassin actually relied on his muscle memory to instinctively attack from behind! Poison Blade quickly raised his short sword to block. Clang! The sound of metal colliding suddenly sounded in this gloomy and dead Hungry Ghost Village. However, it was this assassin who retreated seven to eight steps. His eyes widened in shock. This person also looked like an assassin. However, why was this person so powerful?! “Eh, your perception is not bad. You actually discovered that I was approaching from behind.” Poison Blade chuckled. The assassin took a deep breath. In a short period of time, he had already sensed the difference in strength between the other party and him. Therefore, he decided to… shout for help! “Come over quickly! Someone attacked me here!” However, after he shouted, the two companions actually did not react. The assassin was first stunned before breaking out in cold sweat. Poison Blade smiled and said, “Go ahead and shout. You won’t be saved even if you shout your throat out.” The assassin gritted his teeth. Even if he was a fool, he would still be able to understand the outcome of his two companions! “I’ll kill you!” The assassin took out a blood-colored pill from the storage compartment and placed it in his mouth. In an instant, his aura soared like a ferocious demon! Poison Blade looked at this person’s information again and shockingly discovered a line of words. “Consumed the Hungry Ghost Blood Pill. All attributes+8%, attack speed+20%. Duration: 10 minutes.” “Hungry Ghost Blood Pill, what’s that?” Seeing this, Lin Xuan was puzzled. However, his movements did not slow down at all. He immediately controlled Poison Blade to activate Lightning Wind, and his speed increased explosively. He instantly dodged the short knife that the assassin was stabbing at his face. “Kill, kill, kill!” The assassin turned his body and stabbed again. His attack speed became faster and faster, even leaving afterimages. The air was filled with the sound of air being cut as he quickly waved his short knife. However, Poison Blade was experienced and skilled. Every time, he could accurately dodge the short blade. Not far away, Tianyu Lan stuck her head out of the basement and was shocked to see this scene. This martial artist seemed to be even more powerful than the Seventh Realm martial artists shehad seen in the Tianyu Family. However, who was the man in black that was attacking crazily? “How did you get the Hungry Ghost Blood Pill?” Poison Blade asked casually as he dodged the attack. The assassin’s eyes were red as he shouted angrily, “It has nothing to do with you! You’re already a dead man!” “Who sent you to hunt down everyone suspected to be Tianyu Cai?” “Like I said, you’re a dead man! There’s no need for you to know!” Poison Blade had a helpless expression. How troublesome. Pfft! The attack speed of the assassin became faster and faster. In the next moment, he suddenly stabbed the figure in front of him. A smile appeared on his face and he was about to stab again. However, he discovered that the figure in front of him had suddenly disappeared! “Why did it disappear?!” His heart skipped a beat as he realized that he had actually stabbed an afterimage. Pfft! Then, a short sword pierced through the assassin’s heart. This person’s level was higher than the other two. It was a little troublesome for Poison Blade to kill him, but he still killed him in the end. Even if he had taken a pill, he could still be easily killed as long as Poison Blade grasped the flaws. Just now, Poison Blade had used Lightning Wind and Flash at the same time. While pretending to have revealed a flaw, he directly flashed behind this person and easily captured him. “Come out. There’s no more danger.” Poison Blade squatted down and searched for something on this person’s body as he casually said. Only then did Tianyu Lan quietly crawl out of the basement. “Did your Miss Tianyu Cai provoke some enemy? Why does someone want to kill her?” Poison Blade asked without looking up as he searched the corpse. Tianyu Lan shook her head. “I’m just a servant. How would I know what’s going on with Eldest Miss?” Poison Blade nodded. “That’s true.” He searched for a while more and finally chose to give up. Other than the few items that were randomly dropped after they were killed, these three black-clothed people actually did not have any symbols on them. It seemed that they had long been prepared. Even if they were caught, the enemy would not be able to find the mastermind through them. The only thing Poison Blade obtained was a small bottle of Hungry Ghost Blood Pill. After opening the bottle stopper, a bloody stench assaulted his nose like a rotting corpse. It was unknown how this person endured the disgust and ate it. “Perhaps I can find some clues based on this thing.” Lin Xuan was deep in thought. “Let’s go. I’ll send you off.” Poison Blade waved his hand. Tianyu Lan walked over and could not help but say, “I still don’t know your name…” Poison Blade smiled. “Mu Qiang.” Tianyu Lan was stunned. “You’re from Xia Country? You’re not Japanese?” Poison Blade nodded. Tianyu Lan seemed to have guessed that he had something to hide, so she did not ask further and directly followed. The two of them quickly left the Hungry Ghost Village. Then, they went straight to the Secret Service Division in Kosaka City and told Murata everything. However, in order to not appear too powerful, he said that the enemy only sent one black-clothed person to chase after her. Moreover, he also intentionally lowered the other party’s level to level four Seventh Realm. Tianyu Lan hid in the basement the entire time in fear. She had the strength of a Sixth Realm expert, but her personality was weak. She did not know how many people were chasing after her, so Poison Blade could naturally say whatever he wanted to. Murata was shocked when he heard this. He originally thought that this was just an ordinary hungry ghost riot. He did not expect it to be related to such a conspiracy. The black-clothed people and Yamamoto were all pawns. There was an even stronger mastermind behind them. “By the way, this is something I seized from them. After eating it, it can temporarily increase one’s attributes and attack speed. Mr. Murata, perhaps you can find some clues from this.” Poison Blade took out a Hungry Ghost Blood Pill and handed it over. Murata received it solemnly and wrapped it in a red cloth. “You did very well! I’ll report this matter to my superior as soon as possible and let him inform Lord Tianyu!” Murata nodded repeatedly, his eyes even more satisfied with Poison Blade. With that said, he turned to Tianyu Lan. “Are you coming with me to return to the Tianyu family or are you going to stay here?” Tianyu Lan pursed her lips. “I… I’m also worried about Miss’s safety. I think I’ll stay in Kosaka City. If there’s any news of Miss, I also want to find out and go rescue her immediately.” Lin Xuan chuckled in his heart. He did not believe her at all. The other party was probably worried that she would be punished when she returned to the Tianyu family. “Mu Qiang, you did well this time. Although you only saved one person, you gathered a lot of clues for us. I’ll request for the section chief to reward you. Don’t worry.” Murata stood up and patted Poison Blade’s shoulder. Poison Blade also smiled and nodded. “This is all thanks to Mr. Murata’s good leadership. I think Mr. Murata still has to take the lion’s share of the battle merits.” Murata laughed loudly. The more he looked at him, the more satisfied he was. Mu Qiang was not bad at all. He was powerful, loyal, and spoke flattering words. The only pity was that he was from the Xia Country. Even if he defected to High Heaven Plains, he would still only be treated as a second-class citizen. “Mr. Murata, if there’s a suitable mission for me, remember to tell me. I’ll be at your beck and call.” Poison Blade smiled. Murata nodded in satisfaction. “Don’t worry, you’ll be the first one I look for!” Tianyu Lan looked at Poison Blade’s back. She kept feeling that this man was very similar to her. He was forced to please his superior. Like him, she was also forced to please the eldest daughter and follow her orders to enter the Hungry Ghost Village. Poison Blade turned around and strode out of the Secret Service Division. Tianyu Lan gritted her teeth and followed. “Why are you following me?” Lin Xuan was very puzzled. Tianyu Lan said, “You’re very powerful.” “Mr. Murata’s level is higher than mine. It’s safer for you to stay in the Secret Service Division.” Tianyu Lan shook her head. “You’re stronger than that person.” Poison Blade smiled faintly. This Tianyu Lan had a weak personality, but she was very good at judging people. “Alright, follow me. You and my daughter might be able to get along very well.” Poison Blade waved his hand. Tianyu Lan was surprised. “You actually have a daughter?” “Why? Did you think I was very young? I’m already 39 years old.” Mu Qiang was 39 years old this year. Otherwise, he would not have a 14-year-old daughter. In the apartment. Poison Blade opened the door and saw that the door to the second bedroom was closed. He knocked on the door. “Little Ling, I brought an older sister back. She might be staying here temporarily. Get to know her.” Squeak. The door opened and a big head popped out. Tianyu Lan hurriedly bowed slightly. “Hello, I’m really disturbing you. My name is Tianyu Lan. I have to stay here temporarily for the next few days.” However, Mu Xiaoling suddenly pounced out. Her two big eyes were sparkling, and she looked completely different from when she was facing her father, Mu Qiang. “Sister, you’re so beautiful. Come, let’s go in and talk. Don’t talk to that scum.” With that said, Mu Xiaoling pulled Tianyu Lan into the room and closed the door with a bang. Tianyu Lan: “Ah?” Poison Blade did not know whether to laugh or cry. “This is the first time they’re meeting each other. But she didn’t seem unfamiliar with her at all and directly pulled her into the bedroom. Could it be that this little girl likes women?” Poison Blade did not continue thinking. He took some ingredients and began to cook. He made food for three people. Just as he was about to knock on the door to ask them to come out and eat, Tianyu Lan rushed out of the room with a flushed face. “Mr. Mu Qiang, your daughter, your daughter…” She stammered and could not even finish her sentence. “What’s wrong?” Tianyu Lan said excitedly, “She actually showed me… that kind of thing!” Poison Blade was dumbfounded. His curiosity was piqued. Why was she blushing like this? He wanted to take a look as well. A moment later, he was speechless as he held the book. The content was just about two beautiful men being intimate. “That’s it? I thought it was something else.” Poison Blade shook his head and threw the book back under Mu Xiaoling’s gritted teeth. Tianyu Lan’s face was flushed. “But this is too strange…” Mu Xiaoling muttered softly and tried to continue, “Sister Xiaolan, it’s really good. Let’s go in and keep reading.” “Read it later tonight. Finish eating first. If you don’t eat, I’ll eat it all.” Poison Blade pulled the door open. Mu Xiaoling: “…Alright.” The three of them finally had a normal meal. However, Tianyu Lan was still a little absent-minded. From time to time, she would blush. In the next few days, Tianyu Blue Sky had been instilled with knowledge relating to male romance by Mu Xiaoling. Her face was red every day. Those who did not know would even think that she was a monkey. Poison Blade would go out every day to carry out missions. The missions were almost always about saving people. A Sixth Realm mystic realm riot was not something one or two Sixth Realm martial artists could handle. Therefore, the supporting martial artists sent to most mystic realms were all one realm higher. Sixth Realm martial artists would be sent to the Fifth Realm mystic realms. Seventh Realm martial artists would be sent to the Sixth Realm mystic realms. In just five days, he had completed more than 30 missions. Later on, the two guards at the entrance of the Secret Service Division in Kosaka City became extremely familiar with Poison Blade and would greet him when they saw him. Murata also became more and more satisfied with him. It was really rare to have such a hardworking subordinate. Later, even the Secret Service Division of the two cities next to Kosaka City also heard of Poison Blade’s nickname of “Mission Demon” and specially came all the way to ask him for help. Poison Blade accepted all the requests for help. His battle merits in the High Heaven Plains also soared as a result, and he was almost qualified to enter Reed Country. … In the market near the apartment. Poison Blade and Tianyu Lan were buying the dishes they needed here. It was evening and after work. Some martial artists who worked in the Secret Service Division and companies would come here to buy ingredients after work. Therefore, it was very lively here. Tianyu Lan also seemed to have integrated into the atmosphere here. She had a smile on her face the entire time. She looked here and touched there and was very happy. “You seem to be very happy every time you come out to buy groceries,” Poison Blade said with a smile. Tianyu Lan looked shy. “I rarely experience such an atmosphere in the Tianyu family.” “Oh?” “Lord Tianyu studies machinery all day and rarely attends three meals a day. The food in the house is all managed by Madam, and Madam… is a serious and rigid person.” Tianyu Lan seemed to have recalled the past and her expression was somewhat unbearable. “Madam is incomparably strict with the preparations of the three meals. They change the menu every three days and they don’t allow us to make any mistakes. Once you make a mistake or the ingredients are not fresh, you will immediately be punished. I have already been punished more than ten times for this matter.” “Once, my back was whipped twenty times and my skin and flesh were lacerated. Madam did not allow anyone to use the Life Potion on me. I lay in bed for a week before slowly recovering.” Tianyu Lan smiled self-deprecatingly. “How can the atmosphere in such a rigid Tianyu family be lively?” “Ever since I was born, I’ve never been in such a noisy and prosperous environment.” She looked around, her eyes seemed to be shining. “It sure is nice to stay here.” Poison Blade was slightly silent. Tianyu Lan suddenly ran to a stall and shouted happily at him, “Mr. Mu! There’s pork belly today! We can go home and make braised pork.” Poison Blade chuckled. “You want to eat braised pork? Alright, I’ll make it for you.” Tianyu Lan shook her head. “It’s not that I want to eat it. It’s just that Mr. Mu wants to eat it. The previous few times you came, you would specially pay attention to whether there was any fresh pork belly.” Poison Blade was stunned for a moment before he smiled. The taste of the food in the High Heaven Plains was slightly bland. After coming here for a period of time, he felt the urge to eat some of his hometown’s dishes and wanted to make braised pork to satisfy himself. Unfortunately, he returned empty-handed every time and could only buy some other meat. This girl had actually noticed this and even remembered it. “Then buy more today. I’ll use this as an opportunity to show off my cooking skills.” Poison Blade smiled. “Alright!” Tianyu Lan jumped up happily. Soon, the two of them walked back to the apartment with bags of ingredients. The two of them chatted and laughed as they walked into the alley under the streetlamp. Then Poison Blade stopped. This was because he felt the threat with his [High-Level Perception]. In front, two people blocked the way. Behind him, two people also surrounded him. Tianyu Lan’s smile froze, and her face turned pale. “They…” Poison Blade put down the ingredients and said indifferently, “They’re here to kill you.” The two people in front did not say anything and quickly attacked. “Stay where you are.” Poison Blade shouted and immediately pulled out a short sword. His figure suddenly disappeared from the spot. When he appeared again, the short sword had already pierced through the neck of one of the assassins. Crack! Blood spurted out! That assassin could not even react in time. He only saw a headless corpse fall before his mind quickly returned to darkness. The other assassin was shocked. Last time, when the three men in black went to kill Tianyu Lan, they all ended up getting killed instead. After investigating, they determined that it might be related to Mu Qiang. Then, they obtained relevant information about Mu Qiang from the Secret Service Division. After assessing this person’s strength, they mobilized four Seventh Realm martial artists to assassinate him this time! In the end, one of them was instantly killed! “How did this person become so powerful?!” The three killers roared crazily in their hearts. They had already investigated so carefully, but they had still underestimated this person’s strength! Poison Blade glanced at the three of them and said indifferently, “Just attack together.” The three killers were furious. Just now, the other party had taken advantage of them because they only sent one person to attack. Now, they felt that if they attacked together, the other party would definitely die! After killing this Mu Qiang and the person suspected to be Tianyu Lan, their mission could also be considered to be completed! The three assassins attacked from the front and back, their sharp blades stabbing towards Poison Blade’s glabella, throat, and heart! In just a short period of time, Poison Blade had already seen the detailed information of the three of them with his High-Level Observer skill. If he was not mistaken, including the one he had instantly killed, the four of them were all assassins with high damage output and low health. It was also very difficult for those who were not assassins to hide in such an ordinary alley and wait for them to take the bait. Moreover, their concealment methods were especially brilliant. Even with his [High-Level Perception], Poison Blade did not discover them in advance. In the past, [High-Level Perception] could detect hostile enemies from at least 50 meters away. Now, it only warned him when they walked into this alley. Facing their attack from both sides, Poison Blade directly activated [Lightning Wind] and his speed increased explosively. The three killers’ attacks directly missed. Before they could react and figure out where Poison Blade was, a snort sounded from the side. A killer felt his heart turn cold. He looked down and saw that his heart had actually been pierced by a sharp short sword! “What a high critical hit… This situation seriously does not match up with the information we obtained from our investigation…” The assassin was incomparably aggrieved before dying. What the hell was with the information sent by the informant in the Secret Service? The information had clearly stated that this Mu Qiang was an assassin who was good at hiding and escaping. How could he be so different from the information? Seeing another companion fall, shock flashed across the faces of the remaining two assassins. The skills this Mu Qiang had mastered seemed to be far more than what was recorded in the information. Not to mention anything else, the skill that suddenly increased their movement speed greatly just now was something they had never seen in the information. Moreover, this person’s damage output and critical hit were much higher than expected. The three of them surrounded Mu Qiang, but it was as if they were all rushing forward to die. “Let’s split up!” The two killers looked at each other and quickly realized that they had to leave here alive with their newly-obtained information. Otherwise, the next assassin sent to carry out the mission would still suffer. The two of them ran left and right. Poison Blade shook his head. How many times had this happened since he came to this world? Be it ordinary martial artists, genius martial artists like Dart, or level nine Eighth Realm experts like Garuda, they all ran away when they could not defeat the other party! Did these people have any morals?! “You guys want to escape? Of course I won’t let you escape!” Poison Blade used [Flash] and immediately appeared behind an assassin. Under the other party’s shocked gaze, he pulled out his sword and slashed the other party’s neck. The last assassin heaved a sigh of relief. Fortunately, fortunately. This assassin felt that Poison Blade probably did not have the means to catch up to him anymore. He had to tell the others about this. There was a very powerful person protecting the girl suspected to be Tianyu Cai! In that case, it was not difficult to guess that this girl was very likely Tianyu Cai herself! The assassin was not far from the entrance of the alley. He could even hear the voices of the people outside the long alley. “As long as I can reach that place…!” The killer was hopeful. The next moment, lightning enveloped him. Plop! His speed plummeted and he fell to the ground. He looked down and his heart turned cold. He was actually bound tightly by many lightning threads. With every struggle, the threads would release lightning, numbing his entire body and making him unable to move. The assassin’s eyes widened in anger. “You… How do you know [Lightning Chains]?!” This skill was the famous [Lightning Chains]. As an assassin, he was knowledgeable and naturally knew it. However, he did not understand very much. The information clearly stated that this guy was an assassin! It was very difficult for assassins to meet the skill learning requirements if they wanted to learn the [Lightning Chains]! The learning requirement for this skill was at least 200 Spirit points. Where did Mu Qiang get so many attribute points?! Poison Blade smiled and said, “Can’t I learn more skills in my spare time?” The assassin was extremely unwilling. “If you antagonize us, you won’t…” Click. The short sword cut through his skin, trachea, and esophagus, causing blood to splash. Before the assassin could finish speaking, he fell to the ground. Lin Xuan controlled Poison Blade to check their bodies as usual. There were still very few items that dropped. There were hundreds of thousands of essence, more than a hundred Mystic Realm Pearls, and some blood pills that were very similar to the Hungry Ghost Blood Pill. “The Zombie Blood Pill. This increases agility and movement speed. It’s suitable for assassins.” Poison Blade smiled. “Their battle with me ended too quickly, so they died before they even had a chance to eat the blood pill.” “Mr. Mu is so powerful!” At this moment, Tianyu Lan had already walked over with a shocked expression. These were four Seventh Realm assassins, but Mu Qiang had actually dealt with them so easily. She had indeed not misjudged him back then. Compared to Murata, this Mr. Mu Qiang was not just powerful, but ridiculously powerful! “That Lightning Chains just now is my secret skill. You’re not allowed to tell anyone,” Poison Blade said calmly. Tianyu Lan nodded repeatedly. “I know.” “Let’s go home and make braised pork!” Poison Blade chuckled and picked up the bags of ingredients again. The two of them walked out of the long alley, leaving behind four corpses. The next day. Poison Blade made breakfast for the two girls at home as usual and arrived at the Secret Service Division in Kosaka City early in the morning. When he arrived, a group of Seventh Realm martial artists had actually gathered here! Many of them were unfamiliar faces that he had never seen before. Murata was also among them. On the ground were four corpses. It was the four assassins he had killed last night. Some martial artists who were proficient in observation squatted down to check their injuries with solemn expressions. “What’s going on?” Poison Blade approached and was shocked. He acted very well and even took a few steps back in fear. Murata smiled helplessly. “At dawn, someone discovered these four corpses in the alley. After checking, we discovered that they had some pills that were similar to the Hungry Ghost Blood Pill on them. They should be working alongside those who were after Miss Tianyu.” Poison Blade had a shocked expression again. “Heavens, they actually dared to carry out an assassination in Kosaka City!” Murata gritted his teeth. “This is a provocation to our Kosaka City Secret Service Division!” “Mr. Murata, the results of the investigation are out. The fatal injuries on the four corpses are all sword wounds, and almost all of them were instantly killed. There’s also one person who was clearly injured by a lightning skill. We suspect that it might be the Sixth Realm skill [Lightning Chains].” A white-clothed martial artist walked over and reported seriously. “What do you think happened here?” Poison Blade asked. The white-clothed martial artist glanced at him and did not answer. Murata smiled and said, “Don’t worry. He’s a member of the Secret Service Division in Kosaka City.” Only then did the white-clothed martial artist reply, “My guess is that at least two people killed them. One of them was an assassin with high Agility and critical hit, and the other was a mage proficient in [Lightning Chains].” “Oh? How do you know that he’s proficient in Lightning Chains?” Poison Blade asked. The white-clothed martial artist said solemnly, “According to the wound analysis, the binding time was at least 4 seconds. This means that this mage profession has at least 270 Spirit points. Moreover, the level of his Lightning Chains skill has also reached at least purple.” Poison Blade raised his thumb. “I see. That’s some valuable insight!” His praise made the white-clothed martial artist very happy and slightly smug. “By the way, I forgot to introduce you. This is Hirano Yuta from the neighboring Furuya City.” With that said, Murata whispered, “He’s the son of the head of the Secret Service Division in Furuya City. Remember to build a good relationship.” Poison Blade nodded repeatedly and replied in a low voice, “Thank you for the reminder, Mr. Murata.” Hirano Yuta frowned. “What are you two talking about?” Murata laughed. “I hope Mu Qiang can be like you and develop such exquisite analytical skills.” Poison Blade nodded. “That’s right, that’s right. Hirano’s analysis just now was on point. You were able to instantly deduce the general information of the killer.” Hirano Yuta nodded proudly. At this moment, three men arrived at the same time. Murata hurriedly said, “The three section chiefs are here!” The martial artists who were analyzing the corpses hurriedly stopped talking and bowed slightly to the three section chiefs. “These three are?” Poison Blade was very surprised. Why did all three section chiefs arrive together? Murata said in a low voice, “It’s the three Secret Service Division section chiefs of Kosaka City, Furuya City, and Inochi City!” The three section chiefs smiled and walked over. Murata also raised his head and pointed at Mu Qiang. “Section Chief Fujiwara! This is the Mu Qiang I’ve mentioned to you many times.” The chief of the Secret Service Division of Kosaka City was a short, shrewd, and cautious bald man. He sized up Poison Blade and nodded with a smile. “Not bad, not bad. I’ve long heard Murata mention you. Fortunately, thanks to you, we learned that Miss Tianyu was being chased.” The section chief of Furuya City and the section chief of Inochi City also said in surprise, “So you’re the Mission Demon. We’ve also heard a little about you.” Hirano looked at Poison Blade in surprise. A few days ago, he had heard about a person who crazily did missions and entered and left the mystic realm to save martial artists. Hirano did not expect that person to be Poison Blade. “Um, may I ask why you guys are…?” Poison Blade was a little puzzled. The section chief of Kosaka City waved his hand. “We discovered a person suspected to be Miss Tianyu! However, she also seems to have been targeted by another group of people. We guess that those people are very likely the black-clothed people you mentioned!” The section chief of Furuya City snorted. “Someone actually dares to attack Lord Tianyu’s daughter. They’re really tired of living!” The section chief of Inochi City also had a solemn expression. “We have to find out who these people in black and the mastermind are! We believe that Lord Tianyu should have the same thoughts!” “Everyone, follow. The target is Hirano Plains!” Lin Xuan was surprised. Hirano Plains was originally a Fourth Realm mystic realm. Every few days, it would be swept through by Fifth Realm martial artists, so there were very few demon beasts. Hirano Plains had always been a stable granary for Kosaka City and the nearby cities. The soil there was fertile and suitable for planting crops. A large number of high grade grass also grew, allowing them to herd cows and sheep. However, the appearance of the burning earth demons recently caused the crops to fail. The burning earth demons came and went without a trace. Even the Fifth Realm martial artists could not find them. However, because there was indeed no need to go to a Fourth Realm mystic realm, Poison Blade had never been there. The person suspected to be Miss Tianyu was actually in the Hirano Plains? At this moment, Murata leaned over and whispered, “Mu Qiang, let me tell you this… We also just discovered that the Hirano Plains have actually become bigger! Moreover, it’s accidentally connected to the Sixth Realm mystic realm, Hungry Ghost Village!” Poison Blade was stunned. Such a situation was too rare. Every mystic realm was equivalent to an independent small world with a relatively self-sustaining ecosystem. There were plants, herbivores, carnivores, and creatures at the top of the food chain. Hirano Plains was an example of a perfect mystic realm. That was a huge flat plain terrain with very few hills. It was naturally suitable for large machinery farming and large-scale grazing. The Hungry Ghost Village, on the other hand, was an example of an extremely poor mystic realm. The sun was rarely seen there. It was also difficult for various plants to grow there, and the trees that grew there were small and short. The only demon beasts there were hungry ghosts that wandered around the village all year round. In the past, there had been several examples of mystic realms being connected in the Construction Division. However, the mystic realms that were connected in the Construction Division all had a similar environment. For example, a plains-type mystic realm would connect to another plains-type mystic realm, mountains would connect to mountains, swamps connected to swamps, and so on. However, now that the Hirano Plains and the Hungry Ghost Village were connected, this had become the first connection that occurred between two completely different mystic realms. In any case, such an example had never appeared in the Construction Division. As for the other large organizations, Lin Xuan did not know. After all, he had only read a large number of records about the Construction Division. The three Secret Service Division section chiefs gave the order and all the martial artists immediately followed. Poison Blade swept his gaze over. There were about 30 people, which meant that there were about 10 people from the Secret Service Division of each of the 3 cities. The door of light of the Hirano Plains mystic realm was similar to the door of light of the Hungry Ghost Village. They were both located in the central square of Kosaka City. This was also the reason why the martial artists from the Secret Service Division of Furuya City and Inochi City had specially rushed to Kosaka City. Soon, they arrived at the central square of Kosaka City. There were eight mystic realm doors of light here. Among them were the Sixth Realm mystic realm Hungry Ghost Village and the Fourth Realm mystic realm Hirano Plains. “We’ll guard outside. If anyone wants to escape, we’ll immediately intercept them.” The section chief of the Secret Service Division of Inochi City took the initiative to guard outside. The other two section chiefs had no objections and led the other 20 people into the plains one after another. After a short moment of dizziness, Poison Blade saw a flat and open plain. The bright sunlight shone on the grass, making it appear even more green and bright. Looking over, the whole scene was green. Many creatures that had been tamed by martial artists were leisurely eating grass here. These creatures were also demon beasts in the past, but after several generations of nurturing, their wild nature had been eradicated and they rarely displayed any aggression. Moreover, after several generations of cultivation, their meat was even more succulent and their milk was even more abundant. Compared to the chickens and cows before the global digitization, the production here was much higher. There were small ranches every certain distance on the grassland, and the Fourth Realm martial artists in charge of this grassland lived there. Of course, although they were Fourth Realm martial artists, their combat strength was actually not very powerful. They might only have one or two combat skills. They did not need to fight much. At most, they would comfort the demon beasts when they were restless. These demon beasts had long lost their wild nature. After being tamed a little, they would calm down. These martial artists basically focused on developing life skills and logistic skills. Their daily job was to feed the demon beasts. Poison Blade looked ahead and could still see a green wheat field. Every wheat field was square and was handled by two to three Fourth Realm martial artists. The speed at which crops matured in the plains was far faster than outside. If they got lucky, these crops could even become mature in a year. There were many mystic realms like the Hirano Plains. It was precisely because of these mystic realms that High Heaven Plains could steadily produce a large amount of food, so much so that it could even be exported to the Arctic Army, which produced less food. Beside him, Murata also sighed and said, “I’ve eaten wheat from the Hirano Plains since I was young, but I’ve never gotten tired of it.” “This kind of good place can’t be destroyed by the burning earth demons. If we deal with that group of people later, we still have to find the burning earth demons.” Poison Blade nodded when he heard this. In any case, he would gain battle merits. It didn’t matter what he did. “Where are those people?” he asked. Murata pointed at the black cloud in front of him. “Look, over there is the place that connects the Hirano Plains and the Hungry Ghost Village. According to the report of the martial artists from the Hirano Plains, more than a dozen people were fighting each other just now. Among them were the black-clothed men you once described.” “If I’m not wrong, they’ve already gone to the Hungry Ghost Village. However, the hungry ghosts there are rioting. Although the hungry ghosts are only at the Sixth Realm, they’ll still be a hindrance to us. This is why we’re taking the path of the Hirano Plains to chase after them.” The chief of the Secret Service Division of Kosaka City sneered. “If these people try to escape from the Hungry Ghost Village through various means, they will immediately be stopped by the people outside!” “They’re basically surrounded and can’t escape!” The martial artists immediately bragged and praised the section chief’s wise leadership. Lin Xuan listened carefully and felt a trace of worry. The other party dared to lead more than ten people into the mystic realm with great fanfare just to kill a girl suspected to be Tianyu Cai. If they dared to do this, wouldn’t it mean that they had also considered the possibility that the Secret Service Division would send people to surround and suppress them? Could it be that they did not prepare any backup plans? Thinking of this, Lin Xuan secretly took a few steps back. Even if the sky collapsed, a tall person would hold it up. He would let the others probe first. The two section chiefs of Kosaka City and Furuya City were both Eighth Realm martial artists. If the black-clothed people also had Eighth Realm martial artists, they would need to depend on the section chiefs. Everyone continued forward, and the surrounding scenery changed subtly. The bright and beautiful environment gradually turned into a dark and miserable atmosphere. The sunlight was gradually replaced by dark clouds. Soon, the surrounding atmosphere quickly turned into the miserable atmosphere of the Hungry Ghost Village. To the martial artists, it was as if they had fallen from heaven to hell. After taking a few steps, they saw many bloodstains and corpses on the ground. Hirano Yuta immediately stepped forward and analyzed a corpse’s wound and cause of death. Three minutes later, he quickly stood up. He said solemnly to the section chief of Kosaka City and the section chief of Furuya City, who was also his father, “There are 12 injuries and 2 fatal injuries on his body. One of the fatal injuries was caused by a short knife that pierced his heart, and the other was an ice spike that pierced his brain. The time of death was about 20 minutes ago.” The section chief of Furuya City nodded in admiration. “Yuta, your analysis ability has improved again.” Hirano Yuta smiled proudly. “Continue forward! The other party must be somewhere in the Hungry Ghost Village!” the Kosaka City section chief shouted. After taking a few steps, they saw another corpse fall to the ground. The martial artists immediately approached. Hirano Yuta even walked in front of the corpse and squatted down to flip the corpse. “Wait…” Poison Blade directly stopped him. He really could not help it. It didn’t matter when he analyzed the previous corpse just now. Back there, the kid could analyze it however he wanted. In any case, he was the son of the section chief of Furuya City. However, he could not analyze this one. Poison Blade had used his High-Level Observer skill to see that there was a trap set up by the other party under this corpse. [Black Blood Leech] was a strange Seventh Realm demon beast. It was almost harmless and was usually the color of flesh. After absorbing enough blood, it would turn black and explode after being poked lightly. The power of the explosion was enough to raze everything within a ten-meter radius to the ground! Even two Eighth Realm martial artists like the two section chiefs could be blasted and suffer intermediate injuries! The strength of those men in black was unknown, so he could not let anything happen to these two section chiefs. If they were seriously injured now, how were they supposed to fight later?! Hearing his words, everyone was stunned. Hirano Yuta turned around and looked at him unhappily. “Do you have any unique insights?” Murata also coughed dryly. “Mu Qiang, you’re inferior to Yuta in terms of analyzing corpses. Why don’t we let him do it?” Poison Blade did not know whether to laugh or cry. He hurriedly said, “Don’t touch that corpse. There’s a trap below!” Hearing this, Hirano Yuta immediately stopped the hand that almost touched the corpse. A trigger type trap was placed under the corpse. This was a vicious trap that was cleverly placed. If he was careless, he might fall into the trap. Hirano Yuta only wanted to show off in front of his father and did not want to lose his life. “That makes sense. Let’s retreat and attack this corpse from afar.” Hirano Yuta nodded softly. Everyone hurriedly retreated seven to eight meters. Poison Blade shook his head. “No, I think we’re still too close. I’ll go back a little.” He directly retreated ten meters. The section chief of Furuya City could not help but laugh. “Murata, your new employee is a little timid.” The Kosaka City Section Chief smiled helplessly. He was also not familiar with Mu Qiang. He had only heard Murata mention Mu Qiang many times. “It’s always good to be cautious. I’ll take a few more steps back.” The section chief of Kosaka City was also a relatively cautious person. Moreover, he felt that there was indeed no harm in being cautious. It was just that Mu Qiang seemed a little… timid. Since the section chief had retreated, the others from Kosaka City also retreated. In this way, the members of the Furuya City were all seven to eight meters away from the corpse. Murata and the other members of Kosaka City were nine meters away. Only Poison Blade was ten meters away. Hirano Yuta took a bow from his back and instantly pulled it to the limit. The bow was like a full moon. An explosive arrow shot out and directly blasted the corpse away. Boom! The black blood exploded crazily, and the terrifying power directly blasted the corpse into dozens of pieces. Flesh and bones fell from the sky, enveloping Hirano Yuta and the others. The person closest to the corpse took the most damage. The section chief of Furuya City reacted in time and pulled his son into his arms with his right hand, suffering most of the damage himself. The other two were not so lucky. They were directly hit by the flesh and bones that contained huge kinetic energy! There were small bloody holes all over their faces and chests. They screamed on the spot! As for the section chief of Kosaka City, Murata, and the others, they were dumbfounded. What the hell? There was really a trap! Moreover, the power of the trap was ridiculous! They had already retreated to nine meters, but there were still many pieces of flesh that shot over like bullets! Murata wiped his cheek. A bloody groove had suddenly appeared there! He felt a burning pain. Lin Xuan deliberately controlled Poison Blade to retreat a few steps and shouted exaggeratedly. “Damn! Fortunately, I was more cautious. That scared me to death.” Murata immediately looked at him and even gave him a thumbs up. “There’s indeed no harm in being cautious.” Compared to the members of these departments in Kosaka City who had superficial injuries, the two unlucky ones in Furuya City were much worse. Their health points had decreased by at least half. They had no choice but to use the Life Potion to recover as soon as possible. They felt very regretful now. If he had been as cautious as Mu Qiang a few minutes ago and retreated a few more steps, they would not have suffered such an unexpected disaster. Hirano Yuta was also a little dumbfounded. After a while, he walked over to Poison Blade and said helplessly, “You’re right… If I had known earlier, I would have been more cautious.” The section chief of Furuya City gasped in pain, but he also gave Poison Blade a helpless look. Then, he looked at the section chief of Kosaka City. “I’ve always treated caution as cowardice. Now, I realize that I should have been more cautious.” The section chief of Kosaka City laughed and patted Poison Blade’s shoulder. Everyone packed up and continued forward. With this experience, Hirano Yuta and the others became much more cautious. When they encountered corpses, they would first use long-range attacks to probe from afar. However, the other party seemed to also know that this trick would only work once. The corpses that appeared later did not have similar vicious traps. Soon, they chased to the entrance of the Hungry Ghost Village. There was a small open square here, and on both sides were houses. However, there were only hungry ghosts here. There weren’t any black-clothed people at all. The two section chiefs were stunned. This was not right. With the section chief of Inochi City guarding outside, it was impossible for these black-clothed people to escape. As long as the other party passed through the door of light of the mystic realm, they would immediately be attacked. When passing through the door of light of the mystic realm, unless one’s Constitution was above 400 points, one would have a short headache and experience discomfort. At that time, it would be very difficult for one to react to an attack. “What’s going on?” The section chief frowned deeply and planned to directly go out through the door of light of the mystic realm to ask the section chief of Inochi City what was going on. However, just as he led the martial artists beside him over, the ground suddenly emitted an ominous red light. The red light instantly drowned the section chief of Furuya City and the other martial artists. Poison Blade looked over and was shocked to discover that seven to eight negative statuses had immediately appeared on their bodies. Chaos, blindness, armor-piercing, bleeding, paralysis, speed reduction… everything. The section chief of Furuya City was shocked and furious. These black-clothed people had actually set up a trap while escaping! “This is an ambush. Retreat!” The level of the section chief of Furuya City was high, and his constitution was also relatively high, so he had a higher resistance to these negative statuses. However, just because he could quickly resist these negative statuses did not mean that others could as well. With so many negative statuses on these members of Furuya City, they did not have time to retreat at all. “Throw them out!” The sound of air being torn suddenly sounded. With the help of the weak flames, Poison Blade saw the things being thrown out were actually black and swollen insects! “Black Blood Leech!” The pupils of the Kosaka City Chief suddenly constricted. “Find cover nearby!” Boom! Boom! Boom! Dozens of black blood leeches landed. Due to the pressure, these strange demon beasts instantly exploded from the inside out! A terrifying explosion completely enveloped the ten people from Furuya City. Members below the Eighth Realm died on the spot! They exploded until not a single piece of flesh was left on their bodies. Even their biological parents would not be able to tell them apart. Because Hirano Yuta had his father’s protection, he avoided death. However, in order to protect him, the section chief of Ancient Wu City was also severely injured. His back, chest, arms, legs, and even the back of his head were all hit by the aftershock of the explosion. His health points decreased! But that was not all. A woman’s low shout sounded from the houses on both sides. “Fire!” Then, dozens of poisonous arrows shot out from the darkness. Everyone hurriedly hid behind the bunker and did not dare to poke their heads out. The section chief of Furuya City desperately threw his son to the back of the house, and his wide body blocked a large number of arrows. Previously, he had been injured by the corpse trap. After that, he was even injured by a large number of Black Blood Grasshoppers. Now that he was being attacked by a large number of arrows, his health points had almost reached zero. “I’ll drag someone down with me even if I die!” The section chief of Furuya City roared angrily and took out a huge bomb the size of a human brain from the storage compartment and threw it over fiercely. Boom! The bomb exploded. The screams of several black-clothed people sounded from the flames. Swoosh! A black and red light suddenly shot over from the building. There seemed to be ghosts crying and vengeful spirits wailing. This black and red light directly pierced through the forehead of the section chief of Furuya City! His head exploded, and red and white contents splattered! Some of the brain matter even splashed onto Hirano Yuta’s face. He watched in a daze as his father died in front of him and was shocked speechless. “Attack in that direction!” Thanks to the section chief of Furuya City, they were able to finally discover the other party’s exact location. They immediately took out a bundle of bombs from the storage compartment and threw them in that direction. Boom! Flames erupted. The men in black had to stop shooting arrows to avoid the bombs. With the help of the flames, Poison Blade finally saw those black-clothed people. One of them had been killed by the huge bomb just now, and the others were more or less injured. The person on the roof was wrapped in tight black clothes, and his face was also completely covered. Clearly, he was the leader of these people. The dying attack of the section chief of Furuya City had made a huge contribution. Poison Blade tried to use a High-Level Observer on the person on the roof. —- Name:? Level: Level Four Seventh Realm Profession: Great Curse Master (Peerless Golden) Attributes:? Skill: Group Weakening (Legendary Dark Gold), Fatal Beam (Legendary Dark Gold)… Equipment: Dead Man’s Staff (Peerless Gold), Curse Set (Peerless Gold)… —- Lin Xuan was surprised. The other party was clearly only a Seventh Realm martial artist, but he could block his high-level Observer skill. This proved that the other party must have a special item or skill that could block the prying eyes of others. Moreover, the grade of this thing must be very high, at least dark gold. “Stop hiding. Come out and kill them as soon as possible. I still have to continue looking for Tianyu Cai.” A woman’s cold voice sounded from the roof. The section chief of Kosaka City’s heart skipped a beat. Did the other party have backup? The next moment, the section chief of Inochi City walked out with more than a dozen trusted aides. “Understood!” The pupils of the Kosaka City section chief narrowed. The section chief of Inochi City was actually a traitor?! He was in cahoots with those men in black?! Lin Xuan saw this scene through Poison Blade’s eyes and was also dumbfounded. Oh boy. The internal strife in this High Heaven Plains was too intense! The leader of the black-clothed people took out the staff on his back and raised his hand. A black and red light wave swept past the section chief of Kosaka City and the others, even enveloping Poison Blade. Poison Blade immediately saw a large number of negative statuses appear on his body. “This should be the Group Weakening skill. Fortunately, my Constitution is very high. These negative statuses will only last for at most ten seconds before disappearing.” However, the section chief of Kosaka City, Murata, and the others were shocked and furious. These negative statuses would stay on them for at least 8 minutes! At this moment, they were almost at a complete disadvantage when facing the section chief of Inochi City and the others! “I’ve released a Group Weakening. I’ll leave these people to you. Be careful and don’t leave any traces.” With that said, the black-clothed leader led the black-clothed people quickly to the mystic realm’s door of light and left the Hungry Ghost Village. The section chief of Inochi City rubbed his wrist and smiled sinisterly. “Fujiwara, it’s time for us to fight!” He suddenly stomped on the ground and instantly approached the section chief of Kosaka City. The fist the size of a casserole instantly expanded and punched the chest of the Kosaka City Chief. In a hurry, the section chief of Kosaka City could only cross his arms and block. However, with his negative status stacked, he was no match for the section chief of Inochi City at all. He retreated repeatedly. The trusted aides of the section chief of Inochi City also rushed up. The section chief of Inochi City and his trusted aides had been waiting for the black-clothed men to tire them out. At this moment, the members of Kosaka City had already exhausted a lot of their energy. Coupled with these negative statuses, they were immediately at a huge disadvantage. As the Kosaka City Chief retreated, he took out a bottle of Purifying Potion from the storage compartment and drank it. However, this bottle of Purifying Potion was only of the green grade and only removed the chaotic state. The other states were still attached to his body like maggots. “Give up! Although your profession is stronger than mine, you can’t get rid of your negative status at all. You’re not my match!” “Unless you can take out the Great Purification Potion. However, we both know that the High Heaven Plains doesn’t produce the Great Purification Potion!” The section chief of Inochi City sneered loudly. Victory was in his grasp, and his fists rained down. With seven to eight negative statuses on his body, the Kosaka City Chief could only constantly resist and retreat. The other members of the Secret Service Division of Kosaka City looked desperate. In just a few minutes, they had already suffered casualties! Poison Blade glanced at Murata and discovered that he had also fallen into a bitter battle. Fortunately, the strength of the person who attacked him was also insufficient. The two rookies were still fighting each other. Although Murata was at a disadvantage, he would not die on the spot. “This won’t do. If there are no Eighth Realm martial artists, I would still be able to kill all these people. However, Eighth Realm martial artists can only be dealt with by Eighth Realm martial artists. The section chief of Kosaka City can’t die.” Poison Blade pretended that he was also affected by the negative status. As he fought the martial artist in front of him, he leaned towards the direction of the two section chiefs. “Chief Fujiwara, this is the Great Purification Potion I bought from the Construction Division. I’ve always had it with me. Drink it quickly!” Seeing that he was close enough, he hurriedly took out a large potion and threw it over. The Great Purification Potion was one of the rare and difficult potions to make. The Purification Potion could only remove one or two negative statuses. However, the Great Purification Potion could directly remove all negative statuses and maintain the immunity status for 3 minutes. Lin Xuan’s main body had been researching new potions. The Great Purification Potion was one of them. Hearing that it was a Big Purification Potion, the Kosaka City Section Chief was overjoyed. He immediately took it and gulped it down. The section chief of Inochi City frowned and punched Poison Blade fiercely. Poison Blade was directly sent flying a few seconds before he smashed over. He even forcefully spat out a few mouthfuls of blood in the air, and he deliberately showed a dispirited expression. After drinking the Great Purification Potion, the section chief’s negative status instantly disappeared, as if he had received godlike assistance. He had a purple grade profession, while the section chief of Inochi City only had a blue grade profession. Moreover, he was also stronger than the section chief of Inochi City. Just now, he was only at a disadvantage because of his negative status. Now that the negative status was removed, it was time for him to dominate the battle! The Inochi City chief was shocked and furious. The reason why he was confident just now was because he knew that environment in the High Heaven Plains well and was confident that the other party would be unable to gather the complete materials to make the Great Purification Potion. He expected the other party to only settle for the next best thing and make some Purification Potions. Even so, Purification Potions were still very expensive. Only section chiefs like them would buy a bottle and keep it on them in case of emergencies. However, the Purification Potion was very helpless in the face of so many negative statuses. He did not expect someone to actually throw a bottle of Great Purification Potion at the Kosaka City Chief! Bang bang bang! The Kosaka City Section Chief punched continuously. Despite his short figure, he actually unleashed the aura of a huge bear! “Damn, damn, damn!” The section chief of Inochi City was beaten until he retreated repeatedly. His arms were covered in blood and flesh, and even his white bones could be seen! He knew that the other party’s health points were at most 20%. He had repeatedly tried to kill the injured Kosaka City chief, but the latter had seized the opportunity and directly sent him flying with a series of consecutive moves, shattering a house in the process. The Kosaka City section chief leaned forward and rode on the chest of the Inochi City section chief. His fists struck fiercely and smashed the other party’s temples. “How can you be so ruthless to your colleagues?! Are you still a member of the High Heaven Plains?! Tell me! Who’s behind you and who are those black-clothed people?!” The Kosaka City Section Chief roared. He had suffered a huge loss today. The section chief of Furuya City had died in battle, and nine members of Furuya City had also lost their lives. Several members of Kosaka City had also died! These were all Seventh Realm martial artists he had carefully nurtured! His heart ached greatly! Blood foamed from the chief’s mouth, but he still laughed loudly. “You’ve always been very smart. Why haven’t you guessed it? I was never loyal to the High Heaven Plains, I’ve always been a servant of the Ghost Shadow Legion!” The Kosaka City Chief was stunned. “The Ghost Shadow Legion?! What else do you know? Tell me quickly!” Click. The Inochi City chief hugged his head with both hands and broke his neck. Even in death, his face was filled with mockery. He would rather die than tell him the information! The Kosaka City Section Chief frowned deeply. Damn, he hated martial artists who did not fear death the most! As soon as the section chief of Inochi City died, his trusted subordinates immediately lost their backbone and retreated in the direction of the mystic realm door of light. The section chief of Kosaka City immediately chased after him. An Eighth Realm martial artist killing a Seventh Realm martial artist was as easy as slaughtering a chicken. In the blink of an eye, he captured all these people. However, they were all the same. Once they were caught, they would very resolutely commit suicide! In the end, other than learning about the Ghost Shadow Legion, he did not obtain any useful information. Murata supported himself with the help of Poison Blade and crawled up shakily. Poison Blade even considerately gave him a bottle of Life Potion. “You’re awesome. You actually have a bottle of the Great Purification Potion on you. If not for you, we wouldn’t have survived today.” Murata was not stingy with his praise. The more he looked at Mu Qiang, the more satisfied he was. Poison Blade pointed at something that had fallen after the death of the section chief of Inochi City. “That looks like a head?” Murata went over to take a look and sighed. “It’s the head of a young girl, not Miss Tianyu. It should be a substitute.” Poison Blade nodded. These black-clothed people had spent a lot of effort chasing after the people suspected to be Tianyu Cai, but they still failed this time. It was just a pity that this girl had inexplicably lost her life because of Tianyu Cai. At this moment, the section chief of Kosaka City had already returned. He patted Poison Blade’s shoulder forcefully and said, “Good job! It’s all thanks to you this time! I’ll report your battle results to the higher-ups. Perhaps you’ll be qualified to enter Reed Country to train!” Hearing this, Lin Xuan’s spirits rose. After doing so many side missions, he was finally qualified to carry out the main mission. However, he had also heard the name that the section chief of Inochi City had muttered just now. Ghost Shadow Legion! “Section Chief Fujiwara, what kind of organization is the Ghost Shadow Legion?” he asked. The Kosaka City Section Chief sighed. “Mu Qiang, you’ve only arrived recently, so you naturally don’t know that the Ghost Shadow Legion is a rebel organization that has only appeared in the north in the past few months.” “Their leader is called Ghost Shadow. It’s said that he’s a Ninth Realm martial artist. He was the one who established the Ghost Shadow Legion. He has been gathering the people who have opposed the leader of our High Heaven Plains. Moreover, the number of their members is increasing!” Lin Xuan was very surprised to hear this. The rebel forces of High Heaven Plains? Interesting. “Why haven’t we tried to surround and capture them? Leader, you can actually tolerate the existence of such a force?” he asked. The section chief of Kosaka City was helpless. “Naturally, attempts of encirclement have been made. Back then, the leader ordered Lord Sato, Lord Tianyu, Lord Yamamoto, and a large number of Eighth Realm martial artists to carry out a large encirclement. However, we only managed to capture some Sixth Realm and Seventh Realm martial artists of the Ghost Shadow Legion. We didn’t capture any higher-ups at all! It was as if they had all escaped from the encirclement in advance!” Lin Xuan was shocked again. Damn, there must be a spy. Murata seemed to have guessed his thoughts and hurriedly said solemnly, “Just keep some things to yourself and don’t say them out loud. Otherwise, it might cause trouble.” The section chief of Kosaka City continued, “Ever since the Ghost Shadow Legion appeared, they have always been active on the northern islands. The terrain there is harsh, and there are fewer cities. Our High Heaven Plains’ control is also relatively weak. I really didn’t expect the Ghost Shadow Legion to actually all come to the southern port.” “Everyone, clean up the battlefield and prepare to go home.” He rubbed his temples. “I have to write several pages of combat report for today.” “And that child…” He glanced at Hirano Yuta with some sympathy. The latter was still kneeling in front of his father’s corpse and could not calm down for a long time. “Section Chief Fujiwara, I want to temporarily join the Secret Service Division of Kosaka City. If there are any traces of the Ghost Shadow Legion next time, I want to be the first to join the operation.” Hirano Yuta suddenly stood up, his eyes bloodshot. The section chief of Kosaka City walked over and patted his shoulder. “Alright, I promise you.” … That night, in Jingdu City, High Heaven Plains. The report drawn up by the section chief of Kosaka City was placed on the desk of the leader of the High Heaven Plains. He read the entire report word for word and turned his back to look at the night view outside the window. “Take a look.” There were still two people standing in his office. One of them was the robust Sato Take, who was more than two meters tall. The other was the thin Forger Tianyu, who had messy hair. The two of them browsed the report one after another with surprised expressions. In particular, Forger Tianyu was surprised and worried. The leader walked over and looked at Forger Tianyu face-to-face as he said seriously, “Forger, I’m also very concerned about your daughter’s safety. Don’t worry, I’ll definitely find her and bring her to you safely.” Forger Tianyu was touched and knelt on one knee. “Thank you, Leader!” “Take, you’ll be in charge of this matter. Isn’t your daughter in Furuya City? Get her to investigate the battlefield. I’m certain that the Ghost Shadow Legion is still in Kosaka City. We have to open a huge net and capture all the bold members of this Ghost Shadow Legion!” The leader stared coldly at Sato Take. “I don’t want to see what happened a few months ago happen again!” The situation a few months ago naturally referred to the situation when Sato Take and the other Ninth Realm martial artists joined forces to surround and attack the Ghost Shadow Legion, but they ended up letting all the higher-ups of the Ghost Shadow Legion escape. Ever since that incident, Sato Take’s reputation under the organization’s leader and above ten thousand people plummeted. Until now, he had even been surpassed by the Sky Feather Craftsman, who was not good at fighting. Sato Take’s forehead was covered in sweat. The leader was clearly a head shorter than him, but he was extremely pressured when standing in front of this leader. It was as if this leader was a high and mighty elder, making him not dare to look up and speak. “Don’t worry! Your orders will be carried out completely!” Sato Take nodded solemnly and bowed deeply. The leader watched as the two of them walked out of the office. His eyes were deep and dark. … On the other side. Seeing that Poison Blade was seriously injured, the section chief of Kosaka City gave him a break. Poison Blade was naturally not injured, but he was happy to be free and returned early. Before returning, he passed by the market and bought some dumpling skins and pork. However, when he was about to return to the apartment, he saw a girl in blue turn into a long alley that few people visited. There were many girls in blue, but he was very familiar with this one. This was because she was Tianyu Lan. However, at this moment, Tianyu Lan’s expression was somewhat unfamiliar, as if she was a stranger. “Interesting…” Poison Blade immediately followed. Soon, he heard conversation from the long alley. “Miss, the ship is still being prepared. Recently, High Heaven Plains has been very strict with the people entering and leaving. We’re currently forging our identities…” “As soon as possible. The people looking for me will definitely investigate thoroughly in a few southern ports. By the time they find out about Kosaka City, it will be too late.” “Understood!” Then, Tianyu Lan walked out of the long alley and returned to her usual appearance. Lin Xuan saw this scene through Poison Blade’s eyes and a deep interest rose in his heart. “Things are becoming more interesting.” “The first time we met, Tianyu Lan claimed that she was only a servant and a substitute for Tianyu Cai.” “But now, someone is calling her Miss. And she’s even about to leave High Heaven Plains on a ship.” Lin Xuan rubbed his chin. It seemed that everything was related. However, the only thing he could not figure out was… The name that was displayed on her information panel after Lin Xuan used his High-Level Observer skill was still “Tianyu Lan”! There was no way that she was Tianyu Cai. The High-level Observer skill would not lie to him. Soon, Poison Blade also returned to the apartment and started wrapping the dumplings. During this period of time, Mu Xiaoling and Tianyu Lan got along very well. They laughed and joked in the room every day, and Tianyu Lan no longer blushed as much as before. Seeing Poison Blade making dumplings, Tianyu Lan also leaned over and stared at his agile hands. “How impressive. He can actually make such beautiful dumplings. Mr. Mu was a chef in the Construction Division, right?” Poison Blade chuckled. “Why don’t you give it a try.” Tianyu Lan smiled awkwardly. “I don’t know how to.” “C’mon.” Tianyu Lan clumsily picked up the dumpling skin and placed the meat filling on it. However, because there was too much meat filling, the dumpling skin could not be closed at all. In the end, it turned into a huge and ugly… pancake. Tianyu Lan did not know whether to laugh or cry. “What a waste of dumpling skin and meat stuffing.” Poison Blade chuckled. “It’s fine, it’s fine. Just watch.” Although he said this on the surface, he already had some guesses in his heart. Previously, he had been the one cooking, so Tianyu Lan did not have the chance to cook. This time, he had deliberately let Tianyu Lan take part in the cooking. This clumsy action seemed to indicate something. Tianyu Lan claimed to be a servant. Even if the High Heaven Plains did not eat dumplings much, it was impossible for to be so clumsy when she was a servant. Something was wrong. “Time to eat dumplings!” Poison Blade knocked on the door. Tianyu Lan dragged the unwilling Mu Xiaoling out and the two of them sat at the dining table. Mu Xiaoling still did not want to get along with her father, but with Tianyu Lan dragging her out, she could not refuse. The three of them ate very quietly and did not speak. Tianyu Lan casually said, “Mr. Mu, you came back so early today. Did you complete the mission in advance?” Poison Blade nodded. “I was injured. The section chief asked me to come back and recuperate.” “Mr. Mu was actually injured? What mission is it?” Tianyu Lan said in surprise. “It’s related to your Miss. A group of black-clothed people are chasing after the people suspected to be Tianyu Cai. However, in the end, they only managed to kill a substitute. The casualties on our side were also very heavy. Even the section chief of Furuya City died in battle.” As Poison Blade spoke, Lin Xuan specially paid attention to Tianyu Lan’s eyes. One could deceive others with their words and actions… However, if one did not undergo strict training, their eyes will still give away the truth. The strange thing was that other than sadness, Tianyu Lan’s eyes did not reveal anything. “Another substitute died. It’ll be my turn one day, right? Those terrifying killers…” Tianyu Lan sighed. Mu Xiaoling patted her arm. “Sister Lan, don’t be afraid. Although Mu Qiang is scum, he should be able to protect you.” Tianyu Lan did not know whether to laugh or cry. “Little Ling, why do you call Father scum? I’ve long wanted to ask about this.” Mu Xiaoling glared fiercely at Poison Blade. “He betrayed the country and leaked information, causing countless members of the Construction Division to die. If he’s not scum, what is he?” Tianyu Lan’s beautiful eyes flashed. “Mr. Mu, I’m also very curious about something. Why did you betray the Construction Division?” Poison Blade shrugged. “Money, power, whatever things I can get from the High Heaven Plains that the Construction Division can’t give to me.” Tianyu Lan supported her chin. “But I heard that the low-level martial artists of the Construction Division live the best compared to the low-level martial artists of the various large organizations. Do you know that some organizations don’t even treat martial artists below the Fourth Realm as their own kind?” Poison Blade continued to speak according to Mu Qiang’s personality. “What does a low-level martial artist have to do with me? I’m no longer a low-level martial artist.” “Looks like Mr. Mu is not the kind of person who cares about the world.” Tianyu Lan chuckled. Poison Blade ate a dumpling and said indifferently, “What does the world have to do with me? I only care about three meals a day.” His expression was calm, but his heart was in turmoil. When Tianyu Lan spoke just now, he inexplicably used another High-Level Observer skill. He was shocked to discover that her name had actually changed to “Tianyu Cai”! After the two of them ended their conversation and ate a few dumplings, he used his High-Level Observer skill to observe again. However, this time, her name had changed back to “Tianyu Lan”! “What method did she use to be able to switch between these two names at will?” Lin Xuan was rather surprised. The high-level Observer skill that he had always relied on actually failed this time! “No matter what, regardless of whether she’s Tianyu Cai or Tianyu Lan, she’s definitely related to Tianyu Cai.” “This girl is very problematic.” Lin Xuan’s thoughts were a little chaotic now. He needed to sort them out. The next day, in the Secret Service Division of Kosaka City. As usual, Poison Blade arrived early. However, it was a little too early today because… the door to the Secret Service Division was not open yet. As he waited, a tall lady in black slowly approached. Her entire body was wrapped in tight black clothes, revealing her round and perky curves. Her facial features were very exquisite and revealed a seductive aura, but her expression was abnormally cold. Two contradictory auras were reflected in her at the same time. The black-clothed lady stared at Poison Blade for a few times. “I’ve seen the Fujiwara City Section Chief’s combat report. You’re the one who provided the Great Purification Potion and helped the section chief of Fujiwara City turn the situation around, right?” Poison Blade frowned. “You are?” The black-clothed older sister said indifferently, “Sato Qingkong, the new person-in-charge of the Ghost Shadow Legion-Tianyu Cai Operation.” Lin Xuan heard the black-clothed woman’s words through Poison Blade and was rather surprised. “Ghost Shadow Legion-Tianyu Cai Operation? It seemed that not only did they want to find Tianyu Cai, but they also wanted to capture the Ghost Shadow Legion in one go. Thinking of this, Lin Xuan used an Advanced Observer skill on Sato Qingkong. —- Name: Sato Qingkong Level: Level Four Seventh Realm Profession: Great Curse Master (Peerless Golden) Attributes:? Skill: Group Weakening (Legendary Dark Gold), Fatal Beam (Legendary Dark Gold)… Equipment: Dead Man’s Staff (Peerless Golden)… —- Seeing this information, Lin Xuan frowned slightly, as if he had thought of something. Memories flashed in his mind and quickly froze on the leaders of the black-clothed people he encountered in the Hungry Ghost Village. That’s right! Although the other party had an extra name and she didn’t have the Curse Set… However, this person’s information was basically the same as the information he had seen on the leader of the black-clothed people that day! “Could it be the same person?” Lin Xuan’s heart surged. Seeing that he was silent, Sato Qingkong asked calmly, “What are you thinking?” At this moment, footsteps sounded. “You’re… Miss Sato?!” The shocked voice of the Kosaka City Section Chief suddenly sounded. Poison Blade turned around and saw the section chief of Kosaka City approaching with wide eyes. He bowed humbly to her. “Greetings, Miss Sato!” Sato Qingkong nodded slightly. “The leader has appointed me to be the new person-in-charge of the operation. I’m currently in charge of the 11 port cities in the south, including Kosaka City, Furuya City, and Inochi City.” The section chief of Kosaka City was even more humble and bowed even deeper. “Open the door. I want to go in,” Sato Qingkong said indifferently. The section chief of Kosaka City hurriedly took out his key and opened the entrance of the Secret Service Division. “Chief, who is this?” Poison Blade asked in a low voice. The section chief of Kosaka City exclaimed, “You don’t know? That’s right. You’re from Xia Country…” “Do you know Master Sato? He’s the second strongest person in the organization after the leader. Sato Qingkong is his daughter! He thinks highly of her!” Lin Xuan rubbed his temples. What was going on? Could it be that the daughter of the number two figure in High Heaven Plains was a member of the Ghost Shadow Group? If that was the case, this Sato Qingkong was too shrewd. Yesterday, they were still fighting to the death, but today, she appeared in front of them as if nothing had happened. Moreover, it was all thanks to his Great Purification Potion that the section chief of Kosaka City and the others were able to survive. From the perspective of the High Heaven Plains, Mu Qiang was someone who had contributed greatly. However, from the perspective of the Ghost Shadow Legion, Mu Qiang was someone they wanted dead. Sato Qingkong stood in front of him, but she did not reveal any ruthlessness on her face. She was really difficult to see through. “Or is it just that the information on the interface is a little similar? Is she not the leader of the black-clothed people?” Lin Xuan pondered deeply. “Come in, all of you. Don’t stand outside. When my people arrive later, I still have to reward you.” Sato Qingkong’s hollow and calm voice sounded from inside. “A reward?” Poison Blade went in, looking surprised. At this moment, Sato Qingkong had already sat down on the sofa in the hall of the Secret Service Division. Her long and beautiful legs were crossed like two intertwined black pythons. The section chief of Kosaka City personally made tea. Sato Qingkong took a sip of tea and said indifferently, “If not for you taking out the Great Purification Potion and helping the section chief of Kosaka City get rid of his negative statuses, I’m afraid you guys would have been completely wiped out yesterday. With such a huge contribution, even if you were originally from Xia Country, the organization would not treat you badly.” At this moment, several more people walked in. The person in the lead was a round-faced girl about 1.6 meters tall. She had a chubby face and heavy black-framed glasses. Generally speaking, after a martial artist leveled up, even if they did not increase their Constitution, their physical fitness would still slowly improve. Short-sightedness, rhinitis, and lumbar disc protrusion would naturally disappear as one’s level increased. However, this young girl was still wearing thick glasses, indicating that she might have learned a skill that consumed a lot of eye power. Behind the round-faced girl with glasses were two martial artists. They were both burly men. Poison Blade swept his gaze over. The three of them were all above level three Seventh Realm. “This is my assistant, Aida Mei. The two behind are martial artists sent by Father to protect me. They’re Sato 99 and Sato 100. Get to know them.” Aida Mei stretched out her hand shyly and shook hands with the section chief of Kosaka City and Poison Blade. As usual, Poison Blade used his High-Level Observer skill to observe her. He was first shocked before he did not know whether to laugh or cry. He did not expect their reunion in the High Heaven Plains to be like this. This Aida Mei was not Aida Mei at all, but… Lu Luo! “Li Weiguo’s high-level makeup skills are really impressive. Lu Luo clearly has an oval face and phoenix eyes, but after her makeup, she now has a baby face and round eyes.” Lin Xuan immediately cursed. “Mu Qiang, there are many women out there. There’s no need to hold on to my assistant like that, right?” Sato Qingkong frowned slightly. Only then did Lin Xuan realize that he was still holding Lu Luo’s hand and hurriedly let go. Aida Mei only smiled shyly and retreated to the side. Time slowly passed. Murata and the other martial artists arrived at the Secret Service Division one after another. Seeing Sato Qingkong and the others, these martial artists were very surprised. Miss Sato was also here! “Section Chief Fujiwara, everyone is here, right?” Sato Aoki said indifferently. “Everyone’s here.” Sato Qingkong uncrossed her legs and slowly stood up. “The leader has ordered for me to be appointed as the new person-in-charge of the Ghost Shadow Legion-Tianyu Cai Operation. I’ll be in charge of finding Tianyu Cai and surrounding the Ghost Shadow Legion.” “In addition, I also brought a commendation token this time. It’s for Mu Qiang.” Amy hurriedly stepped forward and handed the commendation token to Sato Qingkong. The expressions of the section chief of Kosaka City, Murata, and the others turned solemn, and their faces revealed joy. Mu Qiang had played a huge role that day. To exaggerate, if not for that bottle of Great Purification Potion, they would have all died! They were also happy for Mu Qiang to be rewarded by the higher-ups of the organization. “…I’ll specially reward Mu Qiang with 3,000 battle merits. He will be allowed to enter Reed Country. In addition, he can choose a golden item.” After Sato Qingkong finished speaking, she looked around. At this moment, Poison Blade also stayed true to Mu Qiang’s identity as he immediately stepped forward and bowed slightly. “Thank you for nurturing me! I will definitely work hard for the organization!” “You can choose to go to Reed Country to train now or continue to stay here,” Sato Qingkong said indifferently. “However, I advise you to stay here for a period of time. With your strength, you will definitely be able to obtain a large number of battle merits after this operation ends. At that time, it will be more stable for you to enter the Reed Country.” Lin Xuan laughed in his heart. This leader’s speech was basically an art form. Wasn’t she basically asking him to stay? “The operation has not been completed and the revenge for my colleague’s death has not been avenged. How can I leave alone?! Miss Sato, please rest assured. I will stay and fight together!” Poison Blade spoke loudly and generously. Clap! Clap! Clap! The section chief of Kosaka City was the first to applaud with tears in his eyes. Murata and the others immediately followed and applauded. They couldn’t help but feel that Mu Qiang was a great member of the High Heaven Plains! Sato Qingkong pressed his hands down, indicating for everyone to quiet down. “Contact the section chiefs of all the port cities in the south coast. I want them to conduct a city-wide search and register every martial artist.” “Tianyu Cai is bent on leaving High Heaven Plains. She must be in these port cities at the moment,” she said calmly. “Yes!” Everyone nodded heavily. “Mu Qiang, follow me to the warehouse. You should collect your golden item first.” Poison Blade followed him to the Secret Service Division warehouse and strolled around. He had seen the equipment, runes, and items areas but did not see anything suitable for him. “I didn’t expect your standards to be so high.” The Kosaka City section chief laughed loudly. As he passed by the skill book area, Lin Xuan suddenly saw a skill book through Poison Blade’s eyes. His eyes lit up. “This is it!” Poison Blade picked up the [Frost Demon King] and smiled. “This… Aren’t you an assassin?” The Kosaka City section chief was surprised. “Chief, to be honest, I’ve also learned a lot of ice-type skills. With this skill, my lethality will further increase.” Poison Blade immediately made up a story. The section chief nodded. Such a situation was quite common and not special. Many demon beasts had very high one-sided resistance, such as high physical resistance, high fire resistance, and so on. In this situation, martial artists needed to have multiple types of killing ability. If he only focused on physical attack power, he would definitely be useless if he encountered demon beasts with high physical resistance like the ghosts of the Little Spirit Mountain. It was very normal and wise for Mu Qiang to choose to take into account both physical damage and frost damage. “Frost Demon King! With this, I can synthesize the [Lord of the Elements] skill through the synthesis table! That’s a dark gold skill.” Lin Xuan entered his consciousness space. He stretched out his hand, and the three skills on his body, [Demon King of Fury], [Demon King of Mad Lightning], and [Demon King of Malice], transformed into three skill books. Coupled with this [Frost Demon King], the four skill books entered the synthesis table. Four different colors enveloped the synthesis table. More than twenty minutes later, the skill book flowing with dark golden light was freshly produced! —- Name: Lord of the Elements Level: Level Three Seventh Realm Grade: Legendary Dark Gold Effect 1: Permanent+25% all elemental damage, permanent+25% fire resistance, permanent+200 magic power. Effect 2: Consumes 30% of magic power,+35% all elemental damage,+45% all elemental resistance for 30 minutes. Effect 3: -30% of the magic power consumed by any elemental spell. -20% of the learning requirements for any elemental spell. Effect 4: 25% of the damage caused by any elemental spell will be converted into the corresponding elemental shield. —- Previously, he had used the Demon King of Fury more often, so Lin Xuan had long upgraded it to level six Seventh Realm. The other three did not improve much. The level of the [Lord of the Elements] was level three Seventh Realm. It was the average of the four skills. “Before synthesis, these had been four skills. I would have needed to spend fourfold the essence to increase all their levels.” “But now, it has become a single skill/ This directly reduces the consumption of essence by three-quarters. This is too awesome.” Lin Xuan sighed. The effect value of [Lord of the Elements] had increased completely. Moreover, compared to the other four skills, there was even a fourth effect. Perfect! At dusk. Sato Qingkong and her three followers were arranged to stay in the best hotel in Kosaka City. After dinner, this black-clothed lady stayed in the hotel and did not come out. Aida Mei left the hotel under the excuse of going for a walk. The lecherous traitor of the Construction Division today made her furious. She could not help but want to come out and relax. Soon, she arrived at the river near the hotel. The wind on the river blew gently, calming her thoughts. Only at this moment could she slowly tear down the disguise in her heart and temporarily show her former self. Lu Luo. “I became her assistant, but my chances to kill her have been rare.” “I can indeed kill her with the few chances I have, but I won’t be able to leave alive after killing her.” “More importantly, Sato Qingkong seems to have another identity. As a mage professional, she can actually avoid my perception and leave for several days before suddenly appearing beside me.” “What’s her other identity? Does she have a life-saving trump card?” Lu Luo looked at the surging river and thought of the greedy and lecherous traitor of the Construction Division, Mu Qiang. “What a traitor. He actually saved the people from the Secret Service Division. I can’t believe he was a martial artist of the Construction Division in the past!” Lu Luo gritted her teeth. She hated deception and betrayal! “If there’s a chance, I’ll kill this Mu Qiang too!” Lu Luo had already included Mu Qiang on her assassination list. “Miss Aida, why are you here alone?” However, a frivolous voice sounded from behind him. Lu Luo’s heart skipped a beat as she suddenly turned around. She was shocked to see Mu Qiang standing behind him! She had just added this person to her assassination list, and now this person was already here? Wasn’t this too much of a coincidence? However, even so, Lu Luo still displayed the qualities a spy should have. She instantly blushed. “Mr. Mu Qiang, why are you behind me? It’s very rude for you to follow a lady like this.” At this moment, Lin Xuan, who was far away on the Little Spirit Mountain, could not help but laugh. He had never seen Lu Luo speak with such a tone and expression before. “I’m from the Construction Division. You know that, right?” Lin Xuan controlled Poison Blade to walk to her side and leaned against the railing by the river. Lu Luo pushed her black-framed glasses and lowered her eyes. “I know.” Poison Blade smiled. “I can sense the same aura from you. You seem to be from the Construction Division too.” A ferocious glint appeared in Lu Luo’s eyes, but she quickly concealed it. “What are you talking about? Mr. Mu Qiang, I don’t understand. I grew up in the capital city.” She looked up with a puzzled expression. Poison Blade approached her ear and whispered, “Stop pretending. I know your name, Lu Luo.” Lu Luo almost took out her sickle from the storage compartment to cut off this guy’s head. However, she forcefully endured it. After all, the other party could have chosen to directly expose her instead of exposing her here. He definitely had a motive. Coupled with Mu Qiang’s personality and experience, his goal was definitely related to money or resources! Or perhaps it had something to do with his… lechery. “What do you want?” Lu Luo whispered. Poison Blade smiled and said, “I want to work with you.” Lu Luo was stunned. “How?” Poison Blade chuckled. “There’s a martial artist from the High Heaven Plains who wants to go to the Construction Division, but the ship control is strict now. She can’t find a single ship that can take her out of there.” Lu Luo nodded. “We can do this. Who’s this martial artist?” “Tianyu Cai.” Lu Luo: “???” “The eldest daughter of the Tianyu family?” Poison Blade shrugged. “Who else could it be?” Lu Luo frowned deeply. “Who are you?” Poison Blade waved his hand. “Let’s meet here tomorrow at this time. You can take your time to guess my identity.” By the hotel window. Sato Qingkong was holding a glass of red wine and saw this scene. “Mu Qiang is hitting on Aida Mei? What a lecherous and dirty man.” Extreme disgust flashed in her eyes. … In the apartment. When Poison Blade returned, he discovered that there was actually food on the dining table. Tianyu Lan sat quietly at the dining table and flipped through… a collection of handsome men. Mu Xiaoling was not in the bedroom and seemed to have gone out. Poison Blade stood behind her and looked. It was two muscular handsome men fencing. The two of them had thick, long, and powerful swords. They were ferocious. “Are you enjoying it?” Tianyu Lan nodded subconsciously. “Yes.” With that said, she realized that Mu Qiang was standing behind her. She hurriedly stood up and closed the atlas, her face flushed. “Mr. Mu, I, I, I…” “It’s fine, it’s fine. It’s normal for adults to be lecherous.” Poison Blade waved his hand and pointed at the dishes on the table. “Did you make these?” Tianyu Lan nodded. “I learned from the cooking manual and gave it a try.” “Looks good. Ling ate it too?” He picked up his chopsticks and was about to pick up a small black ball. “Is this a sesame ball?” “It’s a bun.” Poison Blade :”…” The chopsticks that were extended stopped on the spot. “Little Ling said it was quite delicious but told me not to make it next time. She ran out to buy food,” Tianyu Lan said awkwardly. Poison Blade sighed. “Have you ever thought that as a servant, it’s very abnormal for you to not know how to cook?” Tianyu Lan was stunned, then her expression changed. She suddenly took out a gold pocket watch from the storage compartment and waved it in front of Poison Blade. “It’s normal for house servants to not know how to cook… It’s normal for house servants to not know how to cook…” Lin Xuan immediately sensed this and a voice suddenly sounded in his mind. It was as if a charming voice was pulling him into a quagmire step by step. However, this situation only lasted for a short three seconds before his eyes quickly became clear. After all, his Constitution was 469? Was this a joke? Poison Blade grabbed the golden pocket watch. “Hypnosis?” Tianyu Lan’s face was completely pale. Poison Blade used another High-Level Observer skill. As expected, the information on Tianyu Lan was not “Tianyu Lan”, but Tianyu Cai! Lin Xuan’s thoughts flashed like lightning. Coupled with the golden pocket watch, hypnosis, and so on, he immediately formed a guess that was as accurate as 99%. The girl in front of him had always been Tianyu Cai! However, Tianyu Cai had used Hypnosis to hypnotize herself and told herself that she was Tianyu Lan. This allowed her to successfully disguise herself. In this way, if she thought that she was Tianyu Lan and others also thought that she was Tianyu Lan, she would really be Tianyu Lan! She would probably only leave the hypnosis state when a certain safety word was triggered. However, she could easily fall back into the hypnosis state again. It was even very likely that her profession was a hypnotist. Wonderful! After understanding this, even Lin Xuan gave her a thumbs up. Poison Blade sat down and said calmly, “Tianyu Cai, can you tell me why you want to leave the High Heaven Plains?” The blue-clothed girl had already completely lost her shyness. Instead, her eyes were filled with coldness. “I have nothing to say to a traitor of the Construction Division like you.” She crossed her arms and said coldly. Lin Xuan did not know whether to laugh or cry. After all, this was the daughter of Sky Feather Craftsman, the eldest daughter of the Tianyu Family, and the rich second generation heir of the High Heaven Plains! It was not like she was a member of the Construction Division. Wasn’t it a little strange for her to say this to him? “Then what if I tell you that I’m not Mu Qiang?” Poison Blade said helplessly. Tianyu Cai was stunned. “You’re not Mu Qiang?” Poison Blade smiled and said, “Just like you, I’ve also disguised myself. My true identity… is a spy planted by the Construction Division in the High Heaven Plains.” Since the other party’s identity had been exposed, there was naturally no need for him to continue hiding. Moreover, he was also very curious why Tianyu Cai had always wanted to escape from the High Heaven Plains and even hated his identity as a traitor of the Construction Division. Tianyu Cai’s beautiful eyes flashed. A spy from the Construction Division?! “Tell me, Miss Tianyu, why do you want to leave the High Heaven Plains?” Tianyu Cai took a few deep breaths and said what she had been holding in for a long time. “My father was bent on competing with that Chief Wan of the Construction Division. He studied a large number of mechanical blueprints, and I stole the most important and precious batch. I want to leave High Heaven Plains and hand them over to Chief Wan.” “In this way, the strength of the Construction Division will definitely increase greatly!” “The only thing that can help humanity rise is the Construction Division. The other organizations are all obstacles to the growth of the entire human race!” “If there’s a chance, I also want to… join the Construction Division and become a member.” Lin Xuan was first shocked before his eyes widened. Oh boy. Was her awareness that high? There was no doubt she would be able to become a member of the political party. “I agree with your opinion, but I really want to know how these perceptions of yours were formed. Logically speaking, you’re someone who has a vested interest in High Heaven Plains. Why would you betray High Heaven Plains?” Poison Blade asked. Tianyu Cai looked into his eyes and said solemnly, “Drowning City! Everything began with Drowning City!” “Demon beasts keep surging out of Drowning City. That place is closer to the Construction Division, but it’s not far from the High Heaven Plains. If no one surrounds them, those demon beasts will crazily attack the Construction Division and the High Heaven Plains. In the end, they will follow the current and arrive at every water area in the world.” “After all these years, the Construction Division has sacrificed their lives to stop Drowning City. High Heaven Plains is the beneficiary of all this! However, you also know what happened after that. Not only did this organization not thank the Construction Division, but… they even did incomparably despicable things!” Tianyu Cai gritted her teeth. “Before I escaped, I heard someone report to Father that they ambushed a powerful martial artist from the Construction Division in Drowning City and locked him in Reed Country!” “This matter has completely solidified my determination to escape from High Heaven Plains and head to the Construction Division!” Poison Blade’s eyes lit up. “Is that martial artist called Xiang Qiankan?” Tianyu Cai recalled and nodded heavily. “Yes.” “My goal for this trip is her! We have to save her.” Tianyu Cai revealed a difficult expression. “That’s a little difficult. According to what I know, the place where she was imprisoned is the Asura Prison of Reed Country. That place is very deep and is heavily guarded.” Poison Blade said in a low voice, “I’m only responsible for finding out the exact location. I’m not the one who will be breaking her out.” Lin Xuan knew his strength very well. He was invincible under the Eighth Realm. However, there were Ninth Realm martial artists in Reed Country. The job of saving her would naturally be for the Ninth Realm martial artists of the Construction Division to worry about. “I’ve said everything I can. Since you’re a spy from the Construction Division, do you have a way to bring me out of High Heaven Plains? I can’t wait any longer. Sooner or later, they’ll find me in Kosaka City!” Tianyu Cai looked anxious. “Yes, I’ll give you an answer tomorrow night at the latest.” Poison Blade nodded. “Alright!” Tianyu Cai’s beautiful eyes flashed with hope. The next day. Sato Qingkong asked Lu Luo to meet her. She stared into Lu Luo’s eyes and said in a low voice, “Mei, I saw what happened last night.” Lu Luo’s heart skipped a beat. What do you know? Sato Qingkong took a deep breath and said sternly, “That Mu Qiang actually dared to tease you! It’s one thing for him to hold your hand previously, but he actually paid you a visit in the evening! What a lecherous and despicable man!” Lu Luo :”…” That’s it? Lu Luo was almost scared to death. She pushed up her black-framed glasses and blushed. “Not really. Mr. Mu Qiang just wants to interact with me.” Sato Qingkong snorted. “Isn’t it because he’s lecherous? If he still dares to contact you, tell me and I’ll take care of it myself! It doesn’t matter if he has made any contributions or not. He’s not allowed to touch my people!” Lu Luo lowered her eyes and nodded slightly. “Alright, I still have some things to deal with. You can leave first.” Sato Qingkong waved his hand. Lu Luo walked out of the office and closed the door. Sato Qingkong’s assistants had already changed more than ten times. Every one of them was a young girl who looked similar to Aida Mei. They were all round-faced, cute, and easily shy. Lu Luo guessed that this might be Sato Qingkong’s special hobby. This woman probably said the same thing to every assistant. “It’s time to find that guy.” Lu Luo walked around the Secret Service Division and quickly saw Poison Blade. Poison Blade also understood. The two of them walked out of the Secret Service Division building one after another and circled twice before walking to a place in the back of the building that few people passed. Lu Luo even deliberately avoided the windows so that it would be extremely difficult for others to discover her. Lu Luo handed over a note. “I’ve already discussed it with the informant. Her new identity has also been arranged for the merchant ship tonight.” Poison Blade nodded and accepted it. “It’s time to tell me your identity.” Lu Luo looked straight into his eyes. Poison Blade smiled. “Do you have a guess?” Lu Luo bit her lip. “You should be a spy too, but I left the Construction Division early. I don’t know who else left after me.” Poison Blade smiled. “Alright, alright, I won’t tease you anymore. I’m Poison Blade. You should have some impression of me, right, Miss Lu Luo?” Lu Luo was enlightened. “So it’s you? That makes sense. You’re very suitable for this job.” She had also heard about Poison Blade’s achievements on the Little Spirit Mountain. “Why are you hiding beside Sato Qingkong?” He smiled. Lu Luo took a deep breath. “To kill her.” Poison Blade raised his eyebrows slightly. “Sato Qingkong’s profession is a Great Curse Master. Could it be…” Lu Luo nodded. “Back then, when I fought her, she obtained an extremely powerful one-time curse item from her father. Not only did it directly reduce my level to the Third Realm, but it also transformed my appearance into that of a little girl.” “However, this is not a bad thing. Instead, it allowed me to eat all the various attribute items and increase my strength again, consolidating my foundation.” “I’ve even become stronger than before.” She smiled confidently. “But you can’t kill Sato Qingkong and escape safely,” Poison Blade said with a smile. Lu Luo nodded again. “She seems to have another identity. She’s clearly a mage, but she can suddenly disappear and appear many times.” Hearing Lu Luo’s description, Lin Xuan could almost confirm his previous guess. Sato Qingkong was probably the leader of the black-clothed people! He then described his guess to Lu Luo in detail. Lu Luo gasped. Never in a million years would she have expected that Sato Qingkong was actually a member of the Ghost Shadow Legion! However, after Poison Blade said this, everything seemed to be quickly confirmed. The Ghost Shadow Legion wanted to chase after Tianyu Cai. Sato Qingkong had also been very anxious about Tianyu Cai. A few months ago, the higher-ups of the Ghost Shadow Legion had escaped from the huge net woven by the Ninth Realm martial artists Sato Take and Forger Tianyu. This probably had to do with Sato Qingkong! This was because she was the daughter of martial artist Sato Take. It was easy for her to come into contact with this information! Poison Blade’s words enlightened her. “I can work with you to kill Sato Qingkong. After killing her, I can even make sure that it won’t cause a large-scale reaction in High Heaven Plains.” Poison Blade nodded. “However, we need an excellent opportunity.” Lu Luo’s beautiful eyes moved. “You mean we should kill her when she’s acting as the leader of the Ghost Shadow Legion?” Poison Blade smiled. “Correct.” … The night gradually darkened. However, the Secret Service Division in Kosaka City was brightly lit. The section chief of Kosaka City was very excited because they had discovered the traces of the Ghost Shadow Legion! “Strange, where’s Miss Sato? I was just about to tell her this news. Why isn’t she here?” He knocked on Sato’s empty office, but it was empty. “Miss Aida, do you know…?” Lu Luo shook her head. “Miss suddenly left. She said that she had something to do.” The Kosaka City section chief scratched his head and looked at the two burly bodyguards behind Lu Luo. “Forget it, it’s fine. With Miss Sato’s two bodyguards, we have the combat strength of two more Eighth Realm martial artists. I also invited the new section chief of Furuya City to help. It’s enough.” He did not know where Sato Qingkong had gone, but since her assistant and two bodyguards were here, it was fine. “Pass my order. Surround the port immediately! We strongly suspect that the Ghost Shadow Legion has discovered Miss Tianyu’s traces before us!” The Kosaka City Section Chief shouted. The martial artists of the Secret Service Division began to work. Poison Blade and Lu Luo looked at each other and saw the smile in each other’s eyes. Poison Blade and Lu Luo were the ones that revealed this news. As expected, the Ghost Shadow Legion were the first to receive this news and immediately headed to the port to investigate the whereabouts of Tianyu Cai. Now, the martial artists of the Secret Service Division in Kosaka City had also discovered the traces of the Ghost Shadow Legion. Very soon, the two sides would fight. At that time, they would be able to take advantage of the situation. At this moment, the real Tianyu Cai was in a house near the Secret Service Division. She sat here uneasily and looked at the port that seemed very calm. “Wait, keep waiting here. After the chaos calms down, you can take a ship to leave High Heaven Plains.” Poison Blade’s words still echoed in her mind. “I almost have no one to rely on now, so I can only listen to him.” Tianyu Cai took a deep breath and tried her best to maintain her composure. At the port. The Ghost Shadow Legion had no intention of hiding at all. They immediately started a large-scale search. They entered every ship and saw and searched every girl. As long as they had a chance to find Tianyu Cai, they would not hesitate. On the roof of a three-story house near the port, a figure wrapped in tight black clothes stood steadily. Her gaze roamed the port. She was not worried that the Secret Service Division would discover the Ghost Shadow Legion. As long as she could find and kill Tian Yucai before the martial artists of the Secret Service Division arrived, it was enough. However, for some reason, the woman’s sharp intuition told her that something was wrong tonight. However, she really could not tell what was wrong. If there was something abnormal, it should be the source of the news. The people they had planted in the port had sent news that someone had seen someone suspected to be Tianyu Cai enter the port with a possible intention of boarding the ship. However, Tianyu Cai had been hidden for so long. Why would she appear at this critical moment? “It’s enough as long as I complete the mission. I can’t be bothered to think about nonsense.” Sato Qingkong shook her head and threw away the messy thoughts in her mind. The night wind blew, fluttering her tight black clothes and accentuating her voluptuous figure. However, at this moment, she saw the people from the Secret Service Division arrive! The section chief of Kosaka City, the new section chief of Furuya City, and the two Eighth Realm martial artists of the Sato family walked at the front. Behind them were Murata, Hirano Yuta, Mu Qiang, and the other special forces martial artists. Of course, there was also her little assistant, Aida Mei. “They came a little early.” Sato Qingkong frowned slightly, but she quickly relaxed. “It’s fine. If they interfere with my mission, it’s the same even if I kill them all. However, it’s a pity for me to kill Mei like this…” Hirano Yuta was the first to see the black-clothed people searching for Tianyu Cai in the port. His eyes immediately turned red. “Kill!” Murata and the others immediately followed. The last time they fought, the Ghost Shadow Legion had killed many of their people. This time, he had to retaliate. It was not only to complete the mission given by the higher-ups, but also to take revenge! Shouts and the sound of metal colliding suddenly sounded in the port. The low-level martial artists screamed and dodged. They were too weak and were bound to die once they became involved in such a battle. Even if they only suffered a slight hit, they would still be seriously injured. “There are indeed Eighth Realm martial artists among them, and there’s more than one!” As soon as the section chief of Kosaka City fought the other party, he immediately realized that the other party was extraordinary. The new section chief of Furuya City was the same. At this moment, a large number of black and red lights descended from the sky and enveloped most of the people. The chief of Kosaka City could not dodge in time and was still hit by the Group Weakening. Just like last time, a large number of negative statuses immediately hung on his body like maggots. However, this time, the section chief of Kosaka City did not panic. Instead, he immediately took out several bottles of Purification Potions and drank them while blocking the other party’s attack. He had long known that the leader of these Ghost Shadow Legion was a mage who was proficient in reducing magic. He was not prepared last time. Before coming this time, he had already applied for many Purification Potions. Although they didn’t have any Great Purification Potions, they still had many Purification Potions. He himself was equipped with six bottles. The other martial artists more or less prepared one to two bottles. As for why they were so well-equipped, the reason was very simple. The Eighth Realm martial artists were the key to victory. If an Eighth Realm martial artist fell because of too many negative statuses, it would be useless even if a Seventh Realm martial artist removed all of their negative statuses. The battle had reached its climax from the beginning. Poison Blade was also fighting the martial artists of the Ghost Shadow Legion in front of him. This Group Weakening was almost useless to him, and the negative status quickly disappeared on its own. However, he did not quickly kill the martial artists in front of him. Instead, he dealt with the enemy while observing the surrounding situation secretly. He was searching for the person who had released the Group Weakening, Sato Qingkong. Aside from him, Lu Luo was also searching for her. “Found her!” When Poison Blade’s gaze swept past a roof, his high-level perception allowed him to see the graceful figure that had almost fused with the night! He shouted and erupted as his sword directly pierced through the hearts of the martial artists from the Ghost Shadow Legion in front of him. “I actually triggered a critical hit! Beautiful!” he shouted. His voice was very loud, and even the surrounding people in the noisy battle could hear him clearly. Lu Luo also heard it. “Go to hell!” Poison Blade shouted again and pounced towards a martial artist from the Ghost Shadow Legion beside him. As he fought, he also closed the distance between him and the house where Sato Qingkong was standing. Lu Luo noticed this scene and also approached imperceptibly as she fought. Poison Blade’s loud shout just now was the signal that they had agreed on a long time ago. When he approached the lower part of the house, he suddenly stared at the top and shouted, “There’s someone up there!” After saying that, he directly put down the Ghost Shadow Warriors in front of him and turned to directly attack Sato clear sky heart. Sato didn’t expect Mu Qiang to suddenly notice her, and he attacked her without saying a word. In her opinion, she had fused perfectly with the night, and no one present had noticed her! Even if Mu Qiang approached the house, she would only treat it as a normal movement during a battle. Mu Qiang’s attack was completely unexpected. In her haste, Sato Qingkong could only forcefully block it. A yellow leaf the size of a human face suddenly appeared and blocked between her and the poison blade. Clang! The Poison Blade’s short sword stabbed into the yellow leaf, but it did not easily pierce through it. Instead, there was the sound of metal colliding! He looked down and saw that the durability of his short sword had decreased by quite a bit. However, the yellow leaf in front of him shattered instantly. It turned into dust and disappeared with the night wind. At this moment, the chief of Kosaka City, Koya City, and the others looked over. “That yellow leaf seems to be produced from the Dragon Mountain Range controlled by the Knights of Truth! It can forcefully block any attack below a level 9 warrior!”The chief of Kosaka City exclaimed. Kosaka City’s section chief’s gaze was gloomy. “That guy must have a very high position in the Ghost Shadow Horde!” “Muqiang! I’ll leave that person to you. You must capture him alive!”Murata Yong also roared. Poison Blade did not waste any more words as he moved forward. His short sword cut through the air and stabbed at all the vital parts of Sato Haruta’s body. Sato Haruta was a mage after all, so she could only retreat continuously. However, her agility was higher than Lin Xuan had imagined, and she actually dodged several attacks consecutively. At this time, Sato Haruko took out something new from her bosom. It was a small bottle filled with a dark green viscous liquid. When poison blade stabbed again, she directly smashed the bottle over. Crack! The small bottle quickly shattered, and the dark green viscous liquid quickly wrapped around the short sword. Poison Blade subconsciously released the short sword. As expected, the liquid instantly wrapped around the short sword, and a foul smell immediately spread out from within. At the same time, thick black smoke also appeared. Sato qingkong used this opportunity to jump to another roof, quickly pulling away from poison blade. Poison Blade looked down again, and the short sword was actually corroded into only the hilt within a short period of time! He felt his heart ache. This was a gold grade weapon, yet it had been eaten just like that. “Now, you can only use your backup weapon. Let’s see how you can fight me!” Sato harrumphed coldly and took out her staff. Immediately, a black-red light enveloped poison blade. Weakening! Seven to eight negative statuses immediately enveloped poison blade. Sato harrumphed coldly. However, in just five seconds, the dark red light enveloping the poison blade’s body disappeared without a trace. The Poison Blade’s speed instantly increased explosively, closing the short distance in an instant. In mid-air, he even took out another short sword from his storage compartment! That weapon was shockingly shining with a golden light! The corroded golden short sword was only the most compatible with the poison Blade’s equipment, skills, and rune group. But that didn’t mean that he didn’t have any other backup weapons. In fact, because equipment had durability, many martial artists would prepare another set of equipment apart from this set of equipment, just in case they needed it. Otherwise, they would be fighting halfway. Hey Hey! The durability of the equipment dropped to zero, and it directly shattered. Then what was the point of playing. However, the quality and level of the backup equipment were generally not high. For most martial artists, they usually used gold equipment, and the spare equipment was usually purple equipment. Very few martial artists’spare equipment was also gold. Because...; they really didn’t have any money. Sato Haruka was originally sneering. But when she saw poison blade directly take out a gold weapon, she was shocked. This Mu Qiang had a very deep background! “Damn it...; and he actually cleared the negative status on his body so quickly. Could it be that he still has a great purification potion? !” Sato qingkong immediately waved her staff and weakened it again. “Then I’d like to see how many bottles of grand purifying potion you have!” The dark red light enveloped her, and the negative status appeared again. Poison Blade didn’t have any intention of drinking the grand purifying potion. Instead, he held his short sword and stabbed at Sato Qingkong’s tall chest. Sato Qingkong didn’t expect this person to be so ruthless, directly exchanging injuries for injuries. She cried out in surprise, and yellow leaves appeared in front of her again. Whoosh! Flash! However, her vision blurred, and poison blade’s figure suddenly disappeared. Sato haruta was both shocked and angry. Where was he? ! A huge force suddenly emerged from behind. Poison Blade’s 43-yard-long foot ruthlessly kicked her butt. Sato Haruta lost her balance and directly flew out. She tried her best to change her position in mid-air and landed safely with the armor on her chest. Poison Blade continued his pursuit. One of them chased after the other and disappeared into the main battlefield. Lu Luo shouted, “Section chiefs, I’ll go help him!” “Go, you must bring back the leader of the Ghost Shadow Horde Alive!”Kosaka section chief shouted. “Yes!” Lu Luo responded and chased after him. Dang dang dang! Poison Blade’s short sword stabbed down three times in a row. But every time, a huge yellowed leaf would appear in front of Sato Haruko, blocking the attack. She could also use the gap between the attacks to try her best to increase the distance between them. However, every time she increased the distance between them, Poison Blade would quickly catch up to her. The two of them quickly changed their battle position in just two minutes and arrived at the street near the sea. “Die!” Poison Blade stabbed again, aiming straight at Sato Haruko’s heart. * Puchi * . Blood gushed out crazily, and poison burst out. However, feeling the sensation of stabbing into his flesh, Poison Blade knew that this attack did not kill Sato’s heart instantly. “The front armor is too thick, I almost managed to stab her heart!” Poison Blade immediately drew his sword and stabbed again. At the same time, he also learned a lesson. When fighting with a woman, one must pay attention to the thickness of the front armor. If it was very thick, if one wanted to kill her in one hit, one had to infuse more power into it. PFFT! But this attack still made Sato clear her heart feel the threat of death. She coughed out blood and kept retreating. Her beautiful eyes were filled with fear. As the eldest daughter of the Sato family, she was spoiled and had never experienced such a battle. As the small leader of the Phantom Horde, she only needed to release all kinds of skills in a safe place and give negative statuses. There was no need for her to go up and fight to the death. It was precisely because of this that she had no choice but to use all of her trump cards when she was forced by poison blade to engage in close combat! “Damn it!” Sato clear sky shrieked in her heart and suddenly crushed a golden skull. An ear-piercing shriek suddenly sounded from within the skull and engulfed poison blade’s mind. Poison Blade immediately felt a terrifying sound wave as if it really existed. It was like a massive hammer that was crazily attacking his brain. The pain from his brain also caused his hand movements to temporarily stiffen. Right now, there was only one thought in his mind. This Miss Sato really had a lot of life-saving trump cards in her hands! Two yellow talismans suddenly lit up on Sato’s hollow and slender calves. Bang! Her speed instantly soared. This time, she directly pulled away from poison blade by more than 100 meters! “Damned thing, next time I’ll definitely use my power to find an excuse to kill you!” Sato Haruka gritted her teeth, and she frantically jumped out of the way. “You don’t have a chance.” The round-faced girl carried a huge black sickle, and rushed out from the long alley to her left. The black sickle ruthlessly slashed down, and cleanly slashed across her slender and fair neck! * Ka-cha * . A clear sky doll pinned to Sato’s waist exploded into ashes! He was stunned. Because this round-faced girl was precisely the same AI Tianmei whom he had spent a lot of time with! She even thought that after completing this mission, she would strip this shy round-faced girl naked and throw her onto her own bed to enjoy. But what was going on? ! At this moment, Poison Blade’s high vitality had helped him get rid of the mental shock state. He stomped on the ground and rushed over. “You actually betrayed me? !” Sato clear air let out an incredulous shriek. She glared at Lu Luo with incomparable hatred and was about to jump into the sea to escape! Lu Luo was also stunned. That clear sky doll could actually be a scapegoat! “Don’t just stand there. She doesn’t have any more tools to take the fall. She doesn’t have any more trump cards!” Poison blade shouted. At this moment, Sato Clear Sky’s hands, head, and upper body had already sunk into the sea. Only her two calves were still on the surface of the water. If she were to dive into the sea, she might really be able to escape with the help of the darkness! At that time, she would be in trouble. Poison Blade’s words made Lu Luo react quickly. The black sickle in her palm instantly disappeared, and a set of black chains appeared in its place. She quickly threw out the chains and accurately wrapped them around Sato’s calves that had yet to enter the water! “Don’t even think about running!” Lu Luo suddenly exerted strength with both her arms and pulled hard, pulling Sato out of the water. Sato’s face was filled with despair. At this time, Poison Blade had already crossed a short distance of 100 meters. The short sword in her hand accurately stabbed into Sato’s heart. This time, it was from the back, so there was no need to consider the fat in front of her. Sato’s HP plummeted like a waterfall! She had already used up all her trump cards, and there was no way for her to escape anymore. She glared at the round-faced girl with hatred, but she was already in a daze. “You...; who...; Are You!” Lu Luo revealed a victorious smile. “Seeing that you’re about to die, I’ll tell you...;” She slowly squatted down and sneered in Sato’s clear heart’s longing eyes. “If I don’t tell you, I’ll Piss You Off!” Pu! Sato’s clear heart spat out a mouthful of blood as his HP fell to zero! Sato clear heart died. Many items dropped from her body at random. These items were at least gold in color, and one of them was even dark gold in color. “The blindfold leaf...; no wonder it can block my high-level observation skill.” Poison Blade picked up the palm-sized leaf and looked at its effect carefully before nodding slightly. It was a valuable item from the Kunlun ruins. Logically speaking, this item was prohibited from being exported. No one knew how it ended up here. Apart from the dark gold item, there was also a golden cursing master set. This item could be sold for a good price no matter where it was placed. “The Sato martial artist gave her too many good things. He also gave her a scapegoat item. However, he didn’t give her the Ghost Buddha’s lamp. Otherwise, we wouldn’t have been able to kill her.”Poison blade sighed. Using the Ghost Buddha lamp would cause one’s body to be surrounded by ghost flames. One wouldn’t be able to receive attacks or attack others. In just a few seconds, one would be teleported to the Wei Ming country. However, each time she used it, her level would drop. Almost every time, her level would drop by one level. “She told me about this when she was free. Her father was afraid that she would take risks everywhere with the Ghost Buddha lamp, but that would seriously drop her level, so he deliberately didn’t give her the Ghost Buddha lamp. Instead, he gave her another life-saving tool. It should be the sunny baby.”Lu Luo nodded. “And the clear sky doll is?” “If I’m not mistaken, it should be produced in Wei Ming country, but I’ve never seen it before. It’s very likely that it’s been hidden by takama-ga-hara and rarely taken out.” “What do we do now?”Lu Luo pointed at Sato’s clear sky doll’s corpse. “Destroy the corpse and cover the tracks. Pretend that she’s missing. We’ll report back later and say that we lost her.”Poison Blade smiled. Lu Luo nodded. After destroying the corpse, the two of them even cleaned up the blood stains to ensure that there weren’t any loopholes left. Then, the two of them returned to the battlefield. There were four rank 8 martial artists here due to Kosaka City’s section chief and the others, while the Phantom Horde only had two rank 8 martial artists. The Phantom Horde was at a disadvantage from the start. While poison blade and Lu Luo were chasing after Sato, Kosaka City’s section chief’s battle had also entered the end. “You...; didn’t catch that leader?”When Murata Yong saw that they had returned empty-handed and dejected, he immediately exclaimed. “Yeah, he ran too fast.”Poison Blade’s face was filled with frustration. Lu Luo also pushed up her black-rimmed glasses and nodded repeatedly. “We had already stabbed him, but unfortunately, that guy had too many trump cards, so we still let him escape.” Kosaka City’s section chief walked over and patted his shoulder. “It’s fine, it’s fine. Don’t be disheartened. Other than the leader who escaped, all the ghosts who entered the harbor have already been captured!” “Yes, it’s all thanks to you guys chasing after that leader, forcing him to be unable to use group weakening.”Kosaka City’s new section chief also walked over. “Otherwise, we would have to go through some trouble to deal with these tier 8 martial artists.” Hirano Sunta’s eyes were bloodshot as he panted heavily. “Damn it, it was that leader who killed my father. He actually escaped!” Poison blade rubbed his nose. He really wanted to say that he had avenged your father for you. But he also knew that he absolutely couldn’t say this. If he claimed that he had killed the leader of the Ghost Shadow Gang, then the others would ask him where the corpse was. Then, they would find out that this person’s real identity was actually Sato Haruko. Sato Haruko was the daughter of a Sato martial artist! No matter what Sato Haruko did or what identity he had, if the news that he had killed his daughter reached his ears, what would that tier 9 martial artist do? It was very likely that he would directly kill his way over from Reynamo! Hence, he could not admit it. He would just treat it as if he had run away and disappeared. “Clean up the battlefield! While you’re at it, find out if Miss Tianyu Cai is here,”the Kosaka City section chief shouted. “Yes!” The martial artists immediately scattered and searched for Tianyu Cai. Naturally, they could not find her. This was because Tianyu Cai was still in a house outside the port. After searching for about half an hour without any results, the Kosaka City section chief did not waste any more time searching. “We came out to kill the Ghost Shadow Group Tonight. Sorry to trouble everyone. Now disperse and go home to have a good rest.” After the boss gave the order, the secret service martial artists naturally went back to their own homes to find their own mothers. Those who were hungry went to eat, those who were thirsty went to drink. There were also people who ran straight to the custom shop to take care of the weak woman in shabby clothes. Soon, the port returned to peace. When the low-level warriors saw the secret service department disperse, they returned to their posts and continued to work. The business relationship between Gao Tian Yuan and the construction department was their biggest source of profit. In simple terms, it was Master Dao. They bought the products of Gao Tian Yuan at a low price and sold them to the construction department at a high price. For the profit, it was worth staying up all night to work. Not long after, a girl with a gray face arrived. Poison Blade and Lu Luo did not accompany her, because that would leave some traces. The girl followed the note that poison blade gave her and quickly found an ordinary merchant ship. Here, many low-level warriors were laboriously loading all kinds of materials. Those items that were of higher value and smaller in size were placed in the storage compartments of the captain and his trusted crew. However, these ordinary materials were too large to be placed in the storage compartments, so they still had to rely on transportation to transport them. The young girl came here and tried her best to calm her emotions. “Brother-in-law! Brother-in-law!” A middle-aged man wearing a cap walked out. He glanced at the young girl and asked in puzzlement, “Why did your sister ask you to come?” The young girl smiled helplessly. “Sister was worried that you were looking for a woman outside, so she asked me to stay by your side to supervise...;” The crew members at the side laughed loudly. “Captain, I didn’t expect you to be so strict with your wife.” “Captain, sister-in-law doesn’t trust you very much, right?” The middle-aged man wearing a cap blushed slightly. “Alright, Alright, then come in.” The girl nodded and followed him in. The two of them entered the cabin one after the other. At this moment, there was no one in the cabin. The middle-aged man in the cap lowered his voice and said, “This is your cabin. Don’t come out. I’ll send you three meals a day.” The girl nodded repeatedly and closed the door after entering the cabin. She was naturally tian yucai. The conversation between her and the captain was a set of passwords compiled by Lu Luo. Such passwords would not be too eye-catching. Even if others heard it, they would just laugh it off. More importantly, the captain’s wife really had a sister! Everything could be matched. Even if the Secret Service department really did find some clues on this, they would not be able to find any clues. By then, Tian Yucai would have arrived safely at the construction department. .. On the second day after the Kosaka City port was cleared of the Ghost Shadow crowd. A commendation order was issued from Kyoto City. The Kosaka City section chief, the new section chief of Kosaka City, and the others received the commendation. What made the Takama-ga-hara higher-ups furious was that the person in charge of the normal operation, Sato Haruko, suddenly disappeared? ! Kyoto city. Takama-ga-hara’s chief’s office. Under the desk stood Sato martial artist and Sky Feather Craftsman. The leader’s expression was terrifyingly gloomy. “Warrior, I’ve appointed your daughter as the person in charge of this operation. Tell me, why did she abandon her responsibility and disappear when she needed her the most? !” The leader stared coldly at the Sato warrior. The air in the office seemed to be so cold that it could freeze into ice. The Sato warrior’s forehead was covered in cold sweat. He wanted to know too. “I’ll give you three days to find your daughter and find out what happened! Otherwise, you’ll be punished yourself,”the leader said coldly with a gloomy face. Sato gritted his teeth. “Yes!” The punishment the leader mentioned was to make him hand over a part of the secret realms he controlled. The secret realms in takama-ga-hara were different from the construction department. The powerful rank 9 martial artists almost all controlled some secret realms, and these secret realms became their and their family’s private property. The reason why the Sato martial artist could have a large number of martial artists working for him and not takama-ga-hara was that he controlled nine secret realms, and they were all very rich. The attribute items and skill books that they produced were very popular. Compared to him, the sky feather craftsman was a lot weaker. He only controlled four secret realms, and only one of them was relatively rich. The other three produced very little. As for the other rank nine martial artists, there were even fewer. There were only two more, and there were even fewer. The leader wanted him to hand over the secret realms in his hands. That made his heart ache even more than cutting off his flesh. The Sato martial artist accepted the order and left. The leader walked to the Skyfeather Craftsman and patted him on the shoulder, “Craftsman, I understand your feelings. I have always been concerned about your daughter’s safety. Although your daughter usually has some bad tendencies, no matter what, she is still your daughter. I will definitely bring her to you safely.” The Skyfeather Craftsman was so moved that his eyes turned red. He nodded repeatedly. His daughter, Tian yucai, had always shown a strong impression of the construction department. There was even one time that she even said in front of him that she wanted to become a foreign agent in the construction department. This matter spread like wildfire. In the end, even the leader knew about it. The Sky Feather Craftsman did not expect that even so, the leader did not have the slightest bit of distance between them. He still placed Tian Yucai’s safety on his mind. “Don’t worry too much. Just focus on designing the machine. I believe that the day when you surpass the ten thousand travel gap will not be too far away!”The leader encouraged him seriously. The Sky Feather Craftsman nodded excitedly. “Yes!” He also turned around and left with an excited expression. The leader’s recognition of his machine level was the greatest encouragement to him. After watching him leave, the leader withdrew his gaze. “Sato Haruko received the news that Sky Feather Cai might be at the port of Kosaka City first. She immediately left and went to the upper part of the port to suppress the enemy. She released her weakened group, but she was chased by two martial artists. In the end, the two secret service martial artists reported that Sato Haruko was injured and jumped into the sea to escape.” “However, the news from the Ghost Shadow Group indicated that Sato Haruko did not return...;” “Dead?” The leader paced back and forth. After a short moment of thought, a cold smile appeared on her face. “Regardless of whether she is dead or alive, she has seriously derelict her duties this time. I can use this opportunity to weaken the strength of the ambitious Sato martial artist.” “As for the Skyfeather Craftsman, she is just a ninth rank martial artist who is obsessed with machinery. She has no ambition at all. We can make good use of her at the moment.” The leader stood in front of the window, looking at the flourishing night scene of the capital city. He could just see the Sato martial artists walking out of the capital’s secret service department, frowning as they walked alone on the street. The leader’s cold face was reflected in the glass. “The Highheaven Plains is my highheaven plains. Do you think I don’t know that you’ve secretly come into contact with the Ghost Shadow Horde?” Sato Takeshi brought his trusted aides to Kosaka City as quickly as possible. Great Chattcha! From the time and place of the battle, the participants, to every detail, he asked in great detail. Kosaka City’s section chief originally thought that Sato Takeshi was here to issue a commendation order. In the end, Sato Takeshi’s lineup almost scared him to death. The other Secret Service department martial artists were the same. All of them shrunk their necks in fear. Poison Blade and Lu Luo were the same as the other martial artists. They also shrunk their necks, showing the fear that normal martial artists should have towards the Sato martial artist. During this period, the Sato martial artist also personally questioned the two of them about the details of chasing after the leader of the Ghost Shadow Group. However, Poison Blade and Lu Luo’s answers were smooth, and they insisted that the leader had escaped into the sea after being injured by them. Even if poison blade and Lu Luo were asked separately, their answers didn’t differ much. The Sato martial artist was anxious, but he couldn’t touch the two of them. In the end, he could only let them go back. He knew long ago that his daughter was the leader of the Ghost Shadow Group. This position was even specially requested by him to the leader of the Ghost Shadow Group, also known as “Ghost Shadow”. Sato harano-kun didn’t need to personally take up this position. He only needed to cast his skills at a safe place. But even so, he had suddenly disappeared? Sato martial artist felt very uneasy. It had been so long, but his daughter hadn’t appeared in any identity. It was very likely that she was already dead. This was the daughter that he had spent a lot of effort and effort to nurture! One day later, Sato Takeshi left with his trusted aide. At the same time he left, he also brought three people with him. Poison Blade, Lu Luo, and Hirano Suntai. Because poison blade had accumulated enough battle merits, he could enter the reed country. Lu Luo’s undercover identity was AI Tianmei. Sato suntai had promised her long ago that after this operation was over, she could also enter the reed country to gain experience. As for Hirano Yangtai, his father had fought to the death with the Ghost Shadows and received the Chief’s Commendation. He had also received special permission to enter the Wei Ming country. The Sato martial artists wanted to slap poison blade and Lu Luo to death. Their daughter had been injured by the two of them. But he could kill them, but he couldn’t bear the consequences after killing them. What would the chief think of killing those who had contributed? This time, he was going back to Kyoto City to receive his punishment. If he killed the two martial artists who had done meritorious deeds, the leader’s attitude towards him would probably be even more disgusted. The straight line between Kosaka City and Kyoto City was not far, but the terrain was mostly steep during this period, so it took him a total of eight days to arrive at Kyoto City. After arriving at Kyoto City, the Sato martial artist randomly assigned a person to arrange accommodation for the three of them, and he hurriedly ran to the Secret Service department to find the leader to punish them. “The three of you, follow me.” The martial artist had an arrogant expression as he led the three of them to a reception apartment in the Secret Service Department. “Choose your own room. Tell the attendant what you want to eat.”After saying this, the martial artist immediately turned around and left without saying a word. “The two of you, why don’t we have a meal together?”Poison Blade said with a smile. “That’s fine.”Lu Luo nodded. However, Ping Yeyang firmly shook his head. “I want to seize the time to become stronger. I Can’t waste time eating with you guys.” Poison Blade couldn’t help but laugh. “The leader of the Ghost Shadow Group who killed your father mysteriously went missing. You’ve already taken your revenge. Why are you still pushing yourself?” Ping Yeyang’s eyes shot out a resentful gaze. “He’s dead, but the Ghost Shadow Group isn’t destroyed. My goal has changed. I want to become stronger. I want to completely destroy the Ghost Shadow Group!” After saying this, he directly left the apartment. “Where is he going?”Poison Blade asked casually. Lu Luo said, “There’s a heart stream martial school in the capital. The school master is an eighth rank martial artist. He’s very good at guiding martial artists. Ping Yeyang must have gone there to temper himself.” Poison Blade smacked his lips. “Then let’s have a meal together?” “That’s fine.” The two of them ordered some dishes and then ate in the dining room of the apartment. Here, they could order delicacies from all over the world. Western Chinese food, Japanese and Korean food, everything was available. However, in order to fit the two of them as undercover agents, Poison Blade ordered Mu Qiang’s favorite home-cooked dishes while Lu Luo ordered ai Tianmei’s favorite mild-wind dishes. After eating and drinking their fill, the two of them said goodbye to each other and walked into their respective rooms. .. At the same time, the construction of Si Xia Jing City. Wan youxi and the girl in front of him stared at each other. “I seriously doubt your identity.”Wan youxi circled around her with a serious face. Tian yucai said aggrievedly, “President Wan, I’m really Tian yucai. I came back through your construction division’s ship. It was one of your spies who sent me back.” “Can you tell me his name?” Tian yucai scratched her head. “Didn’t I say it just now? His undercover identity is called Mu Qiang. You should be able to find out, right?” Wan youxi sneered. “I’m in charge of the research and development of the construction division. I’m not in charge of undercover intelligence.” Tian yucai,”...;” Although the level nine martial artists in the construction division had a good relationship with each other, at this position and with so many construction division agents under them, the most taboo thing was to have overlapping functions. Moreover, it was a very confidential list of undercover agents. Wan youxi naturally could not and would not take the initiative to get access to this information. Deng Deng Deng. The sound of footsteps could be heard. A warrior walked in quickly, handed over a piece of information, and whispered in Wan youxi’s ear. Wan youxi nodded slightly and quickly glanced at the information. Only then did his expression gradually ease up. “I have already received the information and can roughly confirm your identity,”Wan youxi said faintly, “Speak. What exactly do you want to do here? You are the daughter of the Skyfeather craftsman. As far as I know, the Skyfeather Craftsman has always been very bad to me.” Tian yucai said excitedly, “I stole father’s mechanical blueprints!” After saying this, she took out a large number of mechanical blueprints from her storage compartment. At a glance, there were hundreds of them! Wan youjie glanced at them. Many of the blueprints had good design concepts, but there were clearly traces of imitating his mechanisms. However, there were still many blueprints that could make his eyes light up. It was obviously a masterpiece that the sky feather craftsman had put in a lot of effort. When he saw a few blueprints that glowed with a dark golden light in the pile of blueprints, his breathing quickened. “You actually stole the dark golden blueprints as well?” Tian yucai nodded happily. “That’s right, these blueprints are the most valuable!” The More Wan youxi looked at the blueprints, the more surprised he was. “You’re really a filial father.” Tian yucai had never learned Chinese before, so she couldn’t understand such profound words. She asked in a puzzled voice, “Chief Wan, what did you say just now?” Wan youxi waved his hand. “Nothing, nothing. I was just praising you.” Tian yucai said excitedly, “I contributed to the construction department?” “Yes! A great contribution!” Wan youxi was not like the skyfeather craftsman who did not care about personal combat strength and only cared about the design of machinery. On the contrary, he was a very flexible and flexible person. With the stubborn character of the Skyfeather craftsman, even if Wan youxi’s blueprint was sent to him, he would probably snort in disdain and insist on using his own design to defeat Wan Youxi’s design. However, Wan youxi wouldn’t do that. How could he not want the blueprints that were delivered to his door! With just a slight change, he could use the materials from the construction division to mass produce them. This would consume a lot less of his brain cells! Tian yucai was extremely happy. “Then, can I make a request?” “Don’t talk about one. You can make a few requests. I’ll satisfy all of them!” Tian yucai was so excited that she almost jumped up. “I want to join the construction division!” Wan youxi said, “Yes, yes, yes, yes...; Wait, you want to join the construction division? !” He was stunned. He immediately looked away from the Dark Gold Blueprint and stared at the jubilant girl in front of him. The girl asked doubtfully, “Can’t I?” “This...; I really don’t understand why you want to join the construction division. You’re the daughter of the Sky Feather Craftsman.” The girl said firmly, “President Wan has never stayed in the Gaotian plain. You Don’t know about the power interweaving and conspiracies in the Gaotian plain. I’ve seen it with my own eyes. That’s why I know that it’s not the place I should work for.” “So you want to join the construction division? It’s not impossible for other organizations.” Tian yucai shook her head. “Although I’ve never been to other organizations, I can gather a lot of unknown secrets through the connections of the skyfeather family.” “The Salvation Society, the Truth Knights, India...; they’re all similar to the Gaotian Plain. The Arctic army is slightly better, but I don’t want to go there because it’s too cold.” Wan youxi didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. “I want to join the construction department, even if it’s a foreign agent!”Tian yucai’s beautiful eyes shone with determination. “Okay, I promise you, but you can’t expose yourself right now.”Wan youxi pondered for a moment, “I’ll draw out a research room for you. You’ll be the only one there, and you’ll be able to eat three meals a day. Whatever materials you want, someone will send them over. I really want to see how much you’ve learned from the Skyfeather Craftsman.” Tian yucai patted her own chest and made a metallic sound. “Please rest assured, director Wan! I will definitely not disappoint your expectations!” .. Gaotian plain, Kyoto City. Poison Blade was half-leaning on the bed, reading history books on the Gaotian Plain. He could multitask while he was at it, looking at the perspectives of the training clones. “Eh? The training clone in Jieri City has a giant lion heart! Not Bad.” “I can pay attention to the giant tiger heart and the Giant Dragon Heart in the future. It would be even better if I could buy them in Gaotian Plain.” Thinking of this, Lin Xuan simply controlled the poisonous blade to get up from his bed. It was a night market now. He could go to the market in the capital city and maybe buy some good things. Soon, he arrived at the market area. However, he could feel that someone was following him from behind, but that person was only following him from a distance. Even if he walked alone in the long alley, he didn’t get close to him. Looks like it’s just surveillance. Then let him do it. I’ll pretend that I don’t know. Lin Xuan laughed in his heart. Poison Blade walked through the market area, passing through many stalls. Many warriors were selling all kinds of materials here. The gate of light of the secret realm around the capital city surpassed any other city in the Gaotian plains. The warriors gathered here were naturally the most numerous, so they obtained the most items from the secret realm every day. There was a dazzling array of items, and there was no end to them. Poison Blade had only taken a few steps when he saw many items that glowed with golden light, but the prices were all very high. Almost all of them required close to ten million essence. That was really bullying the buyer who didn’t understand the market. This sort of price-setting couldn’t be said to be normal. At the very least, it could be said to be an exorbitant demand. Poison Blade walked around once, and every time he saw something interesting, he would use a high-level observation technique to take a look. However, he didn’t find any truly valuable items. However, just as he was about to leave the market area, he unexpectedly found something that surprised him. A withered heart! The following was a brief introduction: the heart of the black-horned dragon, a rank 7 battle-king, had slightly rotted. The price was too high, a total of five million essence. “Why, are you interested in this?” The stall owner was an old man in his fifties. He noticed Poison Blade’s line of sight and smiled. Poison blade nodded slightly. “But the price you marked is too high. Even a fresh horned dragon heart only requires 3 million essence, let alone a rotten and shriveled one.” The old man chuckled. “Young man, you’re quite knowledgeable. My Price is just to bully outsiders. Then tell me what price you want.” Poison Blade raised a finger. “One million essence.” The old man immediately nodded. “Okay.” He had no idea what to do with this rotten horned dragon heart. If he continued to let it rot, sooner or later, no one would want it even if he gave it away for free. Now that the young man was willing to take over, he couldn’t wait to be happy. Soon, Poison Blade got his hands on the Horned Dragon Heart. The heart was yellowish brown and gave off a faint smell. The old man did not ask poison blade what he wanted it for. Since it had been sold, it was no longer his. Poison Blade held the thing, his expression did not change, but his heart was somewhat happy. This was because when he passed by the Horned Dragon Heart, the space of consciousness vibrated slightly. He took a closer look and found that a new synthesis formula had appeared on the synthesis table. It was the method to synthesize a giant dragon’s heart! Giant Dragon’s heart = Inferior Dragon’s heart (Flying Dragon/Earth Dragon/flood dragon) + three liters of giant dragon’s blood Inferior Dragon was the collective name of all dragons that were not giant dragons. Flying Dragon, Earth Dragon, flood dragon, and so on were all among the inferior dragons. “Although Giant Dragon’s blood is also a specialty of the Knights of Truth, I seem to have it when I was shopping just now!” Poison Blade followed his memory and walked to another stall. As expected, there was quite a lot of dragon blood here. If he went to the Knights of truth to buy Dragon Blood, it would cost almost the same price, which was quite cheap. However, the dragon blood that was shipped to the Gaotian plain was much more expensive. Taking into account the transportation cost, labor cost, and so on, the price of a liter of dragon blood sold from the Knights of truth to the Gaotian plain increased by six times! Poison Blade bought three liters of dragon blood with a pained expression and spent 600,000 essence. “When I have the chance to go to the dragon mountain range in the future, I must leave a training clone there.” Poison blade sighed in his heart and quickly brought these things back to the reception apartment. When he returned to the reception apartment, he happened to meet Ping Yeyang. This guy was covered in sweat and was covered in bruises. There were seven or eight bruises on his face alone. His handsome face was badly beaten up. “What are you doing?” Ping Yeyang proudly stroked his wound. “This is the mark of a man! I’m gradually becoming stronger!” Poison Blade shook his head. “Even if you want to become stronger, there’s no need to ask for a beating.” Ping Yeyang snorted. “What do you know? True cultivation can only be manifested in constant battles. So what if you’re beaten up? You’re sweating so that you don’t bleed during battles!” Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. Was this kid brainwashed by the people from some martial arts school. Chicken soup was a set. Ping Yeyang seemed to feel that he couldn’t get along with people like poison blade who didn’t cultivate seriously. He snorted and quickly returned to his room. Poison Blade also quickly returned to his room and entered the space of consciousness. He placed the heart of the Earth Dragon and three liters of dragon blood into the synthetic platform. The synthetic platform began to creak. Twenty minutes later, a huge, fresh heart that was still beating came out of the furnace. This heart was as big as Lin Xuan’s head! The heart’s valves were very thick, and the blood vessels were as thick as a finger. As expected of a dragon’s heart! Lin Xuan glanced at it and immediately used the advanced observation technique to read its description. —— Name: Heart of a giant dragon Level: Tier 7, Tier 3 Quality: Golden Effect: directly consumed, increases vitality by 5 points. can be broken through the upper limit. can only be used once. —— “Now I have the heart of a giant lion and the heart of a giant dragon. I’m only missing the heart of a Giant Tiger.” Lin Xuan was a little excited. There were more secret realms with Giant Tigers. The Knights of Truth and the Salvation Society both had them. The Wei Ming kingdom might have them too, but the official information of the Gaotian plain had never been mentioned. He would probably have to go in personally to find out. “I’ll go to the Wei Ming kingdom tomorrow. I really want to know how magical this super-large mystical realm, which is highly valued by the Gaotian plain, is.” The next day. Poison Blade flipped over and jumped up from the bed. When he pushed open the door and walked out, Lu Luo, who was next door, also walked out. The two of them looked at each other and smiled. At the same time, they walked to the first floor of the restaurant and ate some breakfast. After they finished eating breakfast, Ping Yeyang came down. However, his face was full of excitement. “You seem to be very happy?”Lu Luo asked casually. Ping Yeyang nodded seriously, “Yesterday’s training was valuable. I learned a new skill called [ endurance ] . It’s blue quality, but the effect is very strong. It increases a lot of physical resistance. It’s very useful in Wei Ming Kingdom.” Poison Blade could not help but laugh. In that case, it should not be a loss for him to be beaten so badly. Sunny Hirano was in a good mood. He drank a big mouthful of miso soup and laughed, “Mu Qiang, I suggest you try the heart stream dojo as well. That Dojo Master is really good. Although his words are very rough and his temper is very bad, he can really learn something.” “Look, if you have patience, won’t your survival ability against those monsters in the Wei kingdom improve a lot?” Poison blade smiled and nodded. “Ah, right, right, right.” He had already used advanced observation skill to see the effect of the new skill on sungod Hirano. —— Name: Patience Level: Tier 7, Level 1 Quality: Rare Blue Effect 1: Physical Resistance + 15% . Effect 2: when attacked, physical resistance + 15% . —— This skill couldn’t be said to be too bad, but it couldn’t be said to be too good either. All in all, it was only 30% . Compared to Lin Xuan’s defensive skills, it wasn’t just a little bit inferior. Moreover, the blue grade skill, to be honest, had a limited upgrade. Essence was used to increase the level of a warrior, but it was also used to increase the level of a skill. This also meant that it was very difficult to accumulate essence, but it was very easy to squander it. Anyway, Lin Xuan would definitely not use precious essence to improve this skill. “Alright, let’s go to the famous reed country together.” The three of them finished their breakfast one after another, and Lu Luo was the first to speak. “That’s good too. I’ll let you see the strength of my [ endurance ] . Physical resistance will be of great use against the Monsters of the famous Reed Kingdom.”Ping Yeyang smiled slightly. The three of them walked together and soon arrived at the central square of the capital city. There stood an extremely tall light door of the secret realm. The light door had an ancient style, making people feel as if they had come to the capital during the era of flying birds and Nara. However, the strange thing was that the height of the door of light was constantly changing. The highest was nine meters, and the lowest was seven meters. This meant that the weakest of the Wei Kingdom had seventh rank monsters, and the highest had ninth rank monsters. It was not like those secret realms that were fixed on the height of the door of light. If it was nine meters high, there would definitely only be ninth rank monsters, and there would not be any lower than ninth rank monsters. At this moment, there were a total of twenty guards in front of the secret realm’s light gate. Poison blade used an advanced observation skill to scan them and found that these guards were all tier 7 or Tier 3. Moreover, their attributes were quite good, and they could be considered above average. Moreover, they were all wearing four-piece sets that included heads, chests, arms, and legs. Even their weapons were standard equipment. One look and one could tell that they were well-equipped and well-trained. “Stop, qualification certificate.” The leading guard stretched out his hand and stopped the three of them. The qualification certificates of the three of them were all different. Poison Blade took out a battle merit bracelet. Once one’s battle merit points reached 5000, they could enter the Wei Ming country directly. Lu Luo took out a special certificate, which was given to her by Sato Qingkong. Hirano Suntai took out a leader’s special certificate. It was stamped with the chief’s seal, so no one dared to copy it. The guards had different expressions when they saw these three things. When they saw the battle achievement bracelet, they nodded slightly and signaled for poison blade to go in. When he saw the special permit, his expression became slightly solemn as he sized up Lu Luo. When he saw the chief’s special permit, he immediately bent his back ninety degrees and bowed deeply to hirano-suna. His appearance was even more respectful and sincere than when he saw his superior. “Mr. Ping Ye, please come in!” The guard’s arrogant and respectful appearance caused the surrounding martial artists to be quite surprised. “What kind of big shot is he?” “He doesn’t look like it. That white-clothed youth is very young, not more than 30 years old.” “Could he be the son of a rank nine martial artist?” “Look at the document in his hand...; that big seal...; it can’t be wrong. It’s the leader’s special approval document!” “I’m crazy. could he be the leader’s illegitimate son? !” The warrior beside him quickly covered him and widened his eyes. “Do you want to die?” The surrounding warriors watched poison blade and the other two enter the Wei Ming country and lined up to follow them. “There’s an awesome person here today.” “I’m afraid our gains will be greatly discounted.” The Warriors conversed with one another and followed them into the Wei Ming country. After passing through the light screen and feeling a slight discomfort, poison blade opened his eyes and looked at the surrounding scenery. There was a saying that the style of the Mystic Realm’s light door was the same as the Mystic Realm’s light door. The Wei Ming country was indeed the same as the mystic realm’s light door. It was filled with the ancient flavor of the Flying Bird Nara era. Moreover, this place was not like Xiao Ling Mountain. There were broken walls everywhere. The buildings here were very well-preserved. There was almost no damage. Poison Blade looked at the surrounding environment again. The place where he and a group of warriors appeared was a huge bluestone square. There were four exits in the square that extended in all directions, disappearing into the vast buildings shrouded in water vapor. The warriors spread out in groups of three to five to explore. Hirano’s balcony also rushed out impatiently with an excited expression. “Let’s start exploring. I Can’t wait any longer! I want to become stronger!” Lu Luo glanced at poison blade. She did not say anything, but her words were already hidden in her sight. Poison blade nodded solemnly. Of course, he knew what his goal was, and he had never forgotten it. Find the exact spot where he was being held! Until then, perhaps he could try to get in touch with the artifacts that Wan Youjie had dropped into the Wei Ming state. At the same time, in the leader’s office. This time, the people standing under the desk were not level nine warriors like Sato warrior and Sky Feather Craftsman, but two young level seven warriors. Their faces were the same, and their figures were almost the same. However, there was a slight difference in the aura they emitted from their bones. One was fierce, and the other was cruel. The fierce one was his older brother, Blood Asura, and the cruel one was his younger brother, Hungry Asura. The Asura twins! “That Shimada long that Sato martial artist carefully groomed is also about to enter the reed country for training. Apart from that, there are two of his nephews. Let’s have a good fight with them.” With his back facing them, the leader said indifferently, “Remember not to leave any traces behind.” His younger brother, Hungry Asura, laughed out loud. “Shimada Long? I’ve wanted to kill that kid for a long time!” His older brother, Blood Asura, also laughed coldly. “Indeed. What right does he have to be ranked second on the Global Tier 7 leaderboard? He’s not worthy. My younger brother and I will definitely replace him!” The leader said indifferently, “Then let me see just how much use I can make after nurturing you guys so carefully for so long.” The two of them accepted the order and turned to leave. The leader was still facing the window, and not a trace of joy or sadness could be seen on his face. .. Kyoto city, Sato family. This was Sato martial artist’s study. Normally, he would never allow outsiders to enter, even if it was his biological daughter, Sato Qingkong. The layout of the study was very special, and it did not fit in with the style of the other parts of the Sato family. If the leader came here, he would be able to see the mystery at a glance. The layout of the study room was exactly the same as the layout of his office! However, there were three other people in the study room besides the Sato martial artist. The positions of the three people were also very particular. The cold-faced young man in the middle stood at the front with his head held high and his chest puffed out, and his posture was domineering. The two young men on his left and right were half a step behind him, and their expressions revealed a hint of respect for the cold-faced young man. “I suspect that the death of the heart has something to do with the leader,”Sato Takeshi took a deep breath and suppressed the anger in his heart as he said in a low voice. When he said this, the youths on his left and right looked shocked, and there was a faint trace of fear. The leader was like an invincible God in the Highland. Once anything was related to the leader, the martial artists would instinctively feel reverence towards him. Even though these two young men were the blood-related nephews of the Sato martial artist, they couldn’t remain completely calm. Only the cold-faced young man remained unperturbed. Instead, a cold glint flashed in his eyes. The Sato martial artist saw the subtle expressions of the three of them. He was sincerely satisfied with the cold-faced young man’s current performance. “Foster father, did the leader suspect you?”The cold-faced young man asked. Sato Takeshi shook his head. “If he really suspected me, he would have attacked me directly in the office. The Skyfeather Craftsman is 100% loyal to him. If the two of them joined forces, I would have been seriously injured even if I didn’t die.” “If he didn’t attack, it means that he doesn’t have enough evidence to prove that I have a connection with the Ghost Shadow Group, or it means that he still needs me.” “No matter what, Qing Kongxin’s death is beneficial to the leader, but it’s a heavy blow to me. If he can do it, he will definitely do it.” The cold-faced youth nodded solemnly. “I’ve received news that the Shura Twins that the leader has groomed are planning to collect diamond wood for him at Mount Vajra in Reed country. That thing is something he urgently needs to make powerful puppets.” “Long Ye, and the two of you, I request that you interfere with their mission. If you seize the opportunity, you can even kill them. But you must be careful not to leave any traces behind. I don’t want to lose all decorum on the surface.” The Sato martial artist stared at the three of them and said sternly. Shimada Long Ye and the two young men from the Sato family nodded heavily. “Yes, Sir!” “By the way, if you encounter these two people in the Wei Ming Kingdom, kill them as well.”Sato martial artist pointed at the two files on the table, “Qing kongxin was injured by them and escaped into the sea. They don’t have the ability to kill Qing kongxin, but they injured my daughter, so they must die!” The three of them looked at the two files carefully. The two faces on the files were naturally mu Qiang and Ai Tianmei. They firmly remembered these two faces, nodded heavily once more, and left as ordered. The Sato martial artist raised his head. His gaze seemed to pass through the roof and the sky, arriving at the office of the head of the Secret Service Department of Kyoto City. Their gazes seemed to touch through space. .. Wei Ming Guo. Lu Luo chose the south exit. Poison Blade chose the west exit of the plaza, just like the balcony of Hirano. He had already read the rough map of the Wei Ming country before coming here. The place where the light door of the secret realm was located was the entrance square under the high wall of the Wei Ming country. The east exit led to the river of washing gold. The West exit led to Mount Jingang. The south exit led to Wangxia town 20 kilometers ahead. The north exit led to the capital of the Wei Ming country. Ever since the Wei Ming country was discovered by the Gaotian plain, its secret realm had been slowly expanding. At first, it was only the Wei Ming kingdom’s capital, but later, the gold-washing river, Mount Jingang, and Wangxia town gradually appeared. The gold-washing river originated from Mount Jingang in the west and rushed down from Mount Jingang. It also rushed down a large amount of ores from Mount Jingang. Among them was a large amount of gold-washing stone. Gold-washing stone was a consumable item. As long as it was ground on a weapon, it could immediately increase the sharpness of the weapon greatly for a short period of time. However, a gold-washing stone could only be used once, and it could not be used on a staff or other weapon. As for the Diamond Mountain, it bred an extremely tough and heavy wood called the Diamond Wood. Diamond Wood sank into the water and was comparable to steel. From this, a batch of equipment made of Diamond Wood was born. Its set effect was also very powerful, and it was said that it provided a huge amount of physical resistance. However, it was very difficult to cut down diamond wood, so the production of related equipment was not high. There were even more good things in Wangxia Town and the capital of Wei Ming country. Lin Xuan really admired the luck of the Gaotian Plain. They could actually have such a good arcane pocket realm like the country of Wei. Ores, there! Wood, there! Equipment blueprints, skill books, and runes for the four classes were also available! There were even substitute dark gold items! This arcane pocket realm was probably equal to the combined forces of Kunlun ruins, Xiaoling Mountain, and Luolei Mountain. “The items in the Gold Washing River, Wangxia town, and the capital of the country of Wei are all good, but the diamond wood suits me best. I’ll get more of it back and directly hand it over to the forging table to make equipment. I’ll get a set of diamond wood set as soon as possible. It should be very strong.” Lin Xuan nodded slightly and accelerated his poison blade. “Eh, this is?” After walking a few steps, he suddenly heard a voice in his mind. [ news from the country of Wei: The Origin of the mystic realm is being nurtured in the underground cave altar in Wangxia Town. It will take 15 days, 8 hours, and 36 minutes for the origin of the mystic realm to be born. ] Lin Xuan was dumbfounded. Origin of the mystic realm? ? What the hell! Damn it, he had touched a blind spot of knowledge! Lin Xuan had read through the books of the construction department and the Gaotian Plain. He had memorized the records and summaries of the Mystic Realm recorded by the human warriors over the past 100 years. However, he had never seen the words “Origin of the mystic realm”. “No matter what...; It must be something good!” “However, it will still take 15 days for it to be fully nurtured. There is still plenty of time.” After hearing the news, Lin Xuan analyzed it briefly and then continued to walk towards Mount Vajra with determination. It wouldn’t be too late to go to Wangxia town after he had obtained enough vajra wood in Mount Vajra. It was said that Wangxia town was filled with wandering zombies with high physical resistance and strong physical attack power. There would also be level 8 zombies appearing from time to time. If they could make the diamond wood set, they would have more confidence to go there. At least, they would not have to worry about being killed by a level 8 monster in one hit. There were also many warriors who rushed to the diamond mountain like Poison Blade. Not only did the diamond mountain have the diamond wood, but there were also many treasures. Even if they could not get the diamond wood, they could still find other treasures. After running for an hour, Poison Blade finally arrived at the Diamond Mountain. He stood at the foot of the mountain and looked up. The mountain peak was surrounded by clouds. The mountain was majestic and towering, piercing straight into the clouds. No matter who saw this magnificent scene, they would sigh with heartfelt emotion. However, it was not the first time that the warriors next to him came. The first time they saw it, they would sigh with emotion. The second and third time, they would become numb. They brushed past poison blade and began to climb the Diamond Mountain. Mount Vajra did not have a mountain path, so they had to rely on themselves to advance step by step. Moreover, even if they spent a lot of effort to open up a mountain path today, they would recover in an instant the next day. The recovery time was neither too much nor too little, exactly 24 hours. It was not just the vegetation on Mount Vajra. Even the civilian residences in Wangxia town, the city walls of the Wei kingdom’s capital, and the palace city, which were destroyed today, would be restored tomorrow. It was as if there was an ancient and majestic will quietly repairing everything, trying to restore it to its original appearance. When the mystic realm had just appeared, there would still be warriors who would think about this question all night long. Why would it be restored? But now that a hundred years had passed, the Warriors were already used to it. No one would think about such unrealistic questions. Poison Blade also chose a gentle slope and began to climb Mount Vajra. Not long after, he found a vajra wood that was big enough for two people to hug at the edge of the steep cliff. The Vajra Wood was very easy to identify. The bark would emit a faint golden light, and the leaves were not normal leaves, but palm-like. The mountain wind blew, and from a distance, one would think that golden palms were falling from the sky. Back then, some timid warriors were even scared to death. At this moment, he discovered that not far away, there was a warrior in white who was swinging an axe and chopping down a bowl-sized diamond wood. At this moment, three-quarters of the Diamond Wood had been chopped down, and it was about to break. The warrior in White was, of course, Ping Yeyang. He was one step ahead of poison blade and arrived at Diamond Mountain ahead of time. “Mu Qiang, I didn’t expect you to come to Mount Vajra too.”Ping Yeyang Tai seemed to have expended a lot of energy. He put down his axe and rested for a while. At the same time, he noticed poison blade who had just arrived. Poison blade nodded. “Vajra Wood is a good thing. I want it very much too.” After saying that, he fished out a blue axe from his space of consciousness and prepared to chop down this vajra wood. “Wait, you want to chop down this one? This one is too thick. I advise you not to waste your strength.”Ping Yeyang could not help but laugh. “He’s right, young man. If you have the strength, you might as well choose a smaller one. If you really choose this one, I’m afraid you won’t be able to chop it down even after dark.”At this moment, a middle-aged warrior happened to pass by and heard their conversation, he nodded and agreed. Poison Blade waved his hand. “I’m just giving it a try. Who knows, I might be able to cut it down?” Ping Yeyang Tai shook his head repeatedly. “You’re really stubborn.” He picked up the axe and was about to continue cutting when he suddenly thought of something and casually reminded him, “Don’t forget that there are white-headed eagles on Mount Vajra. They like to ambush warriors when they’re cutting down trees. If they peck the back of your head, you’ll be finished!” Poison blade smiled and nodded. “Thank you for the Reminder.” The middle-aged martial artists passing by saw that they could not persuade him, so they continued to climb up. Most of the martial artists were looking for vajra wood that was as thick as the mouth of a bowl, which was easier to cut down. If they only cut down this kind of vajra wood, they could cut down three to five if they were lucky during the day. Three was not a loss, but five was a gain! “Is it really difficult to cut this thing?” Poison blade swung his arm and swung his axe fiercely! Dang! A wound about one centimeter deep appeared on the smooth surface of the diamond wood. “My strength is even seven or eight points higher than that of a normal tier 7 martial artist of the same level. I can only cut down one centimeter deep with this axe? No wonder people say that diamond wood is difficult to cut down.” Not far away, Hirano Suntai also heard him muttering to himself. As he chopped, he laughed, “Not only that, chopping down Diamond Wood consumes a lot of equipment durability. Even this diamond wood of mine, which is as thick as a bowl, has to be chopped down in sections. At the very least, it will consume all the durability of a blue axe.” “That Diamond Wood of yours, which two people are hugging together, will need to be chopped down in sections. At the very least, it will consume fifteen blue axes!” Poison Blade could not help but laugh. No wonder all the martial artists loved and hated Diamond Wood. It was so precious, yet it was so difficult to cut it down. “With two people in my arms, the diameter is about one meter. Every time I cut it, I can cut it down by one centimeter. It is indeed a little slow...;” Poison blade shook his head, but he did not give up. Instead, he continued to swing the axe around, cutting it down again and again. Kacha! He had only cut it down halfway when the durability of the blue axe was directly exhausted. This axe was a relatively small assassination axe, and its durability was indeed not as high as a large axe. Poison Blade shrugged and directly took out a second axe. This time, he directly took out a purple one. Beside him, Hirano Suntai had already completely cut down the diamond wood that was as thick as the mouth of a bowl, and began to segment it. However, even after cutting it into segments, the volume of the Diamond Wood was still very large. Hirano-sun took out a few pieces of equipment from the storage compartment and barely stuffed all the diamond wood into it. “Mu Qiang, can you help me take a look at these few pieces of equipment?” Poison blade nodded and indicated for him to put them aside. Hirano-sun nodded and quickly went down the mountain. He wanted to immediately return to the square and hand over the diamond wood to the craftsmen there to forge the equipment. As for the equipment blueprints, he had already bought them in the market area of the capital city. Now, he only needed the diamond wood as a material. Seeing Hirano Suns leave, poison blade continued to chop the Diamond Wood. The durability of a purple weapon was naturally much higher than a blue weapon. He finally chopped off the diamond wood and began to segment it. During the process of breaking it into sections, the purple axe in his hand also cracked. Seeing this scene, Lin Xuan shook his head repeatedly. It was too slow. The speed at which the durability was consumed was also too fast. If this continued, the efficiency of him obtaining the Diamond Wood would indeed be very low. He had to think of a way to speed up the pace. At this moment, [ advanced perception ] was automatically activated. He suddenly heard the helpless voice of a warrior from high up. “My Axe is broken again. I keep feeling that the hardness of the diamond wood has increased. It usually doesn’t break so fast.” His companion also shook his head helplessly. “I also feel it. It seems that the durability of the diamond wood has decreased by a quarter compared to before.” Poison blade listened again and realized that almost all the martial artists around him had mentioned this point. The durability of the axe had decreased too quickly! But using weapons other than axes was too slow. Using swords and knives to cut Diamond Wood? That was really brain damage. Many warriors did not expect the durability to drop so quickly. The axes they brought were all used up. At this moment, they were scratching their ears and cheeks, not knowing what to do. Lin Xuan’s eyes lit up. He seemed to have thought of a quick and convenient method! His mind entered the space of his consciousness and rummaged through a large pile of equipment blueprints. These equipment blueprints were thick and were divided into four types: melee, ranged, magic, and elemental. With a thought, the melee equipment blueprints were quickly divided into sword, knife, spear, axe, and many other weapon blueprints. In the blink of an eye, twenty-six axe blueprints appeared in front of him. “I don’t want the gold ones, and I don’t want the purple ones. The materials used are too much.” After one condition, there were only four blueprints left. Lin Xuan filtered through the four blueprints and selected the axe that was most suitable for cutting wood. Coincidentally, this equipment blueprint came from the level 6 mystic realm, hungry ghost village. The weight and feel of this axe perfectly matched the ergonomics of the human body. It ensured that the warrior could wield this axe more efficiently than before. And most importantly, its durability was very high! “You’re the one, start forging!” Lin Xuan had the three forging tables exert their strength immediately to forge this logging axe with all their might. He felt that the forging speed of the forging table was too slow, and spent a lot of essence to upgrade it to a level seven forging table. Ten minutes later, the first batch of three axes were quickly produced. Twenty minutes, thirty minutes later, a large number of axes appeared in the space of consciousness. As long as there were enough materials, they could keep forging! Poison blade tidied up his appearance and joined the Warriors’conversation. “Eh, what’s the matter?” Those warriors were talking with a frown when they suddenly saw a stranger approaching, and they all stopped talking. Poison Blade smiled. “I heard you guys say that your axes have run out of durability?” “Yeah, they were used too fast. My Diamond Wood was almost cut down. I was wondering if I should use my sword to cut it down...;” “Do you have an extra axe?” The Warriors came over. Poison Blade smiled and lied on the spot. “I accidentally found a warehouse in the hungry ghost village. I found a lot of wood-cutting axes there.” After saying that, he took out a logging axe and handed it over, “You can take a look. Although it’s only a tier 6 weapon, its durability is very high! It’s not worse than some tier 7 axes!” The warrior took the axe and looked at it. He was pleasantly surprised and shouted to the warrior beside him, “It’s true! It’s much better than mine!” The other warriors also took the axe in surprise and carefully looked at the effect of the axe. They were very happy. “How much is this axe of yours?”The warrior in the lead asked urgently. Poison blade smiled slightly. “It doesn’t have to be pure. A ten-centimeter-long diamond wood as thick as the rim of a bowl can be exchanged for an axe. You can also buy it in a group. If it’s more than three people, you can get a 20% discount.” This price was naturally slightly higher than a normal sixth rank axe, but it was very reasonable in Diamond Mountain. Especially for those warriors whose axes had already been broken, it was even more important. They could definitely go to the plaza to buy another one, but this round trip would take at least 2 hours! Unknowingly, they had lost another 2 hours to chop down the trees! Spending a bit of extra value in exchange for a bit of time, it was worth it! “I want to buy it!” The leader of the Warriors only thought for a short while before nodding in agreement. After saying that, he turned to ask the martial artists beside him, “What about you guys?” When these people heard that, they also nodded their heads. “We bought it! We’re buying it as a group! A total of six logging axes!” Poison blade smiled and nodded his head. After trading the six logging axes, he received a long section of Diamond Wood. After completing this transaction, he quickly rushed to the next location. He smiled as he gave a vivid introduction to another group of martial artists. “Everyone, do you want a logging axe? All steel is quenched, it won’t collapse or roll! The handle is shockproof and anti-stripping, in line with the ergonomics design. Whether it’s chopping wood, cutting trees, or guarding a residence to ward off evil, they are all first-class choices! Now, more than three people can enjoy a 20% discount on group purchases!” Within a short period of time, Poison Blade had sold more than 30 wood cutting axes and obtained a large amount of diamond wood. The amount of Diamond Wood he had accumulated in his space of consciousness had far exceeded the amount a martial artist could cut down in a day! Poison Blade looked satisfied. As expected, one could not blindly cut down trees. One had to use more brains to earn money. At this moment, Ping Yeyang had already returned to Mount Vajra from the square. At first, he ran to the place where he had cut down the trees, but he did not find Mu Qiang. Then, he asked a few warriors before he found Mu Qiang. He was quite surprised. He did not expect Mu Qiang to actually think of selling the cutting axe to obtain the Vajra Wood. He was so business-minded. However, on the way to find poison blade, he found three warriors staring at poison blade from afar with ill intentions. “Those three...; I remember now. It’s the one-eyed Dragon Trio!” Ping Yeyang’s heart skipped a beat. When he was tempering himself in the heart stream dojo, those three fellows were also present. They used the excuse of “Sparring”to beat him up. Fortunately, the dojo master came out to mediate. He had only suffered some superficial injuries and had unexpectedly learned a new skill, [ endurance ] . He quickly ran to poison blade’s side with a nervous expression. “Mu Qiang, the one-eyed Dragon Trio has their eyes on you. Hurry up and leave. Don’t sell the logging axes anymore.” “One-eyed Dragon Trio?” “Yes, they’re over there. Do you see those three fierce fellows? They’re all rank 7 and rank 6! Hurry up and leave.”Ping Yeyang pointed to a few hundred meters behind him without leaving a trace. Poison Blade looked towards the direction of the sound. As expected, he saw three fierce-looking warriors with fierce eyes. Their unique feature was that all three of them only had one eye. Perhaps that was why they were called the one-eyed Dragon Trio. “They want to snatch my Diamond Wood?”Poison Blade reacted and could not help but laugh. Ping Yeyang nodded, “Of course, you have obtained so much diamond wood by selling your logging axe. Those people with ill intentions must have long been envious! Some people do not dare to act rashly because they do not know your strength.” “But one-eyed dragon and the other two are very strong. I heard that there’s someone behind them! So they don’t have any scruples!” “I won’t hide it from you. The last time I suffered so many injuries in the heart stream martial school, I was beaten up by the three of them in the name of sparring.” “Run before they come! Run to the square, and they won’t dare to touch you.” Ping Yeyang reminded him earnestly. The only safe place in the country of Wei was the square where the light gate of the secret realm was located. That was the place where fighting was forbidden in the Takama Plains. Besides the square, fighting was not forbidden in any area of the country of Wei! “It’s too late. They’re already here.” Poison Blade shook his head. Ping Yeyang’s expression changed slightly as he looked behind him. As expected, the one-eyed man and the other two were less than twenty meters away from them. If they used their skills, they could reach them in half a second. “Oh, you look familiar. I remember your surname is pingye, right? Last Night’s sparring made me very happy.”The leader chuckled. “What are you guys doing here?”Sun Pingye’s expression was gloomy. “The three of us also want to buy a logging axe.”The leader of the Warriors said with a fake smile. Poison blade said, “Of course, the three of you can have a group purchase discount.” “But even if we have a discount, we can’t take out so much diamond wood.”Another warrior also said with a fake smile. “How about this? You give us the logging axe and all the Diamond Wood that you just sold.”The leader of the Warriors said with a weird smile. The surrounding warriors also noticed the anxious atmosphere. They stopped chopping trees and looked over. “Oh no, one-eyed dragon and the other two went to find trouble with that guy.” “I’m afraid that guy sold a lot of logging axes. They are jealous!” “To be honest, I would be jealous too. That Kid’s name is Mu Qiang, right? He sold at least 30 logging axes. He has a lot of adamantine wood on him!” The martial artists discussed in hushed tones as they looked at them with pity. Ping Yeyang took a deep breath and said coldly, “What do the three of you want? Are you trying to rob me openly?” The leader of the three laughed. “What do you think I’m doing?” The martial artist on the left waved his hand impatiently. “We’re only robbing the person behind you. Get lost.” The martial artist on the right snorted coldly. “If you don’t get lost, then we’ll fight you together. If you want to live, you’ll have to hand over the things on your body! Think carefully! Don’t be so foolish as to stand up for others!” Ping Yeyang Tai gritted his teeth. In the end, he roared angrily, “I won’t let you! I said I won’t let you!” “Mu Qiang, let’s attack together and beat them up!” Ever since his father died for him, the ruthlessness in Ping Yeyang’s bones had been triggered. Last Night, the one-eyed dragon trio had beaten him up badly. Today, he could not back down again! Otherwise, the courage in his heart would disappear without a trace! If his father knew about this in the afterlife, he would definitely scold him for his cowardice! Moreover, he had just entrusted Mu Qiang to look after his equipment. Mu Qiang did not refuse and directly agreed. Now, Mu Qiang was surrounded by three people for no reason. Since he was also here, he could not just stand by and watch. Lin Xuan was slightly surprised. He had never seen how close Ping Yeyang was to him. Last night, this guy even thought that poison blade did not cultivate seriously and did not speak properly. He was actually willing to stand by his side today? This guy’s personality was really interesting. “I’ll hold off their attacks later. You’re an assassin, so look for an opportunity to attack!”Ping Yeyang said in a low voice. Poison blade nodded, “Don’t worry, it won’t take too long to take them down.” Ping Yeyang laughed bitterly. He felt that Mu Qiang was comforting him. The one-eyed dragon trio opposite them laughed out loud as if they had heard a funny joke. They laughed until their stomachs hurt. However, before the laughter could fade, the leader pounced over viciously. His speed was as fast as a cheetah! The laughter just now was actually a feint to numb them. Caught off guard, he was directly punched in the chest. Pu! He spat out a large mouthful of blood. This punch had reduced his HP by at least 20% . His expression was one of shock and anger. He was originally an armored soldier. The equipment and skills that stacked physical resistance on him were already quite a lot. Now, he also had [ endurance ] , which added quite a bit of physical resistance. However, after taking this punch, he still received a lot of damage! These three guys didn’t show their full strength when they beat him up last night. “Damn it!” Ping Yeyang gritted his teeth and struggled to get up from the ground. Now, he thirsted for strength more than ever! “I’m going to attack.” Poison Blade said and rushed out. Ping Yeyang Tai screamed, “Don’t!” But before he could finish, poison blade had already stabbed his dagger at the throat of the leader. Ping Yeyang Tai sighed. I didn’t attract any aggro from the other party, and I didn’t even manage to get a few skills out of him. You just charged forward. You’re really not afraid of death. The spectating martial artists nearby also had looks of pity on their faces. This guy had quite the business sense, but unfortunately, his IQ wasn’t very high. He actually dared to directly charge at a seventh rank sixth rank martial artist. When the one-eyed Dragon Trio’s leader saw Poison Blade’s fierce attack, he immediately laughed sinisterly and fiercely grabbed out with his huge fist. However, Poison Blade’s speed suddenly skyrocketed, and his fist grabbed nothing! Immediately after, a miserable cry sounded from behind him. He was shocked, angry, and turned around to look. The throat of his left underling had been pierced, and he was lying in a pool of blood! He was seriously injured! “Bastard!” The leading warrior roared, and an invisible sound wave swept out with him as the center, directly hitting Poison Blade’s body. Poison Blade’s body froze. “Catch him!” He and the warrior on the right pounced on him from the left and right. However, Poison Blade’s figure was like paint as it entered their shadows, once again letting them catch nothing. The one-eyed dragon trio were once again shocked and angry. They knew this skill. It was the blue job class [ Shadow Warrior ]’s job class skill [ shadow escape ] ! It could hide in the shadows and Dodge attacks. However, the cooldown time was very long, a full 10 hours. In the next moment, Poison Blade rushed out from the shadows like a fish. The short sword instantly stabbed the back of the martial artist on the right. Puff! Puff! Puff! Three wounds suddenly appeared, and blood gushed out like a fountain! The martial artist screamed and fell down. “You’re the only one left.” Poison blade sneered and pounced again with his sword. The martial artist in the lead was shocked and angry. This was not just a tough bone, it was a poison that could kill people. He could not eat it at all! Hence, he quickly made a decision that did not concern himself with martial morality. Run! “Leaving your back to an assassin class, you’re really smart.” Poison blade sneered as he stabbed his dagger into the back of the Warrior’s heart. At this moment, Sundance Hirano also reacted. He hurriedly shouted, “Don’t! He has a skill that can directly grab the back of an attack. It’s called [ backhand dig ] !” As expected. Just as poison blade was about to stab the warrior’s back with his short sword. His huge palm suddenly grabbed at the warrior without warning! “You dare to chase after me? You’re also very smart.” This warrior did not even turn his head. He knew that his opponent would definitely be tightly grabbed by him! However, he did not feel anything from his palm. He grabbed the air again! In the next moment, a short sword directly stabbed into his throat. It was pulled out and stabbed again, three times in a row! In the end, it was a fierce slash! Critical hit! His HP instantly fell to zero! The last member of the one-eyed Dragon Trio fell to the ground with a muffled thud. Even though he was dead, his furious eyes were filled with shock, anger, and unwillingness. He had not been able to react in time to this unexpected death. Sundance Ping and the other warriors who had witnessed this scene were even more dumbfounded. What was that skill just now? It actually appeared in front of the warrior from behind in an instant! Lin Xuan controlled poison blade and intentionally panted a few times. “Phew...; This guy is quite powerful. I was almost caught by him.” Ping Yuntian said in shock, “What skill is that? I’ve never seen it in the Gaotian Plain.” “Flash, I spent a lot of money to buy it in the construction department. This is my life-saving skill, don’t tell others.”Poison Blade lowered his head and said in a low voice. Only then did Ping Yuntian nod repeatedly. “That’s right, I forgot, you’re from the construction department.” However, there was still a trace of shock on his face. He originally thought that even if he and Mu Qiang joined forces, they wouldn’t be able to defeat the one-eyed Dragon Trio. In the end, they might still be beaten up and had no choice but to hand over the treasures in the storage compartment. But now, the one-eyed dragon trio was actually all killed by Mu Qiang alone! His moves were sharp and ruthless! “What are you looking at me for? Continue chopping down the trees,”poison blade laughed. The martial artists who were still in shock lowered their heads and quickly worked hard to chop down the trees. Those martial artists who had been itching to make a move and wanted to act as a fisherman also quickly withdrew their thoughts. What a fellow, his strength was actually so fierce! Fortunately, they didn’t charge forward! “It’s time to split the spoils.” Poison Blade brought over the items dropped by the one-eyed dragon trio and was quite delighted. These three people had quite a lot of diamond wood on them, and they were all good wood that was thicker than the width of a bowl. However, other than that, there was nothing else worth mentioning on them. The skill books were even more miserable to look at. Surprisingly, only one purple quality skill book dropped from the three of them. It seemed that they usually relied on their higher levels and their numbers to bully other martial artists. If he met someone with the same level as him, or someone with more luxurious equipment and skills, he could only take a beating. Poison blade casually threw some equipment and skill books that were suitable for Sundance Ping Ye over. At first, Sundance Ping Ye was not embarrassed to accept them, but poison blade insisted, so he accepted them. “Thank you so much this time. I didn’t expect you to hide your strength,”Sundance Ping Ye said with a smile. Poison Blade waved his hand. “How can I not hide my strength when I’m out in the open?” Ping Yeyang Tai couldn’t help but ask, “Isn’t this your full strength?” Poison blade smiled slightly. “What do you think?” Ping Yeyang Tai was even more impressed. “The Diamond Wood in my space of consciousness can at least make two sets of equipment. All I need now is the blueprint.” Lin Xuan thought for a while and said to ping yeyang, “I need to go back to the square to buy equipment blueprints. I’ll be leaving first.” Ping Yeyang nodded. He also felt that Mu Qiang had already obtained a lot of diamond wood, so there was no need for him to stay at Diamond Mountain. Poison Blade went straight back to the square and chose the blueprint here. Not long after, he found a golden quality set blueprint that was suitable for armor-type professionals. When the stall owner saw that poison blade actually wanted to buy the golden grade equipment blueprints, he was very enthusiastic. An average person would not be able to afford a golden grade equipment blueprint. Even if they bought it, they might not be able to forge a golden grade equipment. Therefore, this golden grade equipment blueprint had been placed on the stall for a very long time. Now that it could finally be sold, and there was a large amount of essence coming into his account, he could not wait to be happy. The stall owner did not ask for an exorbitant price. Instead, he gave him a discount. In the end, Poison Blade bought it for 9.5 million yuan. After all, it was only a blueprint. Although it was a golden set blueprint, he still needed to gather the materials and forge it himself. Naturally, it was far less than the price of a complete golden set. “Let’s start forging.” Lin Xuan’s mind entered the space of consciousness and put all kinds of materials into the forging table. Half an hour later, a set of heavy earthen yellow equipment was made. King Kong set! Before he could see the effect of this set, Lin Xuan suddenly found that a new synthesis formula had appeared on the synthesis table. [ indestructible overlord (dark gold set) = Overlord set + King Kong set + Rampart set ] “Another dark gold set!” Lin Xuan was pleasantly surprised. “Synthesis! Immediately!” Another half an hour later, a new set of majestic and domineering equipment was displayed in front of him. This set of equipment took into account the majesty and Solemnity of the Overlord set, the sturdiness and heaviness of the Vajra set, and the sturdiness and majesty of the barrier set! —— Name: Indestructible Overlord Level: Tier 7, Level 4 Quality: dark gold legendary Equipment Requirements: vitality 350, Strength 256 Effect 1: vitality + 10% . Effect 2: all resistances + 100% . Effect 3: all negative status resistances + 60% . Effect 4: AGGRO + 100% . Effect 5: all healing effects + 150% (including HP regeneration speed). Effect 6: if the enemy deals more than 50% of their own HP in a single attack, the damage will be reduced to 50% . —— Lin Xuan took a closer look at the effects of the [ indestructible overlord ] set equipment and praised sincerely, “This set equipment is really F * cking awesome.” The first five effects were needless to say. Each of them was capable of fighting. The sixth effect was really awesome. As long as he wore this set equipment, he could directly dodge the massive damage! Even if it was fatal damage! This effect would still be effective even if he encountered a tier 8 or even tier 9 martial artist. Originally, when the other party slapped him, he would lose 100% of his HP. However, due to this effect, his HP was forcefully reduced to 50% ! However, this effect should only last for a short period of time. This was because the other party’s first attack had indeed been forcefully reduced to 50% . If the other party’s second attack were to follow up, his HP would only be at 50% . Even if he was forcefully reduced by the [ undying dominator ] .., he would still die. Moreover, there was also the durability of equipment. Although this set of dark-gold set equipment had a very high durability, it was impossible for him to withstand more than three attacks from a tier 8 martial artist. If he were a tier 9 martial artist, he would only be able to endure for a moment before this set of equipment shattered. With this [ undying overlord ] set, I have a trump card that can save my life. This way, I’ll have more confidence even if I go to investigate shallow view’s exact location in the asura prison Lin Xuan looked satisfied. When he was still in the germinal organization, he had synthesized the [ giant shield ] set through the synthesis platform. That set had an effect. It was immune to death once, but after it was immune, it would shatter on its own. Now, there was this [ indestructible overlord ] set. It was equivalent to having double insurance. At this moment, Lin Xuan noticed from Poison Blade’s eyes that many martial artists ran back to the square in a panic. Many of them even had injuries on their bodies. “What’s Wrong?”The Warriors in the square were confused and quickly asked. “Several great experts are fighting!” “You have no idea who is fighting! It’s Shimada long and the ASURA TWINS!” The martial artists were shocked at first, then their eyes widened with excitement. This was a battle between experts! Although everyone was a rank 7 martial artist, everyone knew that Shimada Long was also a person who was on the global rank 7 list. He was not on the same level as ordinary rank 7 martial artists like them. It could not be said that they were almost the same. At the very least, they were worlds apart. All the Warriors present did not doubt that the four of them would not be able to gain any advantage in the battle with Shimada long! “Although the Shura Twins are not in the top ten of the global tier 7 list, they seem to be ranked in the top hundred. The battle between them must be very interesting!” “However, I heard that Shimada long seems to be Lord Sato’s foster son, and the Shura Twins...; are personally groomed by the leader. Why would they fight?” “Wow, isn’t it just those things, like conflicts of interest? I’m afraid that someone from both sides found some precious treasure and fought.” The martial artists were talking about each other, and it was extremely lively. It seemed that the ones fighting weren’t Shimada long and the Shura Twins, but them. “Hey, then what happened to your injuries? were they affected?”A martial artist asked curiously. “Of course. You guys have never seen Shimada long fight before. It was terrifying. I was standing a hundred meters away to watch the show, but somehow, I was affected by the aftermath of the battle. Look at my arm. A large part of it was burned by the Flames!” “The Shura Twins were even more arrogant. They didn’t treat US Warriors as human beings at all. The battle between the three of them started in an instant. I was in the middle of them. A huge arrow as thick as a baby’s arm brushed past my face and shot out! I almost didn’t pee at that time.” “We’re considered lucky. I heard that someone died in the aftermath of their battle.” Many martial artists’faces were filled with the fear of surviving a disaster. When Lin Xuan heard this, his heart thumped. Oh No, Ping Yeyang was still there. And he hadn’t returned yet. could something have happened to him? Lin Xuan frowned slightly. If Ping Yeyang had not stepped forward when he was besieged by the one-eyed Dragon Trio, then he would be at ease if he did not return to Mount Vajra now. However, Ping Yeyang had stepped forward under such circumstances, which meant that the young man had already regarded him as a friend. “Just bring him back. As for the fight between Shimada Longya and the Shura Twins, it has nothing to do with me.” Lin Xuan controlled the poisonous blade and quickly ran toward Mount Vajra. Many brave warriors, onlookers, and onlookers also ran toward Mount Vajra. They didn’t mind the excitement as long as they didn’t die! A middle-aged warrior who had bought his logging axe recognized him at a glance and quickly stopped him. “Are you going back to your friend?” “How is he?” The middle-aged warrior quickly asked, “He’s right at the place where you started cutting down the trees. When Shimada long and the Shura Twins were fighting, he blocked the path of the Blood Shura and couldn’t Dodge in time. One of his legs was directly cut off by a blade. If you go now, you should be able to save him.” “Thank you.” Poison blade nodded and sped up again. His evaluation of Shimada long and the Shura Twins’strength had increased by quite a bit. One slash was enough to break one of Hirano Suntai’s legs! And Hirano Suntai was an armored warrior! Could it be that these three had all reached tier 7 or 9? At the same time, on Mount Vajra. Three terrifying lights were colliding, interweaving, and annihilating here. Upon closer inspection, it was actually three people in the light. The Red One was Takayuki Shimada. His height had risen to 2.3 meters, and his entire body had grown by a size. His joints were covered in thick red giant scales, and there seemed to be an eternal flame burning in his eyes, his skin was completely red, emitting a terrifying high temperature. The blood-red one was his elder brother, Blood Asura. His blood qi transformed into a three-meter-long katana. Every time it chopped down, it would definitely shatter large pieces of trees, and even the surface of the adamantine wood would show some deep cuts. The black one was his younger brother, Hungry Asura. The black qi condensed into a bony black claw. Each finger was more than a meter long, and the palm was four meters long. The blood-colored katana and the black claw attacked Shimada long from both sides. However, Shimada Long’s body was also shrouded in flames. Every time, he could form all kinds of weapons and defensive equipment to block it. The battle between the three of them was very intense. However, anyone could see that Shimada Long was also fighting one against two. His combat strength was very strong! At the bottom of Mount Vajra, there was a gentle slope. Hirano suntai was leaning against a vajra wood. His handsome face was distorted due to the pain. “If I was strong enough...; how could I be sent flying by Blood Asura’s slash like a pig or a dog!” He gritted his teeth. His eyes were filled with hatred, but they were soon replaced by despair. “The commotion from their battle is too great. My current position isn’t safe. If I’m hit by the aftershocks of the battle, I’ll either die or be seriously injured. If the Shura Twins have the intention to kill me, they might just kill me...;” Boom! The Flames, Blood Light, and black gas collided once again. Shimada Long was still not at a disadvantage. Blood Asura and hungry Asura looked at each other, their faces gloomy. The second place on the global tier 7 ranking was indeed worthy of its reputation. This guy’s strength was worthy of its name! One versus two, yet he was still not at a disadvantage. No one knew how Sato martial artist discovered such a ruthless character like Shimada long. “His class skill is too strange. It’s different from the information we got,”hungry Asura said in a low voice. “It should be Sato martial artist who hid it and didn’t give the detailed information to leader. This guy is indeed ambitious.”Blood Asura snorted coldly. Dang! The Flames condensed into a shield and blocked the blood qi giant saber once again. “You killed two of foster father’s nephews. Can I take it as the leader’s Order?”Shimada long also said coldly. Hungry Asura laughed wantonly. “It doesn’t matter if it’s the leader’s order or not. I’ve long disliked those two people. So what if I killed them conveniently?” Blood Asura also sneered. “Shimada long, don’t forget that Takama-ga-hara is the leader’s Takama-ga-hara. You followed the wrong person!” Shimada Long’s expression was also quite gloomy. He didn’t have much of a relationship with the two nephews of the Sato martial artist, but the Sato martial artist was his foster father. Since his foster father’s nephew was dead, as his foster son, he naturally couldn’t let the murderer Live! However, although he wasn’t at a disadvantage now, it was still quite difficult for him to kill one of the Asura twins. The battle had always been in a stalemate. “Perhaps I can make use of these martial artists who are watching the show.” Shimada long also observed the situation around him without leaving any traces. He also had a similar perception skill, but the one on the Takama-ga-hara’s side was called [ spirit eye technique ] . It could detect living creatures within a certain range. “If there’s a person over there, lure him over there. Variables will appear wherever there are people.” “If I remember correctly, this person had one of his legs cut off by blood asura at the beginning of the battle. He must hate blood Asura very much.” This time, Shimada long also attacked with all his strength. The Flames gathered crazily and formed a ferocious dragon head in the blink of an eye, devouring it. The three of them gradually moved towards the edge of the battle. Over there was precisely where Ping Yeyang was hiding! Hearing the sounds of the battle getting louder and louder, Ping Yeyang felt a chill in his heart. The thing he was worried about had finally appeared. The attacks of the three of them were really approaching him. “Damn it...; damn it! What can I Do? What else can I do? !” Ping Yeyang thought quickly in his mind, but he realized in despair that he could not escape even if he exhausted all his means. He would definitely be killed by the three of them in the battle! “Instead of dying in frustration, I might as well strike back. My leg was cut off by Blood Asura. I’ll leave a wound on him even if I have to risk my life!” “As for whether Blood Asura will die, I’ll leave it to Shimada Long!” Ping Yeyang gritted his teeth. He was prepared to fight to the death. Even if he died, he had to drag someone down with him! In the next moment, Ping Yuntian used his remaining leg to leap high into the air. He swung his greatsword and used all his strength to ruthlessly smash towards the back of Blood Asura! Blood Asura also had [ Spirit Eye ] , but his [ spirit eye ] was far inferior to Shimada Long’s, so he did not discover Ping Yuntian in advance. By the time he noticed Hirano Sundance, his back was already exposed to the opponent’s greatsword. He had no choice but to try his best to Dodge. Shimada long seemed to have already guessed this point. Flames suddenly gathered around his body, condensing into a three-meter-long spear that stabbed viciously toward blood Asura’s heart! Just now, Blood Asura had no choice but to Dodge Hirano Sundance’s greatsword. This spear suddenly stabbed at him again. It was as if he took the initiative to meet the spear. Blood Asura’s eyes widened in anger. An ancient mirror suddenly appeared in front of him. When the ancient mirror touched the spear, it suddenly shattered thousands of small lenses. The power of this spear attack was also reduced to less than 50% . That was not all. Blood Asura immediately raised his arm. The seemingly ordinary small round shield on his arm suddenly appeared with a ferocious red pattern of a ghost. The evil ghost pattern rushed out of the round shield and collided with the long spear. The power of the long spear decreased once again, reducing to 20% . Bang! Only then did the long spear hit blood Asura. Blood Asura’s chest was pierced through, and his entire body was sent flying far away. He only stopped after crashing into a large tree. Even though the power of the long spear had been reduced to 20% , this attack still hit his vital points, causing nearly 50% of his HP to be damaged! However, as the flaming spear shattered, Shimada long let out a muffled groan. It seemed that he had received quite a bit of damage. Hungry Asura turned pale with fright. He immediately wanted to charge forward. However, Shimada Long did not give him the chance to do so. He activated the flames around him and condensed them into a long chain, tangling with hungry Asura. At the same time, he forcefully expended his HP and condensed a flaming spear that was over a meter long, attacking blood asura. At this moment, he was multitasking, attacking blood Asura and hungry Asura at the same time! At this moment, Ping Yeyang had already been hit by Blood Asura’s furious counterattack. His entire body was sent flying, and his chest caved in mid-air, spurting out blood. His HP plummeted like a waterfall. At this moment, he was at the center of the battle. The battle between hungry Asura and Shimada longyi was about to land on him. Just when he thought he was going to die, a warm and sweet great life potion was suddenly poured into his mouth. Miraculously, his HP was pulled back! Then, his vision blurred, and he realized that he had actually dodged the aftershock of the two’s battle! Ping Yeyang opened his eyes and saw that it was poison blade who had appeared in front of him! “Mu...; Mu Qiang! You actually came back? !” He was both surprised and happy. “You treated me as a friend and stood up when the one-eyed Dragon Trio surrounded me. Naturally, I wouldn’t watch you die.” Poison Blade chuckled and grabbed ping yeyang’s unbalanced body, allowing him to stand steadily on the hillside. Blood Asura did his best to block the flaming spear. When he saw this scene from afar, he was both shocked and angry. Ping Yeyang had given him a fierce blow on the verge of death, which allowed him to use all of his trump cards to neutralize the power of the flaming spear. Now, Ping Yeyang had actually been saved! What kind of skill was that? It actually led Ping Yuntian to move nearly 30 meters in an instant. Forcefully moving from the center of the dangerous battle to the edge of the battle! “Help us kill Shimada long. Whatever you want, we’ll give it to you!”Hungry Asura suddenly shouted. Blood Asura was stunned. While blocking the flaming spear, he also shouted, “If you can join us in besieging Shimada long, I’ll personally apologize to that kid! We can give you anything you want!” At this moment, the two of them had already reacted. This new martial artist’s strength was not ordinary. They had never seen that sudden teleportation skill in the Takama-ga-hara. It was very likely a skill similar to the Salvation Society’s [ teleportation ] and the construction division’s [ Flash -RSB- . If this person joined the battle, even if he could not cause direct damage to Shimada long, his unpredictable battlefield position was enough to disrupt Shimada Long’s battle and create an opportunity for them! Shimada Long’s expression also changed slightly. There were more variables! In a one-on-one fight, he admitted that he was not inferior to anyone. But if the new martial artists also chose to join the Shura Twins’side, the balance of the battle on his side would be raised high! At that time, he would either die in battle, or he would have to throw out his trump card and escape in humiliation! But Shimada Long was also a proud person. He could not tolerate such a cowardly and cowardly act of running away! When Ping Yeyang heard these words, his expression changed slightly. Should he believe them? However, his leg had been cut off by the Blood Asura. At that time, the blood asura did not have the slightest respect in his eyes. Instead, he looked at him as if he was a pig or a dog! Lin Xuan sneered in his heart. The Asura twins were old rivals. Back when White Crane was defending, the Asura twins had appeared, almost breaking the balance of the battle. At that time, Ye Yuqiu’s uncle had used the blue blood pill heart to forcefully increase his lifespan to the level of a Tier 7 fighter before defeating them. Moreover, the construction department’s analysis of the two brothers also showed that they were not good men or women. They were cruel and cunning, and did things without scruples. Working with these two people was tantamount to asking a tiger for its skin. It was very likely that they would counterattack while defeating Shimada Long! “I’m very satisfied with your conditions...;”poison blade smiled. Blood Asura and hungry Asura’s faces lit up with joy. Shimada Long’s heart sank. ”...; That’s why I chose to join Shimada Long’s side and kill you,”poison blade continued. The Asura twins’expressions changed. Shimada long also revealed a satisfied smile. “Not bad. You made the right choice.”He nodded his head in praise. “Stay here.” Poison Blade handed two bottles of great life potion to Sundance Ping Ye. He stomped on the ground and activated [ Swift Lightning ] , joining the battle like an afterimage! Sundance Ping Ye looked down and saw that the two bottles of great life potion were both gold grade! “This guy...;”he could not help but tear up. Ever since his father passed away, no one had cared about him so much. “I’ll leave that Guy to you!” Shimada long also retracted his flaming spear and focused on dealing with hungry asura. He did not dare to use his HP to forcefully activate his class skill for too long. Now that Poison Blade was helping him, it was naturally a good thing. Clang! Clang! Clang! Poison Blade held his short sword upside down and stabbed all of blood Asura’s vital points. Blood Asura was shocked and furious. He had no choice but to retreat continuously. Poison Blade’s attack speed was too fast. It was so fast that he could only block it! After blocking a few moves, he was even more shocked and furious. He had clearly only suffered a flesh wound, but he was also poisoned. Moreover, the wounds on his arms were increasing, and his body was covered in a bleeding state. His HP was like an ice cream melting in summer. It was steadily and slowly decreasing. At this moment, it had already dropped to 40% ! “Damn it! Do you know what you’re doing? You’re making an enemy out of the leader!”Asura cursed as he retreated. Poison blade sneered. “I don’t know what happened. There were only the two of you in the entire battle. Even if you died, it was Shimada long who killed you. It had nothing to do with me.” Hearing this, Asura cursed in his heart. “Shadowless dazzling burst!” Poison Blade roared as he raised his short sword high up in the air. He seemed to be using an extremely powerful skill as he pointed it at Blood Asura’s throat. Blood Asura did not dare to be negligent. He immediately raised his round shield to block the attack. A second evil ghost pattern appeared on the round shield. His round shield did not have much defense, but it had a total of three evil ghost patterns. Every day, he had to replenish 10% of his HP. If he used the Devil’s patterns in battle, he could block an attack directly in front of him. The prerequisite was that his opponent’s attack was below tier 9. Today, he had already used it once when he had killed Sato’s two nephews. He had used the flaming spear to block Shimada long-ya’s attack once again. This was the last time. At this moment, he saw a mocking smile on his opponent’s face. His vision suddenly blurred, and the figure in front of him suddenly disappeared. Blood Asura’s heart thumped, and he instinctively turned around. But his speed was too slow. The dagger had already pierced into his back! It pierced into the chest cavity that had been pierced through by Shimada long and stirred violently! [ see the blood and seal the throat ] was activated! It hit the wound! It hit the vital part! The target was in a poisoned state! Accumulated critical strike rate: 100% ! Triggered Critical Strike! Accumulated critical strike damage + 920% ! As the sword fell, Shura felt a great fear of death enveloping him. His entire body was chilled to the bone, as if something had been peeled off. At this moment, the clear sky doll hanging on his waist instantly shattered! Only then did blood Asura realize with extreme fear that if the leader had not given him this life-substituting treasure, he would have already died once! “There are so many life-saving items. It’s really troublesome,”poison blade muttered to himself. It was the same when he killed Sato clear sky heart. Bug-like items kept appearing one after another. There was also yellow leaf, who would definitely block an attack, acid water that corroded a weapon, and clear sky doll, who was a substitute. As expected of the martial artist that the leader had carefully nurtured, this blood asura also had a substitute tool. “But it’s fine. I’ll just kill him once more.” Poison blade sneered and pounced forward once more. Blood Asura finally reacted. He brazenly consumed 30% of his HP and activated his strongest skill. In an instant, a terrifying blade storm formed around him, enveloping the poison blade! “Brother actually used this skill as well...;” While Hungry Asura and Shimada dragon were fighting, he noticed the 15-meter-wide blood-red blade storm, and his heart trembled. Shimada dragon also noticed this astonishing movement and exclaimed, “That’s...; The [ blade storm ] from the Reed Kingdom’s capital!” As the adopted son of the Sato martial artist, he had been training in the city of Reed ever since he became a Tier 7 martial artist. He was well aware of the situation at Mount Kumgang, Golden River Wash, Wangxia town, the city of Reed, and even the asura prison. He had experienced the power of this skill once before. Using this skill required a consumption of 10% to 50% of one’s HP. Following which, a terrifying bloodblade storm would form around the user for three minutes. The more HP the user consumed, the wider the range of the storm of blood blades and the higher the damage. Everything within this range would be crazily slashed by countless tiny blood blades. Under such circumstances, all living creatures would be sliced into tiny minced meat. Shimada long had also used this skill before. However, his class skill consumed HP. If he used this skill again, he would not be killing his opponent, but committing suicide instead. There was a way to counter this skill. Bloodstorm was an AOE attack with high frequency, high bleeding, and low damage. As long as one had a skill and equipment that could reduce damage in a single attack, it would greatly reduce its lethality. “Unfortunately, that guy is obviously an assassin. An assassin would not prepare such a thing.”Shimada dragon shook his head secretly. In fact, he had recognized this person when he came to the top of Mount Kumgang. Mu Qiang had once injured Sato clear sky heart. His foster father had ordered that if he met this person and Aitian Mei, he must kill them. He also glanced at Mu Qiang’s information. He was 100% an assassin. At most, he had learned a few ice-type skills. Such a martial artist would definitely die in the bloody storm. Instead of worrying about Mu Qiang, he might as well worry about how he would deal with the situation if Mu Qiang died and the blood Asura had no one to hold him back. The blood asura laughed sinisterly. “Die! I Can’t wait to see you cut into pieces!” He stood in the center of the storm of blood blades. This place was like the eye of a typhoon. There were no blood blades, so he was absolutely safe. Meanwhile, his opponent was enveloped by endless blood blades that were moving at high speed. He was dead for sure. Meanwhile, sungod Hirano widened his eyes. He clenched his fists tightly, and his joints turned white. “Mu...; Mu Qiang!” His eyes were red, and he did not dare to look at his opponent anymore. However, at this moment, blood Asura started screaming crazily. “Why...; Why is my hp decreasing? ! I’m the one who used the storm of blood blades!” Asura’s voice was filled with disbelief. He had not received any attacks at all, but his HP had plummeted like a waterfall! In the blink of an eye, his HP had dropped to 10% ! In addition to the battle with Poison Blade, his HP had also fallen to 0% due to both bleeding and being poisoned. His HP was steadily falling towards 0% ! Poison Blade’s faint voice came from the Bloodblade Storm. “Why are you losing hp?” “Of course it’s because...;” Blood Asura widened his eyes, wanting to hear the reason. “Because...;” He gritted his teeth, wanting to hear the reason. “Because...;” “Ah!” Blood Asura’s HP was steadily falling towards 0% ! His eyes widened in anger, and he fell to the ground, unwilling to give up! “I can’t even think of an excuse myself, how can I tell you?”Lin Xuan cursed in his heart. He had never expected that the blood Asura would suddenly exchange damage for damage. However, when he realized that the 15-meter radius of the Bloodblade Storm looked terrifying, the damage it dealt was not even as fast as his HP. “Fight me. If you use such a high frequency and low damage AOE, it’s suicide.” Lin Xuan laughed out loud. His [ advanced thorny body ] was no joke. The high damage was not something to be taken lightly. Even Shimada long and hungry Asura, who were fighting fiercely not far away, did not expect this. In the distance, Horizon Horizon’s eyes widened in shock when he saw this scene. He knew that Mu Qiang was quite strong. After all, he had single-handedly killed the one-eyed dragon trio and remained unscathed. However, the person he had killed was blood Asura, one of the Asura twins, who had been carefully groomed by their leader! Although Blood Asura and Shimada Long had fought for a long time, their HP, Mana, and stamina had all decreased significantly. But they shouldn’t have died so easily, right? Shimada Long’s eyes sparkled. The information his foster father had given him did not mention this. Could it be that Mu Qiang had obtained a powerful trump card from the construction division before he came to the Highheaven Plains? At this moment, hungry Asura was beyond furious. He and Blood Asura were twins. The twins had some sort of strange telepathic connection. When Blood Asura died, the string that bound the two brothers together seemed to have suddenly snapped! “I’m...; I’m going to kill you!” Hungry Asura roared crazily toward the sky. He actually threw Shimada long aside and charged toward poison blade. “Help! I don’t have much mana left...;”poison blade deliberately shouted. Shimada long also snorted coldly. “You don’t have to say it. I’ll stop him too.” He swung his arms out, bringing with them flames as he smashed them down viciously, directly blocking hungry Asura’s path. Meanwhile, Poison Blade shot out long-ranged skills from afar, slowly depleting hungry Asura’s HP and provoking his weak nerves. Hungry Asura, who had lost his reason, was like a caged beast. A beast with intelligence was the most terrifying. However, a beast that had lost its reason was only a beast. Shimada long also displayed the strength of the 2nd rank on the Global Tier 7 leaderboard. His combat strength, endurance, and overall outlook were all impeccable. He used an incomparably precise battle method to exhaust hungry Asura to death, but he barely suffered any damage. In the end, hungry Asura also opened his eyes wide in anger, roaring crazily as he collapsed in despair. Shimada long also threw a few more skills at the vital parts of his corpse. After confirming his death, he let out a sigh of relief. He had won against two people by himself, and it was only with the help of others. What his foster father said made sense. The leader had deliberately suppressed the Shura Twins’strength, not allowing them to obtain too high a ranking on the global tier 7 leaderboard. He wanted to use this method to paralyze his foster father. Poison Blade looked into the distance. Those martial artists who had been eating melons earlier had long scattered like birds and beasts. They were afraid of being implicated and did not dare to look again. There were only the three of them alive on the summit of King Kong Mountain. “We didn’t come here today. You killed the Shura Twins,”Poison Blade said with a smile. Shimada long also raised his eyebrows and said with a faint smile, “You want to push the blame on me?” Poison Blade smiled, “What’s wrong with that? You’re Lord Sato’s foster son. You fought alone and killed the Shura Twins. Lord Sato will definitely value you more. In the eyes of the other warriors, you’ve also displayed the second most powerful force on the rank seven list in the world. It will also attract more warriors to defect to Lord Sato.” “We’re afraid of Lord Leader’s anger, but you’re not afraid. Lord Sato will protect you.” “No matter how you look at it, blaming the death of the Shura Twins on you will only benefit you.” Shimada long also smiled faintly. “You’re very good at talking.” Poison Blade still had a smile on his face. When he heard Shimada Long’s words, he knew that this was a sure thing. Hirano sun was shivering. Brother Mu Qiang was so awesome that he could even speak with confidence in front of Shimada long. “You helped me kill Blood Asura. I owe you a favor.” “I won’t pursue the matter of you hurting Qing kongxin back then. But the next time we meet, I will make a move because this is an order from my foster father.” Shimada long also said calmly. Lin Xuan frowned slightly. This guy was so vengeful! However, the Sato martial artist should only know that Mu Qiang had hurt his daughter. If the Sato martial artist knew that his daughter’s death was actually related to Mu Qiang, he would probably come straight here and kill him! “However, your strength is quite good. We might be able to cooperate in the future. When we cooperate, I’ll pretend that I didn’t see you.”Shimada long also paused and said. “Let’s go.”He waved his hand, took the Shura Twins’relics, and left. “Let’s go too.” Poison blade waved his hand, signaling for Ping Yeyang to follow. Ping Yeyang rushed to his side. He still felt like he was in a dream. He somehow survived. Blood Asura died inexplicably. Hungry Asura also died inexplicably. “Brother Mu, which level are you at? Did you level up again?” “Brother Mu, what did you use to survive the storm of blood blades?” “Brother Mu, brother Mu...;” Ping Yeyang couldn’t help but ask, his eyes full of curiosity. Poison Blade just smiled and didn’t answer. .. In the square. The two came here and randomly found a small stall to eat. The stall owner had [ cooking ] , which could make dishes. While the martial artists fought, they also had to eat. The stall owner would take advantage of this time to make some snacks, which could be considered as earning extra money. High and mighty martial artists like Shimada long and the Shura Twins were always in the minority. The low-level martial artists all lived very hard. “F * ck, I saw the battle between Shimada long and the Shura Twins. It was too awesome. That scene, that imposing manner...; TSK, TSK, tsk. I Won’t be able to achieve it in my lifetime.” “I saw it too, but I was afraid that the aftershocks of their battle would hit me, so I ran away ahead of time. To be honest, they are indeed worthy of being the martial artists that Lord Sato and chief nurtured. They are indeed awesome.” “However, why did they fight? Could it be that behind them is Lord Sato and chief...;” The martial artists’heated conversation suddenly stopped. Everyone keenly realized that they couldn’t say anything else. At this moment, the ground suddenly shook violently. At the same time, the secret realm light door in the center of the square, which was constantly emitting light and rotating, suddenly dimmed at an extremely fast speed. This situation attracted the attention of all the Warriors in the square. Before they could react, the secret realm light door completely dimmed! “This...;” Ping Yeyang was flabbergasted. This was the first time he had seen the door to the secret realm automatically close. “What’s going on?” A martial artist working in the Secret Service Department of the capital walked over with a frown and gently touched the door to the secret realm. There was no reaction. The door to the secret realm seemed to have completely lost its function. “We...; are trapped here? !” A warrior suddenly shouted as if he had remembered something. His words immediately caused panic among the other warriors. “Are we going to be trapped here for the rest of our lives? !” “F * ck, my wife and children are still outside!” “It’s okay, it’s okay. Every time I come to Wei Ming country for training, I will entrust my wife and children to my brothers.” ”...;” Lin Xuan frowned deeply. Although Lin Xuan was in Xiao Ling Mountain, among all his clones, only poison blade was adventuring outside. Therefore, he had been paying attention to the situation in Wei Ming country. The sudden disappearance of the light gate of the mystic realm was definitely a big deal. “Is it related to the origin of the Mystic Realm?” Lin Xuan Thought for a long time, but it seemed to be the only explanation. The origin of the secret realm was being nurtured, so the light door of the secret realm was tightly shut! It was hard to say what would happen in Wei Ming country next. In the capital city. A seventh rank martial artist whistled and was about to enter the light door. Suddenly, he directly passed through the light door, almost staggering. The martial artists lining up behind him to enter Wei Ming country were also shocked. What the F * ck? The light gate was not allowed to enter? ! The sudden closure of the light gate caused the warriors outside the secret realm to be frightened. What was happening in the Wei Ming kingdom that caused the light gate to be closed. The leader, Skyfeather Craftsman, Sato warrior, and the other tier 9 warriors were also shocked when they heard the report from their subordinates. They all came to the light gate. The leader subconsciously used [ spirit eye ] to look carefully. There was nothing. Even if his [ spirit eye ] had long been dark gold quality, he could not see anything from the light gate. The leader looked at the others. Sato warrior, Sky Feather Craftsman, and the others also shook their heads. The leader frowned deeply. “Immediately seal the capital city. No one is allowed to go out. The news of the light gate of the secret realm of the Wei name nation can not be leaked. Anyone who disobeys the order will be killed!” “Yes!” The martial artists of the capital’s Secret Service Department had solemn expressions as they immediately began to maintain order. The gate of light was closed. It was unknown if it was for an hour, two hours, a day, two days, or even a year or two years. It was even...; completely closed. Because this had never happened before, the leader did not dare to use positive emotions to speculate. He could only think of the worst consequences. The Wei Ming country was the most important secret realm of the Gaotian plains. Without the Wei Ming country, the Gaotian Plains’future development potential was almost halved! It could no longer compete with top organizations like the Salvation Society and the construction division. Therefore, the news of the Wei Ming country’s secret realm, Guangmen, must not be leaked at all. Otherwise, the other organizations might have some little tricks up their sleeves. The leader took out the Gaotian Plains’internal communication device from the storage compartment, trying to contact the level 9 martial artist guarding the Wei Ming country. However, the communication device could not send out any news, only the dull rustling sound. Reed country, on the square. The rank 9 martial artist guarding the Reed Country, Hyako Yamamoto, arrived under the awed gazes of all the martial artists. There were also several rank 8 martial artists guarding him. Shimada long also nodded slightly, not looking at this rank 9 martial artist. Poison Blade also restrained his thoughts of throwing out the high-level observation technique. Who knew if this type 9 martial artist had any special skills? If he knew that someone was using the high-level observation technique to look at him, that would be bad. Yamamoto Xuanxin looked around the light door, but his expression did not change. After thinking for a short while, he turned to the Warriors. “Everyone, the sudden disappearance of the light door without any warning may be related to the earthquake just now. The Monsters of the Wei Ming kingdom may become stronger. Everyone, be prepared.” After saying that, Yamamoto Shinkai left straight away. He still had to guard the Asura prison. The lives of these warriors had nothing to do with him. His mission was to ensure the safety of the Asura prison. That was the most important place in the Takama Plains. “Master Yamamoto, when will the light gate open again? !”A warrior mustered up his courage and asked. Yamamoto Shinkai did not answer, nor did he take half a step to stop. The Warriors looked at each other. It seemed that even the tier 9 boss did not know when the door of light would open. “Brother Mu, what do you plan to do next?”Ping Yeyang was a little lost and could not help but ask. Poison Blade Thought for a moment. “It’s not dark yet. I need to go out and find something. I’ll come back when it’s dark.” Ping yeyang quickly said, “I’ll go with you!” Poison Blade did not know whether to laugh or cry. “Why are you following me? If you’re scared, stay in the square. If you want to train, then train somewhere close to the square.” Ping Yeyang scratched his head and smiled awkwardly. After witnessing Mu Qiang’s strength, he could not help but want to Hug Mu Qiang’s leg. Lin Xuan naturally could not let Ping Yeyang follow poison blade. He planned to go out and look for the mechanical artifact that Wanyou Gap placed in Wei Ming country. Perhaps he could contact the construction department. “Where should I look?” He controlled poison blade and wandered around. He had already been to King Kong Mountain. It would be better to go to other places to take a look. Poison Blade first went to the gold washing river. He did not find the mechanical artifact. Instead, he found more than ten gold washing stones. Then, he came to Wangxia town. Wangxia town, as its name implied, was a small town under the imperial city. There were a large number of walking corpses here. They were stronger than the hungry ghosts in the sixth level mystic realm, the hungry ghost village, and the variety was more abundant. There were things that ran on the ground, swam in the water, and flew in the sky. In addition, there were all kinds of beast carcasses formed by birds and beasts, poisonous corpses that contained venom.. All the martial artists who trained here had to go out for some fresh air every few days without exception. There were also some people who had been training here for a long time, causing psychological problems and never dared to come to Wangxia town to train again. The reason was that this place was too gloomy and dark. It was a hundred times scarier than the hungry ghost village. Those who didn’t know would think that they had come to some netherworld or Asura hell. When poison blade arrived here, the martial artists were fighting with all their might. Their battle cries shook the sky. He glanced around and soon discovered Lu Luo’s figure in the crowd. Lu Luo perfectly displayed ai Tianmei’s personality. She was shy and muddle-headed. Her strength was not up to par, but she was unyielding. She did not retreat in the face of the terrifying zombies. “Retreat, Retreat! The attributes of these zombies have increased by at least 10% , especially the level eight and level nine tiger corpse leading them. It’s simply a king of a small mystic realm.” A level eight and level nine martial artist clutched his arm and shouted in exasperation. The level eight martial artist beside him also used him as the center and slowly retreated. Since the level eight martial artist said so, the level seven martial artist naturally wouldn’t be idle and charge forward. Very quickly, the martial artists retreated out of Wangxia Town. The strange thing was that the zombies actually didn’t chase after them. Instead, they roared at them from afar for a while before returning to the depths of Wangxia town. “That’s strange. Why don’t they rush out every time?” “Yeah, they seem to be guarding something. Could it be that they have some treasure?” “Now that you mention it, I remember. It seems that the ground shaking just now was also from Wangxia Town.” The martial artists were all whispering among themselves as they voiced their guesses one after another. “Miss Aitian, you’re here too. What a coincidence.”Poison Blade walked into Lu Luo and greeted her. Lu Luo nodded when she saw him. “What’s going on here?” Lu Luo sighed. “I’m confused too. I heard that the light gate of the secret realm was closed, and the attributes of the monsters here have increased by about 10% . We were lucky enough to escape under the lead of those tier 8 warriors.” “But there are still more than 40 warriors inside. They should be dead already. We rushed to Wangxia town just now to save those people.” Yamamoto Xuesin had already investigated Wei Mingguo. The data he gave was that there were at least 100,000 zombies in Wangxia town. Even if they killed them today, there would be new zombies in the houses tomorrow. Zombies did not reproduce. They appeared in the houses out of thin air. It was extremely terrifying. “They seem to be gathering assassin professionals. They want these warriors to sneak in and see what’s going on inside.” At this moment, Lu Luo heard the cries of the tier 8 warriors and turned around to speak to poison blade. Lin Xuan was deep in thought when he heard this. Sneak in? I’m good at that! “Oh right, did you see those traps and artifacts?” Lu Luo came to her senses. He was asking about Wan youxi and those things. She nodded without a trace, but she looked troubled. “I saw them once. It was in Wangxia Town. It was too far away and surrounded by too many zombies. I didn’t dare to go there.” “The general direction?” Lu Luo quickly described it to him. The description could not be said to be perfect. At the very least, it could be said to be messy. Lin Xuan wondered if Lu Luo would easily get lost without a map. Noticing his gaze, Lu Luo’s face turned red. “Let me draw you a map.” She took a branch and began to draw on the ground. Only then did Lin Xuan remember the general location of the mechanism. “Don’t let others discover it. The mechanism is the most important secret,”Lu Luo said softly. They had hidden their identities for so long without being exposed. If they were to be exposed because of the mechanism being suspected, it would be a huge loss. Poison blade nodded and walked towards the Type 8 warriors. “Assassins, Step Out!” “What are you afraid of! You’re assassins, you’re best at walking in the midst of an army, not even a blade of grass can touch you.” “Hurry up and step out, do you want me to personally order people?”Takeda Shinobu snorted coldly. The Assassins felt their scalps go numb. Big Brother, if you can do it, then do it. If you let us enter King’s town, where there are as many as 100,000 zombies, to gather intelligence, then what’s the difference from sending us to our deaths? Only a Tier 8, Tier 2 assassin stood out helplessly. As a Tier 8 martial artist, he had no choice but to set an example. The other assassin professionals looked at each other, each of them shrinking their necks. No matter what you say, we’re not going! Takeda Shinobu frowned deeply. He was loyal to Skyfeather craftsman. Skyfeather Craftsman had never liked to kill randomly, and he had inherited Skyfeather Craftsman’s personality. The words he said just now were just to scare these people. But these assassin professionals were really tough. They actually didn’t want to go up. Do whatever you want. Just as Takeda Shinobu was at a loss, a voice sounded. “I can do it.” Everyone looked in the direction of the voice and saw a shrewd-looking middle-aged man. Takeda ninja was pleasantly surprised. “What’s Your Name?” “Mu Qiang.” The martial artists’expressions froze. He was actually from China. Could it be that he had defected from the construction division? At the thought of this, the martial artists all revealed looks of disdain. Traitors were not welcomed no matter where they went. Takeda ninja’s expression also froze. He wanted to slap himself. What a chatterbox. Why did he ask for his name. “Mu Qiang, I’m very gratified that you’re willing to take the initiative to stand out. I represent Lord Tianyu to express my gratitude to you.”Takeda ninja took a deep breath and said seriously, “But I need to confirm that you’re an assassin? Do you have the confidence to sneak among these zombies and try to gather as much information as possible?” Poison blade nodded. “Alright...;”Takeda Shinobu nodded in relief. Just as he was about to continue speaking, poison blade interrupted him. “I am the only Level 7 warrior who is willing to enter. May I ask if Lord Takeda can give me some reward?”Poison blade rubbed his hands. His eyes flickered with shrewdness, perfectly acting out mu Qiang’s true character. Takeda Shinobu looked helpless. He took out 50 secret realm pearls from his storage compartment. “Is this okay? If you come out alive, I will give you 50 more.” Poison blade nodded. “It’s enough.” He took the mystic realm pearls and plunged into Wangxia town. Everyone rolled their eyes. This guy wanted money more than his life. The Tier 8, Tier 2 assassin snorted coldly, “I feel that this kid is going to ruin things.” Then, he teased Takeda ninja, “I’m afraid that your 50 secret realm pearls have gone down the drain.” Takeda ninja smiled bitterly, “At least he dares to stand out. If he’s going down the drain, then so be it.” The tier 8 assassin was also prepared to enter King’s town. At this time, the martial artists behind him exclaimed. “F * CK, did you see that? That guy swaggered past the zombies! The Zombies acted as if they didn’t see him!” The martial artists wiped their eyes, as if they had seen a ghost. That Mu Qiang was really like a ghost, he simply floated past! Takeda Ninja and the Tier 8 assassin were also stunned. Following that, Takeda Ninja’s face revealed a look of surprise, “This guy is more reliable than I thought!” The tier 8 assassin nodded, “He does have some tricks. I’ll go in too.” After saying that, he quickly entered King’s town. With the effects of his skills and equipment, he was immediately hidden in the shadows. At this time, Poison Blade had already entered the depths of King’s Landing Town. “It’s true. The attributes of these zombies have almost increased by 10% . Tier 7 Level 1 zombies can already suppress tier 7 level 2 martial artists. No wonder they were forced to leave King’s Landing Town.” Poison Blade continued to move forward, and soon, he saw traces of blood on the ground. He followed the traces of blood for a while, and as expected, he saw a few pieces of broken limbs. Lin Xuan shook his head. He mourned for him for a moment and continued to move forward. With the double buffs of his skills and equipment, his sense of presence was practically zero. He moved like a fish in water in the shadows. Even if he slipped past the zombies, they did not react at all. It was as if they treated the poison blades as air. Not long after, he arrived at the center of Wangxia Town. There were a huge number of zombies gathered here! These zombies all had their backs to him and were facing the center. However, there were too many of them. They blocked off the flow of water. Poison Blade could not see what was going on and could only climb to the residential area to take a look. When he climbed to the roof, he was happy. There was actually a trembling warrior here. “You are here to save me?”The warrior was pleasantly surprised. Poison blade nodded, “Where are the others?” The warrior pointed to the roofs of the nearby houses, “Most of them are hiding on the roofs. Most of the undeads have been guarding the center of Wangxia Town. They didn’t attack US and just stood there. However, the undeads that are scattered around Wangxia town’s houses and streets are very aggressive. They attack everyone they see. It’s so scary.” Poison blade nodded slightly, looking at the center that was surrounded by the zombies. He saw a deep hole! The hole seemed to be emitting some pure black gas at all times. The level 8 and level 9 tiger corpse that was in the lead was lying on the edge of the hole, breathing in and out the black gas. Although he could not see the front of it, from its actions and reactions, it seemed to be quite comfortable. Behind the tiger corpse, there were over 40 Type 8 zombies, all sorts of forms. They only dared to stand half a step away from the tiger corpse and breathe in and out of the black gas. As for the Type 7 zombies outside, the amount of black gas they could breathe was even less. The tiger corpse ate meat, while the rest of the Type 8 zombies ate bones. The Type 7 zombies could only drink some leftovers, forming a distinct pyramid system. Of course, these were still considered good. The Zombies in the residences and streets couldn’t get through at all, and were directly pushed out. When Lin Xuan saw this scene, his heart pounded wildly. Could it be that this big hole had appeared from the ground shaking just now? According to the news from the reed name nation, the origin of the arcane realm was being nurtured in the underground altar of Wangxia Town. Could it be under this big hole? Judging from the black gas coming out of the big hole, it was very likely true! The origin of the secret realm sounded very awesome. The black gas might be a byproduct of the secret realm’s origin nurturing process. But just this byproduct alone could make the level 8 and 9 Tiger Corpse in the lead extremely happy. It was hard to imagine what level the treasure of the Secret Realm’s origin was. “Could it be above dark gold legendary quality, seven-colored immortal quality?” “Get them to come over and stay on this roof of yours. Soon, a level 8 warrior will arrive, and he will bring you all away,”poison blade said softly. That warrior nodded repeatedly, almost tearing up. “Thank you!” Poison Blade flipped over and landed lightly on the ground, like a cat. He blended into the darkness again, and even the warriors on the roof did not notice his presence. “This guy’s stealth ability is too strong.”The Warriors on the roof looked at each other. Poison Blade followed the crooked picture that Lu Luo had drawn and walked through the residential buildings. Soon, he arrived at his destination. This was also an ordinary residential building, but in the corner of the residential building, there was a mechanical creation the size of a three or four-year-old baby. However, this mechanical device was deliberately aged and covered with a large amount of dust. No matter who passed by, no one would notice it. Moreover, this was Wangxia town, which was full of dangers. In the entire famous reed country, its level of danger was second only to the capital of the famous Reed Country. Even the warriors who came in to search for treasures would at most take a glance and leave as soon as they saw that there was no treasure. Now, there were not many warriors in Wangxia town other than the zombies. The remaining warriors were shivering and lying on the roof. They did not even dare to poke their heads out. Instead, it gave him a chance to calm down and operate. Poison blade squatted in front of the machine. According to the method that Li Weiguo had taught him before he came, he gently rubbed, rubbed, and flipped. He used a special method to lightly touch more than ten parts of the machine’s body. Lin Xuan ridiculed in his heart, “Those who don’t know would think that I’m creating a mechanism to promote blood circulation and remove blood stasis.” After a whole set of massage techniques, the mechanism creation center suddenly glowed faintly and began to operate silently. At the same time, Wan You, who was studying the dark gold blueprints of the Skyplume Craftsman, suddenly jumped up from his chair and rushed into his secret research room. Tian yucai was so scared that her hand trembled, and the new mechanism she was putting together was ruined on the spot. She looked resentful, but she didn’t dare to say anything, so she could only start again. Wan youxi closed the Secret Research room and came to a screen with some excitement. The strange thing was that the screen didn’t light up, but a snowflake screen. Wan youxi scratched her head and put on the headphones, and the monotonous rustling sound came from the headphones. “The audio-visual methods are all out of order...; what happened to Wei Ming Country?”Wan youxi looked puzzled. When he first designed this set of things, he had carefully designed three communication methods. Because some secret realms had extremely strong interference abilities, even the strongest communication devices would fail. Some secret realms were not like this, and even the low-quality communication devices developed by India could work normally. Some secret realms were like the Falling Thunder Mountain. Because the kings of the secret realms were too powerful, they could interfere with the operation of the communicators. Wan youxi naturally didn’t know what was going on in Wei Ming country, so he arranged three communication methods. Video chat couldn’t work, and voice chat couldn’t work either. Then let’s type and chat. Wan youxi rubbed his fingers and typed a word. “Here?” Poison Blade immediately saw this line of words in the dim light at the center of the machine. Lin Xuan was speechless on the spot. Who Is He! Why is he saying ‘here’to me at a time like this? He controlled poison blade to write on the machine with one finger. Then, three amiable words came into Wan youxi’s sight. “In your mother’s.” Wan youxi was stunned at first, then he laughed out loud. “Who is that? It suits my personality.” Wan youxi typed another line of words. “Ahem, what happened in Wei Ming Country? Did you get the location of Xiang Qian’s imprisonment?” Lin Xuan said, “The light gate of Wei Ming country’s secret realm suddenly closed, and the monster’s attributes increased by about 10% . Xiang Qian’s imprisonment is in the capital of Wei Ming country, Asura prison. I’m preparing to go there.” Wan youxi was quite surprised when he saw this. “The light door of the secret realm closed? That’s strange. This has never happened since the beginning of the global digitization.” “If I get the detailed location of shallow view, how can I be rescued?”Another line of text appeared. Wan youxi replied, “Remove the core of the mechanism and bring it to the place of detention. By then, a Tier 9 warrior will open a passage through the key of the sun and appear directly in Asura prison.” Poison blade replied, “The light door of the secret realm is closed. Can the key of the Sun still be used?” Wan youxi nodded slightly. “I will inform the chiefs and let them give it a try.” The communication ended. Lin Xuan controlled poison blade to pull down the core of the mechanism. It was a pearl that was shimmering with a faint light. He used a high-level observation skill to observe the object. He only knew that it was called [ mechanism core ] . It was Level 9, Level 1, and nothing else could be seen. “It’s about time to leave. I’ll come back when the origin of the secret realm is almost complete. Now, I should go to the capital of the Reed Kingdom and find an opportunity to go deep into the asura prison.” Lin Xuan calculated in secret and was ready to return. At this moment, a shocking roar came from not far away. The roar was earth-shaking, and even the dark clouds in the sky above King’s Lower Town were gone! The terrifying sound waves swept wildly in all directions. Poison Blade was affected. It was as if his brain had been stabbed by a large number of long needles. He felt a sharp pain. Fortunately, his physique was high enough. Poison Blade quickly recovered. However, upon closer inspection of his condition, he realized that his HP had actually dropped by 10% ! “A roar caused me to lose 10% of my HP. What’s going on? Is it that Tier 8, Tier 9 Tiger Corpse?” Poison Blade immediately left the residence and climbed to the roof. As he had expected, the corpse of the tiger, which had been breathing in and out of the black smoke, had already grown in size! “That tiger corpse has probably absorbed enough black smoke to become a Tier 9 monster!”Seeing this scene through Poison Blade’s eyes, Lin Xuan was slightly surprised. The tiger corpse stretched out its body in satisfaction, and the zombies beside it all fell to the ground in fear. At this time, the tiger corpse seemed to have noticed something, and its gaze sharpened, as it looked towards a nearby residential area. It roared out, and spat out a huge cloud of black gas, enveloping the residential area. A figure charged out of the residential area, running towards the outskirts of Wangxia town. It was the Type 8 assassin who had entered Wangxia town with poison blade. His concealment was seen through by the tiger corpse. The assassin was terrified, not daring to turn back, and could only flee. The Tiger Corpse’s eyes were filled with a terrifying suppression. Without thinking, it was a Type 9 monster! “We must bring the news out! We must tell Lord Yamamoto that a Tier 9 monster has appeared in Wangxia Town!” The number of Tier 9 monsters was very small, but once they appeared, it would definitely cause a huge disaster. Therefore, in order to control it, the leader of the Gaotian Plains had long made an agreement with a group of Tier 9 warriors. Once a Tier 9 monster was born, if its attributes were weak, it would be driven to a place where no one was around and killed only after its level had slightly increased. It was just like raising pigs.., once it was fattened, it would be killed. If its attributes were strong, it would be surrounded and killed as soon as possible. The reason was simple. The leader’s level was only tier 9, Tier 7. As for Sato, skyfeather, Yamamoto, and the others, their strength was between Tier 9, Tier 4, and Tier 9, Tier 7. A martial artist with this strength alone might not be able to defeat a Tier 9 monster. If a Tier 9 monster had some powerful skills, a tier 9 martial artist might be injured. A tier 9 warrior was the absolute strength of a large organization. If any tier 9 warrior was injured, it would weaken the organization’s high-end combat power! No organization could afford to take such a risk. Ever since the tier 9 monster died three years ago, it had been a long time since a Tier 9 monster appeared in the country of Wei. The leader had single-handedly killed the tier 9 monster, and all the gains were enjoyed by the leader alone. No one knew how much benefits he had received, so the Skyfeather craftsman, Yamamoto, and the others were all in awe of him. This Type 8 assassin only had one thought in his mind, escape! He had to escape! However, he had underestimated the Type 9 monster. When the Black Cloud landed on the residential area, it melted silently, turning into dozens of small tiger carcasses. The tiger carcasses were not that huge, but their speed had increased drastically. The Type 8 assassin continued to sprint, only a few hundred meters away from the entrance of Wang Xia Town. He could even see the figure of the leader, Takeda Shinobu. He let out a long breath, it seemed like he had escaped. Takeda Shinobu and the rest also saw him, their faces filled with joy. However, at the next moment, Takeda Shinobu and the rest’s expressions changed. Because they saw a large number of tiger corpses appearing behind the Type 8 assassin, chasing after him relentlessly! The distance between the two was rapidly closing! The leader of the tiger corpses exploded, pushing his head towards the back of the Type 8 assassin! The assassin felt a sudden sense of danger, and he instinctively rolled to the side, dodging the attack. However, his speed was greatly reduced. Dozens of tiger corpses swarmed forward! From the center came the horrifying howls of a Tier 8 martial artist! His body was devoured by dozens of tiger corpses in less than a minute. The tiger corpses scattered on the spot. The tiger corpse burped contentedly, as if it had eaten an entire living person across space. Takeda Shinobu and a group of martial artists saw this scene in its entirety, as if they had fallen into an ice cave! It was too terrifying. That was a tier 8 warrior! Although he was an assassin and had relatively low HP, it was impossible for him to be wiped out in an instant like a cat or dog. However, this was the truth, and they found it hard to believe. Takeda ninja clenched his fists tightly, his face pale. Those tiger corpses were clearly not zombies, but a skill. When they had fought with the tiger corpse, the tiger corpse had used this skill before. However, the power of the skill was not that strong back then. As a warrior who mainly focused on strength and slightly focused on constitution, he had taken all the damage head-on, even so, he had only lost 30% of his HP. Now, however, the same skill had insta-killed a tier 8 warrior. Such strength...; it was impossible for it to be a tier 8 monster. Such a terrifying Suppressive Force could only be achieved by a Tier 9 monster. Right now, he no longer had the time to think about the life and death of the tier 7 warrior named Mu Qiang. He had to tell Yamamoto Shinji everything. The light gate of the secret realm was sealed. The only one who could compete with a Tier 9 monster was Yamamoto Shinkai! “You guys stay here. I’ll go ask Yamamoto-sama Now!” Takeda Shinobu turned around and left. “He’s going to ask Yamamoto-sama? Could it be that the tiger corpse...; has become a Tier 9 monster?” “Let’s run too. Who knows when those zombies will rush out.” “There are still many warriors inside. How can we abandon them? !” “Who cares about their lives? Their lives are the most important.” After witnessing the death of the rank 8 warriors, the other warriors were also panicking. Not long after Takeda took his leave, these warriors also left in groups of three to five. Almost half of them had left. The remaining warriors who were still here were all because their friends and relatives were still inside. There were also some who thought that Yamamoto Shinkai had been famous for a long time. As long as he arrived, he would definitely be able to control that tier 9 monster, so there was no need to worry. Lu Luo was also pacing back and forth restlessly. There were only two people who had entered the scouting area. That tier 8 assassin had obviously been discovered, so he had no choice but to escape frantically. Then, he was instantly killed by a skill. Then, what about poison blade? Lu Luo could only pray that poison blade could hide for a while longer, waiting for Yamamoto Shinkai to arrive and escape in the chaos. “Don’t let anything happen...;” Lu Luo stared intently at the main street of Wangxia town, which led from the north to the south, hoping that a figure could escape unscathed. On the other side. Lin Xuan, like Takeda Ninja and the others, had personally witnessed the entire process of the eight tier 8 martial artists being instantly killed. He could not help but be shocked. Although his strength was enough to crush warriors and monsters of the same level, facing such an unreasonable and direct suppression of a higher level, there was still nothing he could do. Of course, having life-saving items on him would not be enough to kill him. “I just don’t know if the 100% reduction in my sense of presence will be effective on that tiger corpse. I Can’t take the risk, so I’ll go around it from a distance.” Lin Xuan controlled the poison blade to circle around the tiger corpse very carefully. He had already memorized the distance between the residential area where the level 8 warrior was hiding and the tiger corpse. It was a full 800 meters. This distance was very likely to be discovered. Therefore, Lin Xuan absolutely could not get within 800 meters of the tiger corpse. At this time, the tiger corpse had evolved to level 9 and gave up its position, allowing the level 8 zombies behind it to come forward and breathe out black gas. It looked at the surrounding buildings with a sharp gaze. In less than half a minute, it roared, its huge tiger eyes shooting out a cruel and bloodthirsty light. Roar! It directly pounced out, lightly leaping onto the three meter tall roof. The martial artist on the roof instantly paled. Before he could jump off the roof, his upper body was swallowed by the tiger corpse. The lower half of his body slowly fell down, and blood spurted out like a fountain! The martial artists on the other roofs swallowed a mouthful of saliva and fled frantically towards the exit of Wangxia Town! They had originally been moving slowly and cautiously, trying their best not to alarm the zombies. But now that the tiger corpse had started hunting, it was no longer up to them. If they did not run now, they would die! The tiger corpse chewed with large mouthfuls, and in a few bites, it ate the martial artist and jumped towards another residential building. Screams of Pain Rose and fell in Wangxia town. The warriors outside Wangxia town only felt that it was bone-piercing. At the same time, after listening to Takeda Shinobu’s description, Yamamoto Shinobu frowned deeply and had already rushed over with a few tier 8 warriors beside him. Yamamoto Shinobu’s speed was extremely fast. In the end, he simply abandoned Takeda Shinobu and the others and rushed to Wangxia Town alone. According to the normal route, it would take at least two and a half hours to reach Wangxia town from the Shura Prison to the capital of the reed country. However, Yamamoto took only half an hour to arrive. When he arrived here, he could already feel the terrifying aura and horrifying screams from afar. “That’s right, it’s the aura of a Tier 9 monster.” Yamamoto had once killed a Tier 9 monster with his leader, so he was very familiar with this aura. “If the tiger corpse is killed personally, I’m afraid no one will survive.”Shinji Yamamoto frowned deeply. At this moment, Poison Blade moved quickly close to the residential area and came out from under the eyes of a few undeads. He appeared at the main road of Wangxia town, only a thousand meters away from the exit. At this distance, there was no need to go into stealth, he could just run straight away. He activated [ Swift Lightning ] and ran on a road. Yamamoto Shinkai raised his eyebrows. “This kid...; he must have maxed out [ stealth ] and [ divine movement ] , right?” [ stealth ] and [ divine movement ] were skills that were produced in many mystical realms in the Takama-ga-hara. In the construction division, similar skills were [ stealth ] and [ swift steps ] , in the Truth Knight Order, India, the Arctic Army, and the Salvation Society, they had different names. Although the names were different, and the effects of the skills were different, they were all the same. Roar! The tiger corpse bit off the head of a martial artist. Its sharp eyes noticed the poison blade that was running on the main road. A human-like anger flashed across its huge tiger eyes. ‘running under my nose like this, you don’t think much of me?’? It abandoned the martial artist in its mouth, stomped on the roof, and leaped over ten meters. At the same time, it spat out a cloud of black gas, which turned into dozens of small tiger corpses and rushed to the back of the poison blade. “How can I allow you to kill people in front of me? !” Yamamoto Xuanxin snorted and suddenly pulled out his saber. His voice shook the world. The Tachi was unsheathed, and lightning descended! Lightning gathered in the sky, and in the blink of an eye, it gathered into a ten-meter-long giant lightning blade. The giant blade slashed down! The small tiger corpses that were charging towards the poisonous blade roared at the same time, and all of them collided together, instantly forming a giant black claw that charged towards the lightning giant. At the same time that the giant lightning blade and the giant black claw collided, in the distance, Yamamoto Xuanxin and the tiger corpse looked at each other. When the Warriors saw this, they could not calm down for a long time. This was a battle between a Type 9 warrior and a Type 9 monster! As expected of the strongest force in the world. Poison Blade took this opportunity to rush out of Wangxia town, his heart slightly shocked. Originally, he had maintained a distance of over 800 meters from the tiger corpse. However, the rate of the tiger corpse’s movements was too fast, and it had been hunting the warriors on the rooftops. At its closest distance, it was only 600 meters away from him. When he rushed to the main road, the tiger corpse had noticed him, and used the same method to deal with the Type 8 warrior. Poison Blade could survive. But he had to use his trump card. And for a Type 7 warrior to survive the attack of a Type 9 monster, anyone would have guessed that there was something wrong with him. If Yamamoto Shinkai knew, then he would be investigated. But fortunately, at this juncture, Shinji Yamamoto arrived and happened to be standing next to the tiger corpse. Both sides had to put all their attention on the other party, so naturally, they would not care about a tier 7 minor character. Lu Luo and he looked at each other. Poison blade nodded slightly, indicating that he had completed the task and had contacted the construction department. Lu Luo was slightly happy. After disguising himself and coming to the Highland Plains for so long, he had finally contacted the construction department. This feeling was really reassuring. Boom Boom Boom! The battle between Shinji Yamamoto and the Tiger Corpse continued. Lightning and black gas collided in the air, interweaving and annihilating. At first glance, Shinji Yamamoto did not have the complete upper hand. “Shinji Yamamoto has been famous for a long time. His level should not be low, right? But that tiger corpse has just become a Tier 9 monster not long ago...;”Lu Luo said in a low voice. Although she didn’t have a good impression of Shinji Yamamoto, if Shinji Yamamoto couldn’t stop the tiger corpse, no one in the entire reed country could stop the tiger corpse. At that time, the tiger corpse would be able to rush out of the King’s Town and kill wherever it went. The entire reed country would be its dining table! “It’s still a problem of attributes. That tiger corpse is a king of the arcane realm. In addition, its attributes have inexplicably increased by 10% . It’s already comparable to a king of the arcane realm in previous battles. It’s only missing 5% of its attributes. Such a tiger corpse has become a Tier 9 monster. Its strength must be stronger than an ordinary tier 9, Tier 1 monster,”poison blade replied in a low voice. Lu Luo nodded slightly, her heart filled with unease. Bang! Yamamoto Xuanxin was caught off guard and was hit in the chest by the Tiger Corpse’s Giant Claw. He was instantly sent flying more than ten meters away and only came to a stop after smashing through three houses. A severed arm fell ahead of time. Shockingly, one of his arms had been severed by the Tiger Corpse! Yamamoto Xuanxin’s entire body was also buried in the rubble and dust. The warriors were shocked and gasped. The Tiger Corpse also roared arrogantly, as if it had already become the victor. “Monsters...; will always be monsters, without wisdom.” A steady voice came from the dust. The next moment, the place where the tiger corpse stood was instantly submerged by the terrifying lightning fluid. The lightning fluid fell from the sky, its entire body silver-white and emitting a dazzling light. Even a glance at it would cause one’s eyes to be scalded! “Roar!” The Tiger Corpse let out a crazy howl from the Lightning Liquid. It wanted to rush out. However, a large number of spikes condensed from lightning appeared all around where it stood. Each spike was more than six meters tall. These spikes didn’t pierce straight into the ground. Instead, they formed an arc. The protruding side was facing outwards. If the tiger corpse wanted to leap out, it would definitely be stabbed by the lightning spikes. In addition to the Thunder liquid pouring down from the sky, the terrifying damage caused its roars to gradually weaken. At this moment, the dust also gradually dispersed. A steady figure slowly walked out. One of Yamamoto’s arms was cut off, and his chest was heavily caved in. However, he was still able to stand steadily. The Tiger Corpse, on the other hand, had been completely submerged by the lightning fluid and died on the spot! The martial artists cheered and jumped in joy. Poison Blade and Lu Luo looked at each other and nodded slightly. The Tiger Corpse had died, and Yamamoto was seriously injured. Although this result wasn’t a mutually beneficial one, it was still pretty good. Yamamoto, who was seriously injured, would definitely find a place to heal his injuries as soon as possible. This gave them an opportunity to sneak into the asura prison. Yamamoto Shinkai went forward and searched through the items dropped after the tiger’s corpse died. He revealed a slight smile. Poison Blade saw that Yamamoto Shinkai had dug out a shriveled and large heart from the Tiger’s chest. His heart moved slightly. Wasn’t that the Giant Tiger’s heart! ! At this moment, Takeda Shinobu and a few other tier 8 martial artists hurried over. They were also out of breath. However, by the time they arrived, the battle had already ended. Shinji Yamamoto took his broken arm and slowly walked out of Wangxia town. “Lord Yamamoto!” Takeda ninja was shocked. Shinji Yamamoto shook his head. “It’s fine.” He immediately took out three sets of equipment from his storage compartment. “Choose the three strongest tier 8 and 9 warriors. Put on these three sets of equipment and destroy the tier 8 monsters inside. Don’t give them a chance to absorb the black gas.” “After completing the mission, guard the Big Hole in the center of Wangxia Town. Don’t act rashly. Wait until I recover.” Yamamoto Shinkai said seriously. He had just fought with the tiger corpse and destroyed the entire Wangxia town. He had also destroyed a large number of residential houses. Naturally, he had also seen the deep, abyss-like hole in the center of Wangxia Town. There were also quite a number of tier 8 monsters lying at the entrance of the cave, breathing out black smoke. Those who could become tier 9 warriors were never stupid. With just a little thought, he knew that the big hole was not ordinary. However, he also instinctively felt that there was danger in the Big Hole. His current condition was not good, so he could not go deep to investigate, so he simply sent people to watch. “Understood!” Takeda Shinobu nodded heavily. The crowd parted on their own. Yamamoto Shinobu took his broken hand and drank the life potion while walking towards the direction of the Reed Kingdom’s capital. Even though he was seriously injured, his speed was still very fast, and in the blink of an eye, he had disappeared. “You, you, put on the set and follow me into Wangxia Town!” Takeda Shinobu called the two strongest rank eight and rank nine martial artists to put on the set. After the three of them checked the effect of the set, they were all pleasantly surprised. This should have been prepared by Yamamoto Shinji for his trusted aides or heirs. Now, he was lending it to them temporarily. This set was shockingly dark gold-quality! After putting on this set, their combat strength far surpassed rank 8 and rank 9. It was enough to fight against a group of rank 8 monsters alone. “You actually came out alive. Not bad.”Takeda Shinobu glanced at poison blade and was pleasantly surprised. The rank 8 warrior was dead, but the rank 7 warrior was still alive. “By the way, this is your other reward.”Takeda ninja took out 50 secret realm pearls and handed them over. Poison Blade accepted them with a smile. “Master Tianyu is short of assassins like you. If you are interested, you can look for me after this battle. I will introduce you to Master Tianyu.”Takeda ninja laughed. The surrounding warriors all had envious looks on their faces. Lord Tianyu was naturally referring to the sky feather craftsman. They did not expect that Mu Qiang could be directly recommended to the sky feather craftsman. He would probably rise to the top in the future. Poison blade said, “Thank you, Lord Takeda, for your appreciation!” “Let’s go in and Hunt Monsters!”Takeda Shinobu waved his hand and led the tier 8 warriors into Wangxia Town. Poison Blade and Lu Luo looked at each other and left quietly. Lu Luo said, “Takeda Shinobu appreciates you very much. You can stay and join the skyfeather craftsman.” Poison blade said, “Don’t joke. When we save Xiang Qianyu and his identity is exposed, he’ll wish he could kill me himself.” “Are we going to the capital of Wei Ming Country Now?” “Of course. While Yamamoto Xuanxin is seriously injured, we should find Asura prison as soon as possible.” “HMM...; the question is, where is Asura prison?” Poison Blade stopped in his tracks with a strange expression on his face. “I thought you knew.” The Reed Kingdom’s capital was very large. They only knew that Asura prison was underground in the Reed Kingdom’s capital. However, the underground area was so large, where should they enter from? Lu Luo coughed lightly. “You’ll have to ask Silver Fox about that.” Poison Blade raised his eyebrows. “He’s here too? What’s his identity?” “He’s Yamamoto Shinkai’s distant nephew, Yamamoto Macho Man,”Lu Luo said with a strange smile. Poison Blade,”? ? ?” Lu Luo said with a smile, “I came to takama-ga-hara as well. I only discovered him by chance when I came into contact with him.” Poison blade said, “Good Man. How did you get this identity?” Lu Luo spread out her hands. “Apart from their leader, these rank 9 warriors of Takama-ga-hara are all very enthusiastic about their families.” “The biggest ones are the Sato family and the sky feather family. After the Sato warriors and the sky feather craftsmen became rank 9 warriors, their relatives who have nothing to do with each other came over and quickly gathered a large number of people.” “Although the Yamamoto family can’t be compared to the Sato family and the sky feather family, they are still quite big. Yamamoto Xuanxin himself only has one son, and he is only eight years old this year. However, his elder brother’s children are thriving, and he has four sons. Mio Yamamoto is the youngest son of Mio Yamamoto.” “However, Yamamoto Yunio’s personality was lazy since he was young. His family forced him to upgrade his warrior level to tier 7, and he never touched it again.” Lu Luo chuckled, “Because of this, Yamamoto Yunio gradually became marginalized in the Yamamoto family. Once, on a whim, he went out to play and encountered two tier 7 monsters wandering in the wilderness. When he died, his identity was used by our informant.” Poison blade nodded. “So, Silver Fox knows the location of the Asura Prison?” Lu Luo said, “During our previous exchange, he found an opportunity to tell me that Yamamoto Shingen sent him to Asura prison as a logistics officer, an idle position.” “The logistics officer has to come out every day to arrange food and drinks from the palace city to Asura prison to supply the prison guards and prisoners. As long as we go to the palace city in the capital of Wei Ming kingdom, we can find him.” “Okay, then we will go there as soon as possible.” The two of them followed the main road and rushed towards the capital of Wei Ming kingdom. Two hours later, a huge city wall came into view. The city wall was ten meters tall and was covered with the traces of the erosion of time. Every piece of stone was huge enough. Countless pieces of stone were arranged neatly, forming this majestic city wall. “I will go in first. You wait for a few minutes before entering. We are just acquaintances now,”Lu Luo reminded him. “Once we enter, we will meet under the Palace City.” Poison blade nodded to show that he understood. He watched Lu Luo enter the capital of Wei Ming country. He only entered a few minutes later. The capital of Wei Ming country was similar to the architectural style of Wangxia town, but it was more majestic and ancient. The residential buildings here were even taller. There were even two-story and three-story small buildings. In addition, there were all kinds of taverns, bathhouses, and shrines. There were far more types of buildings than those in Wangxia town. However, there were no living people in these buildings now. Instead, they were all zombies. The Zombies in the capital of Wei kingdom were generally larger and stronger than the zombies in Wangxia town. Their attributes were about 2% to 8% higher. This place also had the most tier 8 zombies. Therefore, the reed name nation was the most dangerous place in this mystical realm. Poison Blade had only walked a few steps into the reed name nation when he heard a hoarse roar coming from a nearby residence. Following that, a Tier 7, Tier 3 zombie crashed into the shop and charged at him with a ferocious roar. Poison Blade did not have any intention of fighting the zombie. He quickly dodged into the shadows of the building and used the shadow cloak to reduce his presence to zero. The zombie seemed to have lost its target and soon calmed down. It returned to the residential area and hid quietly, waiting for the next careless warrior. The Wei Ming kingdom wasn’t peaceful. The stronger warriors were all training here, so poison blade could hear the sounds of battle from time to time. The Zombies would be attracted by the sounds of battle again and move towards that direction. The bigger the noise of the battle, the more zombies would be attracted. However, the warriors who dared to make a big noise were almost all confident in their own combat strength. Of course, they were either very confident in their running speed. As long as they ran fast enough and ran out of the range of the zombies, those zombies would also return to their original places because they had lost their target to attack, or quietly wait for the next target, or wander aimlessly. At this time, he suddenly heard the sound of fierce fighting coming from not far away, and the sound was getting closer and closer. Boom! A residential building was directly destroyed. A warrior spat out blood, but quickly climbed up. Behind him, three demonic creatures with human faces and bird bodies chased after him like lightning. On a closer look, their faces were especially ugly, but they had roughly human-like facial features. If one had to describe it, it was like taking the eyes here, the nose there, and then finding a place to take the ears and mouth, sewing these things on a face. It could not be said that they were crooked, at least they had crooked eyes and crooked mouths. Their bodies were no different from giant eagles. Their feathers were exuberant, and their wingspan was huge. Their claws were sharp, and they shone with cold light. This kind of monster was called a human-faced eagle. In all the secret realms in the world, there were not many secret realms with human-faced eagles, and Wei Ming country was one of them. Other than that, the secret realm with the most human-faced eagles was the super-large secret realm controlled by the salvation society, “Angel Fortress.”. Poison Blade subconsciously used an advanced observation skill and found that all three of them were level 7 and level 6 zombies. Compared to the zombies of the same level in the king’s Lower Town, their attributes had indeed improved a lot. “Damn it, I was actually entangled by the human-faced eagles.” The warrior stood up while cursing and rushed into a residential building. However, the next moment, he was smashed into pieces by the three human-faced eagles in the air. At this moment, he discovered poison blade who was nearby. In the next moment, he directly rushed toward poison blade. Lin Xuan noticed this scene and frowned slightly. Poison Blade’s sense of presence was zero. Even the human-faced eagle did not notice him, but this martial artist did. It was clear that the other party had some special skill or equipment that could actually detect him. “Kid, help me block these three human-faced eagles. I, Yamamoto Dragon Horse, will not mistreat you!” The martial artist cackled and stomped on the ground. His body shot out like a cannonball. As he ran out, he kicked a huge rock toward poison blade. Poison blade frowned slightly. He had no choice but to come out from the shadows of the buildings to dodge the huge rock. The three human-faced eagles in the air instantly noticed poison blade. The three human-faced eagles shouted in unison and sent out one of them to attack poison blade. The other two were still chasing after Yamamoto Longma. Yamamoto cursed, “Bad luck, didn’t we just steal an egg?” Lin Xuan had no choice but to control the poison blade to speed up his escape. He cursed that guy in his heart for having no morals at all. The human-faced eagle that he had lured over by stealing the eagle egg actually wanted to lure the homicidal facial eagle’s pursuit to someone else through the diversion of trouble. However, why were there three human-faced eagles? Shouldn’t there be one male and one female, and two in a nest? Lin Xuan did not have time to think. He controlled the poisonous blade to quickly enter the shadow of the building. However, the human-faced eagle also had eagle-like sharp eyes. Every time, the poisonous blade was about to enter the shadow of the building. The human-faced eagle immediately let out a sharp cry and spat out a stream of poisonous sputum, forcing him to be unable to shrink into the shadow. If he could not completely enter the shadow, he would not be able to reduce his sense of presence to zero. In this way, the human-faced eagle would always find him. “I have to kill it.” Lin Xuan let the poisonous blade escape while he concentrated on thinking. The clone had a high IQ and could avoid danger by itself. Lin Xuan’s control only made the clone more flexible. In comparison, it was like the automatic and manual controls in the game. The level of the automatic controls was not low, but it was set in the end. To see how powerful the upper limit was, it had to be a god of manual controls. Lin Xuan had another advantage. When ordinary people were being chased, they would often panic, causing them to be unable to seriously analyze the situation. In the end, they might choose the wrong decision, resulting in a complete loss and a tragic death. However, Lin Xuan was now like a player controlling his character, an outsider. He could use all his attention to think of countermeasures. “The human-faced eagle will not easily get close to the ground. The best way is to pretend to be heavily injured, trick it into launching a final attack, and then take the opportunity to kill it.” Lin Xuan quickly made a decision. He had already seen the attributes of the human-faced eagle through Poison Blade’s [ advanced observation ] . It was a level seven or six monster, but its attributes were much higher than the average level seven or six monster. Monsters like the human-faced eagle were cunning and cruel. They liked to attack their prey through poisonous phlegm and falling rocks. They would play with their prey until they were exhausted, and then ruthlessly devour it alive. The human-faced eagle flew over the roof of a residential building, grabbed a piece of gravel the size of a human head, and aimed at the escaping poison blade on the ground, accurately smashing it. Poison Blade tried his best to Dodge and was not hit directly by the falling rocks. However, when the falling rocks hit the ground two meters away from him, they still set off a burst of gravel and left several holes on his body. The human-faced eagle let out a long cry and let out an excited and cruel cry. Its pupils reflected the human martial artist’s cursing but very sullen face on the ground. The speed of the poison blade had also decreased a lot because it had been injured by the gravel. At the same time, the Warriors in the capital of the Reed name Nation also noticed the long cry of the human-faced eagle and saw that the poison blade was being pursued. The Warriors’reactions were surprisingly unified, and each of them avoided this side from a distance. The human-faced eagle was a rather troublesome monster in the capital of the Reed name nation. They were very vengeful. Once they held a grudge against a warrior, either it died or the warrior died. In any case, one of the two would die before they would stop. On a nearby street, two warriors were quietly approaching a bear corpse. At this time, the long cry of the human-faced eagle was heard. The two warriors subconsciously shrunk their necks, thinking that they had been targeted by the human-faced eagle. In the next moment, a warrior flew past, and the human-faced eagle did not stop at all, chasing after it relentlessly. The bear corpse that was eating the corpse was also alarmed by the human-faced Eagle’s cry. However, when it raised its head, the human-faced eagle had already flown far away. The Bear Corpse could only roar at the sky in anger, humming as it lowered its head to continue eating. “Good fellow, so he’s chasing someone else.” “That kid doesn’t seem to be very strong. He’s only at rank 7 or rank 3. Poor Thing. If he’s not strong enough, why would he provoke the human-faced eagle?” Among these two martial artists, the burly martial artist used [ spirit eye ] to observe poison blade from afar and shook his head repeatedly. “No, I saw it on the roof just now. Yamamoto longma was being chased by three human-faced eagles. That Kid was just unlucky enough to be seen by Yamamoto Longma. Yamamoto longma caused trouble to the east. However, it’s fortunate that he was the one who was seen. If Yamamoto Longma saw us, I’m afraid we would also end up like this.” The tall and thin martial artist beside him sighed softly. He was very sympathetic towards poison blade, and his tone was somewhat angry towards Yamamoto longma. Lin Xuan had also noticed them through poison blade’s line of sight just now. However, he was not as immoral as the previous person. Those two people did not know him at all, so he naturally could not lure the human-faced eagle over. The chase between Poison Blade and the human-faced eagle continued. The human-faced eagle repeatedly used poison phlegm and falling rocks to weaken poison blade. Poison Blade narrowly dodged each time, but his speed gradually decreased as a result, and his body seemed to have multiple injuries. If this continued, he would definitely die. The human-faced eagle let out a long cry. It seemed to be tired of this cat-and-mouse game, and launched its final charge. The sharp eagle claws flickered with a cold light, pointing straight at the back of this human martial artist’s neck! Poison Blade revealed a panicked expression as he looked behind him while running. His reaction was almost exactly the same as when those cameo characters in movies and TV shows were being hunted down and killed. Of course, he was faking all of this. The rocks that were thrown off the ground splashed onto his body, but they couldn’t break through his defense at all. His speed didn’t suffer any damage from the beginning to the end. Instead, he lowered his speed on his own. He wanted to paralyze the human-faced eagle! Closer, closer...; ! The poisonous blade could even feel the strong wind whistling over, and he could smell the fishy smell of the human-faced eagle. That was the rotting smell of the flesh that hung on its body after it had eaten raw meat many times. “Now!” The poisonous blade flashed and suddenly appeared behind the human-faced eagle. The short sword was pulled out and stabbed fiercely. Pu, Pu, Pu! Three consecutive strikes, blood spurting out like a fountain! Critical Strike! The human-faced eagle screamed miserably, flapping its wings and trying to raise its height. However, the weight of an adult man suddenly increased on its back, so it could not fly at all. The human-faced eagle screamed continuously, and dark green poison began to seep out of its feathers. It tried to use the poison to force the human martial artist to jump down. “Use poison to deal with me? You are really a little smart.” Poison Blade sneered, drew his sword, and continued to stab. Blood shot out from the human-faced eagle’s fragile neck. Poison Blade watched as its HP plummeted from 90% to zero in the blink of an eye! The sparkling essence and the secret realm pearl fell from its body. Poison Blade casually scooped it into the space of consciousness. Then, he put on the shadow cloak, turned into the shadow of the building, and soon disappeared. Not far away, the two warriors wiped their sweat and let out a long breath. In front of them, a muscular bear corpse fell to the ground. “Eh, the human-faced eagle disappeared?”The muscular warrior suddenly thought of something and looked at the sky, slightly surprised. “Maybe he has killed that warrior and flew away.”His companion shrugged. “You two, do you know who lured the human-faced Eagle to me?” A figure suddenly appeared behind them. The two were frightened and subconsciously pulled out their weapons. Turning around, they found that it was the warrior who was being chased by the human-faced eagle just now. This warrior was covered in blood and had many wounds, but at this moment, he was still smiling at them as if nothing had happened. The muscular warrior looked at him hesitantly. “You Didn’t die?” The warrior covered in blood was naturally a poisonous blade. He smiled. “I was lucky. I caught the opportunity when the human-faced eagle swooped down and killed it.” The two warriors thought about it and didn’t ask further. A Level 7 or level 3 warrior could kill a level 7 or level 6 monster, either because his attributes were very strong and surpassed other warriors of the same level. Or it was because he had an extremely powerful trump card. No matter which one it was, it was not easy to deal with. “That person is called Yamamoto longma, Yamamoto Xuanxin’s nephew. But I advise you not to go against him. Otherwise...; it will be very miserable.” The tall and thin warrior beside him reminded him in a low voice. Poison blade nodded slightly. “Yamamoto longma...; okay.” After saying that, he quickly left. In the blink of an eye, he blended into the shadows of the buildings and disappeared. To these two warriors, their vision blurred. In the blink of an eye, the blood-covered warrior disappeared. The muscular warrior exclaimed, “What a magical technique!” The tall and thin warrior clicked his tongue in surprise. “I’m afraid this guy is a very powerful assassin. Fortunately, we didn’t offend him.” “However, Yamamoto Longma has a grudge against this guy. hehehe.”The muscular warrior laughed strangely. On the other side. Poison Blade’s HP recovered rapidly. The flesh wounds on his body healed at a speed visible to the naked eye. “Yamamoto Longma? When I’m about to leave famous Reed Kingdom, we’ll kill him together.” A cold light flashed in Poison Blade’s eyes. There were no twists and turns in the rest of the journey. He smoothly passed through the entire capital of famous Reed Kingdom and arrived at the foot of the palace walls. The monsters in the palace walls had already been cleaned up by the takama-ga-hara several times. They had been completely established as the Takama-ga-hara’s base in famous Reed Kingdom. Therefore, many warriors gathered under the palace walls to do business here. However, doing business here depended on the size of one’s fist. Otherwise, it would not be a business, but a zero-dollar purchase for others. When poison blade arrived here, there was a large group of warriors gathered here in a disorderly manner. It seemed that they were not doing business. When he got closer, he saw that someone had posted a notice here. “Lord Yamamoto has ordered: the light door of the secret realm is sealed, and the attributes of the monsters have increased. There might be a change. We are now storing a large amount of medicinal materials and potions. We will purchase them with temporary points. Warriors can choose what items to exchange for.” Below the notice was a large number of items that could be exchanged. The first line was that one could choose any type of dark gold set (four-piece set) . The points required reached 100,000 points, but it was only limited to one set. If someone had accumulated enough points to exchange for it, the people behind would naturally be gone. On the second row, there was a universal dark gold skill, [ psychic ] . It could summon monsters that died within a ten-meter radius to chase and kill the enemy. The duration was 30 minutes. The required points were 50,000 points. The psychic skill book was limited to ten books. Once it was exchanged, it would stop. On the third row, there was a giant bear heart. It was dark gold in quality. It could be directly consumed to break the upper limit and permanently gain 3 vitality points. It was limited to once. It could also be used as a material to make potions. The required points were 10,000 points. There was a total of 20 giant bear hearts. Similarly, they would be sold on a first-come, first-served basis. After that, the fourth, fifth, sixth, and tenth rows became golden legendary grade. However, they were still quite good treasures. There was also a limit to the number of these items. However, they were much more than the dark gold set, the psychic spell, and the Giant Bear Heart. From the eleventh line onwards, all of them would become purple-colored and precious-quality items. There was no limit to the number of items after that. Lin Xuan nodded his head repeatedly. No wonder so many martial artists were gathered here in such a chaotic manner. Who wouldn’t be tempted by Yamamoto Shinkai’s offer of such a reward. Even Shimada Long would be tempted. “That dark gold set, I want it.” A bold and domineering voice sounded from behind the crowd. The martial artists all turned their heads and immediately saw Yamamoto longma with a stout figure. Lin Xuan also saw him through Poison Blade’s eyes, so he immediately let poison blade use [ advanced observation ] to obtain all of his information. After reading the information, Lin Xuan frowned slightly. This guy was shockingly level 7, even higher than the human-faced eagle. His class was [ sword hero ] , a gold-quality legendary grade. His attributes mainly increased agility, while his secondary attributes increased strength. He had three skills that had reached dark gold, and six gold-quality skills. The set he was wearing was a gold-quality legendary grade, and his weapon was a dark gold-quality flaming tachi. As expected of Yamamoto Xuanxin’s favorite nephew, this set of clothes could be said to be luxurious. Hearing Yamamoto Longma’s voice, the other martial artists all shrunk their necks and made way for him. No one dared to block in front of him. Yamamoto Longma’s fierce reputation was illustrious. Almost all of the young generation of Takama Plains martial artists had heard of him. In addition, he was also Yamamoto Xuanxin’s nephew. If he didn’t have a certain background, no one would dare to provoke him. Yamamoto longma was very satisfied with the actions of these martial artists. He strode towards the notice board. “En, the [ psychic technique ] is also not bad. I want to exchange it too.”He glanced at the notice board roughly and nodded slightly. “Uncle is very generous. Don’t you think so?” The martial artists didn’t dare to say no and nodded one after another. Yamamoto longma saw them nodding and bowing. He burst into laughter again. At this moment, he caught a glimpse of the poisonous blade in the crowd. “HMM? You’re still alive after being chased by a human-faced eagle?” Yamamoto longma naturally remembered this face. If it weren’t for this warrior attracting a human-faced eagle and sharing a lot of pressure, even if he could escape from the pursuit of the three human-faced eagles, he would have been seriously injured. “It seems that either you’re very lucky or you’re very strong. I like both types of people,”Yamamoto longma nodded slightly as if he was looking down on them, “You’re not bad. Stay by my side later. You have the qualifications to be my subordinate.” The martial artists were astonished. First, they were astonished at the strength of the poison blade. The human-faced eagle was a rather troublesome monster in the capital of the famous Reed Country. It could not run away, and it could not be killed. It could infuriate the martial artists to death. This martial artist did not look particularly powerful. Using [ Spirit Eye ] to observe, he was only at level seven or level three. How could he escape from the pursuit of the human-faced eagle. After hearing Yamamoto Longma’s words, the martial artists had envious looks on their faces. F * ck! Yamamoto longma was actually willing to take this guy under his wing. Although Yamamoto Longma was notorious for being ferocious and temperamental, he was strong! He had a deep background! He was the most prestigious level seven martial artist in the Yamamoto family, and he had received many praises from Yamamoto Xuanxin. If he could follow him, even if he only managed to get a little bit of food out of his fingers, it would be enough for this warrior to make a meteoric rise. Even if he had to be disgusted by Yamamoto Longma’s bad temper every day, as if he had eaten shit, he would accept it. As long as he could become stronger, anything was fine. However, Poison Blade only shook his head. “I’m sorry, I don’t follow anyone’s thoughts.” The martial artists were all shocked. Rejecting Yamamoto Longma was probably not a good choice. Yamamoto longma was about to take large strides out, but when he heard this, he suddenly stopped. However, he did not turn his head. Instead, he just turned his back to him and said indifferently, “The last person who rejected me is now two meters tall.” The surrounding martial artists immediately shrunk their necks and shuddered. Yamamoto Longma’s words clearly did not have any killing intent, but they sounded as if they had fallen into an ice cave. “Since you can not be used by me, then you shall die.” Yamamoto longma turned his head and swung his saber. The tachi that was wrapped in flames was unsheathed. The flaming arc light slashed out at the extreme speed, strength, and intensity. There was a martial artist who was standing between Yamamoto Longma and poison blade. He didn’t even have time to react before his arm was cut off by this arc! Poison blade stomped on the ground fiercely, and his speed increased explosively. Before the flaming arc approached him, he narrowly avoided it. But even so, a strand of his hair was cut off by the flaming arc. Before it landed on the ground, it was burned into ashes. He could naturally dodge in advance, but that would make him look too strong. It was the most suitable way to dodge and not completely dodge. Boom! The flame arc light’s momentum didn’t decrease. It only stopped after it hit the palace wall. “Didn’t hit?” Yamamoto longma seemed to be quite surprised that his blade actually didn’t kill this person. He slowly turned around. It was obvious that he was going to take this seriously. Poison Blade also took out a short sword from his storage compartment. He didn’t want to start a conflict with Yamamoto Longma so early. But since the other party was so unrelenting, he couldn’t back down either. At this moment, a cold and arrogant voice came from outside the crowd. “You can’t touch him.” Yamamoto longma didn’t turn around at all. He drew his sword and slashed again. But this flame arc light had only slashed out for two meters when a palm condensed from flames arrived first, blocking this flame arc light. The two flames intertwined and exploded in mid-air, quickly annihilating. Yamamoto longma frowned slightly and turned his head abruptly. The martial artists under the palace walls also widened their eyes and looked towards the source of the sound. Who Was It? It was actually able to fight against Yamamoto Longma? A tall, handsome, and cold youth appeared before their eyes. This young man’s expression was unusually cold, like an ice mountain that would not melt for ten thousand years. However, his palm was surrounded by scorching flames. It was clear that the attack just now had come from his palm. “Shimada Long!” “It’s actually him. No wonder he dared to block Yamamoto Longma.” “In the entire Gaotian Plain, among the seventh rank martial artists, only Shimada long, Yamamoto Longma, and the asura twins can compete with each other.” “Oh right, I heard that the Shura Twins and Shimada long fought on the top of Mount Vajra. How’s the situation?” “I don’t know. Their fight was too loud. I didn’t dare to watch it anymore.” “It should be a draw. Maybe Shimada long is at a disadvantage too. After all, it’s a 1V2.” The Warriors discussed among themselves, their eyes shining. Everyone wanted to see a battle between the strong. Lin Xuan saw this scene through Poison Blade’s eyes and was also quite surprised. Shimada long was also such a proud person. Why would he save him? Yamamoto longma frowned. “Who is he to you? Why are you protecting him so much?” The martial artists were also very curious. They had never seen Shimada long make a move for one person. This person, who was ranked second on the global tier 7 leaderboard, seemed to have no desire for anything. He only listened to the orders of his foster father, the Sato martial artist. Whatever the Sato martial artist said, he would do. Whatever the Sato martial artist said to kill, he would kill. He was the sharpest and most indestructible blade in the Sato martial artist’s hands! Shimada long said calmly, “He is someone I want to kill. Others can not kill him.” Yamamoto longma smiled. “That’s fine. Go ahead and kill him. I want to kill him anyway.” At this moment, the martial artists looked at poison blade with pity. What a good fellow. Being targeted by two of the strongest tier 7 players in takama-ga-hara at the same time. Young Man, you’re really capable! “I don’t want to kill him for the time being,”Shimada long said calmly. Yamamoto Longma’s expression stiffened. “I want the Dark Gold set, the psychic spell, and the Giant Bear Heart,”Shimada Naga said calmly without even looking at Yamamoto Naga. Yamamoto Naga’s smile became even stiffer. It was obvious that the other party wanted to compete with him. “I know you’re very strong, but aren’t you afraid that I’ll join forces with Blood Asura and hungry Asura?”Yamamoto Naga narrowed his eyes and said coldly. Shimada long also smiled faintly. “Alright, go and find them to team up.” After saying that, he turned to poison blade and said in a clear voice, “Do one thing for me, and I won’t kill you.” Poison blade coughed lightly. “What is it?” “I’ve found a nest of energy-devouring ants. I need help.” After saying that, Shimada long beckoned for him to follow. Poison Blade immediately followed. “Energy-devouring ant nest? !” When the surrounding warriors heard this, their eyes lit up. This kind of ant was extremely big. Even the lowest worker ant was half the height of an adult man. They liked to build their nests in places that were rich in vitality. Therefore, they would definitely find legendary treasures that contained vitality near their nests. And these legendary treasures were naturally suitable for making life potions, especially Super Life Potions that were above life potions and Great Life Potions. At the eighth rank, life elixirs couldn’t recover much. They had to use big life elixirs. After becoming a ninth rank warrior, due to their strong energy levels, the recovery of ordinary life elixirs and big life elixirs would be greatly reduced. They had to use super life elixirs to recover normally. This kind of thing was naturally what Yamamoto Shura had bought with his credit points. Moreover, even if it was just the energy-devouring ants themselves, one out of ten of them might have life crystals in their bodies. This item could be used as the main ingredient of the great life potion! Yamamoto Longma’s expression also changed slightly. Shimada long had also found the nest of the energy-devouring ants. He could exchange for a large number of credits with Yamamoto Shigeaki. The entire set of dark gold equipment that required 100,000 credits to exchange for would probably be taken away by Shimada long as well! “Just you wait.” Yamamoto longma took a deep breath and immediately rushed towards the Wei Ming capital. He only had two eagle eggs on him. According to the exchange rules on the notice board, one egg could be exchanged for about 1,000 points. It was far from comparable to the legendary treasure that contained vitality near the devouring energy ant nest. If he wanted to get that entire set of dark gold set, he had to earn points as soon as possible! Yamamoto Longma had left, so the other martial artists naturally had no need to continue watching. They all dived into the Wei Ming capital, searching for treasures among the ruins, hoping to earn a large number of points. “I keep feeling that you don’t really want to kill me.”Poison Blade followed behind Shimada long and smiled. “You’re not going to carry out Lord Sato’s orders?” Shimada long also smiled faintly. “Whether or not I have to carry out godfather’s orders is entirely up to me.” “In my opinion, not killing you is more valuable than killing you.” Poison Blade also smiled. He didn’t feel any killing intent from Shimada long. This young man’s thoughts were a little hard to figure out. The martial artists all said that Shimada Long was just a saber in the hands of the Sato martial artists. He would kill whoever he wanted and never drag things out. However, Shimada Long didn’t seem to be like this either. “How do we distribute the energy-devouring ant nest?”Poison Blade asked casually. Shimada long said indifferently, “I want that legendary treasure that contains vitality. The life crystals that drop after killing the energy-devouring ant will all belong to you.” Poison blade nodded slightly. He could accept it. Exchanging 100,000 points for that four-piece dark gold set was very tempting to other martial artists. But to him, it could only be said that it was not tempting at all. However, the psychic spell and the giant bear heart were more useful. Not long after, they arrived at the dilapidated buildings in the capital of Wei Ming Kingdom. There were still remnants of the previous prosperous scene. Fruit stalls, vegetable stalls, meat stalls.. There were also chicken cages, duck cages, and large basins filled with fish and prawns. But now, they were all ruins. One could vaguely recognize that it used to be a lively vegetable market. Sometimes, Lin Xuan couldn’t help but think about these things when he saw them. Why would such things appear in the arcane realm? Could it be that humans used to live there as well? But this question, whether he thought about it on his own or through the construction department and the books of the Takama-ga-hara over the past 100 years, he couldn’t find the answer. “The nest of the energy-devouring ants is over there.” Shimada long also pointed at the center of the building. There was a weird tree with five people hugging it. It was weird. The trunk of the tree was surrounded by five people hugging it, but it was only ten meters tall, which was even higher than the height of the building next to it. Under the tree was the tall nest of the energy-devouring ants. The nest on the surface was more than eight meters tall, and it was hard to estimate how many more were underground. No Wonder Shimada long said that he needed a helper. It would take him a long time to kill such a huge nest of energy-devouring ants by himself. “The nest of energy-devouring ants is built around the tree. It means that the root of the tree should be a legendary treasure that contains vitality.” “I’m guessing that the energy-devouring ants have been plundering the vitality of the tree, which caused it to gradually shrink.” Shimada long also said slowly. Poison blade nodded slightly. “I’ll drive out these energy-devouring ants, and you finish the job.” After Shimada long finished speaking, he quickly approached the nest of energy-devouring ants. Flames immediately surged out of his hands, instantly condensing into two fire snakes, and directly drilled into the nest. “Why don’t we take a look at his information?” Previously, he hadn’t had the opportunity to cast a high-level observation skill, but now he finally had the opportunity. Poison Blade cast the advanced observation skill, and the detailed information immediately appeared in front of him. —— Name: Shimada Nagaya Level: Tier 7, Level 7 Class: Dragonblood Warrior (Golden Legend) Essence: 997,828/7,000,000 Attributes: Vitality 220, strength 299, Spirit 211, agility 215 Skills: Dragon Blood Burst (Golden Legend) , Fire Dragon Boil (dark gold legend) , fire weapon (dark gold legend) , fire shield (golden legend) .. Equipment: Fire Dragon Set (Golden Peerless) , Dragon scale gloves (dark gold legend) .. —— “Let’s not talk about other things. Just by looking at these attributes, they are definitely top-tier existences of the same level.” Lin Xuan was rather emotional. He had once calculated that if a fighter used five battle-upgrading materials to upgrade every time they upgraded and did not consume any attribute items, then the total attributes of a level 7 or level 9 fighter would be 884 points. All kinds of attribute items that directly increased four-dimensional attributes could only increase by 100 points at most. In other words, even if a level 7 or level 9 warrior ate all of these attribute items, the total attributes of a naked warrior would only be 1284 points at most. However, because they had to consume attribute items from different secret realms, it was very difficult to collect all of them. Perhaps only level 8 or level 9 warriors who had been famous for a long time could eat all of these attribute items. Even if Lin Xuan had so many experience clones and the clones created by the [ Advanced Cloning Technique ] , he had not eaten all of them yet. And Shimada Long was currently a Tier 7 and tier 7 warrior. His naked attributes had reached 1,165 points! In the future, his strength would only be stronger. As expected of the second-ranked person on the tier 7 list. “He’s Out!” Iwata Nagata also shouted. In the next moment, three energy-devouring ants, each as tall as an adult man’s waist, crawled out of their nests. These energy-devouring ants were not very big. They were grayish-black in color, and they were only worker ants at the lowest tier. After experiencing the flames, their HPS had decreased significantly. The energy-devouring ants were in great pain, and they directly bit at Iwata Nagata. Poison blade immediately dashed over and stabbed his short sword explosively, swiftly killing the few energy-devouring ants. “Not bad. Again.” Shimada long nodded in satisfaction. He controlled the intensity of the flames and forced out five energy-devouring ants this time. Poison Blade followed suit and stabbed his short sword explosively a few times, killing the ants cleanly. Seeing this, Shimada long also continued to increase the intensity of the flames, forcing out more and more energy-devouring ants. Six, eight, twelve, twenty.. Lin Xuan chuckled. He understood Shimada Long’s thoughts. He was deliberately using this method to test the strength of the poison blade, right. Finally, when there were twenty-one, the speed of the poison blade could not catch up. One of the energy-devouring ants missed and rushed towards Shimada long. However, a Flame Shield appeared on Shimada Long’s body. Energy-eating ants rushed up, and was soon burned into ashes by the fire shield. “I think I know your upper limit. You can force out less than 20 energy-devouring ants at once.” Shimada long also carefully controlled the temperature of the two fire snakes to ensure that the number of energy-devouring ants that surged out of the nest was below 20 each time. This precise control surprised Lin Xuan. This guy’s control of skills seemed to far exceed that of martial artists of the same level. No Wonder Shimada Long had always maintained a strong confidence when fighting against the Shura Twins. This guy indeed had the capital to be confident! The two of them worked very well together. They didn’t even need to speak. Shimada long also burned the nest to drive away the energy-devouring ants and used his poisonous blades to harvest. Not a single energy-devouring ant could escape the attacks of the two of them. After a large number of energy-devouring ants died, the queen ant in the deepest part of the nest finally sensed that something was wrong and sent out a large number of soldier ants to observe the situation on the ground. The soldier ants were larger than the worker ants, and their color gradually changed from grayish-black to bluish-black. Seeing the soldier ants appear, Shimada long gave up on the flame burning. “A large number of energy-devouring ants will appear next. I know that you definitely have a trump card. Don’t give up on using it just because you’re worried about me.”Shimada long also condensed the flames in his palm and instantly formed a long spear, with a vicious spear, he nailed a soldier ant to the ground. The Flames continued to burn, but the soldier ant was unable to break free and was eventually burned to death. Poison Blade heard this and laughed lightly, nodding his head. As expected. After the soldier ant at the front was killed, it released a pheromone that only energy-devouring ants could sense. A large number of astonishingly large blue-black soldier ants appeared one after another. These soldier ants’huge jaws flickered with a cold light, as if they could cut off a martial artist’s limbs with a light bite. Their sizes were also larger than worker ants by a whole circle. If they stood up, they would probably be no different from a normal adult man. With the addition of their antennae, they would probably be a little taller. “Let’s do it.” Shimada long also quickly condensed a flame spear in his palm and threw it fiercely. The Flaming Spear roared with great power and instantly nailed a soldier ant to the ground. The soldier ant screamed a few times, but struggled to break free. Not only that, the pain seemed to have stimulated their bloodlust, and the frequency of the friction between their jaws became faster. Poison Blade’s side was also besieged by many soldier ants. However, his and Shimada Long’s methods of dealing with them were also very different. Every time the soldier ants attacked, their huge jaws would clamp down on nothing but air. Every time poison blade dodged their attacks, he would appear behind them at an extremely high movement speed. The short sword stabbed out explosively. At the same time that it hit their vital points, it also quickly put the soldier ants into a poisoned state. After killing a few soldier ants, he had a clear understanding of the health points of these soldier ants. Two critical strikes, in addition to the continuous reduction of HP caused by the poison, were enough to kill these soldier ants within ten seconds. Thus, the poison blade did not directly kill these soldier ants. Instead, it left a poisoned state and charged towards the next soldier ant. These soldier ants hissed as they chased after the back of the poison blade. However, they would fall to the ground and die after only a few steps. With that, his killing efficiency increased greatly. Behind him were the corpses of soldier ants. Shimada long also noticed Poison Blade’s astonishing killing efficiency, which surprised him slightly. In comparison, the way he used his [ flame weapon ] to condense a flame spear and attack in broad strokes was a little crude. Moreover, his killing efficiency was not very high. Shimada long also attacked the soldier ant while observing the poison Blade’s attack methods. While observing, he also quickly learned. In less than ten minutes, he completed the transformation from crude to fine. The flame spear he condensed before was about 1.2 meters in length, and its diameter was about the size of a clenched palm. However, this two strikes were unable to kill the soldier ant, and the damage caused by the three strikes overflowed. After realizing that the poison blade had cleverly used the poison, Shimada long also reacted. The burning state was also a negative state that continuously reduced hp! After ten minutes of transformation, he successfully reduced the length of the flame spear to 0.9 meters, and its diameter was also a circle smaller than before. However, the flame energy contained within the flame spear had increased by a few points. Thus, two strikes, together with the continuous burning state brought about by the two strikes, was just enough to kill a soldier ant! His killing efficiency also increased accordingly. Through Poison Blade’s eyes, Lin Xuan noticed the change in Shimada long and was quite surprised. This guy’s strength was very strong. He did not expect that his learning ability was also so strong. In just ten minutes, he had completed the transformation from rough to fine. No wonder when he was only seven or eight years old, he was chosen by the Sato martial artists and immediately became their adopted son. While the two of them were killing the energy-devouring ants, there were martial artists passing by not far away. They both discovered poison blade and Shimada long. But everyone tacitly avoided this place. Everyone knew that Shimada Long was not someone they could offend. After the battle between the Shura Twins and Shimada long at the top of King Kong Mountain, there was no news of the Shura Twins, and Shimada long appeared here unscathed. Yamamoto Takuma and Shimada long also had a small conflict, but they did not dare to make a move. This in itself explained some problems. Not long after, the soldier ants that emerged from their nests slowed down greatly. At this time, the ones that emerged were the breeding ants that had wings! Having wings meant that they could fly at low altitudes. At the same time, they could increase their combat strength, and at the same time, they could quickly dodge the attacks of martial artists, making them even more difficult to deal with. “Since the breeding ants have appeared, it means that there aren’t many energy-devouring ants protecting the queen. After killing these breeding ants, we’ll enter the nest!” At the same time. Three martial artists were advancing in the nearby streets. The one in the lead was Yamamoto Longma. The two behind him were the two subordinates he had taken in. Their strength was at level 7 or 6, which was pretty good. When the two of them heard that they could become Yamamoto Longma’s subordinates, they were quite excited. However, Yamamoto Longma wasn’t as happy as they were. Instead, his brows were tightly furrowed. The three of them had been wandering around for more than an hour, but they hadn’t obtained many treasures, and the golden ones were even rarer. They definitely couldn’t go on like this. As long as Shimada long could obtain treasures that contained life force within the energy devouring ant nest, he could easily surpass him. “Eh, there’s the sound of battle over there.” A martial artist suddenly said. Yamamoto Longma’s ears twitched, and he also heard the sound. And this sound of battle...; was a little familiar! “It’s the sound of Shimada long also fighting. I’ve seen him fighting a few times, so I can hear it.”Yamamoto longma narrowed his eyes. The two warriors looked at each other and coughed lightly, “Then should we go around it?” Yamamoto longma sneered, “Why should we go around it? They must have exhausted a lot of energy to deal with the energy-devouring ant queen. This is the time for us to come out.” The two warriors wanted to say something but stopped. Yamamoto longma said calmly, “I know what you are thinking. Don’t worry. Although I can’t defeat Shimada Long, I won’t be completely suppressed by him.” “And if we really get that thing in the end, uncle will definitely stand on my side. After all, I’m his biological nephew!” The two warriors nodded and dispelled the worries in their hearts. “Move over and wait for an opportunity to strike!” Yamamoto longma handed the two invisibility talismans to the two of them. The three of them advanced cautiously and did not make a single sound. Because of the existence of the invisibility talismans, even [ advanced perception ] did not discover them. “It really is them!” Yamamoto longma saw from afar that Shimada Longya was using the flaming spear to attack the energy-devouring ants. He narrowed his eyes. “Since the breeding ants have come out, it means that the queen ant has run out of tricks.” “I’m afraid that the queen ant will come out soon!” The two martial artists said in a low voice. As soon as they finished speaking, a huge and fat queen ant was pulled out of the nest by the two soldier ants. However, it only revealed its head, and its huge abdomen was still in the nest. Even so, the ant queen’s appearance was far beyond the imagination of ordinary martial artists. It was too big! Just its head was as big as a breeding ant. Coupled with its big belly, its length was probably more than five meters! The Ant Queen was incomparably furious when she saw the corpses all over the ground. It opened its mouth abruptly and spewed out a terrifying venom, almost covering an area of dozens of meters around the nest. Shimada Long’s feet also accidentally touched a spot, and his shoes began to corrode rapidly, revealing his toes. He felt a rare moment of awkwardness, and immediately took out a new pair of foot equipment from the storage compartment. “Let’s do it.” Poison Blade tossed his short sword and said indifferently. Shimada long also nodded slightly. With a wave of his hands, flames spewed out from the front of his chest, quickly condensing into five flaming spears, aiming at the vital parts of the ant queen’s body from five different directions. Poison Blade also activated his lightning-fast speed and approached the ant queen like a dragonfly skimming the water. The short sword stabbed explosively, killing the last two soldier ants guarding the ant queen in an instant. Roar! The ant queen was also extremely angry, continuously spitting poison from her mouth. The speed of her spit was extremely fast, and the range was also vast. Shimada Long was also almost splashed by the poison. Poison Blade was able to dodge it, but he couldn’t show it to be too strong, so he simply let it slip. He deliberately got splashed by the ant queen’s poison and let out a muffled groan. “It’s time to show your Trump Card!” Shimada long also shouted loudly. “Okay.” Poison blade nodded. Shimada long also growled. His heart thumped, and his blood vessels expanded. Dragon Blood, which was far more viscous than normal blood, gushed out from his heart. Dragon Blood Explosion! His class was a dragon blood warrior. Dragon blood explosion was his class skill. Usually, a portion of the blood in his body would be compressed and stored in his heart as “Dragon Blood”. After activating dragon blood explosion, the dragon blood would spurt out from his heart and flow to his limbs and bones, greatly enhancing his combat strength. This was an all-round improvement! This was also the strength of the Dragon Blood Warriors. However, the dragon blood warriors also had a disadvantage. They had to drink dragon blood every once in a while, otherwise their bodies would become very weak. This also resulted in that only those warriors with strong backgrounds could afford to play this class. Otherwise, if those Takama-ga-hara warriors who did not have much savings obtained this class scroll, they might not even be able to afford the dragon blood to support their bodies! Seeing this, Lin Xuan also immediately let poison blade use his trump card. In fact, he didn’t have any trump cards. This set of attributes that surpassed a tier 7 martialist and was comparable to a Tier 8 martialist was his strongest trump card. Shimada Longya’s naked attributes were vitality 220, strength 299, Spirit 211, and agility 215. His total attributes added up to 1,165 points. Meanwhile, his naked attributes were vitality 469, strength 251, Spirit 261, and agility 251. His total attributes had already reached 1,232 points! In the previous battle, he had not used his full strength. Now that Shimada Longya had also used his class skills, he decided to give him some face and go all out. Under the two of them using their full strength, the ant queen let out a series of wails. Her body was covered in poison damage and charred black. Through the advanced observation skill, Lin Xuan could see that the ant queen’s HP had dropped rapidly to 10% . At this moment, an emerald-green light suddenly lit up inside the ant queen’s body. In the next moment, two emerald-green ant eggs the size of a human head were spat out by the ant queen. Before poison blade and Shimada long could react, the ant queen had already spat out the two ant eggs. The two ant eggs broke out of their shells at a speed visible to the naked eye. The breeding ants inside quickly spread their wings and flew far away, one from the south and the other from the north! “The legendary treasure at the root of the tree was swallowed by the queen ant, which eventually gave birth to these two ant eggs! Now they are legendary treasures!”Shimada long also shouted in a low voice. Poison blade used a high-level observation skill and also saw the information on their bodies. His expression became excited. But at this time, the queen ant let out a final sorrowful cry, and her body rapidly expanded. “It’s going to self-detonate!” Shimada Long’s expression also changed slightly as he quickly retreated. Poison Blade’s speed was even faster as he sped away like he had stepped on a skateboard shoe. Both of them were only affected by the aftershock of the ant queen’s self-destruct and didn’t suffer any injuries. “Split up and Chase!” Shimada long also shouted as he chased after the breeding ant that was flying north. Poison Blade chased towards the south. “Brother Longma, what do you say?”The two martial artists hurriedly asked. “You two go to the north and stall Shimada long. I’ll go to the south and kill that kid before meeting up with you.”Killing intent flashed in Yamamoto Longma’s eyes. “Don’t worry, it won’t be long before I kill that Kid.” “Anyone who dares to reject me must die!” Poison Blade activated the lightning switch and increased his speed, following closely behind the emerald-green flying ant. What surprised Lin Xuan was that even so, he could not quickly close the distance in a short period of time. The Flying Ant’s speed was also ridiculously fast. “Use the advanced observation skill to see.” Lin Xuan controlled poison blade to throw out an advanced observation skill and immediately obtained the detailed information of the flying ant in front of him. “Tier 7, level 6, attributes...; Vitality 10, strength 10, Spirit 300, agility 650?” “Skill [ child of the forest ] , within the forest’s coverage area, speed increased by 20% .” “Skill [ child of the sky ] , flying speed permanently increased by 25% .” “Skill [ ancient tree crystallization ] , dark gold grade, agility increased by 15% !” Lin Xuan was shocked. Damn, this was the template of a king in a secret realm. If this emerald-green flying ant continued to grow like this, it was very likely to become a Tier 9 monster in the future. Moreover, that ancient tree crystallization should be the legendary treasure that Shimada long said contained life force. “Run, I’ll see how you can run!” Lin Xuan immediately controlled the poison blade to increase its speed once more. The only advantage of this flying ant was its speed. The skills on its body were almost all related to speed. Its shortcomings were naturally very obvious. It was as crisp as a piece of paper. Its attributes were almost all stacked on agility, and its vitality was only a pitiful 10 points! The HP that these 10 vitality could provide was very little. As long as poison blade could reach within 10 meters of the flying ant, he could immediately use his skills to attack it from afar! At first, the Flying Ant’s flying speed was very fast, but as its wings flapped repeatedly, its speed gradually decreased. The distance between poison blade and it also became closer and closer. 500 meters, 400 meters, 300 meters.. 100 meters, 50 meters, 30 meters! Until 10 meters! At this moment, Poison Blade’s palm condensed a lightning thread and threw it at the flying ant. The lightning thread hit the flying ant accurately and suddenly formed a heavy shackle that trapped it. The flying ant let out a wail and its wings were burned by the Lightning. Its speed was greatly reduced because of this. Seeing this, poison blade was slightly happy. He immediately stood forward and grabbed it casually. “I’ve finally caught you.” Lin Xuan was also delighted. At this moment, he used his high-level perception and suddenly realized that someone was approaching him rapidly. Moreover, it was an acquaintance. “Yamamoto Dragonhorse? It seems like he’s the only one.” Lin Xuan frowned. This guy wanted to kill him? In less than three minutes, Yamamoto Dragonhorse attacked like a gale, staring coldly at Poison Blade. At the same time, he also noticed the flying ant in Poison Blade’s hand. The Flying Ant was a living thing, so it couldn’t be put into the storage compartment or the space of consciousness. “Only You?” Poison Blade asked. Yamamoto longma sneered, “How many people do I need to kill you?” After saying that, he paused and said in a cold tone, “Hand over the emerald flying ant, and I’ll leave you with a whole corpse.” Poison blade chuckled. Since there was no one behind Yamamoto Longma, and there was no one around him, then it was not a matter of who hit who. Lin Xuan had originally planned to kill Yamamoto Longma when he left Wei Ming kingdom. That way, even if Yamamoto Xuanxin was furious when he found out, he would not be able to find him. But now, there was no one around, and it was a good time to kill. Poison blade forcefully tore off the flying ant’s pair of sheath wings and pulled out a rope from the space of consciousness. He tied it up firmly and threw it to the side. At the same time the flying ant was thrown to the ground, Yamamoto longma stomped on the ground fiercely. Like a long-stored bull, he charged fiercely. The tachi on his waist burned wildly and suddenly chopped down! However, he didn’t feel the feeling of the tachi cutting into his flesh. This slash missed! Yamamoto longma was indeed a warrior with rich combat experience. Seeing that his slash missed, he pulled out a short knife from his waist and stabbed his back without looking back! Dang! Just as Poison Blade’s short sword was about to stab down, the other party’s short knife also happened to stab down. The two weapons collided with each other, emitting a metallic sound. The violent rebound force caused Yamamoto longma to retreat repeatedly, numbing his thumb and thumb. However, Poison Blade only retreated three steps before stopping. “Not bad, as expected of the Yamamoto clan’s most prestigious rank seven martial artist,”Poison Blade praised. Yamamoto Longma’s expression was somewhat gloomy. At his level, whether the opponent’s strength was strong or not, he could test it out with the first exchange of blows. After that attack, the two separated, and he actually retreated even further than poison blade. This meant that his strength was even inferior to poison Blade’s! This made him frown deeply. Impossible! His main attribute was strength. His strength had already reached 287 points, definitely surpassing most seventh rank and seventh rank martial artists. And this person in front of him was definitely not a seventh rank and seventh rank martial artist! Then, how did the other party’s strength surpass his? “Don’t think about it, you won’t understand.” Poison blade laughed coldly, stomping on the ground and quickly approaching. When he was close to 10 meters away, the cooldown of [ swift lightning ] ended. After it was activated, his speed increased explosively, and he instantly rushed in front of Yamamoto Longma. The sharp poison-dipped short sword was pointed straight at his heart! Yamamoto longma took half a step back, and a small shield immediately appeared in front of him. “I was just waiting for this shield of yours.” Poison blade sneered. He had already used the advanced observation skill to look through all the information about Yamamoto Longma. The effects of this shield only had physical resistance and poison resistance. Obviously, Yamamoto Longma had already made a judgment based on poison blade’s attack methods and attack attributes. Poison Blade’s attack definitely had both physical and poison attack. Yamamoto Longma’s judgement wasn’t wrong at all. Normal assassin classes would use these two types of attacks to kill their enemies. But Poison Blade wasn’t an assassin class at all. The short sword in Poison Blade’s hand suddenly disappeared and was replaced by flames that gradually lit up. [ Elemental Lord ] , activate! Flame Burst! And it was cast face-to-face! This power could not be said to be fierce, it could only be said to be very fierce! Yamamoto longma never would have thought that this guy, who was obviously an assassin class, would suddenly take out a flame burst. And he even f * cking enveloped himself in it, as if he was not afraid of death at all! Boom! The terrifying heat reached its peak in an instant. Yamamoto longma was sent flying by the explosion. He only stopped after crashing into over a dozen trees. This was the result of poison blade intentionally weakening the power of his flame blast in order not to injure the emerald flying ant. Poison Blade rushed over quickly. Immediately, he saw Yamamoto longma lying on the ground with his body charred black. His eyes were filled with shock as he looked at the sky. The flame blast that he had used just now had directly blown away 60% of his HP! However, no matter how hard he thought about it, he could not figure it out. How could an assassin learn [ flame blast ] . It was one thing if he had learned [ flame blast ] , but to be able to deal such high damage meant that this person’s spirit attribute was definitely not low. However...; how did he do it. “If you don’t have any trump cards, it’s time to go.” Poison blade stomped on the ground fiercely, sweeping over like a gale. In the blink of an eye, he had arrived in front of Yamamoto Longma. The dark green short sword stabbed straight into his heart! Dang! A silver round shield suddenly appeared in front of him and blocked the attack. However, the durability of the silver round shield was instantly reduced to zero, and it exploded into a pile of scrap metal. Yamamoto Longma’s pupils constricted again. The durability of his silver round shield was at least 50% . He had originally wanted to use it when he was fighting against Shimada Nagaru, but it was shattered by the other party in one strike! What did this mean? It meant that his opponent’s equipment was very strong and his strength was very high! Yamamoto Nagaru’s mind was even more confused. This was not because he lacked combat experience, but because he had suffered a huge blow. He could not accept the fact that he had suddenly seen a large number of things that were beyond his understanding. According to the analysis of what he had seen, he came to a terrifying conclusion. This person’s strength, spirit, and agility were all at least 250 points. Was this possible? It was absolutely impossible! Yamamoto Takuma took a deep breath and tried his best to convince himself that the other party must have obtained some powerful consumable item that could increase all his attributes in a short period of time. As long as he could hold on for a period of time and wait for the other party’s buffs to disappear, he would be able to fight. Dang dang dang dang! Every time the poison blade stabbed down, an item would appear in front of Yamamoto Takuma to block it. At first, it was still a shield. After three shields exploded, it turned into a yellow leaf. Previously, Sato harano-san had also used a yellow leaf to block the poison Blade’s attack. However, the yellow leaf on Yamamoto Takuma’s body was clearly not as much as Sato harano-san’s. After two yellow leaves turned into ashes, Yamamoto Takuma could no longer avoid it. “Why isn’t the buff on your body over? Why!” Yamamoto Dragonhorse was already forced into a desperate situation. He gritted his teeth. Lin Xuan heard this and couldn’t help but laugh. He actually thought that poison blade was so fierce. Was it a buff? No wonder he was still persevering. “Is there a possibility that what I have isn’t a buff but a real attribute? A guess might not be right.” Poison Blade smiled as he spoke, brandishing his short sword and stabbing forward without a moment’s pause. Pu! Pu! Pu! Pu! The number of wounds on Yamamoto Dragonhorse’s body continued to increase, his HP dropping to 20% . With this HP, as long as he triggered the blood choke, he would die without a doubt. Previously, the only reason Yamamoto Dragonhorse had been able to persevere was because Poison Blade’s attacks had not landed on his body. Instead, they had been blocked by various methods. “If you don’t have any life-saving trump cards, you can go on your way.” The poison blade stabbed again. This time, the poison arrow was aimed straight at the wound on Yamamoto’s chest. The flesh around the wound was dark green. It was obvious that he had been poisoned. This attack could trigger the critical strike, vital critical strike, and poison critical strike at the same time. With over 900% critical strike damage, not to mention Yamamoto’s 20% hp, even if he had 40% hp, he would still be able to kill Yamamoto instantly! Slash! The sword pierced through Yamamoto Takuma’s heart without any resistance. Yamamoto Takuma’s eyes widened. He had never imagined that this seemingly ordinary sword attack would actually take away 20% of his HP. He actually still had a life-saving tool on him. It was the Ghost Buddha’s Cup. However, this was the famous country of Reed. The Ghost Buddha’s Cup could only allow the user to teleport to the famous country of Reed. And when the user was in the famous Wei country, it was naturally impossible to use it. Yamamoto longma coughed up blood and was extremely unwilling. “Who...; who are you...;” “Among the level seven takama-ga-hara martial artists...; how can there be someone like you...;” “Impossible...; I don’t understand...;” Yamamoto longma didn’t get an answer until he died. With endless questions, he fell into the darkness forever. Lin Xuan did not have the intention to explain to the dead. In his previous life, he had been influenced by many movies and TV shows. The mouth of a dead person might not be closed. Moreover, he had seen how terrifying the experts in this world were. Back then, the Indian warriors invaded the mystical realm of Xiaoling Mountain under the leadership of Garuda. The light gate of the mystical realm was over a thousand meters away from the third gathering place. Lu Pinghai had cut off Garuda’s leg with one sword strike. The brilliance of that sword strike was still vivid in his mind. However, Lu Pinghai was not the strongest among the level nine warriors. It was hard to imagine that the more powerful level nine warriors had more powerful and mysterious methods. It was probably not difficult to make the dead stand up and speak. “Then let’s destroy the corpses and destroy the evidence.” Lin Xuan controlled poison blade and picked up a few items that Yamamoto Dragonhorse had dropped after it died. Then, he used a face-to-face flame explosion spell to kill the person in one go. After repeatedly observing the surroundings and confirming that there were no traces left behind, poison blade quickly turned around and left. Of course, he didn’t forget to bring the emerald flying ant that was tied up. “The items on Yamamoto Dragonhorse’s body are of high quality. However, he definitely has a ghost Buddha Cup on him. It’s a pity that it didn’t fall out.” As he advanced, he took a look at Yamamoto Dragonhorse’s remains. Over ten million essences! A golden skill book, [ blood evasion ] A giant crocodile’s heart. There was also a large pile of items that contained life force. Yamamoto Dragonhorse had painstakingly collected all of them in Reed Country. Now, all of them had been given to him. There was no need to say more than ten million essences. The more, the better. [ blood evasion ] was a skill similar to [ flash ] . Compared to flash, the cooldown of [ blood evasion ] was shorter. However, each time it was used, it would consume 10% of one’s HP. Moreover, the distance one could escape from it was also slightly shorter than that of flash. However, this was clearly a rather good trump card skill. It could be of great use at critical moments. As for the crocodile heart, after consuming it, one could break through the upper limit and obtain 5 dexterity permanently. Poison Blade placed the crocodile heart into the space of consciousness. Lin Xuan took it out of the space of consciousness and directly transferred the crocodile heart from Wei Ming country to Xiao Ling Mountain. Lin Xuan lit the stove, lit the fire, cooked it, and carefully sliced it. Then, he ate the crocodile heart. The meat quickly turned into rolling nutrients and integrated into his body. As a result, his agility increased from 258 points to 263 points. At the same time, he was controlling poison blade to move forward. Not long after, he met Shimada long, who was rushing towards him. “HMM? Yamamoto longma is chasing after you, but you don’t seem to be injured.” Shimada long sized him up from head to toe with a faint smile. Poison Blade smiled. “I have a little secret of my own, and you have one too, don’t you?” Shimada long also chuckled. “I suddenly feel that your combat strength is stronger than I imagined. Would you like to spar with me?” “Now?” “Not Now.” Poison blade nodded slightly. He noticed that Shimada long also had traces of blood on his body, so he asked, “Someone attacked you too?” “Yamamoto Longma sent two of his underlings to delay me, but I killed them. They were a little rough and splattered with blood.”Shimada long also shrugged. “Yamamoto Longma is dead?” “He’s dead. You killed him.”Poison blade coughed lightly. Shimada long couldn’t help but laugh. “You want me to take the blame just like that? But I don’t dare to admit it now. After all, the strongest person in the Wei Ming kingdom is Yamamoto Xuanxin. After all, Yamamoto Longma is his most doted junior.” “Then...; I dare to guess that Yamamoto Longma is missing.”Poison Blade had a serious look on his face. “Yes, I guess he is missing too.”Shimada long nodded as well. “The emerald flying ants, did you get them?” Poison Blade waved the item in his hand. Shimada long nodded in satisfaction as well. “Alright, let’s hurry to the palace walls to exchange for them.” The two of them flew straight towards the palace walls. Under the walls of the Miyagi City. A round-faced girl was pacing back and forth anxiously. The cute baby’s round face, coupled with the flush of anxiety, made people want to close the distance between them. However, this round-faced girl, Ai Tianmei, would timidly keep a distance from those who harbored evil intentions. If anyone still wanted to take an inch and take a mile, they would be sent flying with a vicious punch from her. After witnessing this girl’s astonishing strength, the martial artists dispersed one after another, not daring to go forward and ask for a beating. Lu Luo cursed in her heart. She felt that she had never worried so much in her entire life. Didn’t they agree to wait together under the city walls. She had already been waiting here for three to four days. Where was that fellow, Poison Blade! Could he have died somewhere in the Wei Ming kingdom. At this moment, she suddenly saw two figures walking out of the ruined walls. Upon closer inspection, one of them was Mu Qiang’s shrewd and greedy face. Lu Luo was delighted. It was good that he was fine. However, when she noticed the person beside poison blade, she instantly lost her composure. Shimada long! Damn it, how did they get together? They seemed to be getting along quite well. Lin Xuan also saw Lu Luo from afar through Poison Blade’s eyes. He quickly walked over and teased, “Could it be that Miss aitian has been waiting for me?” Lu Luo’s face turned red and she hurriedly took a few steps back. “Mr. Mu Qiang, please have some self-respect.” Both of them had perfectly done their role-playing. Shimada long also glanced at him, thinking that Mu Qiang was a lecherous person. It was normal for adults to be lecherous, not to mention that the information given to him by the Sato martial artist showed that Mu Qiang was a person who lusted after women. “We want to exchange for supplies.” Shimada long also shouted towards the city wall. The martial artist on the city wall immediately walked down quickly and bowed slightly towards Shimada long. “Please Wait a moment, the logistics officer will be here soon.” Not long after, a fat logistics officer appeared in front of everyone. “Sorry, sorry, sorry to have kept you waiting.” The logistics officer, Masao Yamamoto, laughed and approached poison blade and Shimada long. Lu Luo glanced at poison blade and gave him a signal. Poison Blade immediately reacted and threw a high-level observation skill at the logistics officer. At a glance, it was indeed true! Outsiders might think that he was Yamamoto Macho, but in reality, he was Silver Fox! How did a middle-aged man in his forties transform into a 29-year-old youth through Li Weiguo’s high-level disguising skill? “Shimada Long? Hello, Hello, what do you want to exchange for?” Silver Fox smiled. “Dark gold set, I want the [ Flaming Dragon Guard ] set,”Shimada long said indifferently. “This...; I don’t have enough points,”Silver Fox said awkwardly. Shimada Nagata also called the two emerald flying ants over. “Legendary treasures that contain life force. These two emerald flying ants are enough for 100,000 points.” Silver Fox widened his eyes. “Wait a moment, I’ll go call uncle right away!” In less than three minutes, an aura soared into the sky and arrived at the entrance of Miyagi City in the blink of an eye. Silver Fox was dragged here by him and was out of breath. Yamamoto Shinji was ecstatic. “Good! Shimada long is indeed worthy of being a martial artist carefully nurtured by Sato. He really found it for you!” The Reed name nation had always had this legendary treasure that contained vitality, but it was very difficult to find. Yamamoto Shinji had his own things to do, so he naturally would not condescend to look for this kind of thing. It was best to hand such a task to a Tier 7 martial artist. “Not bad. If you hand over the life force of these two emerald flying ants to the pharmacist, he will definitely be able to refine a life surpassing potion.” “You want the [ Fire Dragon Guard ] set, right? Sure, I have one here.” Yamamoto took out a set of extremely high temperature soft armor from the storage compartment and handed it to Shimada Longya. The set of the Fire Dragon Guard consisted of four parts, including the head, chest, hands, and legs. The stronger set was the Fire Dragon King set, which consisted of six parts. However, this set was very difficult to obtain in the secret realm of the Dragon mountain range. Shinji Yamamoto kept this set for his nephew Yamamoto Longma. However, since Shimamoto Longma had completed the mission first, as a level 9 martial artist, he would naturally not go back on his word. “This thing is inside the energy-devouring ant’s body. Could it be that you single-handedly destroyed an energy-devouring ant nest?”Yamamoto Shinkai asked casually. Shimada long shook his head as well, pointing at poison blade beside him. “Mu Qiang and I worked together to destroy the energy-devouring ant nest.” Yamamoto Shinkai was shocked. Everyone knew how arrogant Shimada Long was. He actually knew how to team up with others? This meant that Mu Qiang was very strong. Yamamoto Shinkai casually used [ Spirit Eye ] to size up poison blade. He saw about 80% of the information and nodded slightly. Of course, the information he saw was Lin Xuan’s attributes, skills, and equipment after using [ advanced disguise ] . He was much stronger than a normal tier 7 or 4 martial artist, but weaker than a tier 7 or 6 martial artist. In Yamamoto’s eyes, he was considered a talent, but he wasn’t qualified to be a good seedling. Thus, he used [ Spirit Eye ] to take a rough look and didn’t continue to take a closer look. Lu Luo and the surrounding martial artists were also quite surprised. What kind of person was this Mu Qiang. Previously, because he refused to become Yamamoto Longma’s subordinate, he had offended Yamamoto longma. However, Shimada Long was willing to stand up for him. And now, Shimada Long had personally admitted that he and Mu Qiang had cooperated to destroy the nest of energy-devouring ants. This fellow was also highly regarded by Shimada long. He really had something. Lu Luo was surprised that poison blade and Shimada Long had a rather equal partnership. “Thank you, Lord Yamamoto.”Shimada Takashi also bowed slightly. “I have a presumptuous request.” Yamamoto Shinkai was still in high spirits as he nodded repeatedly. “Speak! I can satisfy all of you.” “I wonder if it’s possible for me to enter Asura prison to visit?”Shimada Takashi also asked in a deep voice. Yamamoto Shinkai nodded. “But...;” But just as he finished speaking, he came back to his senses and quickly retracted his previous words. He said resolutely, “No!” Hearing the conversation between the two, Lin Xuan let out a soft gasp. Wasn’t Shimada long an orphan adopted by the Sato Warriors? He actually had a mother. And his mother was actually imprisoned in Asura prison! Shimada long also frowned. “Why not?” Yamamoto Shinkai smiled awkwardly, “You should also know that your mother’s situation is special. The chief personally ordered that you not come into contact with her. Sato even had a stalemate with the chief for a few days before the chief reluctantly agreed to let you visit her from afar every other year.” “There’s still half a year until the next visit.” Shimada Nagaru also took a deep breath. There seemed to be resentment in his eyes. However, this strange resentment was forcefully suppressed by him as soon as it appeared. Shimada long immediately returned to his usual cold and calm expression. “Alright, thank you, Lord Yamamoto.” Yamamoto Shinkai didn’t seem to want to talk about this topic anymore. He turned around and wanted to leave. Shimada long also called out to him, “Lord Yamamoto, the person beside me also wants to exchange for something.” After saying that, he said to poison blade, “Hurry up and take out the items as well.” Poison blade nodded and took out the life crystals that he had obtained from killing the energy-devouring ants from his space of consciousness. Hualala. In the blink of an eye, the life crystals piled up on the ground into a small mountain. Shimada long did not take any of these items and handed them all over to him. The martial artists were dumbfounded. So many! How many points and treasures did they have to exchange for this? Yamamoto Shinkai was stunned at first before he laughed in satisfaction. “Good! It seems like you guys have destroyed a very large energy-devouring ant nest!” “Not bad, not bad. Braveheart, come and take an inventory!” Silver Fox quickly went forward and clumsily took inventory. However, his speed was very fast. He took a few minutes to complete the inventory. “Uncle, there are a total of 1,400 life crystals. They are all about the same size.” “These can be exchanged for more than 60,000 points. What do you want to exchange for?”Shinji Yamamoto smiled and asked. He had always been kind to people who completed outstanding missions. “I’ll have to trouble Lord Yamamoto with the psychic skill and the Giant Bear Heart.”Poison Blade smiled. His actions were also impeccable. Yamamoto Shinkai nodded. He took out two items from the storage compartment and threw them to poison blade. “Brave man, I’ll leave these things to you. Don’t neglect a martial artist, understand?”Yamamoto Shinkai gave the rest of the psychic technique skill book and the Giant Bear Heart to Silver Fox and shouted. “Yes, yes, yes. Don’t worry, Uncle!”Silver Fox slapped his chest so hard that the fat on his chest rippled. Yamamoto nodded and turned to leave. In the blink of an eye, he was gone. Silver Fox wiped his sweat. “I’m sorry. If you have something to say to mother, I can bring it to her for you.” Shimada long also shook his head. “No.” “Mu Qiang, please come over,”he said in a low voice. Lin Xuan was stunned. Did Shimada long also have something to tell him? Although he was a little puzzled, he still controlled the poison blade and walked over. He had a feeling that Shimada long was not the person he appeared to be. He seemed to have a deep secret hidden in his heart. The two of them walked to a place where no one was around. Shimada long also looked around to make sure that there was no one around. Then, he slowly said, “I don’t care who you are. Help me with something.” When he said this, Lin Xuan was a little shocked on the spot. Good heavens, did you see through it? Shimada long shook his head, too. “I don’t know who you are, but your strength and information are different, and they don’t match your identity “But I don’t care which organization you are a spy for. The Salvation Society, the construction department, the Truth Knights, India, or the Arctic army. It doesn’t matter. They have no direct conflict with me “However, I can guess from your intentions that you really want to go to the asura prison, so I just want to ask you for a favor.” When Shimada long said this, he did not have his usual cold arrogance at all. Instead, he revealed a trace of sincerity. Lin Xuan did not feel any killing intent from him either. “Then tell me,”poison blade said. “The seventh floor of Asura prison, cell 35,”Shimada long also said in a deep voice, “Look at my mother. Her right index finger left a scar because she burned it with hot water for me. She has a protruding ear and a mole on her earlobe. Also, the quality of her hair is very bad, and her hair is often curly and forked.” Lin Xuan was speechless. Those who did not know would think that you were describing the murderer’s appearance. “I suspect that my mother is no longer my mother. She is a substitute that the Sato martial artists found.”Shimada Long’s expression was also gloomy. “Forgive me for being blunt, but what is the situation in your family?”Lin Xuan was a little confused. Shimada Long’s information did not mention his mother before he came, so he was quite at a loss. “My parents were hardcore supporters of the previous chief of Takama-ga-hara. When the new chief came to power, my father died in battle, and my mother was imprisoned as a traitor. I was chosen by the Sato martial artists and taken in as an adopted son.” Shimada long spoke slowly and finished his family’s situation in a short paragraph. “The Sato martial artists knew that I hated the chief. If he wanted to control me completely, he would definitely kill my mother and make my hatred for the chief deepen.”He took a deep breath, “A few months ago, during that prison visit, I felt that something was wrong with my mother. She seemed to have changed.” “I understand.” After hearing these words, Lin Xuan immediately understood. At the same time, he was also very emotional. It couldn’t be said that the interior of Takama-ga-hara was unbreakable, right? At the very least, it was riddled with holes! This Shimada Long, who was ranked second on the global rank seven list, and the strongest sword and saber among the rank seven martial artists of Takama-ga-hara, actually had a grudge long ago! “Thank you.” Shimada Longya nodded heavily and turned to leave. Poison Blade watched him leave and turned to return to Miyagi City. Lu Luo was relieved when she saw that he returned unharmed. “He didn’t make things difficult for you, did he?” “Not only did he not make things difficult for me, he might have given us an extra helping hand out of nowhere.”Poison blade blinked. Lu Luo was stunned. However, seeing that poison blade did not continue, she knew that this matter was sensitive, so she did not ask further. “By the way, how do we enter the Palace City?”Poison Blade asked. Lu Luo was about to speak when the logistics officer’s bloated body appeared at the entrance of the palace city. “F * ck, there are still two people left to transport the supplies. Who Wants to transport the supplies?” Mr. Yamamoto cursed as he looked around. The martial artists that he saw, whether they were at the seventh or eighth rank, all subconsciously shrank back. They wouldn’t do such a hard job. Not only was it a waste of time, but they also didn’t get any rewards. This logistics officer had already called dozens of martial artists to help move the supplies. At first, they thought that there were benefits, so they all rushed to help. In the end, Yamamoto Macho took advantage of his uncle’s identity as Yamamoto Shinkai and pretended to be stupid. No matter how he asked, he said that there was no reward. These martial artists were so angry that they gnashed their teeth. If it weren’t for the fact that Yamamoto Macho’s surname was “Yamamoto,”they would have put this guy into a sack and dragged him to a place where no one was around to give him a good beating. Lu Luo looked like an innocent girl, as if she hadn’t realized what was going on yet. Poison Blade was the same. He stood where he was and didn’t move. A large group of martial artists took a few steps back, but they didn’t move. “Good! The two of you are loyal to the organization and serve the country and the people. One look and you can tell that you are the backbone of Gaotian Plains! I’ll leave the important task of moving supplies to the two of you!” Silver Fox pointed at the two of them with satisfaction. Lu Luo said happily, “What about the reward for the mission? It must be very rich, right?” Poison blade nodded as well. “As long as there’s a reward, I’m willing to do it.” Silver Fox thumped his chest loudly. “Don’t worry! With me, Yamamoto Macho, eating a mouthful of meat, there won’t be a lack of soup for the two of you!” Lu Luo and poison blade nodded repeatedly like silly newbies who had been bewitched. The surrounding martial artists immediately looked at them gloatingly. “These two guys have just arrived, right? They actually don’t know that this mission is a thankless task.” “Shh, Keep Your Voice Down. If they hear us, Yamamoto Macho will probably order us!” As the martial artists whispered to each other, Silver Fox successfully led poison blade and Lu Luo into Miyagi City. It didn’t cause any waves. The martial artists who had been guarding the walls of Miyagi City didn’t interrogate them at all. This was because the logistics officer, Yamamoto Macho, was very lazy. He often ordered others to carry supplies and didn’t pay them. If they dared to come forward and interrogate him, they would probably be dragged over as coolies too. Given that this had already happened several times, the guards thought that they were blind and couldn’t see anything. “It’s just that these supplies are too big to fit in the storage compartment.”Silver Fox pointed to a pile of wooden crates on the ground. The length, width, and height of these wooden crates were more than two meters. No wonder he said that they couldn’t fit in the storage compartment at all. The storage compartment was only suitable for those smaller things. “Where are you moving it to?”Poison Blade asked. “Underground, don’t ask questions you shouldn’t ask,”Silver Fox said in an official tone. Lu Luo couldn’t help but laugh. The two followed behind Silver Fox, advancing all the way. Occasionally, they met rank 8 martial artists patrolling in the palace city. The other party only nodded and didn’t ask any questions. The name ‘Yamamoto’was enough to dispel many people’s doubts. Not long after, they arrived at the entrance of a cave. The entrance of the cave slanted downwards and there was a flight of stairs that extended downwards. From the angle of the poison blade, one could see that there was a lamp on the rock wall every certain distance, thus ensuring that the cave would not be too dark. There was a rank 8 martial artist guarding the entrance of the cave. When he saw Yamamoto Macho, he extended his hand to stop him. “It’s a routine inspection.” “Why did you ask the martial artist outside to help carry it?”Seeing that it was two unfamiliar faces, the eighth rank martial artist frowned. Silver Fox smiled slyly, “Wouldn’t that save the manpower cost?” The eighth rank martial artist shook his head helplessly. If it was anyone else, he would have scolded them harshly long ago. But the logistics officer was Yamamoto Macho! This guy could just eat some rebates. He didn’t want to get into an argument with the Yamamoto family either. However, he still dutifully used [ spirit eye ] to check the resources and personnel as usual. There was no problem with the personnel. There was no problem with the resources either. “Go in.”The rank 8 martial artist waved his hand and let them go. “Alright!” Silver Fox waved his hand, bringing poison blade and Lu Luo down. On the way down, the three of them had a tacit understanding and did not say a word. Only Silver Fox, as usual, hummed a little yellow song as he walked at the front. This was what Yamamoto Yunio liked to do the most. “Alright, rest here for a while. Don’t say that I won’t let you rest.” After descending diagonally for about a thousand meters, they arrived at a flat area. There was also a simple men’s and women’s toilet. Silver Fox waved his hand to signal for them to rest and walked into the men’s toilet. Poison Blade and Lu Luo looked at each other and followed. In the narrow male toilet, the three of them looked at each other and smiled at the same time. In a foreign country, the three undercover agents finally met again. They felt a warm current surging in their hearts. Lu Luo asked, “What’s the exact location?” Silver Fox said, “The eighth floor, cell 66.” Poison blade said, “Can we approach it directly?” Silver Fox said, “No, even the daily food and drinks have to be handed over to the martial artists guarding the eighth floor. I can’t even enter.” Lu Luo asked, “What strength?” Silver Fox said, “Tier 8, Level 1.” The three of them fell silent. Lin Xuan was also thinking. Tier 8, Level 1. It wasn’t that they couldn’t fight. In terms of attributes, they weren’t much different. The only difference was the job skills. When a Tier 7 martial artist advanced to tier 8, the job skills would be greatly enhanced, and a second effect would appear. When a tier 8 martial artist advanced to Tier 9, the class skill would have a third effect. According to the materials used to advance, the effect would be different. It could be strong or weak. After all, when a Tier 7 martial artist advanced to tier 8 or Tier 8 to tier 9, other than the materials needed to advance, they also needed the class materials! As for what materials they needed, they could only know after obtaining tier 7, Tier 9, and tier 8, Tier 9. “That person’s strength shouldn’t be strong. If the three of US attack at the same time, we have the confidence to kill him while controlling him.” “But my only concern is whether he has anything special on him, such as...;”Silver Fox said in a low voice. “After he dies, Yamamoto Shinkai will remind us.” Poison Blade and Lu Luo nodded. “It’s very possible.” The three of them continued to ponder. They were already at the final step, and they were only one step away from the door! “Oh right, there has been a change in the Shura prison recently. Perhaps we can use this to our advantage.”Silver Fox suddenly thought of something. “A blood-red door of light that kept rotating appeared on the eighth floor. It appeared more than ten days ago. Yamamoto Shinkai couldn’t see anything with his spirit eye technique, but he felt that it was very dangerous. He even evacuated the prisoners in the cells near the blood-red door of light and told us not to go near it.” More than ten days ago! Hearing this, Lin Xuan fell into deep thought. More than ten days had passed since he entered the secret realm of the Wei Ming country. Mount Kumgang, Wangxia Town, and the capital of the Wei Ming country had stayed in each place for several days. Could it be that the blood-red door of light had something to do with the birth of the origin of the secret realm? “What was the Asura prison before it was occupied by the Gaotian Plain?”Poison Blade suddenly asked. The information about the asura prison was very rare. Before he came to the Takama-ga-hara, the information about the country named Wei only included the Diamond Mountain, the Gold Washing River, the Wangxia town, and the capital of the country named Wei. There was only one line about the asura prison: extremely dangerous. Silver Fox frowned and thought for a while, “It seemed to be the territory of a rank nine secret realm king. In the end, the leader killed it together with the Sato warriors, Sky Feather Craftsmen, and other rank nine warriors.” “However, it was not completely killed back then. A part of the level 9 monster escaped from the secret place of the Asura prison. The second time it appeared was a day later. It appeared in Wangxia town out of nowhere and ate all the zombies in Wangxia town in one night. Then, it reformed into a level 9 monster.” “However, after it reformed, its attributes were much lower than when it was alive. The leader killed it all by himself.” Lin Xuan was delighted. It seemed that there was indeed a connection between the asura prison and Wangxia Town. It was very likely that it was this strange bloody light door. Lin Xuan took a look at the news of Wei Ming country. There was still one day, two hours, and 15 minutes before the origin of the mystic realm was fully formed! “I might know the exact time when the bloody light door opened.” Lin Xuan used Poison Blade’s words to say something. Lu Luo and Silver Fox stared at him, their faces full of suspicion. “Wait one more day. We’ll gather here in one day. The bloody light door will definitely attract the Type 8 martial artist.” Poison Blade said in a low voice. Lu Luo and Silver Fox instinctively wanted to refuse. Waiting one more day might bring many variables. But after thinking about it carefully, they could not think of any way to bypass that rank eight martial artist. “Oh right, I have to meet someone,”poison blade said casually. “Who?” “The seventh floor, cell 35.” Silver Fox thought for a moment. “It’s a woman. I remember now. It’s Shimada Longye’s mother.” “It’s fine to go and see her. I’ll take you there now. Let’s go.” Silver Fox walked in front, and Poison Blade and Lu Luo followed closely behind. The first floor, second floor, third floor.. Their mission was to take out the materials from the wooden crate and place them at the entrance of each floor. Naturally, there would be martial artists guarding here to take them. Soon, they arrived at the seventh floor. Poison Blade walked to cell 35 and saw a woman in her forties who was almost 50. The woman seemed to be quite relaxed. She did not have the despair of being locked up for a long time. Poison blade carefully observed several parts of the woman’s body. The woman also noticed that someone was looking at her and was stunned. Poison Blade had already turned around. “Let’s go.” Lin Xuan had already seen everything through Poison Blade’s eyes. Shimada long had also guessed correctly. There were many unique marks on this woman’s body, but they were already gone. Only the burn marks on the fingers of her right hand were still there, so they could be faked. “Shimada long has also confirmed this news. How will he react?”Lin Xuan sighed softly. After leaving Miyagi City, Poison Blade went straight into the capital of Reed Kingdom, looking for traces of Shimada long. Shimada Long’s battle traces were unique and very easy to identify. Almost all the monsters he killed would be charred. “There’s a very strong smell of roasted meat. It should be nearby.” As expected, it did not take long for him to find Shimada long. At this moment, Shimada Long was also casually sitting on a rock and roasting meat. “You’re so fast. It seems that you’ve already seen her appearance. Tell me.”He noticed poison blade and seemed to be a little surprised by his speed. Poison Blade described the woman’s appearance in detail. Shimada Long’s action of roasting meat immediately froze, and his expression changed for a moment. At that moment, it was as if a towering killing intent rose up. But poison blade blinked and drowned it, and the killing intent disappeared without a trace. “I got it...;”Shimada long also let out a long breath. “What will you do next?”Poison Blade asked casually. “I haven’t thought about it.” Lin Xuan looked at the young man through Poison Blade’s eyes, and for the first time, he saw confusion in his eyes. The first time they met was at the peak of King Kong Mountain. After that, Lin Xuan had never seen this kind of emotion in this man’s eyes. “I think I have to kill someone. When I’m strong enough, I’ll kill the Sato martial artist and leader,”Shimada long also paused and said slowly. “There will be a big move tomorrow. The light gate of the secret realm will reopen. The leader and the other level-nine martial artists should enter the Wei Ming country immediately.” Poison Blade smiled and said. Shimada long was also surprised. How did he know about these things? The two of them fell into a short silence. Since the other party did not say the reason, Shimada long did not ask further. Shimada long also said, “What’s Your Name? It shouldn’t Be Mu Qiang, right?” “Code name, Poison Blade.” Poison Blade stood up. “I look forward to our next meeting.” Shimada long also handed over a skewer of roasted meat. “See you next time.” Poison Blade smiled. As he chewed on the roasted meat, he turned around and left. “Right, if there’s a chance, take care of Hirano Sunda. That Kid isn’t bad.” “Hirano Sunda, good.”Shimada long also nodded. “Poison Blade...;” Shimada long also repeatedly thought about this codename. “I seem to have seen this codename before on the global seventh rank rankings. He seems to be from...; The construction department.” .. Night pervaded the capital. The leader gazed at the bustling capital under the night sky, deep in thought. “The Sato martial artist has been in contact with the Ghost Shadow three times in a row recently, and he even made a request, hoping that the Ghost Shadow Group’s people would enter the capital. His trusted aides would be responsible for protecting them. It looks like his preparations are about to be completed soon, and he’s preparing to make a move.” “This guy is planning to take over!” The leader stared at himself through the window, revealing a cold smile. “Sato martial artist, do you want to be like me back then, exterminating the leader and taking over by force?” “But you definitely don’t know that I know everything that you have planned.” The leader pressed the switch, and the lights went out. The office descended into a prolonged darkness. He sat in a soft chair, closing his eyes and taking a nap. However, his muscles were as taut as a bow. For decades, he had been sleeping like this, night after night, night after night. .. A Day passed in an instant. This day was no different from a normal day. Lin Xuan used the essence he obtained from selling potions and forging equipment in Xiaoling Mountain to invest in his fighter level and skill level. His warrior level had risen from tier 7 to tier 4 to tier 7 to tier 6 in one go! As a result, he had gained 18 free attribute points and invested all of them into his vitality. In addition, he had also gained 3 vitality points from eating the giant bear heart. With the accumulation, his vitality had reached 490 points! As a result, his naked equipment’s attributes were: Vitality 490, Strength 264, spirit 274, and agility 269 points! As for skills like [ Elemental Lord ] , [ all-rounded bone armor ] , [ Swift Lightning ] , and [ Flash ] , which could provide great assistance in battle, their levels had almost all risen to tier 7, Tier 4. He had also poured all the equipment essence he had obtained from refining equipment into the [ indestructible overlord ] dark gold set equipment, raising its level to tier 7, Tier 6. “Indestructible Overlord, Giant Shield, equipped!” “Ready!” Lin Xuan let out a long breath, controlling poison blade to meet up with Lu Luo, and once again came to the palace walls. Just like yesterday, they quickly waited for the time to move the supplies again. The two of them easily entered the asura prison under the lead of Silver Fox. When the tier 8 martial artist saw that it was still them, he did not even bother to use [ spirit eye ] to look at them. Instead, he felt some sympathy for the two of them. “Yamamoto Macho Man, you should at least change to someone else. Aren’t you shameless to capture these two warriors as coolies?” Of course, he did not dare to say these words directly. Just like yesterday, the three of them went all the way down. The first level, the second level, the third level.. All the way to the seventh level. When they arrived here, it was precisely the moment when the origin of the mystic realm was fully nurtured! Boom! A violent boom resounded throughout the entire reed country. On the ground, Shimada Long was also hunting monsters in the reed country’s capital. At this moment, he suddenly raised his head. He saw cherry blossom petals floating in the sky out of thin air. Mount Vajra, the river of washing gold, Wangxia town, and the square where the Mystic Realm’s light gate was located. Countless warriors raised their heads and stared at the falling petals in astonishment. In the palace city. The pharmacist wiped the sweat off his forehead and handed the newly refined super life potion to Yamamoto Shinji. Yamamoto Shinji was overjoyed and immediately raised his head to drink it all. His HP immediately began to recover slowly and steadily. Previously, he could only rely on the HP recovery provided by his physique to recover his HP, causing his HP to remain at around 50% . Now, after drinking this super life potion, his HP should be able to recover to 90% . Rumble. At this moment, he suddenly felt the ground beneath his feet shake. At the same time, he could also see the flowers falling from the sky and a strange fragrance assailing his nostrils. Shinji Yamamoto’s thick eyebrows were deeply furrowed. “What’s going on?” In the square where the secret realm’s light door was located. Hirano suntai felt the strange fragrance lingering around his nose and was very surprised. “It smells so good!” “What on Earth happened?” This question arose in the hearts of all the Warriors. Just then, a warrior closest to the gate of Light inadvertently glanced at the gate of light and then shouted excitedly. “Everyone! The Gate of Light Is Shining! It’s Shining!” The warriors all looked at the gate of light and were also incomparably happy. The gate of light of the secret realm was really shining at a speed visible to the naked eye. This meant that the door of light was about to open! In the plaza in the center of the capital. The door of light of the secret realm also began to shine, attracting a large number of martial artists to approach. When the leader, the Sato martial artists, the Skyfeather Craftsman, and the other ninth rank martial artists received the news, they all rushed over. The martial artists hurriedly made way, making an empty space for the three ninth rank martial artists. Within a ten meter radius, no other martial artists dared to approach. “We don’t know what happened in Wei Ming country. Everyone, be mentally prepared.” The leader looked around and said in a deep voice. The Sato martial artist and the Skyfeather Craftsman both nodded heavily. “Report! A Ghost Shadow Group has been captured in the market area. According to their confession, a large number of ghost shadow group martial artists have infiltrated the capital, and there is no lack of rank eight martial artists among them!” A martial artist from the capital’s Secret Service department rushed over with large strides and reported to the leader. When the Sato martial artist heard this report, his thick black eyebrows twitched for no reason. The leader also furrowed his brows deeply. “The Ghost Shadow Group is entering the capital on a large scale at this time. What are they trying to do? Fish in troubled waters?” The Sky Feather Craftsman said in a deep voice, “Leader, then let me take charge of the capital. I guarantee that the Ghost Shadow Group won’t be able to return.” The leader shook his head. “I’m worried that Ghost Shadow himself will come personally.” Hearing this, the sky feather craftsman’s expression changed slightly. Ghost Shadow himself was a ninth rank martial artist. Because he was dissatisfied with the leader, he had established the Ghost Shadow Group’s power and had been against the Gaotian Plains for a long time. If Ghost Shadow came personally, the Sky Feather Craftsman would not be his match. The Sky Feather Craftsman was better at making machinery, but Ghost Shadow was an extremely strong assassin. Once he was approached by Ghost Shadow, he would lose without a doubt. There was even the possibility of death. The leader looked at the Sato martial artist. “Martial artist, why don’t you take charge of the capital? You are not afraid of Ghost Shadow’s assassination. Besides, don’t You Hate Ghost Shadow? Your Daughter’s disappearance is very likely the Ghost Shadow’s doing.” The Sato martial artist let out a sigh of relief and nodded heavily. “Leader, don’t worry! Martial artists swear to guard the capital with their lives. If ghost shadow dares to come, I will definitely behead him!” The leader patted him on the shoulder in satisfaction. “Martial artist, you are the strongest person below me. If anything happens to me, you will be the next leader of the Takama-ga-hara. Don’t disappoint me.” Sato martial artist’s expression was excited. “Thank you, leader!” But in his heart, he was extremely disdainful. In all these years, the leader had already told him this more than once. It was just a trick to win over people’s hearts. Only a simple-minded person like the Skyfeather Craftsman would be deceived. Sure enough, he glanced at the skyfeather craftsman and found that the latter’s expression was envious. His gaze seemed to say, “The leader praised you but didn’t praise me. I’m so envious of you.”. Sato martial artist felt a chill in his heart. If he didn’t know the Skyfeather Craftsman’s character, he would have suspected that the Skyfeather Craftsman had a special relationship with the leader. The three of them waited quietly, waiting for the moment when the light door of the secret realm lit up completely. .. The eighth level of the Asura prison. The blood-colored light door that was constantly rotating suddenly rotated at a high speed at this moment and emitted a shocking fragrance. The tier 8 warrior guarding the eighth level had a strange expression and immediately approached to check. He did not realize that poison blade and the other two had already appeared on the eighth level. “Lu Luo, you and I will sneak attack that rank eight martial artist together. My stealth ability is quite strong. I will go first and you will follow.” “Silver Fox, while we delay that rank eight martial artist, use this anchor point immediately and contact the construction department as soon as possible. Let the rank nine martial artist use the key of the sun to open the light door and arrive at the Wei Ming country.” Poison Blade handed the machine core to Silver Fox and ordered in a low voice. Silver Fox and Lu Luo nodded solemnly. In the next moment, Poison Blade silently entered the eighth level of Asura prison. Most of the cells here were empty and there was no one. Some of the cells even only had a skeleton, but for some unknown reason, they did not collect the remains. In the eyes of Silver Fox and Lu Luo, Poison Blade’s stealth ability was simply terrifying. “Just now, when he entered the shadow, it was like a drop of water melting into the sea! If I had not stared at that place, I would not have noticed it at all.”Silver Fox was greatly shocked. He hadn’t come into contact with poison blade much, so he didn’t know what poison blade was good at. “You’re making a fuss. I’ve already gotten used to it these days.”Lu Luo chuckled. Silver Fox couldn’t help but click his tongue. Cell number one, cell number two.. Poison blade flashed past quickly, and the cells flashed before his eyes. “That scrawny guy seems to be the famous blood demon Kodo of the Salvation Society! When he disappeared, he was level eight.” “That bearded man seems to be the third vice commander of the Knights of Truth, the Knight of Light, Hall! He went missing four years ago and hasn’t been heard from!” The more he looked, the more frightened he became. “Could it be that takama-ga-hara has been planning to secretly capture the potential level 8 warriors of various organizations?” Blood Demon Kodo and Light Knight Hall suddenly opened their eyes, but they did not see a single figure. They could not help but exclaim in surprise. Cell 66! Lin Xuan looked inside through Poison Blade’s eyes and saw a woman with an elegant face and a mature figure sleeping with her eyes closed. However, even though she was in the Shura Prison of the reed country, even if she was in the core area of the Takama-ga-hara and became a prisoner, she did not look dispirited at all. However, the equipment on her body had long been taken away by the Gaotian plain warriors, and there was almost no aura on her body. It was possible that she had been sealed by the powerful ability of a Tier 9 warrior. Poison Blade swept past cell 66 and approached the tier 8 warrior at a rapid speed. Xiang Qianmu suddenly opened her eyes, as if she had sensed something. “Eh...; Is it my illusion?” Five hundred meters, three hundred meters, one hundred meters.. The distance between the poison blade and the rank eight martial artist was getting closer and closer. The overly curious rank eight martial artist had already arrived in front of the blood-red door of light. If it wasn’t for Yamamoto Xuanxin admitting that the blood-red door of light was very dangerous, Lin Xuan had no doubt that this guy would have rushed in to check it out. After all, one hundred years of experience told human martial artists that the other side of the door of light was definitely another secret realm. Even if it was very dangerous, they could just go back the way they came. What was there to be afraid of. It was not an environment where there was no oxygen in the vacuum, high pressure, low temperature, deep sea, ultra-high radiation, and other things that they had never seen before. They would die instantly when they landed. “Now!” The poison blade suddenly jumped up like a cheetah. The poisoned short sword was aimed straight at the back of the tier 8 warrior’s neck! The tier 8 warrior did not expect that someone would actually attack him from behind in such a safe Asura prison! With a single slash, fresh blood spurted out! Critical hit! Triggered 300% critical hit damage. “It’s a pity that I can’t see his complete information. I don’t know what attribute he has or what class skill he has.” Lin Xuan sighed inwardly. “Bastard!” The tier 8 martial artist was both shocked and furious. He had actually lost 30% of his HP in this attack! In an instant, a silver shield appeared in his hand. He smashed it fiercely towards the face of the ambusher, and instinctively turned around to attack. Poison Blade jumped back and nimbly dodged the attack. “Who...; Are You!” The eighth rank martial artist was both shocked and angry. The quality of his [ spirit eye ] was very low. It was only blue quality, so he could not see the opponent’s detailed information at all. He could not even obtain the opponent’s level. But he instinctively felt that the opponent was very powerful. After all, he could actually sneak around ten meters behind him and make a move. It was definitely not something an ordinary tier 8 martial artist could do. However, Poison Blade did not have any thoughts of answering him. A scythe that was flashing with black light was already slashing fiercely towards the neck of the tier 8 martial artist! While poison blade was messing up the thoughts of the tier 8 martial artist, Lu Luo had already activated her skill and sprinted over. An incomparably sharp attack arrived in an instant! Dang! The black scythe hacked onto the shield. Lu Luo retreated more than ten steps. Her arms were trembling from the recoil, and she almost gripped the sickle tightly. Meanwhile, the tier 8 martial artist only felt a slight numbness in his arms. “Tier 7 martial artist? You dare to attack me even though you’re a Tier 7 martial artist?” The tier 8 martial artist who was in charge of guarding felt as if he had been humiliated. Lu Luo was a little confused. Why was the poison blade able to see blood with a single strike? The other party seemed to be facing a formidable enemy, treating the poison blade as an opponent of the same level. However, he wasn’t even able to break through his defense, and he was even forced to retreat more than ten steps. Both of his arms were numb. Poison blade this fellow...; could it be that he was also concealing his strength? Damn it, shield ghost was the same, and so was flame burst. Why did these guys always like to hide their strength. “Yamamoto Macho? Wait...; You’re with them? You’re here to save people? You’re spies from the construction department!” The level 8 martial artist saw the Fat Yoshio Yamamoto arrive in front of cell 66 at a glance. He struggled to open a strange, shimmering sphere. He was greatly surprised, but he quickly realized that this Yoshio Yamamoto was no longer the real Yoshio Yamamoto! In the cell, Xiang Qianyi’s eyes suddenly lit up. “Someone from the construction department?” Yin Hu nodded. “Senior Xiang, wait, we’ll rescue you right away!” “Okay!”Xiang Qian ‘er was excited. Ever since she was ambushed by the Takama-ga-hara warriors in drowning city and imprisoned in the Shura Prison of the Reed Country, she had not seen the sun on the ground for several months. But even so, she did not give up, nor did she despair. Because she knew that the organization would not give up on her, not every construction department officer! “Stall him and buy time!” Poison blade shouted loudly and stood together with Lu Luo with this tier 8 warrior. Dang dang dang! The sound of metal colliding suddenly sounded. “Damn rats, how dare you break into the Shura Prison to save people. I will let you know today that you will never come back!” The rank 8 martial artist roared ferociously and punched a seemingly inconspicuous railing not far away. Wu Wu Wu Wu! An alarm immediately sounded in Asura prison. The guards on the seventh floor were shocked. No matter what they were doing, they immediately rushed to the eighth floor. In less than three minutes, several rank 7 guards on the seventh floor rushed to the eighth floor. “You go and block them. I’ll deal with this rank 8 martial artist alone!” Poison blade shouted. Lu Luo did not have time to waste, immediately brandishing her sickle and standing together with the Type 7 warriors. Her attributes, class, and equipment were actually among the best among tier 7 martial artists. Although she was only at tier 7 or Tier 5, she could still barely win against ordinary tier 7 or Tier 6 martial artists! As a result, those guards who had rushed down from the seventh floor were completely unable to get past Lu Luo’s obstruction. There was even one person who was caught by her weakness and triggered the scythe effect, killing him instantly! This instant kill shocked the other people and made them cower in fear. In the other cells on the eighth floor, the few prisoners who saw this scene also cried out in surprise. “Good kill! Good Kill!” “Girl, save me. The Savior will not mistreat you!”The scrawny blood demon Kodo was ecstatic. “I’m from the Truth Knights! Quickly let me out. I want to tell the organization about the cruel and evil deeds that takama-ga-hara has committed over the years! Takama-ga-hara must be put on trial!”Hall shouted as he shook the railing with all his might. Many prisoners were very excited when they saw the people from the construction department coming. Many of them had unshaven beards and were dressed in shabby clothes. It was obvious that they had been imprisoned for longer than Xiang Shensi. “Stop joking. It’s just three tier 7 warriors. How can they save us?”In a corner, an old man with white hair that looked like a bird’s nest shook his head repeatedly. “Tier...; Tier 7?” Blood Demon KE duo was stunned for a moment. Hall was also stunned. “Old Ivan, that guy can go head-to-head with a tier 8 warrior! How can it be a Tier 7 warrior?” Old Ivan said impatiently, “It’s a tier 7 warrior. Do you doubt my eyes?” Hall smiled awkwardly. “But...; the construction department should have a backup plan. We’ll just watch. With the craftiness of those old rivals of the construction department, it’s impossible for them to only send three rank seven warriors to save people.” Old Ivan paused and suddenly spoke again. Kodo gritted his teeth. “No matter what, I Must Get Out Alive! I want to take crazy revenge on the Gaotian Plains!” At this moment, Silver Fox’s mechanical core was finally set up. A faint light suddenly emitted, like an anchor embedded in the air in front of him. In the next moment, a faintly discernible crack slowly opened up above the mechanical core. “What the hell is that?”Kodo was stunned. “I’ve never seen it before...; is it the strange machine that Wanyou Gap is researching?”Hall was also stunned. This tier 8 martial artist guarding the eighth level of the Asura prison was very knowledgeable, but he recognized it at a glance. It was the sign that the key of the sun was about to open the secret realm’s light door. These spies of the construction department used some unknown method to actually anchor the eighth level of the Asura prison. Thus, the key of the Sun could open a stable passage between two specific secret realms! “Damn it, I won’t let you open the secret realm’s light door so easily!” The eighth rank martial artist roared angrily. The Silver Shield suddenly dissolved on its own and turned into a pure white light. The white light beam was as big as an adult’s head. It was filled with terrifying and pure energy. It was as if everything would be completely annihilated in this white light beam! Old Ivan let out a strange cry. “Kids, I don’t know what your methods are, but that move is very powerful. Don’t let your methods be attacked. Otherwise, you’ll lose everything!” Kodo and hall also shouted, “Quickly stop them!” “Unless you use human lives to fill the gap, it’s impossible to stop them. Give up on this idea!” The eighth rank martial artist grinned hideously and aimed the light beam at the slowly opening gap. Silver Fox suddenly stood up and tugged at his clothes to ensure that there were no wrinkles on his body. He smiled, but his heart was extremely satisfied, as if he was ready to sacrifice himself. “Do you think that the construction department’s agents are as afraid of death as you are?” Silver Fox chuckled and stood in front of the crack, using his chest as the last line of defense against the white beam of light. “Who said that a mage can not take a shield, so I took it.” Silver Fox flipped his palm, and a small round shield appeared on his arm. Although this small round shield was like a sesame seed compared to the white beam of light, it was like an elephant. “My life was worth it. I didn’t leave any regrets. Now, I can die for the sake of saving a future rank 9 martial artist. I have no regrets.” Silver Fox smiled, his expression calm. Lu Luo cursed, “Get lost! Where’s your son? !” Silver Fox’s expression did not change. “I’ve already handed him over to black. Black will treat him like his own son. Before I came to the Gaotian Plains to be a spy, I already had an understanding.” Poison blade roared, “Then what about the debt you owe shield ghost for the past 80 years!” Silver Fox’s expression changed greatly.”? ? ? How the hell do you know! ?” “The debt hasn’t been paid yet, how can I Die! ?” Poison blade laughed wantonly. He directly rushed in front of the tier 8 martial artist and crashed into him like a bear. The 264 points of explosive strength actually knocked him into the blood-red door of light! Poison Blade himself lost his balance and fell into the light door. The moment the two of them fell into the light door, the white light beam exploded, and poison blade was bathed in it. Amidst the explosion of the light beam, there seemed to be the sound of equipment shattering. The eighth level of the Asura prison was dead silent at this moment. Lu Luo widened her eyes and said in a daze, “Poison Blade...;” Silver Fox was stunned for a moment. “No...; Why did you pounce on him? My emotions are all set...;” Blood Demon Kodo and Light Knight Hall were also stunned when they saw this scene. Kodo scratched his head. “The people in the construction department are all like this. Hall, What do you think? Why don’t we have such young people in our organization?” Hall rolled his eyes, “You have more dealings with the construction department than I do. If you don’t know, what do I know?” “Just now, we felt that there was someone. It should be that young man, right? His stealth ability is definitely the best among the fighters I’ve seen. I’m afraid that even some of the rank 8 and rank 3 fighters can’t compare to him.”Kodo sighed. Hall nodded, but then shook his head, “It’s a pity. Such a good young man, his future is limitless. He’s dead.” They had just watched helplessly as the white beam of light struck the body of the poison blade. A full-strength attack from a rank 8 martial artist. At such a close distance, it was impossible for a rank 7 martial artist to block it. That young man was definitely dead. However, that young man had also done a good deed, which was to ram the rank 8 martial artist guarding the eighth level into the bloody light door, buying time for the others. Old Ivan said calmly, “We’ve been captured by the Takama-ga-hara for a few years, but no one has come to save us. That woman has only been captured for a few months, and the construction department has already sent people over.” Kodo and Hall immediately fell silent. Kodo coughed lightly, “Maybe they didn’t notice.” Hall nodded, “Maybe they know too, but there’s no evidence.” “Don’t fool yourself.”Old Ivan sneered and shouted at Silver Fox, “Kid! The key to the cell is on the wall over there. Open our door. Although our strength has been sealed quite a bit, we can still display a bit of battle strength.” “Right, right, right! Hurry up and open our cell door. Before your construction department’s people arrive, we can also help!”Kodo also cried out. Silver Fox smiled helplessly. He was already over forty years old. It was indeed a little strange for them to call him a kid. However, he also recognized these people. They were all famous tier 8 martial artists from various large organizations. He did not dare to be negligent. He quickly took the key and ran over to open the door. When the martial artists guarding the Shura Prison saw this, they went crazy and wanted to rush over. However, without exception, they were all blocked by Lu Luo. A total of eight rank 7 warriors were blocked by her alone! Puff! Crack! Wounds appeared on Lu Luo’s body one after another. Her clothes were in tatters. However, she still did not retreat. The black sickle waved like a windmill. Anyone who dared to come within two meters of her would be injured. “Get lost, let me do it!” An explosive roar suddenly came from the tunnel. In the next moment, a huge spear smashed fiercely. Lu Luo felt an extremely powerful pressure from this huge spear. This was definitely not a seventh rank martial artist, and it was a terrifying aura that could completely destroy her with one strike! “It’s that eighth rank martial artist at the entrance of the Asura prison...;” Lu Luo sighed softly. Was she going to die after poison blade. However, dying in battle like this wasn’t a bad thing. Facing this terrifying giant spear, Lu Luo stood firmly on the spot without any intention of retreating! In her pupils, the giant spear rapidly enlarged, as if it was going to pierce through her chest in the next second! “Girl, get out of the way!” A roar suddenly sounded behind her. Then, Kodo and Hall rushed out at the same time. “Old Ivan, Hurry up and use your skills!” Kodo cursed. “I know, I know, I don’t have enough mana, let me squeeze...;” Old Ivan cursed and barely released a skill. [ ice armor ] ! Their bodies were suddenly covered with a thick layer of ice. They crossed their arms and directly blocked in front of Lu Luo. Crack! The giant spear struck. The ice on their arms suddenly shattered! Kodo and Hall retreated more than ten steps, almost knocking Lu Luo away. But this attack was blocked by them. The giant spear also fell to the ground with a clang. “Old Ivan, your strength has decreased.”Kodo grinned and laughed. Old Ivan took a deep breath and said reluctantly, “Don’t talk nonsense. You guys quickly recover your energy and mana. I Can’t use the second skill.” “Alright!” Kodo grinned hideously and grabbed the nearest highland warrior. His five fingers were like sharp knives, piercing into his chest. The blood seemed to have spirituality as it surged towards Kodo’s arm. Kodo’s shriveled body was recovering at a speed visible to the naked eye. “Too evil. I really don’t know where you got this anti-human skill.”Hall looked uncomfortable and turned his head away. Kodo chuckled and continued to feed. “Kodo! Hall! You guys actually made it out of the cell!” The Type 8 warrior rushed to the 8th floor, and when he saw Kodo and hall, he was both shocked and furious. “Hall, block him for a while. I’ll go help after you drain him dry.”Kodo waved his hand. Hall nodded, and his entire body burst out with light. In an instant, he was covered in a suit of golden armor, covering all his limbs. There was no gap at all, looking majestic. This was not equipment, but a class skill of his. Equipment could be taken away, and skills could be temporarily sealed. However, when they walked out of the cell and broke free of the shackles, all the power that belonged to them would return like lightning! Hong! Hong! Hong! Hall immediately engaged the Type 8 expert. Only then did Lu Luo recover from her shock. She quickly stopped the other experts, preventing them from approaching the light door. Silver Fox ran over, wanting to open the door, but he could not find the key to cell 66. “That key is in Yamamoto’s hands.”Xiang Qianyu shook his head. Silver Fox scratched his head and was a little anxious. “It’s okay. Let’s leave it at that. The light door is about to open. When our tier 9 martial artist arrives, the cell door can be broken easily.” Xiang Qianyu waved his hand, indicating for him not to be anxious. Old Ivan looked at the slowly rotating blood-red light door behind him. He seemed to have heard the sound of equipment breaking. “Could it be that the young man has something that can save his life?” “But even Shinji Yamamoto doesn’t dare to enter this door of light. It might be very dangerous. Even if he lives, he would have a slim chance of survival if he went to the other side of the door of light...;” .. Opposite the blood-red door of light. Poison blade shook his aching head and slowly got up. Lin Xuan took a look, and sure enough, the [ giant shield ] set equipment on him had been shattered. However, the [ indestructible overlord ] set equipment was still there, and its durability had not decreased at all. Moreover, what surprised him was that his HP had actually dropped from 90% to 40% . “This 50% hp loss...; could it be the price I have to pay to pass through the blood-red door of Light?”? It was no wonder that Shinji Yamamoto had sensed danger with just a glance. After losing 50% of his HP as a Tier 9 martial artist, it would be extremely difficult for him to recover unless he possessed a high physique Lin Xuan took out a large HP potion and gulped it down, deep in thought. Following which, Lin Xuan surveyed his surroundings through Poison Blade’s eyes. It was dark and dark, damp and cold. He could vaguely hear the sound of water. However, the air was extremely foul, and he almost fainted when he smelled it. He looked at his own warrior level and realized that his level was slowly rising, but at a very slow speed. Lin Xuan was deep in thought. “If I’m not mistaken, this is the bottom of King’s town, the place where the origin of the mystic realm is nurtured.” “After passing through the blood-red door, the level eight warrior and I landed at different places. I should have temporarily separated from him “I can’t make a sound first, or I’ll definitely be attacked by him. However, the environment here is very suitable for me!” Lin Xuan controlled the poisonous blade, and like a fish swimming into the sea, he advanced silently without making a sound. “The smell is very strong in that direction. I should go that way.” 100 meters, 200 meters.. He silently recited the distance he had traveled. After walking for a while, there was a faint light ahead. At this time, he suddenly heard footsteps coming from the left! Patter, patter! Although the footsteps were very light, he could hear them clearly in this silent environment. “That tier 8 Warrior is an armored soldier, he’s not good at stealth. I can ambush him in the dark.” “The Indestructible Overlord set should be able to block two full-force attacks from him. However, it will shatter after two attacks. Unless it’s absolutely necessary, we can’t waste it like this.” Lin Xuan thought of everything and quickly approached the tier 8 warrior. “What the hell is this place! where is that damn construction department warrior? !” The level eight warrior cursed in his heart and stared at the surroundings in fear. He had a feeling that there was a pair of eyes staring at him in the darkness, waiting for an opportunity to move. It was so scary, so terrifying. “What is that light over there...;” In the darkness, one could only walk toward the light, or else one would never see the edge. The rank 8 martial artist walked and stopped, slowly approaching in that direction. Puchi! The short sword stabbed violently, hitting the vital part! A mouthful of blood spilled out from the sword! The rank 8 martial artist screamed and instinctively turned around to attack, but this hasty attack missed. “Damn rat, it’s You!” The rank 8 martial artist cursed in all directions, hearing his own echo. He took out a knife and slashed at the air around him angrily, but he could not hit anything. The poison blade was just a few meters away from him, with a cold smile on his face. He was not stupid enough to attack continuously. Once he hit, he immediately ran away. After a few minutes of futile slashing, the level eight warrior finally stopped and continued to move toward the Glimmer. Because the environment was too dark, he could not move faster. Not long after, Lin Xuan controlled the poison blade to follow him once more, slashing once more. Critical hit! Poison blood spurted out! The tier 8 martial artist was incomparably furious as he roared madly. However, he could only attack the air. “Damn it! Damn it!” The tier 8 martial artist gnashed his teeth in hatred. After two consecutive critical hits, his HP had already fallen to a critical state, with only 30% remaining. When he had passed through the blood-red door of light, for some reason, 50% of his HP had been taken away. He had only managed to pull his HP to around 90% after drinking two bottles of the great HP Potion. However, he had already finished drinking the great HP Potion, leaving behind only the low-quality potion. The tier 8 expert then took out the great HP potion and gulped it down. The Life Potion’s medicinal power spread out, helping his HP slowly rise. However, he had only just finished drinking the life potion when the poison blade once again struck Leng Zi. Splat. Blood splattered everywhere! “Ahhhh!” This tier 8 martial artist was about to go crazy from anger. The recovery of the life potion was not much to begin with. After being attacked, the recovery would be interrupted. It was equivalent to not drinking it! “Manic, angry. Now is the time for me to attack.” Lin Xuan controlled the poison blade and launched the final attack. Just as the poisoned short sword in his hand was about to pierce into the back of the warrior’s heart, the level eight warrior suddenly turned around and launched an attack! This attack was accompanied by vigorous power and frost covering it! It was obviously a skill that the opponent had been accumulating power for a long time. Bang! Poison Blade took this attack head-on, his body flying backward as he spat out a mouthful of blood in mid-air. The tier 8 martial artist guffawed. “I didn’t guess wrong. You are indeed behind me!” Poison Blade’s body flashed. HP reduced by 50% . Lin Xuan was slightly shocked, but he quickly calmed down. As expected of a Tier 8 martial artist. The attack that he had been accumulating power for a long time had dealt over 50% of his damage. If not for the [ eternal overlord ] set equipment, he would have lost a lot of HP. Lin Xuan inspected the [ eternal overlord ] set equipment and found that its durability had been reduced by 60% . “As expected, this set equipment is still at a disadvantage against a Tier 8 martial artist. After all, it’s a tier 7 set equipment.” “Brat, prepare to die!” The tier 8 martial artist laughed heartily as he rushed over. He had been ambushed by this damned smelly rat time and time again, and now he had finally seized the opportunity! He wanted to crush the bones on this smelly rat’s body inch by Inch! Otherwise, it would not be enough to dispel the anger in his heart! He rushed over, and sure enough, there was a heavily injured martial artist lying here. “Die!” He grinned hideously as he stretched out his hand, his speed extremely fast, grabbing poison Blade’s neck. However, what he grabbed was only air. “Where is he? !” He was both shocked and angry. In the next moment, the sharp dagger had already pierced into the back of his neck. Critical hit! Critical hit on the wound! Critical hit on the poison! Critical hit damage + 920% ! The tier 8 martial artist’s HP instantly and resolutely emptied out! His eyes widened in anger, unwilling to fall. Even until his death, he still did not know how he died. “Hu...;” Poison Blade panted heavily as he hurriedly poured a bottle of HP potion into his mouth, raising his HP to over 80% . The rest was left to the HP recovery speed brought about by his high physique, so he would naturally recover. “If I use [ flash ] properly, it’s simply unsolvable.” Lin Xuan also let out a long breath as he revealed a smile. Just now, when he had let poison blade lie on the ground, he had deliberately pretended to be heavily injured to deceive this person’s attack. Taking advantage of the moment when this person was bent over, he used [ flash ] to directly move behind this person, instantly killing him with three critical strikes. The entire process was smooth and smooth. “What did it drop?” Poison Blade went forward to check. 13 million essence. A Golden Peerless Quality Broadsword. A dark gold legend quality ring blueprint. A dark gold legend quality rune. “With this 13 million essence, I can increase my fighter level again. At least one more level.” “The effect of this golden broadsword is average. It can be smelted or sold. It’s better than nothing.” “This dark gold ring blueprint is not bad. Small-scale equipment like rings, necklaces, and amulets are very popular. No matter what the effect is, wearing it will be enough!” Lin Xuan looked carefully and found that the effect of the [ greedy golden snake ring ] was not to increase attack power or defense, but to increase the drop rate! “The drop rate of essence, the drop rate of secret realm pearls, the drop rate of blueprints, and the drop rate of runes. All four of them have bonuses. Amazing!” Lin Xuan smiled very brightly and immediately arranged blueprints to be forged in his space of consciousness. “As for this dark gold rune...;” He examined it carefully and found that the dark gold rune itself was more of a supporting character. Moreover, it was not a rune group, but a single rune. [ glutton ] , tier 8, Level 1. It needs to be embedded in the head equipment. Drinking various potions can provide an additional 30% boost “This effect is quite good. Drinking the life potion is equivalent to drinking half a bottle more out of thin air.” Lin Xuan kept the items one by one and walked toward the source of the light. He did not encounter any danger and reached the source of the light without any danger. A strange and mysterious scene came into his sight. It was a shriveled but beating heart! The heart was not bright red either. Instead, it was dark brown like the color of a dead person. The area around the heart was extremely smelly. “There is a saying that when the smell reaches its peak, it means that it is fragrant. When the smell reaches its peak, it means that it is smelly. I’m afraid that the fragrance that pervades the entire Wei Ming country is formed after the stench from this heart is diluted.” Lin Xuan controlled the poison blade and threw a [ advanced observation ] at the heart. —— Name: Corpse Dragon Heart Level: Tier 9, Level 1 Quality: seven-colored immortality Effect: raises skill quality from dark gold legend to seven-colored immortality. Description: Corpse Dragon was once the ruler of the famous reed country. After its death, its heart absorbed the flesh and blood of all the dead monsters in the famous Reed Country. Finally, it was nurtured into the origin of the arcane realm. —— Lin Xuan let out a long breath. As expected, this was the origin of the arcane realm. However, he really did not expect that the effect of the origin of the arcane realm was to raise skill quality! “But there is only one arcane realm origin, which means that I can only improve one skill. Which one should I choose?” Lin Xuan thought carefully. This was a major event in life, he could not be vague. “Which skill should I choose depends on what I need.” “Battle-type, I have [ Elemental Master ] , [ spell enhancement ] , [ mana burst ] , [ burning city ] , [ see blood and seal the throat ] and so on.” “Survival-type, I have [ all-rounded bone armor ] , [ demonized body ] , and so on.” “Support-type, I have [ Swift Lightning ] , [ Flash ] , [ advanced observation ] , [ advanced camouflage ] , [ advanced cloning ] , and so on.” The more Lin Xuan thought about it, the more helpless he felt. Why do I have so many dark gold-quality skills. It’s a difficult choice! “It’s a pity that I can’t know the effects after every quality upgrade. Otherwise, I would have to look at all of them before making a choice.” Lin Xuan thought about it again and again and still chose [ advanced cloning technique ] . This skill had helped him too much. If he leveled up further, there would probably be an unimaginable huge change. “If I remember correctly, there are no seven-colored immortal grade skills in the world. Even those rank 9 warriors only have dark gold grade skills at most.” He remembered this very clearly. When he was still in white crane town, Black had mentioned this to him. The quality of the skills of a level nine warrior had almost reached dark gold, but he did not know how to continue improving. The books that Lin Xuan had read in the construction department and Gao Tian Yuan also showed that there was no higher quality than the dark gold legend. “The origin of the mystic realm is the first one in the world!” Lin Xuan was full of excitement. He controlled the poisonous blade to go forward and touch the Corpse Dragon’s heart. The Corpse Dragon’s heart immediately shrank to the size of a fist and fell into his palm. “Use the corpse dragon’s heart to increase the quality of the high-level cloning skill.” Lin Xuan muttered. Buzz! The poisonous blade’s entire body burst out with seven-colored rays of light, which were surrounded by a soaring fragrance. On Lin Xuan’s data panel, the words “High-level cloning skill”were changing rapidly. At this moment, Wang Xia town was breaking through the sky with a seven-colored light beam! All the zombies that were illuminated by the seven-colored light beam were screaming and burning, running away like crazy. The leader of the reed country, the Skyfeather craftsman, also saw the light beam from afar and was inexplicably shocked. “What’s going on? !”The leader was shocked. “I can sense a shocking aura from that pillar of light,”the Sky Feather Craftsman was also shocked. “Go and take a look!”The leader waved his hand, signaling him to follow. When the two of them arrived here, they found that the pillar of light was shot out from underground. The Sky Feather Craftsman waved his hand, and the two robots immediately fell out of the storage compartment and began to dig rapidly. One meter, five meters, twenty meters.. However, no matter how hard they dug, the seven-colored pillar of light was still lower! The leader frowned deeply. .. Asura prison. Old Ivan, Kodo, and Hall were all lying in a pool of blood at this moment. They were on the verge of death. Silver Fox and Lu Luo were also sent flying far away. One of them had lost an arm, while the other had lost a leg. Lu Luo’s long leg was even forcefully broken. At this moment, the atmosphere in Asura prison was solemn. Originally, with the help of old Ivan and the other two’s strength, the Takama Plains Warriors could not enter the eighth level of the Asura prison. However, Yamamoto Shinkai was not an idiot with a brain full of fat. When he heard the alarm, he rushed here immediately. The first strike destroyed Hall’s golden light armor. The second strike destroyed the blood qi that Kodo had just absorbed. The third blow shattered the frost barrier created by Old Ivan. “You’re still too late...; the level nine of the construction department has arrived.” Blood Demon Kodo spat out blood, but he laughed out loud. The secret realm light door that had been opened by the key of the Sun had already been completely opened. Yamamoto Xuesen was ready to attack, and he stared at the light door. As long as someone came out, he would give it his all! Even if the opponent was a famous rank 9, he would still be heavily injured! Who Came. Lu Pingjiang? Lu Pinghai? Or ten thousand crevices? A thousand feet tall? It couldn’t be ye Lijiang, right. Although that woman was the number one director of the construction division, she rarely made a move. Most of her time was spent managing the important affairs of the construction division. If ye Lijiang had come, Yamamoto Xuanxin would have heaved a sigh of relief. He felt that he could suppress ye Lijiang and fight. At this moment, Yamamoto Xuanxin felt a trace of murderous intent. He frowned, his entire body tensed up as he prepared to attack. A figure appeared in the light door of the mystic realm, almost about to step out of the light door. Yamamoto Xuanxin sneered as a streak of blood-colored light ruthlessly hacked down! Within this blade, there seemed to be the wails of vengeful souls and the roars of monsters. Everyone on the eighth level of the asura prison felt an indescribable pain when they heard the sound of the slash. It was as if their heads were being hammered by a long nail! “This strike of mine will seriously injure you even if you don’t Die!” Yamamoto Shinkai was full of confidence. However, when this slash was sent out, the opponent only extended a pure white hand. In the center of the palm, there was a small black whirlpool rotating. When the blade light hit her body, it was instantly sucked into the black whirlpool. “Yamamoto Xuanxin, after so many years, you haven’t improved at all.” A mature and elegant voice came from the light door. In the next moment, the white-haired ye Lijiang slowly walked out. She raised her hand, and the blood-colored blade light that Yamamoto Xuanxin slashed out became extremely mini. It was firmly bound by the black whirlpool, unable to break out even if it tried to move left and right. Yamamoto’s expression suddenly changed. At the same time, in the underground of Wangxia Town. The seven-colored light had gradually dissipated, and the strange smell had also gradually faded. “I’ve leveled up. Let’s see what it has become.” Lin Xuan hurriedly checked. —— Name: Avatar Level: Tier 7, Level 5 Quality: seven-colored immortal Effect 1: only skill. Other than death, no other living creature or non-living creature can obtain this skill through any means, this includes, but is not limited to, the drops from killing monsters, killing warriors, and obtaining the quality of the skill. Effect 2: creates five clones that inherit 100% of the original body’s attributes and skills. The duration is unlimited. The clones have higher intelligence and do not consume mana. They can be canceled at any time. Effect 3: consumes 10% mana. You can switch between the original body and the clones at any time. Description: Is there a possibility, I mean a possibility, that this is an immortal spell? A guess might not be right. —— “The name has changed again, from [ advanced cloning technique ] to [ avatar ] .” Seeing the words “Only skill”, Lin Xuan was even more surprised. He had never seen such a thing before. This meant that he was the only person in the world who had this skill. Even if someone possessed a skill similar to [ cloning technique ] or [ advanced cloning technique ] , they would never be able to raise the quality of their skill to seven-colored immortality and become this [ avatar ] . “Unique, the only one in the world...;” Lin Xuan exclaimed in his heart. It was indeed a great stroke of luck for him to obtain the origin of the mystic realm! However, when he saw the final explanation, he did not know whether to laugh or cry. “Immortal spell? It’s not impossible. After all, who can explain the arrival of global digitization? If global digitization is triggered by a will and an existence with such powerful abilities, it’s not impossible to say that he is an immortal.” Lin Xuan smiled and carefully browsed through the three effects. “Effect 3. Why Do I not understand it?” “What do you mean by switching between the main body and the doppelganger? Could it be that I can directly bring the main body from Xiao Ling Mountain to Wei Ming Country? and Poison Blade’s doppelganger can switch to Xiao Ling Mountain? I’ll test it when I go back.” Lin Xuan was deep in thought. If that was really the case, then the effect would be too strong. When the opponent’s lethal attack landed on the main body, he could directly switch between the main body and the doppelganger and have the doppelganger come and take his place. Wouldn’t that be equivalent to dodging a lethal attack? And he had five such doppelgangers. That was equivalent to having five extra lives! In addition, he had the -LSB- undying overlord ] set on him, so he could also block lethal attacks. “Even a tier 9 warrior can’t Kill Me Now,”Lin Xuan laughed happily, “However, although a tier 9 warrior can’t kill me, they will find out that this is actually the effect of a skill. They will definitely find out about me and Chase me to the ends of the Earth, trying to kill me to get this skill.” “So, if I want to use this skill to save my life, I have to do it when there is no one around.”Lin Xuan smacked his lips and thought of more things. “Now, it’s time to go back.” Lin Xuan controlled poison blade and returned the way he came. His memory was very strong. He quickly found the blood-red door of light in the darkness and immediately returned to the eighth floor of Asura prison through the door of light. Plop. Poison Blade lost 50% of his HP and fell to the ground. “Huh?” Old Ivan was currently Healing Hall, Kodo, Lu Luo, Silver Fox, and the others. When he saw him, he was stunned. “Hey Hey Hey, Old Ivan, don’t be lazy, you...;”Kodo turned around angrily. When he turned around, he also saw poison blade. “F * ck, Kid, you’re Not Dead Yet? !” Hall, Lu Luo, Silver Fox, and the others also turned around. When they saw poison blade standing there unharmed, but his face was a little pale, they were all stunned. Poison Blade took out a large life potion and gulped it down. His face regained some color before he smiled. “Lucky Bastard. He survived.” Lu Luo rushed over and repeatedly confirmed that he was fine. Only then did she let out a long breath. Poison Blade’s expression was strange. “Don’t touch it.” Lu Luo spat inwardly. “Who touched it? It was just to check the wound. Where’s the tier 8 warrior?” “Dead. He lost 50% of his HP when he passed through the blood-red door. He didn’t have much HP to begin with. He died the moment he passed through it. I barely survived,”poison blade laughed, giving the excuse he had prepared. “I see. No Wonder Shinji Yamamoto said that the blood-red door was very dangerous. He didn’t dare to try.”Old Ivan nodded. Poison Blade looked ahead and saw that Shinji Yamamoto was being violently beaten by a white-haired woman. Actually, it couldn’t be said to be a violent beating, because the white-haired woman’s attacks weren’t violent at all. Every attack was direct and straightforward. But Yamamoto Xuanxin could only retreat again and again, unable to resist at all. “Who is that?” Lu Luo revealed an admiring look. “The first chief, Ye Lijiang!” Poison Blade was greatly surprised. In order to save Xiang Qiantu, even ye Lijiang had personally taken action. However, as both were tier 9 martial artists, it seemed that Yamamoto Shensi might be ridiculously weak. Or could it be that ye Lijiang was ridiculously strong? Hall watched the battle between the two of them and clicked his tongue in wonder, “Young man, don’t say that you’re surprised. We’re also very surprised. Chief Ye hasn’t taken action for so many years. Everyone thought that she was busy with matters and had given up on self-improvement. They didn’t expect her to still be so strong.” “Shinji Yamamoto, why did Gaotian plains capture the martial artists of other organizations?” No expression could be seen on ye Lijiang’s face, and his tone was very calm. Shinji Yamamoto clenched his teeth and didn’t say a word. Kacha. The black vortex in ye Lijiang’s palm landed directly on his left arm. His left arm seemed to have been sucked into a meat grinder, being swallowed inch by inch by the Black Vortex. What was even more terrifying was that Yamamoto Xuanxin could not feel any pain. He could only watch as his left arm disappeared bit by bit, as if it had been eaten by something that did not exist. “I don’t know!” Yamamoto xuanxin said angrily, “Let go of me! When chief and the others arrive, you won’t be able to escape either!” Ye lijiang said calmly, “Do you think he’s my match?” After saying that, she threw out four black vortexes and nailed Yamamoto Xuanxin’s four limbs to the wall. Then, she turned around and walked to cell 66, preparing to open the door. Yamamoto Xuanxin was both shocked and angry. Ever since he fought with ye Lijiang more than 20 years ago, he had never fought with him again. In the end, 20 years ago, he was still able to tie with ye Lijiang. But now, he was crushed! How much stronger had this woman become! ! “You can’t open it. That door was painstakingly built by a skyfeather craftsman. It’s even sturdier than a Tier 9 equipment. You can save the others, but you can’t...;” When Yamamoto Shinkai saw ye Lijiang’s actions, he immediately sneered. Ye Lijiang ignored him and threw a black vortex at the prison door. The black vortex slowly spun, and wherever it passed, the door lock would instantly disappear. The prison door slowly opened. Yamamoto Shinkai was dumbfounded. What kind of skill was that, to be so terrifying? The Skyfeather Craftsman claimed that even Sato martial artists who were skilled in strong attacks wouldn’t be able to blast open that prison door in three minutes. However, the black vortex in ye Lijiang’s hand could silently dissolve it. Strong, too strong. What kind of skill was that? Xiang Qianmu quickly rushed out and bowed slightly to ye Lijiang. “Thank you, teacher!” Ye Lijiang did not look much older than her, but she was her teacher and had been teaching her for ten years. “It’s okay, go back quickly.” Ye Lijiang waved his hand and signaled her to enter the gate of light. “Bring them into the gate of light and retreat.” Ye lijiang shouted in a low voice. Poison Blade and Lu Luo, whose wounds had almost healed, immediately stood up and helped the others into the gate of light. Kodo, Hall, and Old Ivan were all sent back to the construction of the city. “Director Ye, you...;” Through Poison Blade’s eyes, Lin Xuan saw that ye Lijiang was still standing in the same spot, not moving at all. He was quite surprised. “It’s been so many years since I’ve taken action. A lot of stupid people think that I’ve abandoned my cultivation,”ye Lijiang said calmly. “Today, I’ll show them what I can do.” Yamamoto Xuanxin’s old face turned red. Stupid people, he was the one who was being scolded. “You should also enter the light gate of the secret realm. I Won’t be able to protect you if there’s a fight later.”Ye Lijiang waved his hand. Poison Blade took a deep look at her back and turned around to enter the light door. His feet once again stepped on the solid and familiar ground. This feeling made him especially happy. Kodo and hall sized up the situation around them and clicked their tongues in wonder. Kodo exclaimed, “This is the construction of the Sixia Jing City. This is my first time here.” Hall nodded. “It’s more prosperous than the capital of our organization.” “Oh? Why are there foreigners?”A strong and tall figure walked over. When he saw the two of them, he was stunned. Old Ivan stared at the tall figure for a while. “You Are...; Gao Qianchi?” Gao Qianchi was stunned. He stared at the old man for a long time and was shocked. “F * ck, teacher? Aren’t you dead?” When he was still a rank 7 warrior, he had traded places with the Arctic Army for a period of time. At that time, old Ivan was his teacher and taught him many things. Old Ivan went up and kicked him. “You’re the F * cking dead.” Gao Qianchi scratched his head. “What’s going on? Didn’t you go to Wei Ming country to save our people? How did you save the Others?” Poison Blade, Lu Luo, and Silver Fox immediately reported the situation in Asura prison to him one by one. Gao Qianchi frowned deeply, “This is big news. I want to immediately inform the Arctic army, the Salvation Society, and the Truth Knights. I didn’t expect that Gao Tianyuan would be so bold to capture so many people and imprison them in prison!” “By the way, where’s sister Ye?”He asked. Xiang Qianyu pointed at the light door. “Chief ye is still there.” Poison blade said, “Chief ye said that he wants to open their eyes.” Gao Qianchi was stunned and nodded. “I understand. It seems that someone is going to be unlucky.” He turned around and left in a hurry. He must have used a special method to contact people from other organizations. Lin Xuan saw it and nodded slightly. Gao Qianchi was not worried at all, which meant that he was very confident in ye Lijiang’s strength. It seemed that the first president did not rely on reputation to become the “First”, but on strength. Kodo found a chair and sat down, gritting his teeth. “We must destroy Gaotian Plateau! It’s even more evil than me!” Hall said,”...; you know that you’re very evil. However, I also agree to destroy the Gao Tian Yuan. You’ve imprisoned me for so many years. It’s simply detestable.” Old Ivan sneered. “With the relationship between your two families and the Gao Tian Yuan, do you think you can destroy the Gao Tian Yuan?” “Also, who will make the plan and execute it if we want to destroy the Gao Tian Yuan? which rank nine warrior is willing to fight with another rank nine warrior with all his strength?” “What if some rank 9 martial artist dies first, and the organization’s high-end combat strength will be greatly weakened, and the other organizations will take advantage of it?” “Don’t forget, there are not only the six major organizations in the world, there are also some medium-sized organizations and small organizations. Are we going to fight to the death and let them reap the benefits?” “If we really fight, it will be a global war. Once we fight, it will never stop.” Kodo and Hall were stunned. Lin Xuan heard their words and fell into deep thought. Of the six major organizations in the world, the construction division was a staunch ally of the Arctic army. The Salvation Society, the Knights of Truth, and Takama-ga-hara were allies. India, on the other hand, was more neutral. Over the past hundred years, it had sometimes leaned toward the Arctic army and sometimes toward the Salvation Society. However, it had been an ally of the Salvation Society for more than a decade now. Just as Old Ivan had said, based on the alliance between the Salvation Society and Takama-ga-hara, it was unlikely that anyone would really destroy the other. Everyone was an organization of this size. Even if you were a little bigger and he was a little smaller, there was no overwhelming difference. If one wanted to destroy the Gaotian plain, the most core method was to kill the level nine martial artist of the Gaotian Plain. Who would kill him? Just like ye Lijiang, the Gaotian Plain’s leader had not shown his true strength for many years. If his strength increased again, an ordinary level nine martial artist would not be his match at all. Even if he died, the leader of Gaotian plains would probably drag one or two level nine warriors down with him. Who would be willing to take the fall? A level nine warrior was equivalent to a nuclear bomb before the global digitization. Things like nuclear bombs were not to be trifled with. “The only way might be...; if a level ten warrior appeared among the existing level nine warriors.” Lin Xuan suddenly had an idea. Once a level 10 warrior appeared, it would have an absolutely overwhelming combat power against a level 9 warrior. It was equivalent to having a weapon that was more powerful and destructive than a nuclear bomb. Then, everyone naturally put down their weapons and spoke amiably. Lin Xuan did not know what happened in the mystic realm of the name of the Reed Kingdom. But he knew that an hour later, ye Lijiang came back safe and sound without even breaking his clothes. .. At the same time, in the secret realm of Wei Ming country. The eight levels of the Asura prison had now become two levels. The remaining parts were all swallowed by the black whirlpool of Ye Li River and disappeared without a trace. The leader stood in the Asura prison that was like a broken wall with a calm expression. The other martial artists had already followed his orders and retreated from the Asura prison. The Asura prison that had become like this actually didn’t matter. Because after midnight, everything in the mystic realm would return to its original state. What he cared about was the fact that Yamamoto Xuanxin was seriously injured. Yamamoto Xuanxin’s four limbs had been completely crippled by the black vortex. Now, he had completely turned into a human rod. In order to completely recover, he needed a large amount of time and a large amount of super life potion. However, the materials for the super life potion weren’t that easy to find. The leader glanced at the Skyfeather Craftsman again. The Skyfeather Craftsman was in a good condition. However, ye Lijiang’s punch had shattered his chest and one of his lungs. He had fainted at the moment. The Skyfeather Craftsman would need much less time and potions to fully recover than Yamamoto Xuanxin. Yamamoto Xuanxin smiled bitterly. “Leader, that woman is too strong. She’s much stronger than twenty years ago.” The leader looked at him and nodded. “I know.” Yamamoto Xuanxin was a little scared by his gaze. He quickly said, “However, leader is also much stronger than twenty years ago. If you hadn’t come, I’m afraid I would have died.” The leader nodded and said the same thing. “I know.” Yamamoto xuanxin laughed dryly. “Leader, I’m afraid I Won’t be able to display much of my combat strength in the next few years. I’m sorry.” The Shura Prison was dead silent. “Xuanxin, your current state is actually somewhat useful,”the leader suddenly said without any reason. “You don’t have to apologize to me.” Yamamoto Xuanxin was stunned. He didn’t understand what the leader was saying. The leader suddenly approached and placed his right hand on his shoulder. Then, he gently stroked his cheek and finally landed on his skull. “Between rank nine warriors of different organizations, it is forbidden to fight to the death. However, ye Lijiang still cruelly killed you on the premise that you surrender.” “I will throw this matter out. Your death will ignite the hatred in the heart of the Takama-ga-hara warriors. Xuanxin, leave in peace.” Yamamoto Xuanxin’s face instantly turned pale. “Leader, I...;” Crack. The leader’s five fingers crushed his skull. The most essential blood in his heart suddenly flowed backward and entered his body through the leader’s five fingers. “The most essential blood in the body of a level nine warrior is indeed delicious.”The leader let out a long sigh. His tone was full of satisfaction and satisfaction. “Oh? Sato warrior brought Ghost Shadow into the arcane realm? That’s good too. If I kill another level nine warrior, I should be able to reach level nine. Then, I’ll be on the same level as ye Lijiang.” The leader suddenly let out a soft gasp and revealed a playful smile. In less than half an hour, the scream of the Sato martial artist could be heard from outside. “Leader! The capital city is safe and sound. The Ghost Shadow Group didn’t dare to attack the capital.” “I heard some martial artists who left the secret realm say that there was a big movement in the asura prison. I was so anxious that I rushed in. What exactly happened? The Asura prison actually became like this?” The Sato martial artist jumped down from the entrance of the Asura prison that was dozens of meters high. He landed safely on the ground and came to the leader’s side. “Ye Lijiang is much more powerful than twenty years ago. I observed with my [ Spirit Eye ] that she is already at level nine.” “The craftsman was punched through the chest by her. Xuan Xin surrendered, but he was still killed by her.”The leader pointed at the two of them and sighed softly. The Sato martial artist was shocked when he saw the tragic death of Shinji Yamamoto. He went forward to check the wound on Shinji Yamamoto’s head. A trace of fear flashed across his face, but it was quickly covered up. These tier 9 martial artists were almost all old acquaintances. They knew the skills and character of their opponents very well. He knew very well what kind of person ye Lijiang was. Back then, he admired ye Lijiang’s strength and beauty, and madly pursued her. Ye Lijiang’s response was a punch. He was sent flying over 100 meters. But the Sato martial artists knew what kind of person ye Lijiang was. Surrender and don’t kill. The leader claimed that Yamamoto Xuanxin surrendered, but was cruelly killed by ye Lijiang. This was not in line with ye Lijiang’s personality. Then, who killed Yamamoto Xuanxin? Sato martial artist stood up straight with a sorrowful look on his face. “Ye Lijiang...; Damn ye Lijiang!” While wiping his tears, he glanced at a black shadow that was hard to detect in the ruins dozens of meters behind the leader. It was Ghost Shadow, a powerful assassin. Now, there were only the three of them in Asura prison, and the Skyfeather Craftsman was still unconscious. This distance and this scene was the best chance to kill the leader! He couldn’t wait any longer! As a person who relied on killing the old leader to rise in power, the leader was naturally more wary of the tier 9 martial artists around him. The Sato martial artist knew that the leader had long noticed him. If he didn’t move now, then when would it be! The Sato martial artist walked towards the chief and said sorrowfully, “Chief, we must avenge Xuanxin!” The chief’s eyes also reddened slightly as he held his hands. “Yes, Revenge!” “Revenge...; Attack!” The Sato martial artist suddenly exerted strength in his arms, which in turn clamped tightly onto the chief’s hands. Frost spread crazily on both of his arms, and in the blink of an eye, it reached the leader’s arms. Because of this, both of their arms were completely frozen by the Frost! Patter, Patter. The Ghost Shadow walked out from the broken walls and walked towards the leader’s back step by step. The leader was both shocked and angry. “Martial artist, you!” The Sato martial artist let out a long breath. This way, it should be stable. “Leader, even if I don’t make a move, you will kill me first. In order not to be killed by you, I can only make a move first. I’m sorry,”the Sato martial artist said in a deep voice. The leader suddenly asked, “Did you mean for your daughter to join the Ghost Shadow Group?” The Sato martial artist was stunned. In the next moment, the ghost shadow appeared behind the Sato martial artist in the blink of an eye. The first slash went through his throat. The second slash went through his brain. The third slash went through his brain and stirred it violently. The hard skull of a human was as fragile as tofu in front of this black dagger. However, due to his physical condition, the Sato warrior did not die instantly. He made a gurgling sound, but he could not speak and could only bleed. Ghost Shadow’s face, which had always been covered by a black veil, stretched out. That face was exactly the same as the leader’s face. Ghost shadow said, “I am Ghost Shadow, Ghost Shadow is me.” The leader said, “All your plans have been carried out under my nose.” Crack. The leader exerted strength in his arms and easily broke the frost. The five fingers of his right hand pierced directly into the Sato martial artist’s heart, quickly absorbing the most essential blood in the martial artist’s body. In the blink of an eye, the blood in his heart was completely absorbed. With a plop, the Sato warrior’s tall and robust body fell to the ground. His HP was completely emptied. “Although two tier 9 warriors died, I’ve advanced to Tier 9. I’m not considered weak.” The leader smiled faintly. With a gentle wave of his hand, he chopped off one of Ghost Shadow’s arms. Then, he carried the Sky Feather Craftsman and chased Ghost Shadow out of the Shura Prison. Every takama-ga-hara martial artist saw that the leader was brazenly chasing after a rank nine martial artist dressed in black. The leader roared into the sky from the sky above the reed-named nation. “Ghost Shadow, you actually colluded with the Sato martial artist to assassinate me. Today, I will definitely kill you!” Then, he slapped out a palm that filled the sky with blood shadows. He actually slammed Ghost Shadow into the ground with one palm, creating a huge pit. Boom! At that moment, it was as if a cannonball had exploded. The depth was over ten meters. When the warriors of the Gaotian Plains looked over again, they shockingly discovered that the Ghost Shadow’s entire body had already been split into pieces. His flesh and blood were a mess. He lay at the bottom of the crater, not moving at all. The Warriors were incomparably shocked. They were all tier 9 warriors, but their leader had killed the Ghost Shadow with one palm strike! As expected, our Gaotian Plains’leader was extremely tyrannical! How could the tier 9 warriors of other organizations compare! ! A few hours later, three shocking news swept through the six major organizations like a hurricane! During the past ten years, Gaotian Plains had continuously captured blood demon Kodo, Light Knight Hall, Ice Bear Ivan, and Thunder Spear Xiang shallow view, and other veteran tier 8 warriors. They were imprisoned in the Shura Prison of the Wei Ming country, never to see the light of day! The construction department’s first chief, Ye Lijiang, had charged into the asura prison to save people. He had fought fiercely against Gao Tianyuan’s leader, Sky Feather Craftsman, and Yamamoto Xuanxin. He had killed Yamamoto Xuanxin and escaped unscathed. Gao Tianyuan’s Sato warriors had joined forces with the rebel group, Phantom. They had taken advantage of the situation to assassinate their leader and use force to rise to power. However, they had been killed by their leader, especially Phantom. He had been killed by their leader with a single palm strike! The moment the news came out, the entire world was shocked! The incident of Takama-ga-hara secretly capturing rank 8 warriors from various organizations caused a huge uproar. This was because Kodo, Hall, and Xiang Shensi were all first-class experts in their organizations without exception. They only needed ten years at most to leap from rank 8 to rank 9. This way, the high-end combat strength of their organizations would soar, and their international voice would naturally be much greater. The reason why the Salvation Society was the strongest and had the most allies was because it had many level nine warriors! There were more than ten of them! However, these people had all disappeared unexpectedly a few years ago. The Truth Knights, the Arctic Army, and the Salvation Society had all searched for their traces, but they could not find any clues. Even if they were eventually connected to the Takama-ga-hara, they had no choice but to give up because there was no conclusive evidence. In the eyes of many people, they were already dead. Therefore, when the blood demon Kodo and the Light Knight Hall appeared under the Sun once again, the people from the major organizations could no longer keep their cool. Takama-ga-hara, are you F * cking shameless to do such a thing in secret? ! Takama-ga-hara’s reputation in the major organizations suddenly dropped to zero. Originally, Gao Tianyuan had many small and medium-sized organizations that were affiliated to it. There were also many small and medium-sized organizations that were fighting to sign a subservient relationship with Gao Tianyuan and hand over various resources in exchange for Gao Tianyuan’s protection. However, when this matter was exposed, these small and medium-sized organizations that were fighting to be first suddenly disappeared without a trace. What the hell was Gao Tianyuan? He wasn’t familiar with it. As for the second matter, it caused many rank 9 martial artists who looked down on ye Lijiang to once again pay attention to this first chief of the construction department who lived in seclusion. Ye Lijiang fought alone against the three rank 9 martial artists of Gao Tianyuan, Yamamoto xuanxin, and sky feather craftsman, but he was able to kill Yamamoto Xuanxin in a one-on-three battle. What kind of terrifying battle strength was this? Ye Lijiang, the first chief of the construction department, had not made a move for more than 20 years, but his first move was this thunderous? ! Of course, the Skyfeather Craftsman was a research-type martial artist. His direct combat strength could not be said to be invincible, but at least it could be said to be extremely weak. However, even if the Skyfeather Craftsman was ignored, ye Lijiang could still be considered to have killed one person in a one-on-two battle. Such a battle record was also extremely strong among tier 9 martial artists. The third matter made the people from the other organizations even more curious. They were also slightly shocked. After ye Lijiang left, the Sato martial artists thought that they had seized the opportunity. They joined forces with Gui Ying, who had already sneaked into Wei Ming country, to attack the Takama Plains’leader. In the end, the Sato martial artists were killed, and Gui Ying was smashed into minced meat by the Takama Plains’leader in front of everyone’s eyes! This meant that the takama-ga-hara leader had killed two people in a one-on-two fight! This kind of battle record did not seem to lose to ye Lijiang. Of course, the battle between Tier 9 martial artists attracted the attention of countless martial artists. They did not neglect the details. Poison Blade, Lu Luo, and Silver Fox, the three construction department agents, disguised themselves and sneaked into the Takama-ga-hara. Step by step, they approached the Shura Prison, and finally found the place where Xiang Shizu was imprisoned. The wisdom and courage in it were shocking! If they hadn’t found the anchor point and allowed ye Lijiang to use the key of the Sun to open the light gate to arrive at the Wei Ming country, none of that would have happened! On the global rank 7 list, Poison Blade, Lu Luo, and Silver Fox’s rankings rose rapidly. Lu Luo and Silver Fox both rushed into the top 1,000. Poison blade was even more exaggerated. He directly rushed from 91st to 40th place! Everything that happened in Wei Ming country spread like wildfire among the major organizations and became a hot topic among countless warriors. However, this matter also troubled Lin Xuan. For example, there was a guy from the Arctic army who ran to poison Blade’s residence every two to three days. He often knocked on the door in the middle of the night and clamored for a fight with poison blade. Outside the secret realm of Little Spirit Mountain, in the dormitory area of the construction department in Spirit Mountain City. “I’ve already challenged the shield ghost. No one can tell the winner from the fight, but I think I’m still slightly better than him!” “Poison Blade, you’ve made such a great contribution to the construction department. You must be very strong. Come out and fight!” “Poison Blade, are you a man? Why do you act like a coward all day long!” “Poisonous blade...;” Nielko sat outside poisonous blade’s residence. He was cursing while drinking red star Erguotou. Lin Xuan felt helpless. What was there to fight about. Young people did not know how precious their bodies were. The white-haired man regretted his late recovery. What was the point of fighting and killing. At this time, Xiang Tianxiu also came to poisonous blade’s residence. “What are you doing here? I don’t fight with mages.”Nielko snorted. “Mages are all sissies. It’s meaningless.” Xiang Tianxiu snorted. “You don’t understand the fun of being a mage at all.” After saying that, he waved his hand. “I’m not here to fight with you. I’m here to tell you how to ask Poison Blade out for a fight.” Nielko was suddenly energized. “How?” “It’s like chasing a girl. If you don’t bring out something beautiful, how can a girl be tempted?”Xiang Tianxiu said earnestly. “In the same way, you have to bring out something valuable to ask for a fight.” “That makes sense.” Nielko dug in the storage compartment and took out a huge heart. “Poison Blade! I have a huge tiger heart! I was going to forge equipment, but now I’m using it to invite you to fight. As long as you agree to fight, I’ll give you the huge Tiger Heart!” Nielko roared. Bang! The door was kicked open. Poison Blade Strode out. “Where do you want to fight?” Nielko beamed, “Let’s go, Let’s go, let’s go to the nearest arena.” “You Bastard, you’re finally out.”Xiang Tianxiu let out a long breath. Poison blade laughed, “You want to fight me too?” Xiang tianxiu shook his head, “No, I only fight mages. In My Heart, my best opponent is flame burst, but that guy...; you know, I can’t bring out what he needs anymore, so he has been refusing to fight me.” After that, Xiang Tianxiu said, “Actually, I just want to talk to you.” “What?” Xiang Tianxiu looked at him deeply, took a few steps back, and then bowed deeply. A ninety-degree bow! “Thank you, undercover agent Gao Tianyuan. Without You, my mother wouldn’t know how long she would be imprisoned there.” Xiang Tianxiu’s tone was sincere, completely unlike his usual arrogant manner. Poison Blade smiled. Nielko, who was standing next to him, also smiled. “It’s just a mission.”Poison Blade smiled. “Let’s go to the arena! I want to see what kind of strength poison blade, who went deep into the tiger’s Den, has!”Xiang Tianxiu straightened his body and returned to his usual expression as he laughed. In the residence next to them, Ye Yuqiu, Lu Luo, black, Silver Fox, and the others also saw broken wood and pushed the door open. Lin Xuan also pretended not to know and walked out. “Eh, they are going to the arena?”Lu Luo asked in confusion. “Isn’t that poison blade? Who’s the other one?”Silver Fox had just returned and didn’t know Nielke. “That’s the warrior of the Arctic army, Nielke.”Ye Yuqiu laughed. “That Guy Nielke has been staying here for a long time. Today he challenges this one, and tomorrow he challenges that one. No one can beat him except for the shield demon. Today he is going to fight with poison blade. Interesting.”Black laughed. “Let’s go and have a look.” After Lin Xuan and the others, Lin Xuan’s clones followed one after another. There were also a large number of construction department warriors who were quite curious about the result of the battle. Lingshan city’s martial arts arena. There were many warriors fighting here every day. The construction department encouraged the conscience competition among the warriors, and they even specially set up a reward for this. If you won one round, you would receive 10 battle merits. If you won three rounds in a row, you would receive 50 battle merits. If you won five rounds in a row, you would receive 100 battle merits. If you won ten rounds in a row, you would receive 500 battle merits. If you accumulated a lot of battle merits, you could exchange them for various materials in the construction department. Moreover, there was a small competition every three days and a big competition every five days. There was a monthly competition every month and an annual competition every year. The rewards of the monthly competition and the annual competition were very powerful. In addition to obtaining a large number of battle achievements for the top ten, there were also additional rewards. These rewards were something that many martial artists could not refuse. Poison Blade and Nielko came here. The martial arts arena was bustling with noise and excitement. The air was filled with the hormones produced by the battle. The Smell of sweat, alcohol, and farts accumulated and fermented here. It was quite refreshing. In fact, the martial arts arena was like this every day. There was no time to rest. This was the heaven of warriors and the Paradise of warriors. Lin Xuan’s real body had never left the construction department. He often traveled between the mystical realm of Xiaoling Mountain and Lingshan city outside. He was already used to all of this. “Unfortunately, the monthly competition just ended a few days ago. Otherwise, the two of you would definitely be in the top two.”Xiang Tianxiu smiled. “It doesn’t matter. I’m just sparring with Poison Blade.”Nielko waved his hand. “Let’s go to that arena.”Nielko pointed at the largest arena. “They’re going to the largest arena. Nielko is really scheming to make things big. Hahaha.”Black laughed loudly. Silver Fox scratched his head. “I remember that every time they go to the large-scale arena, they have to pay 100 battle merits. Usually, only people who are very confident in themselves would dare to go up.” Black nodded, “That’s right. Small-scale arenas do not need to pay battle merit points. Medium-scale arenas need to pay 10 battle merit points, while large-scale arenas cost 100 battle merit points. However, the bigger the arena is, the more people will watch it. In fact, it is very useful to increase your reputation.” “For example, back when you were training in Little Spirit Mountain, didn’t you come to the arena to play when you had nothing to do? You were clearly a mage and yet you insisted on fighting close to me. Every time you lost to me, you lost again and again. You even won yourself the title of a cockroach. You have a lot of fighting spirit.” Silver Fox’s old face turned red. “Let’s not talk about this. It’s a little shameful.” At this moment, the two fighters on the large-scale martial arts stage had already decided the winner. Immediately, a pair of fighters prepared to take the stage. Nielko shouted, “Brother, we’re in a hurry. Can you let us go first?” One of the fighters said coldly, “Why? Just because you’re from the Arctic Army? I Won’t let you go.” The other one looked at poison blade and said in surprise, “You are poison blade? Nielko wants to fight with you?” Poison blade nodded. “Let us go. We also want to know who is more powerful among you.”The two fighters immediately stepped aside. Nielko and Poison Blade went on the stage in the blink of an eye. “We have agreed that I will fight with you. Give me the heart of the Giant Tiger.”Poison blade stretched out his hand. “Sure, of course I’ll give it to you.”Nierko immediately took out the heart of the Giant Tiger from the storage compartment and handed it over. Poison blade nodded and put it into the space of consciousness. Below the stage, Lin Xuan was delighted. The heart of the Giant Dragon, the heart of the giant lion, and the heart of the Giant Tiger were all gathered. The dark gold skill [ emperor engine ] could be synthesized immediately. Lin Xuan casually threw it into the synthesis stage. He only needed to wait for an hour to see the new dark gold skill. The referee was a middle-aged woman in her forties, a Tier 8 fighter. She looked at both sides and said seriously, “The competition is not a life and death battle. Do you understand?” Nielko and poison blade both nodded. “Please tell each other your class type,”the referee said loudly. Nielko said, “Warrior class.” Poison blade said, “Assassin class.” “Okay. According to the rules, when a warrior class and an assassin class fight, the two sides need to keep thirty meters apart.”The referee nodded. In a fair fight, the four classes naturally needed to keep different distances apart. After all, a mage class had a long attack range, but their close combat ability was very weak. If they were only ten meters away from an assassin, then they would almost certainly lose. But if they were more than a hundred meters away from the beginning, then they could use their own variety of skills to attack an assassin. The same was true for an armor warrior. This type of fighter’s attack range was very short, and long-range skills were almost non-existent. If they were to open up a distance of dozens of meters from the beginning, there would be no fighting at all. Both sides concentrated and prepared themselves. Both of them were like arrows that had left the bow, as if they were about to rush out at the next moment. Right at this moment, it was as if there was a muffled and huge rumble in the world. It was as if something had pierced through the earth’s crust and drilled out from underground without any warning. However, this feeling was rather weak, disappearing without a trace in an instant. Moreover, those warriors below tier 7 didn’t even feel it. But Nielko, Poison Blade, and the others were all stunned. “What’s the situation...;”Nielko scratched his head. The referee also frowned. “The match is suspended. I want to see what happened.” The referee left in a hurry. Not long after, the sound of a broadcast was heard in the sky above Lingshan City. “Please come to the office of the director of Lingshan City’s construction department for those who are tier 7 and above!” “I repeat, please come to the office of the Director of the construction department of Lingshan City...;” Lin Xuan was stunned. Warriors at level seven and above were the backbone and elite fighters of an organization. They were all gathered together all of a sudden. Did something big happen. Lin Xuan immediately thought of the war between the six major organizations. However, as soon as he thought of this idea, he immediately threw it out of his mind. “That’s impossible. Unless the top brass of the six major organizations are crazy, it’s impossible for them to start an all-out war.” This logic was already well-known by now. Before a major organization could ensure that they were unharmed and destroy another major organization, it was absolutely impossible for them to start an all-out war. Nielko cursed, “F * ck, we can’t fight anymore!” After saying that, he scratched his head and raised his hand. “I have a question. Do I have to go too?” “You’ve been freeloading in the construction department for so long. What do you think?”Black laughed in the audience. Nielko said,”...; that’s true.” In front of the Lingshan City Construction Department’s Director’s office. Over a thousand construction department agents had gathered here. There were quite a number of tier 7 martial artists. However, not many of them had truly obtained the status of an officer of the construction department. This was because the officers of the construction department had to ensure both strength and loyalty. Not just anyone could enter. The director of the construction department of Lingshan City was the person-in-charge of the first gathering place of Little Lingshan City. He held both positions simultaneously. “Everyone, we have just received news that the secret realm of the Truth Knight’s Dragon Mountain Range has undergone a major change.” “The light gate of the secret realm has suddenly expanded. The underground mountain range of the dragon mountain range has bulged, and a new terrain has appeared. There are many new monsters in the new terrain, and they are all very powerful.” This director’s expression was solemn. “The bulging of the underground mountain range has caused many monsters to panic, flooding out of the light gate of the secret realm, and poisoning a large number of low-level warriors.” “In the first hour of the secret realm’s promotion, at least 100,000 low-level warriors have died.” “The Knights of truth were busy putting out the fire, while the level nine warriors went underground to fight the level nine monsters in the new terrain. They urgently need the help of other organizations, including level seven, level eight, and level nine warriors.” Lin Xuan was shocked after hearing that. He was not the only one. The other warriors were also shocked. A few months ago, the Luolei Mountain had been upgraded from level six to level seven. It had become one of the super large secret realms and helped the construction department obtain a lot of new resources. Not long ago, in the arcane realm of Little Spirit Mountain, ghosts had rebelled, and a sewn-up ghost with intelligence had appeared. A few days ago, the light gate of the Wei Ming country’s arcane realm had suddenly closed, and a rainbow light pillar had appeared without warning. After that, the light gate of the arcane realm had suddenly opened again, and this matter had yet to be investigated. Now, there was also a problem with the dragon mountain range! This world was too crazy. “Dragon mountain range...; most of the monsters in that place are related to dragons. Dragon Beasts, flying dragons, and giant dragons, their strength increased in turn. Their combat strength has already surpassed other monsters of the same level. They are quite fierce. Now, such a thing actually happened. TSK TSK TSK,”Nielko muttered. “Everyone has three hours to prepare. We will immediately transport you to the territory of the truth knights through a large-scale transport plane,”the director said in a deep voice, “The appearance of the monsters in the Dragon Mountain Range will only harm the Knights of truth in the beginning. However, if a tier 9 warrior can not control the situation, the situation will deteriorate. In the end, it will not only harm the Knights of truth, but the whole world.” The director paused and continued, “Just like drowning the city.” “Yes!” The staff of the construction department responded seriously. Lin Xuan immediately returned to his residence. He quickly packed up his things. Food, water, and all kinds of potions had been neatly arranged in the space of consciousness. With his current storage capacity, he could live a good life even if he were to live alone in the dragon mountain range for more than a year. “I didn’t expect that I would have to rush to the next place not long after returning from the Takama-ga-hara. The dragon mountain range...; I’ve really never been there before. I’m looking forward to it.” Lin Xuan smiled. An hour later, the synthesis platform was completed. A skill book with a dark golden glow appeared before his eyes. —— Name: Emperor engine Level: Tier 7, Level 1 Quality: dark gold legendary Effect 1: health points increased by 200% . Effect 2: Mana points increased by 90% . Effect 3: health recovery speed increased by 150% . Effect 4: movement speed increased by 50% . Effect 5: health recovery speed increased by 100% for 10 seconds after injury. Cooldown: 20 seconds. —— After seeing all the effects, Lin Xuan did not hesitate to learn on the spot. “Awesome!” “As expected of the Emperor engine.” Lin Xuan clicked his tongue in wonder. The emperor engine was often used to describe the sound made by ferocious beasts like lions, tigers, bears, and leopards when they roared. It was also used to describe the sound made by the thumping hearts of some super experts. The materials needed to synthesize the emperor engine were also related to ferocious beasts. In fact, Lin Xuan had already guessed the general effect of the Emperor engine, but he did not expect it to be so powerful. Three hours passed in the blink of an eye. When Lin Xuan walked out of his residence again, a large transport plane had already appeared in the empty space of Lingshan City. This large transport plane was a military instrument before the global digitization. After adding the genius idea of Wanyou Jie, it was redesigned. It consumed less energy, flew faster, carried more weight, and had a longer cruising range. It could be said that no matter how you looked at it, it far surpassed those military machines from a hundred years ago. “Each time, it can carry 300 people. Agents whose names are called please board the plane.” A round-faced little girl stood at the boarding gate and read the name list aloud. “Ye Yuqiu, Xiang Tianxiu, Poison Blade, shield demon, Lu Luo, hei, Bai Xinghe...; Lin Xuan...;” Lin Xuan nodded slightly. Each trip could only carry 300 people. The first ones to be transported were naturally the most powerful fighters. Lin Xuan, his clones, Ye Yuqiu, Xiang Tianxiu, and other fighters would naturally be the first to board the plane. Lin Xuan randomly found a place to sit down and was a little surprised. This seat was quite comfortable. When Wan youxi designed the transport plane, it seemed that he had taken care of the passengers’comfort. Lin Xuan glanced at it and was delighted. There was an old acquaintance in the cabin. Li Weiguo, a level 8 warrior. It seemed that Li Weiguo was the person-in-charge who led them to the Knights of truth. “Everyone, this is the detailed information of the Knights of Truth and the Giant Dragon mountain range. Please browse through it as soon as possible in case you need it.” “Other organizations will also send people for this operation. India and Gaotian Plains might target us in this operation, so we have also gathered the list of elite level 7 warriors from these two organizations and relevant information.” After Li Weiguo said this, two construction department agents immediately took a thick stack of information from his hands and distributed it to the fighters sitting on both sides of the transport plane. Lin Xuan also took a stack of information. As soon as he got it, he immediately began to flip through it. The original body plus five doppelgangers, six people memorized it together, much faster than one person. Others were still reading it carefully, but he had already finished reading it all and memorized it by heart. Ye Yuqiu was sitting opposite him. Seeing him like this, she was stunned. “You...; This is a quantum speed reading method?” Lin Xuan couldn’t help but laugh, “No, I’m just born with the ability to read faster than others.” Li Weiguo also noticed him and snorted, “This is the information that the organization spent a lot of effort to get. Don’t waste it.” “I’ve really finished reading it.”Lin Xuan was helpless. Li Weiguo nodded, “Then I’ll ask you, what is the position system of the Knights of Truth?” Lin Xuan opened his mouth. “The current Pope of the Knights of truth is the third pope, Saint Gregory.” “Below the pope, there are two parts of the College of Cardinals and the Knights. The leader of the College of Cardinals is the Cardinal Archbishop, and the leader of the Knights is the grand leader.” “From top to bottom, the cardinals are the archbishops, the Cardinals, the bishops, the priests, the priests, and the believers.” “From top to bottom, the Knights are the Grand Commander, the Deputy Commander, the Grand Knights, the Knights, and the Knights.” Lin Xuan did not pause at all when he said this. On the contrary, he was clear and concise. Li Weiguo was stunned and immediately looked at Lin Xuan. “Not bad, not bad. Then tell me, what are the elites of the current level 7 warriors of the Knights of Truth?” Lin Xuan nodded, “Among the elites of the level 7 warriors, the strongest is Bruno. He was first discovered by a grand knight, then taught by the Grand Commander and the Cardinal Archbishop. Finally, he became the holy son appointed by the Pope. His occupation is unknown, his skills are unknown, and his battle record is unknown.” “Below Bruno, there is Roger, the occupation [ Messenger of truth ] , the grandson of the Cardinal Archbishop, who is the Cardinal Bishop. His signature skills are [ judgement of Truth ] , -LHolyhLightiBurningnEyeseyes ] , and [ holy light healing ] .” “Bernie, [ Dragon Knight ] , as the Grand Knight. His signature skill is [ radiant armor ] , and he has a Radiant Wyvern. His latest battle record is that he single-handedly took on a 7th rank 9th Rank Fire Wyvern. He sustained minor injuries and killed him.” Li Weiguo was speechless, and he coughed lightly, “Looks like you’ve really seen through it.” Silver Fox exclaimed, “Good fellow, if you were born before the digitization of the world, wouldn’t your reading ability be like a god of learning?” Lin Xuan smiled. “Did everyone see that? You have to remember these materials in your heart! They are useful,”Li Weiguo said in a clear voice. “Yes!”All the agents responded in a thunderous voice. While the construction division’s large-scale transport plane was transporting rank 7 martial artists, the major organizations all over the world also displayed their supernatural powers and used their own transport methods to transport the martial artists to the Knights of Truth. Rank 7, rank 8, and rank 9 martial artists each had their own duties. Above the ocean, a medium-sized transport plane whizzed past. The fuselage of the plane had the symbol of a two-headed eagle. This was the symbol of the Salvation Society. There weren’t many people in the cabin, only a dozen or so people. But the three people in the middle were the most eye-catching. Their bodies all emitted a powerful aura. That kind of Aura was present on the bodies of Ye Lijiang, the Takama-ga-hara leader, and the Sato martial artists. They were level nine martial artists. Among the three people, the first one was a strong bald man. The second one was a fat bearded man. The third one was a beautiful woman with a voluptuous body. At this moment, she was lazily stretching her body, showing her voluptuous curves in front of others. The bald man crossed his legs and grabbed a communication device to discuss business with the person on the other side of the communication device. “Ying, in exchange for this transaction, I need your warriors to cooperate with the martial artists of the Salvation Army and hunt down the martial artists of the construction department in the Dragon Mountain Range.” “Seventh and eighth rank, we have to kill them all.” “If we find a suitable opportunity to directly kill a ninth rank martial artist, we have to take action.” The bald man smiled and said. The voice of the leader of the Gaotian Plains came from the communication device, “Of course, the construction department is my mortal enemy. I will cooperate with the people of the Salvation Army.” “Ness, Ying, you know, I like your straightforward character.”The bald man laughed. “So, what about the promise of The Salvation Society?”The leader said calmly. The bald man snapped his fingers. “Regarding the recent events in the Takama-ga-hara, the martial artists of the Salvation Society will not express any opinions.” “Okay.” “Then, Goodbye.”The bald man smiled. “Goodbye, Jack.”The leader hung up the communication. Shadow was the code name of the Takama-ga-hara leader to the public. As for his real name, no one remembered it. The gorgeous woman lit up a slender electronic cigarette and blew out a fragrant smell, “Jack, are we really going to join forces with the Takama-ga-hara to attack the construction division?”? “I’m not afraid of them, but I’m worried that this might cause a strong backlash from the construction division. Moreover, you know that the reputation of the takama-ga-hara right now...; is too bad.” Jack smiled, “The construction division now has three Super Mystic Realms in their hands, and now there are tier 7 warriors with full potential like shield ghost and poison blade. In another ten to twenty years, they will grow into tier 9 warriors, and our two Tier 9 brothers in our organization will die of old age in a year.” “As for joining forces with the Gaotian plain, that’s nothing. As long as we’re strong enough, we can say that the dark ones are white, and the bad ones can be said to be good. The power of words lies with us.” The gorgeous woman nodded. The bearded man spoke, “Their situation...; is already very serious?” Jack sighed, “You two have been guarding the border all year round, but you don’t understand. I’ve been in the headquarters all this time, so I know best. The bodies and minds of those two brothers have been eroded too much. The Angel Fortress is different from its name. It’s not a good place.” The gorgeous girl and the bearded man paused and didn’t say anything else. There seemed to be something else hidden in their eyes. “For the future of the Salvation Society, for the evolution of all mankind, firmly believing in our path, the Salvation Society is the most correct.”Jack looked at the gorgeous girl and the bearded man and said in a deep voice. Both of them nodded slightly. “Oh right, that old thing, the Cardinal, sent me some interesting information.”The gorgeous girl suddenly remembered something and took out a photo from her deep chest. “Ah...; I took the wrong one. It’s not this one.”She stuffed the photo back and took out six photos. Finally, she found the one she needed. The Bald Man and the bearded man’s face twitched. So your place is a storage space. A photo was placed in front of the three of them. The content of the photo was also very simple: in the dark underground cave, there was a seven-colored light flashing, and the shape of a dragon could be vaguely seen. “That old thing said that it seemed to be a very scary young seven-colored dragon. Its body emitted an irresistible aura, and people couldn’t help but want to skin it, pull its tendons, and eat it alive,”the gorgeous girl said faintly, “However, those level 9 truth knights had just approached it within a kilometer when they were discovered by it. They ran away in advance, and then they never found any trace of it again.” The bald warrior exclaimed, “Seven colors...; it reminds me of the intelligence from the informant of the Highland Plains. Not long ago, a seven-colored light beam appeared there, but it disappeared mysteriously. Ying said that he had searched for it, but he didn’t find anything.” The bearded warrior sneered, “His words are 70% true and 30% false. Don’t believe him. He said that he didn’t find it, so it’s possible that he has already found it. The thing in the seven-colored light beam might be of great value. He just doesn’t want to take it out.” The Bald Man and the lady nodded. “No matter what, that Rainbow Dragon is very likely to be of great use. If we encounter it, don’t hold back and snatch it immediately!”The gorgeous lady stretched out her hand and grabbed the air, as if she had already grabbed the rainbow dragon in her palm. The bald man grinned, “No matter who it is, it won’t work if they want to snatch the Rainbow Dragon from us.” The bearded man gave a strange smile. “What if the truth knights and Takama-ga-hara also want to fight for it?” “Then let’s fight them together,”the Bald Man and the girl said at the same time. .. The Truth Knights, Dragon City. This city was built outside the gate of light of the secret realm in the dragon mountain range. It relied on the gate of light of the secret realm. This city, which had only a hundred years of history, was extremely prosperous. It even surpassed the capital of the Truth Knights, the city of Truth, which was appointed by the Pope. However, at this moment, this prosperous city was drowned in chaos, flames, and death. After about eight hours of flying, a large transport plane from the construction department had already arrived above the dragon city. All the construction department staff saw the tragic scene on the ground. It could be said to be a tragedy in the human world. Houses collapsed, corpses were everywhere, and blood was everywhere. The huge dragon beasts were dashing left and right on the ground, wantonly destroying buildings and chasing after humans. In the sky, flying dragons and giant dragons were roaming freely, spewing out four types of elemental breath, attacking everything in their sight. And this was more than eight hours after the abnormal movement in the dragon mountain range. It was hard to imagine how terrible the Dragon City was when the dragon mountain range had just been in chaos and a large number of monsters surged out of the light gate. It would probably be a hell on Earth. “It’s too scary...; fortunately, this didn’t happen in the secret realms we control.”Silver Fox looked at the ruined dragon city through the window and sighed. Ye Yuqiu, Xiang Tianxiu, and the others also saw this scene. Everyone’s thoughts were heavy. “According to the information, it has been more than twenty years since there was an explosion of monsters that rushed out of the gate of Light.”Lu Luo sighed. Ye Yuqiu nodded, “Although the monsters in the dragon mountain range are strong individually, there aren’t many pure-blooded dragons at the top of the food chain. It’s strange that dragons are lustful. They can mate with all kinds of monsters and reproduce, but it’s difficult for them to mate with the opposite sex.” At the end, she showed a hint of interest. Lu Luo,”...; you seem to be very knowledgeable in this area.” Ye Yuqiu smiled, “We Chinese always have a different interest in dragons. Even though the Dragons in the dragon mountain range are like giant lizards with wings, they’re not bad. We can study them.” Bai Xinghe asked curiously, “Then do you know why the Dragon Mountain Range is safer than other super large secret realms? The information doesn’t mention it. It’s just a passing mention.” Ye Yuqiu nodded slightly, “Dragons mate with monsters to breed. Most of the time, they only give birth to dragon beasts that don’t have much intelligence. For example, earth dragons are a type of dragon beast. “The strength of dragon beasts varies. The Weakest Dragon Beast is only at level one. The Strongest Dragon Beast may also be at level nine, but no matter how strong or weak they are, they have a fatal weakness — they are very afraid of higher-level bloodlines.” Lin Xuan thought for a moment, “So they are afraid of flying dragons and giant dragons?” “Yes!” Ye Yuqiu praised, “Once a flying dragon or giant dragon approaches, they will run away with their tails between their legs. Therefore, the truth knights will nurture flying dragons and giant dragons from a young age. At the very least, they will equip their core members with a flying dragon. In this way, the Dragon Beasts will not be able to threaten them. This applies to most situations.” Lin Xuan was startled. “In other words, in some cases, it won’t Work?” “Yes, because the intelligence of dragon beasts isn’t necessarily very low. Sometimes, by chance, Dragon Beasts with very high intelligence will be born. They are no different from flying dragons and giant dragons. Even if they are suppressed by their bloodlines, they aren’t afraid of flying dragons and giant dragons.”Ye Yuqiu nodded. Li Weiguo smiled. “So, the first task for you to enter the Giant Dragon mountain range is to tame a flying dragon as soon as possible, even if it’s the weakest one. That will greatly reduce your risk in the secret realm.” “As for what kind of flying dragon is best to tame and how to tame it, these are all written in the information. I Won’t go into details. It Can’t be that no one still doesn’t know how to tame a flying dragon, right?” Everyone nodded. Xiang Tianxiu coughed dryly and quietly opened the catalog. Then, he flipped to the corresponding pages and looked at how to tame a flying dragon again. He had read too quickly just now and didn’t remember much. “But if I tame a flying dragon, what if my little bear gets angry...;”at this moment, Nielko raised his hand. Little Bear sat beside him, baring its fangs and brandishing its claws. It was very angry, as if it was blaming the director. was he not powerful enough? Why did you have to seduce other monsters. Everyone was speechless Li Weiguo facepalmed. “Then try to persuade this little...; Little Bear.” At this moment, the internal broadcast of the transport plane sounded. “The transport plane is about to arrive at the designated location. Please pay attention.” “The transport plane is about to arrive...;” Li Weiguo’s expression turned solemn. “Get Ready!” “Flying dragons and giant dragons can not fly at extremely high altitudes, so we will not be attacked by them at high altitudes. However, we will encounter many dragons during the descent process. The transport plane is tough enough that it will not be pierced through. However, the turbulence inside the plane...; the turbulence is inevitable.” Everyone,”...; I can hear it.” A series of chaotic collisions rang out. As expected, those curious wyverns should be attacking the transport plane. However, even so, the transport plane did not suffer too much of a threat and landed safely on the ground. Boom! Through the window, the construction department staff suddenly saw a golden beam of light whistling past, blasting an injured wyvern into pieces on the ground. The light beam seemed to be a signal. A large number of light beams were suddenly released, killing and maiming the wyverns surrounding the transport plane one by one. The remaining wyverns were terrified and did not dare to make any more trouble. They all ran away with a howl. As for the wyverns that were more powerful...; they were busy running around and fighting with wild monsters. After confirming that there was no danger outside the plane, the cabin door of the transport plane slowly opened. More than 300 warriors walked out in an orderly manner. Outside, there were already warriors of the Knights of truth waiting here. There were three people from the Cardinal Group and three people from the Knight Group. Among the three people from the Cardinal Group, one was the cardinal bishop, a level eight warrior, and the other two were the cardinal bishop, a level seven warrior. As for the three members of the Knights, they were all grand knights and rank 7 warriors. The one at the front was a rank 8 warrior. He wore a badge on his chest that symbolized the deputy commander of the Knights. Lin Xuan glanced at him and immediately smiled. Wasn’t this hall? On that day, Hall, Kodo, and the others arrived at Little Spirit Mountain through the secret realm light door that was opened by the key of the Sun. After a day of rest, the Truth Knights, the Salvation Society, and the Arctic army came to pick them up. They did not expect to meet them again today. “Welcome, everyone from the construction division. You are the first to arrive.”Hall quickly walked over and shook hands with Li Weiguo, “Sorry, the main force has to deal with the monsters in Dragon City and Dragon mountain range. We can’t spare more people to welcome you.” Li Weiguo shook his head. “It’s okay. We understand.” Hall sighed. “I thought the first one to come would be the people from the Salvation Society. After all, we are long-term allies. But I didn’t expect...;” “Ahem...;”behind hall, the young Cardinal of the Cardinal Group coughed violently. Hall frowned slightly, but he did not continue. He paused and changed the topic, “Forget it. Let’s talk about the battle plan. Brother Li, when can your construction department’s agents enter the battle?” Li Weiguo said in a clear voice, “Right now!” Hall was stunned and laughed out loud. “Alright! Then I’ll distribute the battle plan for everyone.” “Dragon City is divided into five districts, east, west, south, and north. You guys will be in charge of the East District and try your best to save the people, Okay?”Hall asked. Li Weiguo nodded readily. “Okay.” He waved his hand and said in a clear voice, “Agents of the construction department, two people in a group, enter the East District of Dragon City!” “Yes!” Three hundred tier 7 warriors thundered in unison! In the blink of an eye, Lin Xuan and the other warriors were divided into small groups and entered the East District at an astonishing speed. The Cardinal of the College of Cardinals frowned. “Hall, why don’t we let them go to the Central District? That’s where the light gate of the secret realm is located. There are the most monsters that wreak havoc there, and their strength is also the strongest.” “We can also take this opportunity to weaken the strength of the construction division. We don’t need our people to take the risk. We can kill two birds with one stone.” Hall frowned. “What do you mean? How can you say such words? As a believer of the truth, do you believe in such an evil idea that harms others but not yourself?” “I’ll repeat it again. Any warrior who comes to rescue us is our friend. When we treat our friends, we must treat them like friends!” The Cardinal was speechless. The other two cardinals frowned. The three Grand Knights of the Knights did not change their expressions. “Let’s go back to the battlefield. This is the secret realm of the Knights of truth, the most difficult central city district. Of course, we have to take it down ourselves!”Hall glared at the cardinal like a gale, they charged into Dragon City once again. The three Grand Knights of the Knights of truth did not complain and followed closely behind. “Hmph, Old Fogey.” “Fortunately, we did not tell him about the decisions of the three lords. Otherwise, with his personality, I’m afraid he would not be able to carry out the mission normally.” The young red-robed archbishop stared at their backs and let out a cold snort of disdain. “Archbishop, What About Us?”The archbishop beside him asked. “Let’s follow them too. Although I’m not interested in that old thing hall, he’s still a veteran level eight fighter after all. His reputation is still there. We can’t let anything happen to him, at least not now,”the archbishop muttered, he immediately followed with the two archbishops behind him. At the same time, in the East District. Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu were in the same group. The planning for each group had already been completed on the transport plane. In fact, Lin Xuan originally wanted to be in the same group as his clone. However, Ye Yuqiu took the initiative to ask to be with him to protect him. Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry, but he couldn’t refuse, so he still nodded and agreed. “Do you think I’m weak?”The two of them walked through the ruins. Lin Xuan couldn’t help but ask. Ye Yuqiu looked at him in surprise. “You could only use potions to throw it from a distance. Your only attack was that Giant Thunder Spear. Do you think you’re very strong?” “To be honest, your giant thunder spear should have been sold to someone else. It’s a pity that it’s in your hands.”Ye Yuqiu said straightforwardly and laughed. Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. Fine. For No Reason at all, he was being protected by a beautiful woman. This feeling was quite...; strange. More than 300 construction workers scattered into the East District in the blink of an eye. No one could see each other. Not long after Lin Xuan and Lin Xuan advanced, they met their first opponent. Three level-seven and level-six dragon beasts, dragon-horned rhinoceroses. At this moment, these three dragon-horned rhinoceroses were madly charging at a bungalow. They were charging and roaring at the same time. The walls of the bungalow continuously fell off, and a big hole appeared. From the bungalow came the shrill screams of the little girl. But their mournful screams made the rhinoceroses even more excited. They wanted the taste of first-class human flesh more. Ye Yuqiu turned to look at Lin Xuan. “I’ll charge in front. You can give assistance according to the situation, or you can take advantage of the opportunity when I attract the rhinoceroses to save the people in the bungalow.” Lin Xuan nodded. Ye Yuqiu took a deep breath and immediately stomped on the ground and ran away. Dressed in the [ Ice Valkyrie ] set, she really looked like an ice-blue War God at this moment! Ye Yuqiu’s sword slashed fiercely. Icy blue light swirled, and a huge arc of light appeared in the air, slashing wildly at the three dragon-horned rhinoceroses. The dragon-horned rhinoceroses sensed danger. With a roar, they immediately changed targets. But this type of dragon beast wasn’t good at agility. Other than the dragon-horned rhinoceroses at the edge, the other two couldn’t Dodge this sword. Kacha. The blade immediately left a huge wound on their thick skin. But no blood flowed out because the wound was instantly frozen by the bone-piercing cold air. “Roar Roar Roar!” The two injured dragon horned rhinoceros didn’t retreat at all. Instead, because of the pain, they became even more berserk and charged towards ye Yuqiu! The third rhinoceroses also charged towards ye Yuqiu. Bang Bang Bang. Their huge hooves stomped heavily on the ground. Even the pebbles on the ground were jumping. Ye Yuqiu did not retreat even half a step. She swung her sword and clashed head-on with the three rhinoceroses. Her huge sword was wide open and powerful. Every strike brought up a pool of blood. Two little girls’heads poked out from the crumbling bungalow. Seeing this scene, they couldn’t help but sigh. “That big sister...; is so handsome.” Lin Xuan heard their voices from afar and chuckled. Handsome was handsome, but his health dropped quite quickly. The dragon-horned rhinoceros was a dragon beast with high vitality and strength. If he were to face this kind of dragon beast head-on, he would also have that kind of attribute. Unfortunately, Ye Yuqiu’s vitality was not too high. Lin Xuan immediately took out a health potion and threw it far away, just right beside ye Yuqiu. The life aura immediately spread out and lifted ye Yuqiu’s hp back to 80% . Clang! A huge sword forcefully shattered the dragon-horned rhinoceros’horn. Ye Yuqiu shouted without turning his head, “Good health!” Lin Xuan couldn’t help but laugh. He continued to carry out his duty as a “Support fighter”. Roar! The rhinoceros was broken into pieces. The dragon-horned rhinoceros became even more violent. It didn’t care about the huge wound on its body at all. It forcefully exchanged the injury for the injury and pressed it against ye Yuqiu’s stomach. At this moment, Ye Yuqiu’s huge sword had just been slashed out and hadn’t been retracted yet. Facing this attack from the dragon-horned rhinoceros, she had to do something to block this attack. Ye Yuqiu thought quickly. In the blink of an eye, she had many ways to defend against it. But before she could act, another bottle of medicine smashed at her feet. A rock-like aura immediately spread out and enveloped her. High-level physical resistance medicine! Ye Yuqiu immediately saw that her physical resistance had more than doubled in an instant! Clang! The dragon-horned rhinoceros smashed its huge head over, but it was as if it had crashed into a solid mountain rock. Its body was forced back by the huge rebound force. There seemed to be little stars spinning in its huge eyes. “This bump, concussion is not a joke to you.”Lin Xuan chuckled. Ye Yuqiu also revealed a smile. She immediately withdrew her greatsword and burst forth with strength with both arms, taking advantage of the opportunity to slash! Kacha. A sword light flashed by, and the head of the rhinoceros rolled down! Dragon-horned rhinoceros, dead! After killing the first dragon-horned rhinoceros, the pressure on ye Yuqiu’s body was greatly reduced. The remaining two dragon-horned rhinoceros were also easily dealt with. After all three dragon-horned rhinoceros were killed, Ye Yuqiu looked at his health. It was actually still at 80% . There was practically no change. As for her Frost Valkyrie set, its durability had also decreased very little. Most of the dragon-horned rhinoceroses’attacks were either dodged by her or reduced by the high amount of physical resistance provided by the potion. Ye Yuqiu gave Lin Xuan a thumbs up. “Well done.” After saying that, she rushed into the bungalow and brought the two little girls out. “Big Sister, you are so powerful! However, you are still a little weaker than my brother.”Although the two little girls had blonde hair and blue eyes, they spoke fluent great Xia language. “Although that big brother over there isn’t very good at fighting and wants big sister to block in front, we are also very grateful to you! Thank you for saving us!”The other little girl waved her hand at Lin Xuan. Lin Xuan couldn’t help but laugh. These two little girls weren’t very strong, and their mouths were quite vicious. However, they looked to be only five or six years old, so he didn’t really care. “However, although big sister and Big Brother are both powerful, they are still not as powerful as our big brother. It’s a pity that we are separated from Big Brother. We have been waiting for him all this time.”The two little girls felt a bit wronged. Ye Yuqiu patted their little heads, “You only saw sister rushing in front, but you didn’t see it. Without the medicine provided by Big Brother, Sister’s health would be greatly reduced. Do you understand?” “The efforts of any logistics warrior can not be ignored.” The two little girls nodded their heads as if they understood. “Let’s send them out first.”Ye Yuqiu turned around and discussed with Lin Xuan. “Okay.” After sending the two little girls out of Dragon City, the Warriors of the Knights of truth immediately came over to receive them. The two little girls waved at the two of them. “Big Brother! Big Sister! Thank you, our Big Brother will definitely be very grateful to you!” Lin Xuan waved at them and returned to the east side of Dragon City with Ye Yuqiu. The two girls were extremely lucky. After eight hours of torture, there were not many low-level warriors and ordinary people left in Dragon City. They were extremely lucky to be able to hold on until now and be saved by Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu. Next, Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu continued to hunt monsters in the eastern zone, but they did not find any survivors. Bang! A lava lizard’s neck was cut off, its body and head separated, and it fell to the ground. Ye Yuqiu wiped the sweat from her forehead, “It’s the thirty-first Dragon Beast...;” Lin Xuan nodded slightly, “It’s a pity that we didn’t meet a flying dragon, otherwise we could have tried taming it, and it wouldn’t have been so hard.” Ye Yuqiu sat down without a care for her image, “I can’t do it anymore. I need to rest.” She took out compressed biscuits and mineral water from her storage compartment and began to eat and drink. Lin Xuan smiled. He just needed to throw the potions from behind. He wasn’t too tired, so he naturally acted as a guard. Seeing this, Ye Yuqiu also smiled. This Lin Xuan always knew what to do, so she didn’t have to talk too much nonsense. “Oh right, when poison blade was working as a spy in Gaotian Plains under Mu Qiang’s identity, Mu Qiang also had a daughter called Mu Xiaoling. How is that little sister?”Lin Xuan suddenly remembered something. Poison Blade had left, but Mu Xiaoling couldn’t leave on her own. Ye Yuqiu ate a large piece of compressed biscuit and said incoherently, “Don’t worry.” “Don’t worry. The informant from Gaotian Plains has already brought mu xiaoling back. Otherwise, if she were to remain there, she would definitely be persecuted by the Gaotian Plains’Warriors.” Lin Xuan nodded and was finally relieved. The two of them fell silent again. They did not speak at all. At this moment, an earth-shattering dragon’s roar came from not far away. A four-meter-long ice spike flying dragon seemed to be treating ye Yuqiu and Lin Xuan as its own food. It suddenly swooped down toward them. The dragon opened its mouth wide and icicles condensed, ready to shoot out in the next moment. Ye Yuqiu’s eyes lit up. “I was just looking for the Flying Dragon, and you came to me yourself!” She picked up her huge sword and prepared to face the enemy. However, Lin Xuan’s [ advanced perception ] sensed that an unusual enemy was approaching. He immediately shouted, “Get down immediately!” After saying that, he fell down on the spot. Ye Yuqiu was stunned, but she still followed Lin Xuan’s instructions and lay down. The next moment, a frost dragon that was much bigger and fiercer than the flying dragon suddenly appeared and swooped down. It opened its huge mouth and bit the dragon in its mouth! The Frost spiked flying dragon immediately cried out in pain. It was looking for its prey. It did not expect that it had already become the prey in the eyes of a stronger predator! The Flying Dragon would be suppressed by the Dragon Bloodline. The size of the flying dragon was also completely different from that of the dragon. The wind whistled and the frost dragon stopped for a moment before landing on the ground. The Frost Dragon did not struggle for long before it was torn into two halves by the Frost Dragon. The Frost Dragon happily began to tear and swallow the flesh of the Frost Dragon. It did not notice that there were two living people lying on the ground not far away. Lin Xuan took a glance and noticed that there were many wounds on the frost dragon’s body. Some of the wounds could even be seen with white bones. He also noticed that he could feel the power of various attributes on the wounds. The Frost Dragon must have been attacked by many tier 8 warriors, which was why it had so many wounds on its body. The reason why it wanted to hunt the frost spiky flying dragon was to eat so that it could recover its HP as soon as possible. “However, it didn’t die even after being attacked by many tier 8 warriors...; it must be a king-level dragon in a mystical realm.” Lin Xuan used [ advanced observation ] to check. Sure enough, this frost dragon was Level 7 or 9, but its attributes were ridiculously strong. It was indeed a king-level dragon, and its attributes were 15% higher than normal level 7 or 9 monsters. It could be imagined that the more powerful level 7 or 9 flying dragons and dragons’attributes could probably be comparable to some level 8 or Level 1 warriors. However, although their attributes could be compared, there was still a gap in their skills. After all, the class of a Tier 8 martial artist had already experienced an increase in strength. It was not difficult to crush the tier 7, Tier 9 flying dragons and giant dragons. “This frost dragon is eight meters long. It has a strong desire to attack, but it is injured! It only has half of its HP!”Lin Xuan called out in a low voice. When he used the advanced observation skill earlier, not only did he discover that this frost dragon was the king of the secret realm, but he also discovered that it only had half of its HP left! Seeing this, his thoughts immediately became active. If Lin Xuan was alone, he would rush forward without a word to tame the frost dragon. Because when he was alone, it didn’t matter how he displayed his strength. But now, he had ye Yuqiu by his side, and he was, after all, a “Logistics warrior”, so he couldn’t show too much of his strength. However, since the frost dragon only had half of its HP, he could properly control it. Ye Yuqiu lay on the ground, confused. “Half of its HP...; What’s wrong? Do you want to kill it?” Lin Xuan chuckled, “Why don’t you tame it?” Ye Yuqiu was stunned, “Are you crazy? That’s a dragon!” “The difficulty of taming a flying dragon and a dragon are not on the same level. Old Li gave us the information. Don’t tell me you didn’t see it.” Lin Xuan couldn’t help but laugh, “Of course I know. To us, taming a flying dragon is enough to drive away a dragon beast. When we leave here, that flying dragon can still be used to drink wine. But right now, there’s a giant frost dragon with low health in front of us. Aren’t you tempted?” Ye Yuqiu smacked her lips. “Saying that I’m not tempted...; That’s definitely a lie. But taming a giant dragon is too difficult and too risky.” “If I was alone, I might really dare to try. But with you by my side, I have to protect you.” Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. Old Sister, why are you always thinking of protecting me! Even if I appear here as a logistics warrior, I’m really not weak. When Little Spirit Mountain’s third gathering place faced a large-scale beast tide, Lin Xuan had also used the Giant Thunder Spear to kill a large number of ghosts. He had made a lot of contributions and was not considered weak. “What if I say that I can increase the probability of you taming this frost dragon to 80% ?”Lin Xuan said seriously. Ye Yuqiu frowned and subconsciously said, “Really?” Lin Xuan nodded. “Have you forgotten my identity? I’m a pharmacist.” “I know the habits and preferences of most Dragon Beasts, flying dragons, and dragons. I can tell you right now that frost dragons like to eat all kinds of items that contain the power of ice. If it really can’t be done, they can also eat flying dragons like the Ice Spike Flying Dragon.” Saying this, he took out a bottle of high-level ice medicine from his space of consciousness. “This is a bottle of high-level ice medicine. It can increase the damage of ice skills. If you add the black frost flower, it can further increase the temptation of the Frost Dragon.” Lin Xuan pointed at Ye Yuqiu. “And you, take out the soul-absorbing rune given by the construction department. You should be able to tame this frost dragon.” After hearing his words, Ye Yuqiu was a little tempted. If it was really as Lin Xuan said, taming the Frost Dragon wouldn’t be a difficult task! “Okay, let’s try!” “But you have to promise me that once the frost dragon breaks free of the soul-absorbing runes, you will immediately retreat. Don’t worry about me, I have a way to escape!” Ye Yuqiu said in a deep voice. Lin Xuan nodded slightly. He immediately took out a black frost flower, crushed it, and put it into the advanced ice medicine. Whether it was the advanced ice medicine or the black frost flower, they were both the Frost Dragon’s favorite things. Some people thought that dragons should like to eat meat. But in reality, eating meat was just to absorb the energy in meat. If there was a more convenient way to obtain large amounts of ice energy efficiently, then eating meat would be of little value. Unless, it was for the sake of appetite. As expected, just as Lin Xuan uncorked the bottle of high-grade ice medicine, the Frost Dragon that was gobbling down the food instantly stopped chewing. Its huge nose twitched slightly, and it suddenly stood up and walked towards the two of them. Opposite Lin Xuan, Ye Yuqiu had already taken out the soul-absorbing rune from the storage compartment. Soul-absorbing rune was a treasure that was produced in the Kunlun ruins. It was the same type of item as the protection rune, but it produced more than the protection rune. After using this rune, it could give a heavy blow to the opponent’s spirit. If the timing was right, the soul-absorbing rune could even be used to turn the tide of the battle. For a long time, warriors used it to fight their enemies. However, not long ago, Wan youxi suddenly had an idea. The soul-absorbing rune could deal a heavy blow to the target’s spirit. Perhaps it could also be used to tame monsters. After several experiments, it was found that the monster’s HP could be suppressed to less than 30% first. Then, the soul-absorbing rune could be used to put the target’s spirit in a confused state. Then, it could be used to give the monster something to eat, the monster’s desire to attack would be greatly reduced, and the warrior could take this opportunity to tame the monster as a pet. Of course, this method of taming the monster was still not comparable to the Indian method of taming. The other party could directly use the skill, and the success rate would be greatly increased. Ye Yuqiu held the soul-absorbing rune tightly. As the Frost Dragon approached, her palms were sweating. Bang Bang Bang. The Frost Dragon walked to the bottle of high-level ice medicine placed on the ground and swallowed it in one gulp. When it drank, it even let out a happy sound, as if it had drunk some kind of precious wine. “Now!” Lin Xuan shouted in a low voice. Ye Yuqiu stomped on the ground, and her speed soared, slamming the soul-absorbing rune onto the Frost Dragon’s body! Weng! The soul-absorbing rune immediately let out a low, soul-shaking sound. Accompanied by a dazzling purple light, the rune merged into the Frost Dragon’s body in the blink of an eye. The Frost Dragon’s huge body instantly froze. It was as if its brain had gone into a state of shutdown. Ye Yuqiu used a few skills with astonishing lethality. The blood on the Frost Dragon’s body surged, and its scales flew everywhere. Its health quickly fell below 30% . This state could already be considered a serious injury. Ye Yuqiu grabbed the scales on the Frost Dragon’s body and took two steps forward. With a flip, he climbed onto the dragon’s back. Lin Xuan flipped over and stood up. He immediately threw another bottle of advanced frost potion to Ye Yuqiu. Ye Yuqiu took it and handed it to the Frost Dragon’s mouth. The Frost Dragon whimpered and unwillingly drank it. Ye Yuqiu cried out in surprise, “I got it! I saw the taming progress bar!” Lin Xuan smiled in relief, “See, isn’t that it?” If nothing went wrong, this frost dragon should be tamed by Ye Yuqiu and would be of great help. Lin Xuan had thought about it at the beginning, but with his current identity, it wasn’t appropriate for him to reveal too much of his strength. Moreover, the Frost Dragon was actually more compatible with Ye Yuqiu. Moreover, if he tamed the flying dragon and the dragon just to drive away the Dragon Beast, he actually had a more convenient method. That was to directly find a powerful dragon corpse and possess it on the spot, turning it into his own experience clone. As long as he stood next to his experience clone, Normal Dragon Beasts naturally wouldn’t dare to get close. Moreover, there should be quite a number of dragon corpses in Dragon City. As long as he searched patiently, he would always be able to find dragon corpses with good attributes. The Frost Dragon fidgeted restlessly, as if it didn’t like humans riding on its back. Ye Yuqiu tried her best to maintain her balance. Her beautiful eyes stared at the taming progress bar, waiting for 100% . But there was a saying: If nothing went wrong, then something must have gone wrong. The taming progress bar had just reached 60% when three figures rushed over not far away. And they weren’t from the construction department, but three golden-haired, blue-eyed, and white-robed warriors. In the Cardinal Organization of the Knights of truth, only bishops, priests, and priests wore white robes. Dragon City was currently so dangerous that priests and priests naturally didn’t have the qualifications to appear here. Then, these three should all be bishops. And the leader was someone Lin Xuan had seen in the information released by Li Weiguo. Logue! The grandson of the Grand Cardinal! Logue also saw the two from afar, especially ye Yuqiu, who was riding on the back of the Frost Dragon. He stood a hundred meters away and said from afar, “Cardinal Logue, you are?” Lin Xuan replied, “Construction Division, Lin Xuan, Ye Yuqiu.” Logue was expressionless when he heard Lin Xuan’s name, but his expression changed slightly when he heard ye Yuqiu. However, even so, Logue still said in a low voice, “You are taming this Frost Dragon?” Lin Xuan replied, “You still want to ask if you can see it?” Logue frowned and said coldly, “The three of us saw this frost dragon first. Many of the wounds on its body were caused by us.” “But you took the opportunity to take advantage of it. Isn’t this immoral?” Ye Yuqiu frowned. There were many wounds on the frost dragon’s body, and the remnant aura could not have been left behind by a level seven warrior. Logue was obviously lying. Lin Xuan also laughed, “Don’t joke around. Do you really think we are fools? This frost dragon is a king of the secret realm, and many of the wounds on its body were left behind by a level eight warrior! You Can’t do that.” Roger’s expression did not change at all. “Even if it was left behind by a level eight warrior, those are wounds left behind by a level eight warrior of our truth knights. What does it have to do with the people of your construction department?” “I welcome you guys to come to Dragon City to help, but you guys can’t take what belongs to Me!” Roger gave a look to the two people beside him. The three of them took out oak staffs from their storage compartments. “On account of the fact that you are guests from afar, stop taming the Frost Dragon immediately. We can pretend that nothing happened,”Roger said in a deep voice. Ye Yuqiu struggled in her heart. She was only 10% away from complete taming. If she were to give up now, it would be no different from digging a piece of meat out of her heart. If she could really tame this frost dragon, then the danger factor in Dragon City and Dragon mountain range would be greatly reduced. This was a huge help! Lin Xuan bluntly refuted, “Impossible!” He was already prepared. He could take out the Lion Heart Tower Shield from his space of consciousness at any time and block the attacks of these three. However, that might expose his identity. With Ye Yuqiu’s thoughts, he could quickly guess that he was the shield demon. The two sides were at daggers drawn. The situation was on the verge of breaking out. “Logue, is this how you treat your friends who came from afar?” A loud voice rang out behind Logue and the others. In the next moment, a light dragon descended from the sky. A tall and sturdy youth jumped down from the dragon’s back and Stared at Logue and the others with hostility. Logue’s face twitched. “Bruno...; Why didn’t you stay in the Central Region? Why did you come here?” “I was just about to enter the central region from outside Dragon City and happened to pass by. However, I came at the right time. If I had come a little later, you would have snatched the frost dragons from these two!”Bruno berated. Roger took a deep breath. “That Frost Dragon was originally me...;” “Shut up!”! You’re full of lies. How are you going to maintain your pious faith in the god of truth in the future! “If it weren’t for the fact that we’re in the middle of a war, I would definitely tell the cardinal archbishop to lock you up for a few days and copy the Scripture of truth more than ten times!”Bruno directly interrupted him, he berated him once again in a very heavy tone. Roger suppressed the anger in his heart and did not continue speaking. “Scram back to the central region!”Bruno said sternly. Roger clenched his fists and turned around to leave. After all, Bruno was the son of the saint and had a high status. However, he was only a cardinal, but his grandfather was an archbishop. He was only second to the pope, so he had some status. After Roger and the other two left, Bruno bowed slightly to Lin Xuan and Lin Xuan. “I sincerely apologize to you for Roger and the others’previous actions. I let you see the bad deeds of the organization.” Lin Xuan looked at Bruno curiously. This was the holy son. Logically speaking, he should be very arrogant and domineering, but why was he acting like a modest gentleman. “I also want to thank you two for saving my two lost sisters. I’m really grateful.”Bruno bowed again. This time, the bow was even deeper, almost ninety degrees. Lin Xuan waved his hand. “It’s a small matter. We came here to pacify the monsters and save people at the same time.” Bruno smiled sincerely. “Thank you.” “I have something urgent to attend to in the central region. I Can’t talk to you two anymore.”Bruno got on the dragon of light. Before he left, he suddenly threw a paper ball over and mumbled, “Eh, something seems to have fallen...; forget it, it’s definitely not important. Let’s go, I’ll see you two later.” Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu looked at each other with a strange expression. Lin Xuan walked over and picked up the paper ball. He opened it and saw a line of crooked words. “Someone from the organization wants to join hands with the Salvation Society to harm the construction division. Warriors who are ranked on the global tier 7 and tier 8 rankings are also listed here. Be careful, be careful!” Lin Xuan handed the note to Ye Yuqiu. Ye Yuqiu frowned slightly after reading it. “It doesn’t seem fake. Bruno’s conscience made him warn us on Purpose?”Ye Yuqiu whispered. Lin Xuan nodded slightly. “It’s very possible. If we meet other people from our organization, it’s best to tell them the contents of the note and let them be wary of the other organizations.” In the eastern region of Dragon City, while the tier 7 warriors of the construction department were busy clearing out the monsters, three different types of transport planes had also stopped outside Dragon City. On both transport planes, there were two-headed Eagles’symbols. One of them had a bald head, a full beard, and a gorgeous lady, three tier 9 warriors. The other one came down — blood demon Kodo, several rank 8 warriors, and hundreds of rank 7 warriors. They were all members of the Salvation Society. The third transport plane was the symbol of the Great Wall. Gao Qianchi, Lu Pingjiang, and Xiang Qiantou, a group of rank 8 warriors, came down one after another. There was already a rank 9 warrior of the Knights of truth waiting at the place where the three transport planes landed. He was clad in armor, impenetrable and imposing. The badge on his chest indicated that he was the commander of the Knights, a rank 9 warrior who had been famous for a long time. Seeing the crowd walk down, the commander smiled and immediately walked over to welcome them. “Gao Qianchi, as the second commander, you actually came to help the Knights of Truth?”The commander laughed out loud and first walked over to give Gao Qianchi a bear hug. Gao Qianchi smiled. “The abnormal movement in the dragon mountain range is not a small matter. Sister Ye said that we should treat it as another drowning city, so she sent me and Pingjiang here.” The chief commander nodded and greeted Lu Pingjiang before turning to the bald three. “Welcome, Welcome. The truth knights are very touched that all of you can come to help!”The chief commander sighed. “Jack, there aren’t many of you here. Besides, the three of you have become rank 9 warriors in the last five years,”Lu Pingjiang said with a weird smile, “Aren’t you a little unconcerned about the situation in the dragon mountain range?” The Bald Jack was a little angry. As both of them were rank 9 warriors, there was a big gap between those who had broken through a long time ago and those who had broken through recently. For example, Gao Qianchi had broken through to rank 9 more than ten years ago. His combat strength was tyrannical. “There has been a little disturbance in the secret realm under the jurisdiction of our Salvation Society recently. Although it can’t be compared to the scale of the dragon mountain range, it still needs to be suppressed by a rank 9 warrior,”Jack retorted seriously, “Those few are all suppressing the angel fortress. We can only come over to help.” Lu Pingjiang chuckled. “Do you need our people from the construction department to help? We won’t charge you.” Jack hurriedly shook his head. What a joke. I still don’t know who you, Lu Pingjiang, are. If you were to go to the angel fortress to help, wouldn’t you be able to use the excuse of helping to take away a bunch of treasures. Moreover, the Angel Fortress was a mystic realm that the Salvation Society valued the most. It was just like the Highland Plains’Wei Ming Country Mystic Realm, where outsiders were not allowed to enter easily. The head regiment commander immediately laughed and said, “I understand, I understand. We are already very happy that everyone is able to come. Don’t cause too much unhappiness.” After saying that, he quickly said, “The first to arrive are the level seven warriors of the construction division. They have already entered the Dragon City and are in charge of the eastern region. The level seven warriors of the Salvation Society will be in charge of the Western Region. How about it?” “Yes, Sir Jack. Then I’ll bring them in,”Kodo said in a low voice. Jack nodded. Kodo immediately brought hundreds of seventh-rank warriors of the Salvation Society into Dragon City. The seventh-rank warriors took action while the eighth-rank warriors held the line to ensure their safety. “Everyone, please follow me into the Dragon mountain range. Whether we can control this strange movement or not depends on us,”the head commander sighed and said seriously, “To tell you the truth, this time when I came out to welcome you, I also reluctantly took some time. If it was an hour ago, I’m afraid I wouldn’t even have the time to leave.” Gao Qianchi and the others saw his expression and knew that the internal situation of the dragon mountain range might be a little rotten. They also nodded solemnly and immediately followed. Gao Qianchi’s side had two people, Bald Jack’s side had three people, and the head commander had a total of six people. The six of them quickly entered Dragon City and arrived at the light gate of the secret realm in the central region. They rushed in without saying a word. As the six of them moved forward, they quickly learned about the latest changes in dragon mountain range from the head commander. “Dragon mountain range bulged. At first, we thought it was just some caves, but as we went deeper, we found a huge underground world!” “There was light, water, and even green plants living in the underground world. Its energy source came from an ancient Sun Dragon.” The Grand Commander said in a deep voice, “The Sun Dragon woke up from its slumber and broke the fragile balance of the underground world. A large number of monsters escaped and rushed out of the arcane realm.” “We think that the key lies in the body of the Sun Dragon. If we can gather and destroy it, we should be able to stop the monsters from panicking and gradually calm down this mutation.” “The Sun Dragon? Is it very strong?”The bearded man asked in puzzlement. The chief commander laughed bitterly, “The cardinal archbishop was directly cut in half by it. If not for the super-life potion, he would have almost died.” “I have also fought with the Sun Dragon before. I was unable to use [ probing ] to discover its specific attributes and skills. I barely know that it is at tier 9 or level 9.” Gao Qianchi, Jack, and the others were all shocked. “If I remember correctly, the grand cardinal only reached rank 9 or rank 7 six years ago, right? He could be cut in half by the Sun Dragon with one strike?”Lu Pingjiang scratched his head. The head commander sighed, “Yes, that’s the terrifying part. A rank 9 or rank 7 warrior, his body is as weak as a piece of paper.” “I’m afraid it’s the King of the mystic realm. It might even be the king of the mystic realm,”the gorgeous girl said seriously. The attributes of the King of the arcane realm were 30% higher than that of ordinary monsters. In addition to a series of powerful dark gold skills, it was not difficult to kill a Tier 9, Tier 7 mage in one hit. “There’s something even more fatal. After the Sun Dragon woke up, many of the Dragons began to glow. It seems that they all have the bloodline of the Sun Dragon in their bodies. The stronger the Sun Dragon, the stronger they are.” “If we can’t kill the Sun Dragon, the other dragons will definitely rush out of the secret realm. They only need to adapt to the Earth’s environment for a short while. With their flying ability and the ability to breed dragon beasts, they will soon become the nightmare of this world.” When the head commander said this, his expression became even more serious, as if he had seen some terrible consequences. “Roar!” The six of them had just reached the surface of the dragon mountain range and were about to enter the underground through a huge cave when they vaguely heard an earth-shaking roar coming from the depths of the underground. At the same time, the temperature in the surroundings rapidly rose! “I’m afraid that our people have met the Sun Dragon and are fighting! Everyone, we have to rush over to support them as soon as possible!” After the first leader finished speaking, he immediately activated his haste skill. Gao Qianchi, Jack, and the others also displayed their abilities. Their speed soared to the limit, and in the blink of an eye, they disappeared without a trace. .. In the underground world. In a secret dark cave. A seven-colored dragon that was only a meter long was lying there resting. Due to its small size, it was not as fierce and fierce as the other Wyverns and dragons. Instead, it was rather exquisite and cute. However, at this moment, there were several deep and narrow wounds on its body. The surroundings of these wounds were filled with the aura of holy light. It was like a maggot attached to a bone, constantly releasing damage. As a result, the wounds could not completely heal. What was even more surprising was that the blood flowing out of the wounds was not red, but colorful! Wu Wu! The seven-colored dragon let out a whimpering sound, as if it was crying. At this moment, a cold laugh suddenly sounded. “I’ve found...; You!” Boom! The holy light exploded, directly blasting the surrounding rocks into pieces. A purple-robed elder charged in, his expression ferocious. He was none other than the grand cardinal, who had been slashed in the waist by the giant sun dragon’s Claw. He had barely managed to hang on to his life with the lifesaving potion. After he had been saved by Pope Gregory, he had not been on the frontlines to kill the Giant Sun Dragon. Instead, he had been on the periphery to clear out the other giant dragons. Because of this, he had once again encountered the seven-colored dragon. The ecstatic cardinal ignored the fact that he only had 30% of his HP left and chased after it. The last time he encountered it, he knew that the Rainbow Dragon had no fighting strength at all. It would only run away. This time, he would definitely be able to catch it! Moreover, there was no one else around him now. This meant that he could keep it for himself. The cardinal had a vague guess. If he could eat this rainbow dragon, he would definitely have a huge improvement! The seven-colored dragon whimpered, released the seven-colored light, and prepared to escape again. “You can’t escape. Obediently become food on my plate!” The Cardinal Archbishop had already set up the net of holy light nearby. As expected, the seven-colored dragon crashed into it. The Net of holy light immediately tightened, and the seven-colored dragon was bound by the blazing net of holy light. Its scales seemed to have melted and immediately shattered, and the seven-colored blood splashed again. The cardinal used his finger to dip a bit of blood into his mouth. He immediately felt as if there was energy surging within his body! “My guess was indeed correct. I Must Eat You Alive!” The Cardinal’s face twisted, and he directly pounced forward. The seven-colored dragon let out a final cry of despair. In the next moment, it actually exploded on its own, turning into a pile of broken limbs on the ground. The Cardinal was stunned. He reached out to touch the flesh and found that the rainbow light on it was rapidly fading away. Even the blood was turning from rainbow to red. “Damn it...; damn it!” Without saying anything else, he picked up a piece of flesh and stuffed it into his mouth. In the blink of an eye, his mouth was full of blood. His usual elegant and amiable image had disappeared without a trace. Now, he looked more like a savage who ate raw meat and drank blood. The cardinal archbishop stuffed meat into his mouth while desperately scooping up the blood that was flowing everywhere with his palm. Even if there were mud magazines in the blood, he would just pour it directly into his mouth and did not care at all. The cardinal archbishop ate so crazily that he did not care at all. A faint seven-colored light flew out from the ground, ignoring the laws of physics. It passed through the mud and rocks and arrived at the ground. Then, it silently passed through the secret realm light door and arrived at Dragon City. In Dragon City, there were already many wyverns and dragons that had built their nests. They were trying to breed here for a long time. The seven-colored light wandered among the dragon nests for a moment before finally stopping in front of the sparking Wyvern’s nest. It entered a seemingly ordinary dragon egg. None of this was noticed. Even the mother of the nest of dragon eggs, a sparking dragon, did not notice anything unusual about the eggs it laid. When it came back from hunting, it immediately lay on the dragon egg and hatched in peace. .. Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu killed the Dragon Beast while advancing. Because ye Yuqiu had already tamed the frost dragon, their efficiency in killing the dragon beast was much higher. Even if some fearless dragon beasts still wanted to pounce on them, their strength would be greatly reduced due to the suppression of their bloodlines. Not long after, Lin Xuan met two familiar faces. Silver Fox and black. Before he got close to them, he could hear the sounds of their bickering from afar. Silver Fox said, “That Dragon Nest’s terrain is dangerous, and there are many flying dragons. There are also giant dragons circling around. Even if there are thousands of people, they can not be wiped out. It is reasonable to take a long time to plan.” Black said, “Speak in human language.” Silver Fox said, “I’m afraid.” Black sneered, “In the end, I’m still afraid. Coward.” Silver Fox was embarrassed and angry, but then he said righteously, “Anyway, there is no one nearby. So What If I’m afraid? What!” “Ahem.” Ye Yuqiu coughed lightly and walked out with Lin Xuan. “Guys, the weather is pretty good.” The Silver Fox was instantly dumbfounded. Black was also stunned and then laughed out loud. While laughing, he imitated the silver fox’s tone, “There’s no one here anyway. So what if I’m Scared? What if I’m Scared?” The Silver Fox coughed a few times and quickly tried to change the topic. Then, he saw the frost dragon behind ye Yuqiu. “F * ck!” The Silver Fox swore on the spot. “Wow, you can even tame a Dragon?” Black was stunned for a moment. He couldn’t even react to such a big one. Ye Yuqiu smiled, “We were lucky. When we met this frost dragon, it was at low health. Lin Xuan cooperated with me to tame it.” “Also, the Frost Dragon’s favorite food was only known to me after Lin Xuan told me. The information was not complete.” The silver fox exclaimed, “We tried to tame a venomous flying dragon more than an hour ago, but not only did we fail, even the soul-absorbing rune broke. You guys...; sigh, comparing people is really infuriating.” He did not know whether to laugh or cry. Soul-absorbing runes were one-time consumables. Each of them only gave out three of them, so they treasured them even more. “By the way, what is the Dragon Nest You mentioned just now?”Lin Xuan asked. The Silver Fox pointed in the direction they were coming from, “Over there, a group of lightning flying dragons used broken bricks and tiles to build a dragon nest. There are at least three adult flying dragons and five juvenile flying dragons, but I think there are also a lot of dragon eggs and young dragons in there.” Lin Xuan’s interest was immediately piqued. “This is a good thing. Young and young dragons are more suitable to be tamed. Although their combat strength is weak, they can still emit an aura that terrifies the Dragon Beasts. In fact, the effect is about the same.” “Moreover, the growth rate of the monsters is very fast. If we let them eat more of the Dragon Beast’s flesh and blood, they will improve greatly.” “Dragon eggs can be cultivated and eaten directly. They have a lot of uses.” Silver Fox and black nodded. Black said, “I think so too, but with our strength, we definitely can’t take down that Dragon Nest. We need to find more people.” “We can help with that. With the four of us, it won’t be too difficult to deal with three adult flying dragons and five juvenile dragons.”Ye Yuqiu immediately said. “Yes, and Ye Yuqiu has this frost dragon. The dragon bloodline also suppresses the Flying Dragon Bloodline.”Lin Xuan nodded. “Okay! Then let’s give it a try!” The Silver Fox originally didn’t want to go up, but since there was ye Yuqiu and this frost dragon, he could indeed give it a try. “Lin Xuan, be careful. Remember to hide behind us,”black goodwill reminded, “Silver Fox, don’t forget to protect Lin Xuan.” Silver Fox muttered, “No...; I’m also fragile.” Black glared at him. “You still want to compete with logistics warriors, right?” Silver Fox,”...;” Lin Xuan couldn’t help but laugh. “Okay.” Since everyone thought that I was a fragile logistics warrior, then I will be one. Silver Fox and black led the way in front, while Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu followed closely behind. The four of them soon arrived at the target location. As expected, there was a strange building erected here. The materials used were all broken bricks and tiles that could be seen everywhere in Dragon City, and the adhesive was some transparent purple gel. “That’s strange. How did their nests join together? It seems to be very strong,”the Silver Fox said in a low voice. Black sneered. “You’re not going to read the information carefully, are you? Teacher’s information has long said that nests are glued together using the saliva of Wyverns and dragons combined with the soil.” “Also, Wyverns with different elemental attributes have a strong resistance to these types of elements because their saliva contains the corresponding elements.” Black pointed at the nest of the lightning wyverns that were flowing with purple light. “For example, this nest has a very high resistance to lightning.” The Silver Fox’s old face turned red, and he could only smile awkwardly. “But my best skill is also lightning...; isn’t that useless?” Lin Xuan added, “No, their nest has a high resistance to lightning, but this also means that their nest has a relatively low resistance to ice, poison, and fire.” “Silver Fox, I remember that the skills that you are better at are the Great Ice Dragon, Great Thunder Dragon, and Great Poison Dragon. I suggest that you use the great ice dragon all the way.” Silver Fox was stunned. “F * ck, you even know what skills I’m good at!” Lin Xuan smiled. “As a logistics warrior, you don’t have to charge into battle. You should remember the information of your teammates.” Silver Fox nodded, “That’s true.” “Later, Ye Yuqiu will be at the front, and Black will follow closely behind. Silver Fox, release your ice dragon spell, and I will be at the back to provide assistance. Don’t worry, your hp won’t be lower than 80% !”Lin Xuan said confidently. “You’re that confident?”Black was also surprised. After all, he hadn’t worked with Lin Xuan many times. Ye Yuqiu smiled, “Don’t worry. Lin Xuan and I have worked together for a long time. You’ll know in a while. Not to mention health, even equipment durability won’t drop much.” Black nodded his head slightly. He believed ye Yuqiu’s words very much. Lin Xuan’s plan was confirmed by the three of them. Ye Yuqiu took a deep breath and immediately rushed out. The huge sword slashed down fiercely, and a majestic Frost Shock Wave was directed at the three lightning dragons lying in the dragon lair. The Lightning Dragons looked down from above, and their reactions were very sharp. They immediately dodged. But the juvenile dragons’reaction speed was not fast enough. One of the Juvenile Dragons was hit by the Frost Shock Wave and died on the spot. The three lightning dragons saw this and roared angrily. At the same time, they charged towards ye Yuqiu. They spat out lightning breath from their mouths, crazily enveloping ye Yuqiu’s vital parts. Ye Yuqiu didn’t have many tricks up her sleeves. Facing the three lightning dragons, she could only raise her greatsword to block. Just as the Lightning Breath was about to fall, a bottle of high-level lightning resistance potion exploded at her feet. A purple aura instantly enveloped her. Ye Yuqiu’s lightning resistance more than tripled! Boom Boom Boom! Three lightning breaths landed on her body, only reducing her health by less than 6% ! Not far away, Black’s eyes suddenly lit up. Lin Xuan’s grasp of the opportunity was definitely one of the best among the people he knew! “Great Ice Dragon Spell!” The staff in Silver Fox’s hand blossomed with frost. A huge ice dragon instantly condensed and surged out rapidly, directly hitting the three violent lightning dragons. They let out a wail, and their speed plummeted. Their height also dropped. Black instantly jumped up, and his legs stomped on the ground. Another bottle of potion exploded beside his feet. Black instantly felt that his jumping ability had increased several times. He easily surpassed the height of the three lightning wyverns. Black was overjoyed. Originally, he could barely reach the claws of the lightning wyverns. But now, he could look down at the back of the Lightning Wyvern’s neck! “Kill!” The short knives in Hei’s hands instantly turned into more than 20 and shot out. In the blink of an eye, blood spurted out from the back of the Lightning Wyvern’s neck! They cried out again and fell towards the ground. Lin Xuan took the opportunity to throw another bottle of medicine. This bottle of medicine was aimed at the landing spot of the three lightning wyverns. Buzz Buzz Buzz. Green poisonous smoke immediately spread out and enveloped the lightning dragons. Advanced Poison Potion! The three lightning dragons were attacked several times in a short period of time, and each time they were hit on the vital points. It was already very difficult for them to fly. Now, another bottle of advanced poison potion enveloped them. The large amount of damage caused their HP to drop like a waterfall. Their mournful cries also gradually died down. Finally, they were on their last breaths and completely disappeared. When the poisonous smoke dispersed, only three wyvern corpses appeared before the four of them. “F * ck! We’re actually so well-coordinated.”Silver Fox was shocked. He felt that he and black did not have such a tacit understanding. The two of them often made such low-level mistakes like going east and going west. Black rolled his eyes. “Haven’t you noticed? It’s Lin Xuan’s overall planning that allows us to work so well together.” Ye Yuqiu smiled. “Yes, he throws every bottle of potions at the right time. The timing is very good.” “I’ll leave those young Wyverns to you.”Lin Xuan patted Silver Fox’s shoulder. Silver Fox nodded and released some single-target skills. Soon, those weak young wyverns were shot down. Soon, the four of them stood in the nest and looked at their harvest happily. “Two juvenile lightning dragons! Five eggs of lightning dragons!” “There are many gemstones in their nest. Opal, Opal, emerald...; these gemstones can be used to forge equipment. They are very useful.” The Silver Fox’s eyes lit up. Two of them were accidentally killed by the aftermath of the battle, and another one was killed by the frost shock wave. Therefore, there were only two juvenile dragons left. “Let’s Tame these two young dragons first.”Lin Xuan pointed at them, “I don’t need to be a logistics warrior for the time being, but your taming of the Wyverns has improved a lot, and you can also protect me. You guys go first. Besides, maybe I’ll meet someone better in the future.” “Oh right, this is the Lightning Wyverns’favorite food, the electric berry. I have it here. You guys take it. You can give it to them later. The success rate of taming them shouldn’t be low.”He took out some purple fruits. Silver Fox was touched. “You really...; I’ll cry myself to death.” Silver Fox and black went forward to try taming them. This time, their luck had come. After feeding them the electric berries, the two young lightning wyverns had taming progress bars on them! “Beautiful!”Silver Fox and black exclaimed in excitement. After Silver Fox and Black tamed the two young lightning dragons, they were very happy. The four of them walked together. “Oh right, we met Bruno from the Knights of truth. He gave us a note.” Lin Xuan handed the note to Silver Fox and black. After reading it, they frowned. “They still want to engage in internal strife at a time like this. How Shameless,”black snorted. Silver Fox sighed. “In fact, it should be very simple for them to plan so hard to get rid of our people. Recently, many people with endless potential have emerged among our rank 7 warriors.” “For example, Poison Blade, shield ghost, flame burst, cold domain, and brother milk are all first-class experts. If they are given enough time to grow, they will at least be people like senior Qian Xun.” Lin Xuan rubbed his nose and lowered his eyes. Actually...; these people are all me.. He was a little depressed. His clone was too strong, so the other organizations had misjudged the future potential of the construction division. Was this considered his fault? Ye yuqiu nodded, “Indeed. The Truth Knight Order and the Salvation Society did something unexpected, but if you think about it carefully, it is very much in line with the selfish thoughts of some of them.” “We are the first group to arrive at Dragon City. Logically speaking, the tier 7 warriors of the Salvation Society should be behind us. They will definitely need time to tame the flying dragon, but if we tame the Flying Dragon first, won’t we have the advantage?”Lin Xuan suddenly laughed. “When the time comes, if they want to deal with us again, they will have to consider whether they have the strength or not!” Ye Yuqiu and the other two nodded their heads, but then frowned. “But where can we find a flying dragon?” “Find it! We have the advantage of time. We will find the dragon nest as soon as possible. Then, we will gather our people from the construction department and try our best to have one flying dragon each!”Lin Xuan said in a deep voice. The three nodded their heads. Hei, “Then let’s split up. If we run into the dragon nest or other people in the organization, we will immediately communicate through the communicator.” Ye Yuqiu nodded. The four of them split up again and ran in two directions. Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu’s goal had also changed from killing the Dragon Beast and rescuing the residents to finding the dragon’s nest. Of course, if they ran into a dragon beast while searching for the Dragon’s Nest, they could kill it while they were at it. With the suppression of Ye Yuqiu’s Frost Dragon Bloodline, killing the dragon beast was much easier than before. However, their luck wasn’t good. After searching for more than an hour, they still couldn’t find the dragon nest. At this moment, a message came through ye Yuqiu’s communicator. “Hurry to the cathedral at the junction of the east and central regions. There’s a dragon nest here!” The person who sent the message wasn’t Silver Fox and black, but Xiang Tianxiu. When Lin Xuan saw the message, his eyes immediately lit up. “Let’s Go!” The two of them immediately rushed towards the cathedral. The Knights of Truth was an organization built with faith as its core. Naturally, the cathedral was a necessary building. Moreover, there were five cathedrals in the five districts of Dragon City, east, west, south, and north. The cathedral in the middle district was bigger than the other four districts. In the eyes of the agents of the construction department, this was indeed a little outrageous. Soon, the two arrived here. From a distance, they saw a red dragon nest that was nearly twenty meters tall. It was directly built on top of the cathedral. Dozens of sparking dragons circled above the dragon nest. From time to time, they would catch some dragon beasts and monsters and throw them into the dragon nest. If nothing unexpected happened, they should be feeding the baby. “Follow behind me. Be careful. Don’t be discovered by the sparking dragons,”ye Yuqiu said in a low voice. The two quietly approached the cathedral and went behind a broken wall. “Who is it...; Ah, it’s you guys.” Silver Fox was also there and almost jumped in fright. Lin Xuan glanced and found Silver Fox, black, Xiang Tianxiu, and Bai Xinghe hiding behind the broken wall, staring at the sparking dragon nest. “Just the few of us?”Ye Yuqiu was puzzled. Xiang tianxiu said helplessly, “I’ve already sent a message to the others, but they are far away from here, so they can’t make it in time.” “Teacher Li was originally fine and wanted him to come over, but Lu Luo was being chased by two tier 8 poisonous flying dragons. Teacher Li wants to go over and help, so he won’t be able to leave for a while.” Ye Yuqiu nodded in understanding. Li Weiguo was a level 8 fighter, but he still stayed in the east side of Dragon City. He didn’t enter the Dragon Mountain Range to fight because he wanted to deal with those level 8 monsters that might rush out. Unless it was a level 7 fighter with extremely luxurious stats, equipment, and skills, they wouldn’t be a match for a level 8 monster. Xiang Tianxiu pointed at the huge building in front of him and felt a headache coming on. “This sparking flying dragon nest is too big. There are only six of us. We definitely won’t be able to take it down.” “We can only wait. It’s best if we wait until the flame blast or cold zone arrive. Their long-range attacks are very strong,”Bai Xinghe said in a low voice. Xiang Tianxiu patted her chest. “I’m not bad either!” “Ah, right, right, right.” “However, this sparking dragon nest is a little eye-catching. It can’t be that someone else has their eyes on it, right?”Bai Xinghe stared at the sparking dragon nest and said in a low voice. Xiang Tianxiu waved his hand. “It can’t be. There are only people from our construction department in the Eastern District. How can we be targeted by others? Moreover, even if we are targeted by others, our people will arrive very soon. With more people, are we afraid of them?” Lin Xuan said,”...; you sound like an old general on the stage.” “What?” Xiang Tianxiu was taken aback. He was born after the digitization of the world. He did not know about opera, movies, and other things. These were all ancient works of art that had been sealed away. Not many people would take a look at them out of boredom. ”...; they’re covered in flags.”Lin Xuan looked to the west and sighed softly. Just now, he had used [ advanced perception ] to detect that more than a dozen people were approaching. As expected, Murphy’s law would come true no matter where they were. “It’s You Again!” The leader was none other than the cardinal of the Knights of Truth, Roger! Roger saw Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu at a glance, especially the giant frost dragon behind ye Yuqiu. He was furious. The Giant Frost Dragon was almost in his pocket, but because of Bruno, he had no choice but to give up. He didn’t get along well with Bruno, but there was nothing he could do. Bruno was the holy son appointed by the Pope! Xiang Tianxiu also noticed Roger and the dozen truth knights behind him, and he immediately became alert. “Hey, can’t you see that we’re already here? This sparking dragon’s nest is our target!” “Moreover, our people will be here soon! At least thirty people!” Xiang Tianxiu randomly came up with a number. The priority was to scare the other party with their aura! Ye Yuqiu was about to say something, but Lin Xuan shook his head and pointed to the sky. The next moment, a level eight lightning dragon descended from the sky, and a red-robed archbishop jumped down. He glanced at Xiang tianxiu, “Oh? 30 level seven warriors?” Xiang tianxiu spread his hands, “Forget I said anything.” This was the red-robed archbishop, the Cardinal of the Cardinals. His strength was at least a tier 8 warrior. In addition, this red-robed archbishop had tamed a Tier 8 lightning dragon. In total, it was equivalent to the battle strength of two tier 8 warriors. There were only six construction department agents present. What was there to fight. “You’re Ye Yuqiu, right? Not bad. You actually tamed a Frost Dragon.”The red-robed archbishop sized ye Yuqiu up and nodded slightly. Ye Yuqiu revealed a vigilant look and did not say anything. The red-robed archbishop waved his hand, “I wouldn’t go so far as to snatch something from a junior. Furthermore, the construction department has come from thousands of miles away to support us. As the host, we have to treat you well. You taming the Frost Dragon is your opportunity, I don’t care.” “But...; This sparking dragon nest is ours. You Don’t have any objections, right?” After the Archbishop finished speaking, he narrowed his eyes and swept his gaze across the six construction department agents. Lin Xuan and the others remained silent. Facing an eighth-level warrior, a seventh-level warrior had no right to speak. They did have objections, but what objections could they have? To put it bluntly, the archbishop could kill them all and destroy their corpses. He could also claim that they had died at the mouth of the Dragon Beast. No one would know about this. Of course, Lin Xuan could use his own method to escape, but he would also completely expose his identity and trump cards. “Very good, you all have no objections.”The red-robed archbishop turned to Roger. “I’ll hold the line, you all go ahead.” Roger laughed strangely. “It’s good to have an elder by your side!” The dozen of them immediately began to besiege the dragon nest. Due to the large number of people, as well as the bloodline suppression provided by a lightning dragon, the killing process was exceptionally smooth. Throughout the entire battle, only one person was injured. Furthermore, he had run over to tame the flying dragon too quickly and sprained his ankle. Very soon, Roger and the others were each equipped with a spark flying dragon. The others were very satisfied, but Roger was only slightly satisfied. What he wanted the most was actually a light wyvern like Bruno, but unfortunately, light wyverns were a very rare mutated species. The next best thing was that he wanted a dragon. But now, he could only get a spark wyvern, which could only be said to be barely satisfactory. “Roger, there are many gems here, and more than twenty dragon eggs. Do you want to take them with you?” While cleaning up the Dragon Nest, a bishop asked. Roger sneered and said loudly on purpose, “In ancient China, there is a saying called ‘the friendship of a landlord’. The six members of the construction department helped us find this sparking dragon nest and stood by it for a long time. We should leave something for them.” “Well...; What should we leave? Just six dragon eggs. It’s quite suitable for them.” The other members of the Knights of truth laughed softly. Even the red-robed archbishop had a smile on his face. This kid Roger was quite good at insulting people. Xiang Tianxiu clenched his fists tightly, his face flushed red. If the opponent didn’t have a rank 8 fighter, he would have charged forward on the spot. This damned Roger was too detestable! “Let’s go. See you guys later. I hope that you can help us find a dragon nest next time. There are still quite a number of people in the Knights of truth who don’t Have Dragons.”Roger laughed and turned around to leave. “I really want to beat him up!”Xiang Tianxiu gnashed his teeth. Bai Xinghe patted his shoulder. “Young man, don’t be impatient. You’ll understand when you’re older...;” “Understand what?” “I can’t stand it anymore!”Bai Xinghe gritted his teeth. “Six dragon eggs, that’s fine. We didn’t participate in the whole process anyway.” Ye Yuqiu stared at the six dragon eggs in front of her with a helpless expression. Lin Xuan looked at one of the dragon eggs with a hint of surprise in his eyes. This surprise flashed past without anyone noticing. “Everyone, just pick one. It’s not bad to eat it.”The Silver Fox walked over and casually took one and prepared to grill the egg on the spot. “I’ll take one too. I’ve never eaten a sparking dragon egg before. I wonder what it tastes like.”Bai Xinghe took one as well. Lin Xuan pretended to choose from the dragon eggs and took one as well. “I won’t roast it. Maybe I can hatch a decent sparking dragon.” Since he was giving it to them to eat, it shouldn’t be a problem for him to take the unique dragon egg. Lin Xuan was even a little glad that he liked to use [ advanced observation ] to look around whenever he was free. Just now, he subconsciously threw a [ advanced observation ] at the six dragon eggs. The first five were all normal. They were just ordinary sparking dragon eggs with average aptitude. Only this dragon egg was extraordinary! —— Name: Sparks Flying Dragon Egg Level: Level 7, Level 1 Quality: seven-colored immortal Effect: hatches a Spark Flying Dragon Cub. Currently, the hatching progress is 26.44% . Soaking it in a liquid with the fire attribute can speed up the hatching progress. Description: it is indeed just an ordinary spark flying dragon egg. If it doesn’t have the origin of the mystical realm within it. —— Lin Xuan was shocked. It’s the origin of the mystical realm again! The origin of the mystical realm in Wei Ming kingdom last time was in the heart of the corpse dragon. But this time, it appeared in a Spark Dragon Egg. Roger and the others deliberately left these six dragon eggs to disgust them, and instead left him with such a great opportunity! “However, is the origin of the mystical realm an eggshell, or is it in the body of this little dragon? “If it’s inside the dragon’s body, I might have to eat the dragon egg if I want to obtain the origin of the secret realm. However, the dragon’s aptitude is not bad. I can nurture it well.” Lin Xuan still had the bloodline fruit that he had obtained in India’s Ring Sun City. If he fed it to the dragon cub, it might become even stronger. “I don’t understand. I’ll think about it after it hatches.” Lin Xuan immediately put the Dragon Egg into his space of consciousness and prepared some flame flowers to soak in the water as a breeding ground. At this time, Ye Yuqiu and the others had already burped loudly. “I’m full...;” “To be honest, it’s quite delicious.” Not long after, Li Weiguo rushed over with a dozen construction department staff. He was out of breath. Lu Luo excitedly asked, “Where’s the large dragon nest?” Silver Fox shrugged, “No, the Truth Knights beat us to it.” Ye Yuqiu went forward and described what had happened to Li Weiguo. Li Weiguo was furious. “We came all the way here to help, but we didn’t even let our people get a share. These things are really bad!” He was very angry, but there was nothing he could do. “However, the monsters in the east have been mostly dealt with. I’ll lead you to find the rest of the dragon nests. I’ll hold the line. You guys tame them, and try to get every agent to have a flying dragon.” “Yes!”Those who had not tamed the flying dragon were immediately overjoyed. In the next three days, the agents of the construction division fought in the east under the leadership of Li Weiguo. There were no casualties. However, Li Weiguo did not hide his bad temper when dealing with those agents who did not perform well. He went up and berated them. Some of those who could not accept it mentally were almost scolded to tears by him. In these three days, Gao Tianyuan, the Arctic army, and the follow-up warriors of the construction department also arrived one after another. Only India did not come. The reason was that their own strength had been severely damaged and they could not bring more people to help. Of course, everyone knew whether they were really like this. Ever since India attempted to invade the construction department’s Xiaoling Mountain Mystic Realm last time, they were beaten up by the construction department and even attacked the Jie Ri City Mystic Realm. After killing a large number of seventh and eighth rank warriors, India was like a man’s middle-aged blessing, it never stood up again. In these three days, except for a few people who were especially unlucky, all the construction department’s agents successfully tamed a flying dragon. Even if it was just a baby dragon, it was still considered a flying dragon. It could suppress the bloodline of brainless Dragon Beasts. After all, including the staff members of the construction division who arrived later, the number of tier 7 warriors sent by the construction division had already exceeded two thousand. Each person had a flying dragon. It was definitely a rather difficult task. For other organizations, they only needed to ensure that most of the elites could have a dragon. .. “The monsters in Dragon City have been basically eliminated! Please go to the designated place in the central region to rest and prepare to enter the Dragon Mountain Range!” A majestic voice suddenly resounded in the sky of Dragon City and entered everyone’s ears. “A voice that can be heard clearly by everyone in Dragon City. It must be a tier 9 warrior,”Silver Fox said with a sigh. Li Weiguo nodded, “It should be the commander of the Knights. I’m familiar with his voice.” After saying that, he waved his hand forcefully, signaling for everyone to follow him, “All the agents in the construction department are here! Target, Central District!” “Yes!” Behind him, more than 2,000 rank seven agents nodded heavily and marched forward in unison. The threat above the ruined city had been completely eliminated. As long as the hidden dangers in dragon mountain range were eliminated, everything would be restored to its original appearance. “It seems that the battle is almost over,”said black in a low voice. “So many level nine warriors have been killing in the secret realm for several days. Even the heavenly king has been killed,”said Silver Fox with a laugh. “Now that I think about it, we can go back in a few days at most. Unfortunately, I haven’t had enough fun yet.”Xiang Tianxiu looked relaxed and smiled slightly. Lin Xuan said,”...; When you guys say that, it makes me feel like my whole body is covered in flags.” “Don’t worry, there’s no problem. Everything will be fine.”Xiang Tianxiu did not care at all. After an hour of marching, the construction division officials arrived at the central area of Dragon City. Under the leadership of the head commander, this area had been divided into garrison areas. Moreover, there were also some martial artists who had the -LSB- cooking ] skiTheythey had already set up a big pot and were cooking delicious food. The fragrance of meat and rice, wrapped in the bloody wind, slowly drifted over, attracting the greed of many people. These few days, they had been eating dry food. They rarely had the time to sit down and cook by themselves. Now that there was steaming hot food beside them, no matter who it was, they were all overjoyed. “Logistics warriors, go to the big kitchen to get the food,”Li Weiguo said loudly. Whoosh, Whoosh, Whoosh. More than ten construction department staff stood up. Lin Xuan scratched his head and also stood up. In name, he was also a logistics warrior. Normally, logistics warriors would be protected by combat warriors, so they didn’t have to rush to the front line to fight. But at this time, it was natural for logistics warriors to take action. They could not always enjoy rights but not fulfill their obligations. They would be beaten up. Lin Xuan and these logistics warriors did not know each other. He nodded and followed a leader of the Knights of truth to the Big Kitchen. After passing through the crowd, they arrived here after a few minutes. Many dishes that had already been packed were already placed on the table. The chef was scooping out spoonfuls of beef and potato soup from a large iron pot and placing them into the container. “Beef and potato soup. It smells pretty good. The chef also knows quite a bit about it. Everyone can accept such dishes.” Lin Xuan nodded slightly. “Hello, construction department. 2,017 servings.” Lin Xuan smiled and said. The chef was stunned for a moment. “Construction Department wants so many servings?” Lin Xuan nodded. “We have so many people here, so of course we’ll eat more.” The chef scratched his head. “At the moment, we can’t take out more than 2,000 servings. How about this, we’ll provide you with 800 servings first, and you can come back later to collect them. How about it?” Lin Xuan nodded to show his understanding. However, just as he and the dozen or so logistics warriors were about to put them into the storage compartment, the warriors of the Salvation Army who were standing beside them saw this scene and immediately shouted. “What do you mean? Why should they take it first? !” The warriors of the Gaotian plain also echoed, “Yes, yes. Why are all the dishes given to the construction department? What About Us? Are We just going to wait?” The chef said helplessly, “This...;” He was not even a level seven warrior. He was just a level five warrior who had been temporarily transferred here to cook. How could he dare to offend these level seven warriors. Lin Xuan frowned. “Are you the first group to arrive at Dragon City?” The warrior from the Salvation Society was stunned for a moment and said subconsciously, “No...;” “Were you the first to clear out the monsters in the city?” “No...;” “The Salvation Society sent the most rescue workers?” The warrior from the Salvation Society was completely speechless and his face turned red. “No...;” Lin Xuan said calmly, “Then what right do you have to eat first?” The martial artist from the Salvation Army couldn’t stand it. He was embarrassed and angry. At this moment, a familiar impatient voice sounded. “What’s going on? The Allies of the Salvation Army have been waiting for so long, but there’s still no hot food?” “Huh? It’s You!” Lin Xuan also noticed this person. Well, it’s Roger again. Roger also recognized Lin Xuan at a glance and immediately revealed a playful look. “Are those six dragon eggs delicious? We specially saved them for you.” Lin Xuan smiled very happily. “They’re very delicious. Thank you for your gift. I’ll remember it forever.” These words came from the bottom of his heart and were not perfunctory at all. Roger was stunned. Why was the other party’s tone so...; sincere? Could it be that there was something wrong with his brain? “Cough...; I don’t want to talk about what happened before, but what’s going on here? I saw that the Warriors of the Salvation Society are all hungry. The Salvation Society is our firm ally of the Knights of truth. They must eat first!” Logue said loudly. As soon as he said this, he immediately attracted the praise of the dozen or so logistical warriors of the Salvation Society. “Well said!” “Just a passerby, you’re right.” “We should eat first!” Lin Xuan wanted to say something, but Roger interrupted him. “Forget about the ones you brought in. Leave all these on the table and give priority to the Salvation Army.” After saying that, Roger didn’t want to waste time here, so he turned around and was about to leave. The Warriors of the Salvation Army smiled and walked forward, ready to take all the food away. “Why don’t we wait for the next batch?”Someone next to Lin Xuan said in a low voice. They were all logistics warriors, but Logue was a serious warrior warrior. If they started a conflict now, they would be asking for trouble. Lin Xuan’s face was cold, and he pressed one hand on the table. “The Knights of Truth are yours? You can supply whoever you want first. These food belong to our construction division. It’s useless to say anything!” Roger stopped in his tracks and his tone turned cold. “You, a logistics warrior, dare to Talk Back to me?” The surrounding martial artists of the Salvation Army and Takama-ga-hara all laughed strangely when they saw this. All of them hugged their arms and watched the show. There was competition and cooperation between the six major organizations, but the overall competition was still greater than cooperation. To put it bluntly, if any organization collapsed and all the rank 9 martial artists suddenly died, the other organizations would definitely swarm over and eat them up. In addition, the construction division, the Salvation Society, and the Gaotian Plain were indeed not on good terms with each other. At this moment, they were naturally happy to watch the show. Roger turned around and stared coldly at Lin Xuan. “You’re just a logistics warrior. If I kill you now, the construction division won’t do anything to me.” “As a logistics warrior, you must have the awareness of a logistics warrior. You Can’t fight two without taking responsibility. What right do you have to Talk Back to me?” Roger walked over slowly with a cold smile. The Logistics Warriors behind Lin Xuan clenched their fists, but they could only lower their heads. Because Roger was right. Logistics warriors were born to lower their heads in front of combat warriors. “Lin Xuan, let’s go,”the logistics warrior behind him said in a low voice. “Go? Why do we have to go? Without the support of a large number of logistics warriors, how can combat warriors fight on the front line when they lack resources and hunger?” “In war, we compete in manpower, weapons, and resources!” A cold voice suddenly came from behind the logistics warriors of the construction division. Everyone turned around and immediately saw a cold-looking young man in a white robe. “I have some impression of this person. He seems to be an agent of the construction division, codenamed Cold Field.” “I have some impression too, but I remember that this person’s personality is very cold. Why did he suddenly come?” “Wait a minute. There seems to be someone behind Cold Field!” The Warriors of the Salvation Army conversed in a low voice. Suddenly, they saw a large group of people walking toward them from behind cold field. Shield ghost said, “Discrimination Against Logistics Warriors? Have you forgotten where the food in your mouth came from?” Poison blade said, “No one is superior or inferior. Only the one who has contributed more!” Then, flame explosion, milk brother, Lu Luo, Bai Xinghe, Xiang tianxiu, and the others also walked over quickly. The sudden appearance of so many people surprised Roger. He was just angry at a logistics warrior. Wasn’t the construction division a bit too much. Ye Yuqiu said in a clear voice, “Roger, what does your Truth Knights’doctrine say? All men are created equal. Why is it that when it comes to you, logistics warriors are inferior to battle warriors? You have violated the doctrine!” Roger was speechless. There really was such a doctrine in the teachings. But in the current Knights of Truth, very few people took this doctrine to heart. Who would have thought that ye Yuqiu, an agent of the construction department, actually knew more about the teachings of the Knights of truth than he did. Roger looked deeply at Lin Xuan, “I have violated the teachings. I am willing to be punished. Take this food first. Goodbye.” After saying that, he turned around and left. The Warriors of the Salvation Society and the Takama-ga-hara were stunned. Roger had surrendered so quickly. But thinking about it, it made sense. There were so many people from the construction division here. If Roger still wanted to be stubborn, they would probably have to have a friendly and peaceful exchange. Ye Yuqiu looked at Lin Xuan with appreciation, “Lin Xuan, you did the right thing! Any Logistics Warrior is an indispensable part of our construction division.” Xiang tianxiu nodded repeatedly. “However, if frost region and poison blade didn’t see that you guys hadn’t gone back, they would have come over to take a look. We wouldn’t have known.” Lin Xuan smiled. “Thank you, everyone.” Frost region and Poison Blade came over first, which was naturally his doing. Soon, hot dishes were placed in front of the construction division. Then, the other organizations seemed to have learned their lesson and did not deliberately find fault with them. In the camp of the Knights of Truth. Hall, the Knight of Light, passed by a few warriors and overheard them talking about this matter. “The people of the construction division are really making a big deal out of nothing. They actually surrounded so many people just for a logistics warrior.” “Yeah, yeah. Roger probably saw that they had more people, so he was at a disadvantage, so he turned around and left.” “What’s the name of that logistics warrior? I think his name is Lin Xuan, right? He also said that logistics warriors and battle warriors are equal. No matter how strong or weak, everyone is a part of the organization. Who are you lying to?” Hall heard it and frowned slightly. He walked over quickly and shouted, “What are you talking about!” The three bishops were so scared that they shivered and almost died. They quickly stood up and told Hall everything that had happened. Hall’s frown deepened. “Lord Hall, you have to save Roger’s face!” “Yes, yes, what did Roger do wrong? Of course, we and our allies should be the first to eat the food. Why should we give it to the construction department first?” “And he’s just a logistics warrior. How dare he talk back to Roger? He really doesn’t know his place.” The three bishops spoke one after another. They didn’t even notice that the veins on Hall’s forehead were already bulging. “Bastard!” Hall rebuked angrily. The three bishops nodded repeatedly, “You’re right! Those guys from the construction division are all bastards!” “I’m talking to you! and Roger!”Hall’s voice became louder as he rebuked again. The three bishops were all dumbfounded. Their necks shrunk like a turtle. “How foolish. Do you think that you are superior to others just because you can fight? Do you think that you are more noble than the logistics warriors and those low-level warriors?” “Big Mistake!” “You are bishops, you should have a deeper understanding of the teachings. All of you, go back and copy the teachings ten times!” Hall cursed angrily. The three bishops had sad faces, “Yes...;” “Also, call Roger over! I want to scold him face to face!”Hall scolded again. “Yes...;”the three of them ran away. Soon, Hall’s loud scolding towards Roger was also spread to the other organizations’camps. The construction division immediately laughed out loud. “Hall is the vice leader of the Knights, right? He’s really a good person.”Xiang Tianxiu said in surprise. “Compared to the Cardinal clan, the Knights are actually closer to us. Unfortunately, other than the first pope, the last two popes were all from the Cardinal clan.”Ye Yuqiu shook her head. “Oh? There’s such a thing. Tell me about it.”Lin Xuan became spirited. These things were not written in the information that Li Weiguo gave them. Ye yuqiu nodded, “When the truth knights were founded, they were a group of warriors with the spirit of knights. In the beginning, there were only knights.” “Later on, after conquering the monsters and secret realms, they gradually established their faith in the god of truth. From then on, the Cardinals appeared.” “After that, the Cardinal Group and the Knights slowly formed a confrontation, which was also the two factions within the Knights of Truth.” “Because the knights often went on expeditions, they suffered a lot of casualties, so their overall power was gradually taken over by the Cardinal Group.” Ye Yuqiu said calmly, “This generation’s great leader has publicly clashed with the cardinal archbishop many times. This isn’t any big news.” The construction department staff who had gathered around all nodded their heads when they heard this. At the same time, they were also very emotional. If the two factions of the Knights of truth could use their strength together, they would probably be much stronger. .. After a night of rest, all the warriors were in high spirits. Li Weiguo got up early and was waiting for the order to enter the dragon mountain range. At this time, the head captain walked out of the light door of the secret realm. Lin Xuan noticed that the armor on his body was quite shiny last time, but this time there were many dents and blood stains. It seemed that the battle between a level nine warrior and a level nine monster was very fierce. “There are no level nine monsters on the ground of the Dragon Mountain Range. Listen to my order, all warriors below level eight enter the Dragon Mountain Range!” The head commander roared loudly. His voice was extremely loud and resounded in everyone’s ears. “Yes!” The Warriors from the construction division, the Truth Knight Order, The Salvation Society, the Arctic Army, and the Gaotian plain answered in unison. The Warriors from the five organizations entered in an orderly manner. Among them, the Truth Knight Order had the most people. They had more than 4,000 people. After all, they were fighting on the mainland. Next was the construction division, which had more than 2,000 people. The Salvation Society and the Arctic army only had about 1,000 people. The people of the highland were even fewer, only about 800 people. As a logistics warrior, Lin Xuan was protected in the center of the crowd and entered the dragon mountain range. After passing through the light gate of the arcane realm, his vision blurred, and the scene suddenly changed. Looking around, it was not the rumored lush green forest and grassland filled with birds singing and flowers. Instead, it was the dry land, charred trees, and the corpses of monsters everywhere. Looking Up, it was more intuitive. The Dragon mountain range, which was 2,400 meters high, seemed to have taken off its green clothes and become completely bare. At this moment, there were still endless flames slowly burning on each mountain peak. Lin Xuan took a deep breath and immediately smelled the smell of flames, blood, and death in the air of the secret realm. Not only them, who were rank seven warriors, but even Li Weiguo, who was a rank eight warrior, was a little shocked. In the past, they had been to the dragon mountain range as exchange personnel or trade personnel, but every time they came to the dragon mountain range, they were full of vitality and all creatures were competing for power. This time, what appeared in front of them was such a desolate and cruel scene. “Tier 7 warriors, your mission is to clear all the tier 7 monsters on the ground of the Dragon Mountain Range.” “Tier 8 warriors, your mission is to clear the tier 8 monsters.” “Remember, once you encounter the situation of the ground cracking and the air heating up, turn around and run without saying a word!” The commander of the Knights looked around and said in a clear voice. Lin Xuan’s heart sank. His words made him feel that the dragon mountain range was full of danger. “The essence I have now can reach level 7 or 9 in one go, but I don’t have any extra essence to level up my skills.” “Since it’s so dangerous here, let’s raise the warrior level first. At the same time, let’s see what class materials I need to level up.” Lin Xuan watched the leader enter a cave and disappear. Li Weiguo shouted, “All members of the construction division, split into two groups according to the previous arrangement!” “Remember, our mission is only to clear the monsters on the ground. Don’t go underground!” “Once we clear all the monsters on the ground, everyone will leave the secret realm!” “Yes!” Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu were still in the same group, and the two immediately entered the mountain range. As they advanced, Lin Xuan invested 30 million essence points to raise the level of a fighter from level seven, level six to level seven, level nine in one go. Moreover, he also filled up all the essence points required for level seven, level nine, and thus met the requirements for advancement. The 27 free attribute points obtained from leveling were all invested into vitality. Lin Xuan opened his data panel and looked at his own information with satisfaction. —— Name: Lin Xuan Level: Tier 7 and tier 9(can be promoted) Essence: 9,000,000/9,000,000 Class: Overlord (Golden Peerless) Attributes: Vitality 517, Strength 272, spirit 282, agility 277 Skills: Avatar (Rainbow) , all-rounded bone armor (Dark Gold) , Elemental Lord (dark gold) , monarch engine (dark gold) .. Equipment: Shadow Cloak (Dark Gold) , flame lord set (Dark Gold) , Indestructible Overlord set (Dark Gold) , Lionheart Tower Shield (gold) .. —— He focused his attention on the “Upgradable”at the back of his level, and a new interface immediately appeared in front of his eyes. —— Requirements for upgrading: 1. At least 1 mystical realm king upgrade material, at most 5 mystical realm king upgrade materials. 2. Overlord’s proof: Kill 100 Monsters of the same level without using any potions when HP is below 50% . Promotion Preview: 1. Class skill [ attribute bestowal ] has been upgraded: 40% of the highest attributes will be added to the other three attributes. 2. Class skill [ blood of the dominator ] has been upgraded: the ratio of vitality to HP has been increased from 1:10 to 1:50. —— After reading the promotion requirements and the promotion preview, Lin Xuan immediately felt as if he was enveloped by a great happiness. “This is too powerful...;” “After advancing to tier 8, my [ attribute bestowal ] has increased by 10% , but this small 10% can provide me with an additional 15 attributes.” “As for this new class skill, [ blood of the Conqueror ] , it’s even more insane. Compared to warriors with the same physique, my HP is five times higher than his! This also brings about a huge error tolerance rate.” “However, the requirements to level up are a bit high. If My HP is less than 50% , killing 100 monsters of the same level...; Let’s not talk about anything else. How am I supposed to lower my hp by less than half and self-harm?” Thinking about how painful self-harm was, Lin Xuan felt a chill run down his spine. This level up quest was a bit targeted. “Lin Xuan, what are you waiting for? Keep up. If you’re too far behind me, I can’t protect you.”Ye Yuqiu noticed that he was stunned and quickly called out. “I’m Coming, I’m Coming.” Lin Xuan coughed lightly and immediately followed. In the next few days, they witnessed all kinds of strange movements in the Dragon Mountain Range. The ground suddenly cracked and the air suddenly heated up. These were all normal things. Other than that, there were also strange things like the sudden brightness of the Sun. Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu narrowly escaped every time. But the others were not so lucky. Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu also ran into other teams from the construction division in the past few days. Some teams only had one person left, while others were even more miserable. They ran into two burnt and chopped-up bodies. Of course, not only the construction division, but many warriors from other organizations also died or were injured. Everyone knew that these abnormal signs were probably caused by the giant Sun Dragon in the underground world. As for how it triggered these abnormal signs and why it had such terrifying power, no one knew. .. In the southeast of the Dragon Mountain Range, most of the seventh-tier warriors of the Salvation Society were here to clear out the monsters. A handsome young man with brown hair had commanded more than a dozen people behind him not long ago to besiege and kill a group of giant dragons. At the moment, he was collecting the spoils of war. What was surprising was that their overall strength was extraordinarily tyrannical. After killing a group of giant dragons, they did not die. The person with the heaviest injury only had a large dent in his chest, after drinking a bottle of great life potion, he could recover. At this time, the communication device of the brown-haired young man lit up. “Adamson, take your men and immediately go to a valley in the southern part of the giant dragon mountain range to ambush. — sir.” “Sir’s orders?”Adamson was slightly surprised. Sir, a Rank 8 fighter of the ninth rank, the Hawk faction of the Salvation Society, the strongest rank 8 fighter after the blood demon Kodo. He had occupied the second place on the rank 8 list for three consecutive years. After Kodo’s mysterious disappearance, Sir was the strongest rank 8 fighter of the Salvation Society. Even now that Kodo had returned, the one with the highest reputation was still sir. That was because the knight was young and strong enough. “Going to ambush over there, are we going to make a move against the level 7 fighters of the construction division?”Adamson nodded slightly, “That’s good too. The construction division has been in the limelight too much recently. We should also demoralize them. It would be best if we directly beat them up like India in this battle.” “Quickly clean up the battlefield, Keep Up!”He shouted. “Yes!”More than a dozen warriors of the Salvation Army replied in unison. .. Northwest of the Dragon Mountain Range. Shimada Longya and Hirano Suntai were preparing to hunt a group of flying dragons here. But just as they were about to rush out, Shimada Longya’s communicator rang. He looked down and saw a message. “Shimada Longya, I order your team to immediately approach the valley in the south of the dragon mountain range. Wait for orders when they arrive at the destination. Takeda Shinobu.” He did not avoid Hirano Sunda when he looked at the communication device, so Hirano Sunda could see it clearly. “Brother Iwata, this is...;”Hirano Sunda’s expression froze. Iwata nagata also said calmly, “It should be an ambush for the construction department’s martial artists. I knew it before I came.” “But, you chased away all the members of the team. How are we going to bring the other members of the team to participate in the battle?”Hirano Sunda smiled awkwardly. Shimada long also sneered. “I didn’t say that I was going.” Shimada long was at a loss. “AH...;” “With the intelligence of the higher-ups of the construction division, it’s impossible for them not to have thought of this,”Shimada long said calmly. “Their so-called encirclement and killing of the construction division will probably become a prelude to their destruction in the end!” Shimada Long was stunned. “You used to be a member of the Sato martialists. Now, you have the trust and promotion of the leader. But if you disobey the military order now, I’m afraid...;” Shimada long also smiled. “If your superior is dead, who will know if you disobey the military order?” Hirano Yang didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. Previously, when he didn’t interact with Shimada long, he felt that this person was as high and unreachable as the god of war in the sky. He was the Sato Warrior’s strongest weapon and the strongest warrior of the Takama-ga-hara’s younger generation. However, now that he had interacted with him for a long time, he had a new opinion of Shimada long. This person was cold and arrogant. Under the appearance of being loyal to the organization, there was a strange and disloyal heart. “I hope...; That guy doesn’t die.”Shimada long also smiled toward the south, and a dark green figure appeared in front of him. Poison Blade. .. In the Western Region of the dragon mountain range. There were a large number of warriors of the Truth Knights here. Bruno, Roger, Bernie, and the others were all hunting monsters here. “Your Highness, Bernie, the higher-ups have ordered you to head north to meet Lord Hall. There is a group of powerful dragons with the bloodline of the Sun Dragon. We must get rid of them as soon as possible. Otherwise, they will become a huge hidden danger.” Roger walked forward and said seriously to Bruno and Bernie. Bernie was stunned when he heard that. He immediately nodded and said, “Okay, we will immediately head north.” Bruno asked, “What About You? Don’t you need to go there?” Roger pointed to the south. “A giant dragon with the bloodline of a giant Sun Dragon has appeared in the south. I’ll bring some people there to meet up with a red-robed archbishop.” “Alright.”Although Bruno was still puzzled, he did not ask any more questions. He brought his people and rode the giant light dragon towards the north quickly. Roger looked at their backs and a cold smile appeared on his face. “Let’s Go! Go to the southern valley and ambush the construction department!” Beep Beep! Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu had just killed a level seven and level eight poisonous flying dragon when their communicators rang at the same time. “Information from the Knights of truth. There is a group of giant dragons with the bloodline of the Giant Sun Dragon in the southern Valley of the Dragon Mountain Range. They don’t have enough manpower to kill them. Please approach the construction department warriors near the southern part of the Dragon mountain range and approach the valley.”. — Li Weiguo.” After Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu read the message, their eyes became playful. “This should be the plan that Bruno talked about,”ye Yuqiu said coldly. Lin Xuan nodded. If they hadn’t communicated with Bruno and gotten the note, they would probably have followed the order to go to the valley. If they went there, they would probably be walking into a trap. When that happened, whether they lived or died was not something they could decide for themselves. “But there are only a small group of construction department agents who know about this. Most people don’t know. What if they go there and walk into a trap?”Ye Yuqiu frowned. There were more than two thousand level 7 fighters in the construction department. Lin Xuan only had time to tell Bruno’s reminder to the three hundred people who had started it. Just as Lin Xuan was about to speak, a new message appeared on their communicators. “Private message: the information provided by the Knights of truth is unclear and dangerous. After a temporary discussion between chief Gao and chief Lu, we have decided to send some agents to form an advance team to the southern Valley to test the other party’s actions.” “If the other party makes a move, the advance team will immediately retreat and lure the other party into the ambush location.” “Members who have joined the advance team, please come to this location to look for me. The advance team needs to be at least level 7, and there are currently tens of people in the advance team. As long as you join the advance team, you can choose any dark gold skill book after you return to the construction division.”. — Li Weiguo At the bottom of the message was a coordinate. Following this coordinate, one would be able to find Li Weiguo. Seeing this message, Lin Xuan immediately laughed. “You see, the directors already have a plan.” “However, this message should only be sent to a portion of the agents and not all of them. This is because there might be spies among the construction department’s agents.” “Do you want to go?”He asked. Ye Yuqiu nodded her head repeatedly. She seemed to be moved, but in the end, she firmly shook her head. “You don’t want to go?”Lin Xuan was very surprised. Ye Yuqiu didn’t seem to be a timid person. Ye Yuqiu shook her head. “If I Go, who will protect you?” Lin Xuan couldn’t help but laugh. This ye Yuqiu’s sense of protecting others was too good. “I can temporarily team up with others. You can go. That’s a dark gold skill book.” “Also, don’t underestimate my strength.” Lin Xuan smiled. Ye Yuqiu looked at him seriously. She didn’t see any fear in Lin Xuan’s eyes. “This guy...; he’s clearly just a logistics warrior. Usually, shield demon and flame burst protect him. Where does he get his confidence from?” Ye Yuqiu muttered in her heart and then said, “I might as well bring you to teacher Li. I’ll be relieved if I hand you over to teacher Li.” Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry, “Sure.” The two immediately followed the coordinates and quickly found Li Weiguo. There were already more than ten people gathered in this open space. Most of them were acquaintances. There were also a few...; Lin Xuan’s clones. “All of you want to go? No, flame blast isn’t suitable for this kind of situation where the enemy is lured in.”Li Weiguo immediately rejected flame blast’s request. “I can.”Poison Blade raised his hand. “Your level has reached level 7?”Li Weiguo stared blankly. Poison blade smiled, “You can use the observation skill to check.” After saying this, he immediately used [ advanced disguise ] to disguise his level as Level 7. Li Weiguo looked and saw that it really was level 7. “Since your level fits, you’re an assassin and your movements are agile. You can go.” Ye Yuqiu took a step forward, “Teacher Li, I’ll sign up for the advance team.” Shield ghost, Black, and the others also signed up. Li Weiguo checked them one by one. What made him a bit confused was that shield ghost, cold field, and the others had all reached level 7. “How Strange...; They were only level 7, level 3, and Level 4 not long ago. How did they grow so fast?” Soon, a ten-man advance team was formed. Poison Blade, Ye Yuqiu, black, Xiang tianxiu, and the others were among them. “We’ll leave this team to Ye Yuqiu. is everyone okay?”Li Weiguo asked. “No,”everyone replied. “Okay, I’ll repeat it again. Your mission is to investigate the other side’s actions. Chief Gao seriously suspects that the other side is trying to set us up, trying to trap a group of Level 7 fighters.” “Me, Xiang shallow view, and the other tier 8 martial artists will follow behind you. If there’s any danger, immediately move towards our direction. We can take the opportunity to counterattack the other party. “If they really want to make a move, then we have to be prepared for many people to die!” Li Weiguo said seriously. “Understood!”Everyone replied again. Xiang Tianxiu shrunk his neck. “My mother is coming too?” Li Weiguo sneered, “So, behave well, or else you will definitely get a beating.” Xiang tianxiu nodded repeatedly and touched his butt, as if he recalled something that he couldn’t bear to look back on but happened often. “Alright, go.”Li Weiguo nodded. Ye Yuqiu said in a low voice, “Teacher Li, I’ll leave Lin Xuan to you to take care of. He’s a logistics fighter. Without me by his side, I’m a little worried.” Li Weiguo was stunned and couldn’t help but laugh. “Alright, then I’ll help you take care of it.” Only then did ye Yuqiu leave in peace. Li Weiguo patted Lin Xuan on the shoulder and smacked his lips. “Why do I Feel Like Ye Yuqiu is a mother who’s worried about her child? Me, I feel like a nanny entrusted by her mother.” Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. “I’m really not that weak.” Li Weiguo looked like he understood everything and nodded. “I understand, I understand. You have to be strong.” Lin Xuan was even more speechless now. Alright, if you want to be strong, then you have to be strong. He and Li Weiguo waited here for half an hour before the other tier 8 warriors arrived. The leader was a tall and slender woman. She was beautiful, elegant, and beautiful. She was Xiang Tianxiu’s mother, Xiang Qianyi. Behind her, there was also the person-in-charge of the third gathering place of the Little Spirit Mountain Mystic Realm, Old Man Wu, and other tier 8 martial artists. Lin Xuan counted once. There were a total of eleven tier 8 martial artists! The aura emitted from their bodies was very powerful. One look and one could tell that they were people with rich battle experience. What surprised him even more was that there was actually a blond-haired, blue-eyed, burly man among them. “Trident, I didn’t expect you to come.”Li Weiguo seemed to be very surprised as well. He didn’t expect this man to come as well. The burly man laughed loudly. “My teacher asked me to come. Besides, how could I not come for such a big event? Fighting is my favorite thing.” “Your teacher is...; I remember now. Senior Ivan, Right?”Li Weiguo nodded. Old Ivan’s prestige in the Arctic army was very high. Many rank eight martial artists and even the current leader of the Arctic army were personally trained by him. The burly man chuckled and said in a low voice, “The old man told me to let go and kill. It’s best to kill a few people from the Gaotian plain to appease his anger.” Li Weiguo and Xiang Qianyu also smiled. Old Ivan was already old and did not have much time left to live. Whether he could break through to rank 9 depended on whether he could live until that day. In the end, he was even locked up in the eighth level of the Asura prison by the Gaotian plain for several years. No one could stand this. “Who is this kid?”Trident noticed the only level seven warrior present. He pointed at Lin Xuan and asked doubtfully. “He is a logistics warrior. He is in the same group as ye Yuqiu. Ye Yuqiu entered the advance team and asked me to take care of him.”Li Weiguo patted Lin Xuan’s shoulder, “However, he has two skills, golden [ forging ] and golden [ pharmacy ] . He is different from ordinary logistics warriors.” Hearing the first half of the sentence, Trident only glanced at Lin Xuan and did not look at him again. But after hearing the second half of the sentence, his eyes suddenly lit up. “Good Kid, you have some strength. Are you interested in joining our Arctic Army?”Trident laughed. Xiang Qianyi rolled his eyes. “No way, poaching people in front of us?” Everyone laughed at the same time. “The advance team should have walked a long way. We should follow them,”Li Weiguo looked at the time and suddenly said. “Okay!”Everyone nodded. Li Weiguo smiled at Lin Xuan. “Lin Xuan, follow us. We Won’t stop just for you.” Xiang Qian ‘er glanced at Lin Xuan. “How about I Carry You on my back?” Lin Xuan shook his head repeatedly. “It’s fine, it’s fine. I’ll try my best to keep up with everyone.” “Heh, you’re quite a strong logistics warrior.”Trident chuckled. “If sister Xiang wants to carry me, I’ll definitely be more than happy.” “I’ll give you a punch!” Xiang Qian looked up and punched with a fist the size of a casserole. Bang Bang. Eleven tier 8 warriors stomped on the ground fiercely, and their bodies shot out like arrows leaving the bowstring. Charred trees quickly swept past them on both sides, raising waves of ashes. However, what surprised the level eight warriors was that Lin Xuan did not lag too far behind them. Instead, he followed closely behind them. Moreover, even if he was temporarily left behind, he would still use his fastest speed to catch up. The longest distance was only about 300 meters. Old Man Wu said in surprise, “This kid has been selling all kinds of potions in the Xiaoling Mountain Mystic Realm. I didn’t expect his attributes to be so good. He can barely keep up with our running speed.” “Indeed.”Trident nodded slightly. Logistics warriors had to put a lot of essence into logistics skills such as [ forging ] , [ cooking ] , and [ pharmacy ] . It was difficult for their own warriors to keep up with their levels, so naturally, their attributes would be one level lower than others. After twenty minutes of long-distance running, Lin Xuan and the others arrived at their destination. The twelve of them quickly found a hidden place and hid there. Shallow view took out a telescope from the storage compartment. It was not an ordinary telescope, but a piece of equipment. With this telescope, they could see farther, and any person or thing they saw would automatically reveal rough information. It was equivalent to having an [ observation ] . “There is indeed a group of giant dragons in that valley, and they are emitting hot heat. The surrounding trees are all burnt.” “I can’t see any signs of people,”Xiang Shensi said seriously. “It might be a large-scale illusion. We must be careful,”Trident said in a low voice. Old Man Wu nodded, “That makes sense.” Lin Xuan stood beside them. He looked like a shivering level 7 rookie, but in fact, he had already switched to the perspective of poison blade. “This should be the destination. Where are they?” Ye Yuqiu looked at the valley ahead and frowned. They could even see the Dragons in the valley from afar, but they couldn’t see the people from other organizations. You F * cking asked us to come and support you, but where did your own people go? A few minutes later, a few figures dashed out from the nearby forest. The leader was Roger. There were five people behind him. Each of them was covered in blood and their clothes were tattered. “You’re finally here...;”Roger laughed bitterly, his face pale. “What happened?”Ye Yuqiu looked puzzled, “Weren’t you supposed to wait for us outside? Why are there so many casualties?” Logue laughed bitterly, “We were indeed waiting outside, but those dragons seemed to smell our scent and rushed out for no reason. We were forced to fight.” “Because we were caught off guard at the start of the battle, we suffered heavy losses!” Logue covered his face and wept, his expression sorrowful. No one could tell that he was faking it. “How many dragons are there? Can We deal with them together?”Xiang Tianxiu asked. Logue glanced at Ye Yuqiu and the others indiscernibly and found that there were only ten of them. He immediately shook his head, “No, there are too few people.” “There are more than a hundred dragons in there. As you know, a dragon requires at least two warriors of the same level to deal with it. So, at least two hundred people are needed.” Luo ge sighed, “That’s why I asked the nearby warriors to come here as soon as possible. I didn’t expect there to only be a few of you.” He was already cursing in his heart. What the hell was going on? Only these few people were coming over. The higher-ups had ordered a large ambush. At least 500 level 7 fighters of the construction department should be buried here. It would be even better if they could kill a few level 8 fighters. What did it mean to only have ten people here? Roger’s heart thumped. Could it be that they had discovered it. Ye Yuqiu said apologetically, “Our team happened to be cleaning up the flying dragon’s nest nearby. It was the closest to here, so we rushed over as soon as possible.” “I’m really sorry. If we knew the situation here was so serious, we would have waited for more people to come.” Logue waved his hand. “Forget it. It’s not your fault.” He quietly sized up these ten people. He suddenly felt that it wouldn’t be too bad if these ten people died. Because these ten people were all famous characters on the global tier 7 leaderboards. Ye Yuqiu, shield ghost, and even poison blade. If he killed them, it would be the same as killing many future tier 8 or even tier 9 warriors. Not a loss! Moreover, killing them now wouldn’t affect the construction department’s staff who would rush over later. But if he didn’t kill them now, he would wait until there were more people before killing them. If he waited too long, things would change. Roger understood this and said seriously, “How about this. We first draw out those giant dragons at the edges and surround them.” “According to our observation, the dragons are not a whole, but a few scattered groups, just like a tribe.” Lin Xuan listened to their conversation through the poison blade and sneered. Roger had seen the dagger in the end. It seemed that Roger had realized that it was better to kill these people now. In any case, these people were all very promising fighters. Killing one wouldn’t be a loss. Killing two would be a gain. Killing all of them would be a huge gain! “That’s fine. Then you guys lead the way. We’ll go in and take a look.”Ye Yuqiu thought carefully and immediately nodded her head. “Don’t worry. We’re more familiar with this valley.”Logue straightforwardly patted his chest and directly walked in front. Ye Yuqiu wanted to follow behind, but poison blade beat her to it. “I’m an assassin, so my movement speed is faster. I’ll go in with him to investigate. If anything happens, I’ll be able to escape as soon as possible.”Poison Blade said in a low voice. Logue cursed in his heart. Why did something come up again. Was he so meticulous? ! But he didn’t dare reveal the slightest bit of it. He was afraid that if he revealed any strange emotions, it would cause ye Yuqiu and the others to be wary and suspicious. “As expected of poison blade. I’ve long heard that you’re very strong. I didn’t expect you to be so cautious.”Logue nodded his head slightly. On the contrary, he seemed to be very appreciative. “Then let’s go in.”Poison blade nodded his head. “Okay, I’ll lead the way.” Logue was in front, while poison blade was behind. Ye Yuqiu and the other nine were waiting outside the valley. Logue was smiling on the surface, but evil thoughts were already rising in his heart. The level eight Knight of the Salvation Society, Takeda Ninja of the Takama-ga-hara, the Cardinal of the Knights of Truth, and hundreds of level seven warriors were guarding the corner of the valley. As long as he brought the poison blade over and disappeared from the sight of Ye Yuqiu and the others, the three level eight warriors would be able to attack as fast as lightning. He could guarantee that the poison blade would not be able to say a single word and would die on the spot! “So that’s how it is, hidden in the valley...;” Lin Xuan had already keenly sensed that a large number of people were hiding in the valley through his [ advanced perception ] . “Xiang Qiantu and the others can’t see what’s happening in the valley. It seems that they really are being obscured by some illusion.” “It’s right in front. Follow me, follow me.”Roger put his index finger to his mouth and shushed. At the same time, he squatted down and carefully moved forward. Lin Xuan praised him in his heart. In the past few meetings, Roger had left him with the impression that he was arrogant, cold, and competitive. But now, Roger’s performance was simply at the level of best actor! Of course, he was still a little inferior to him. After all, he was a super best actor who had maintained six different characters for a long time without falling apart. “Wait, I feel a hint of danger. The giant dragon is very likely nearby.” After poison blade said that, he activated [ swift lightning ] and turned around to run. When Roger turned around, he ate a mouthful of dust. “You...; I...;” Roger’s lungs were about to explode. Poison Blade ran a few steps and found Roger Standing Still. He ran back and pulled him along. “Don’t just stand there, run! The dragon is inside, I can feel it!” Roger’s face was stiff, and he was dragged out by poison blade. “You...; How Can You Feel It?” “Are you stupid? I’m an assassin, so I must have a skill related to perception. That moment was really dangerous. If we go around it, I might not die, but a mage like you will definitely die!” Poison Blade ran out of the valley in one breath. He patted his chest and said with lingering fear. Roger was already roaring crazily in his heart. F * ck! I’ll die my ass! It’s you who should die! At this moment, in the valley, the knight, Takeda Ninja, and the others were also very depressed. They had already gathered their strength and were ready to go. But in the next moment, Hey, that Kid ran away! Moreover, judging from the tone and actions of that kid, he did not discover anyone hiding in the valley at all. He even thought that there was a huge dragon hidden there. If he had really discovered that there was an ambush in the valley, Poison Blade would definitely not have dragged Roger out with him. Takeda could not bear it any longer. “This poison blade is quite moral...;” The Knight’s expression was cold. “However, he is quite moral, yet he has caused such a huge mess in your takama-ga-hara.” Takeda could not help but smile. Back then, he had quite taken a fancy to this poison blade. He had even sent poison blade an invitation, hoping that he would join the skyfeather craftsman. Now that he thought about it, he really laughed his head off. “Let’s Wait a little longer. It’s inevitable for assassins to have sharper senses. As long as Logue brings them all in, then don’t waste any more time. Kill them all with lightning-fast methods,”the knight said coldly. “Yes.”Takeda Shinobu and the others nodded. Outside the Valley, Logue coughed lightly. “Actually...; I feel that there might be a problem with your senses. For example, I didn’t sense any danger. Could it be that you’re being paranoid?” Poison blade sneered, “If a mage like you can sense danger, then there’s something wrong.” Logue clenched his fists, but could only reveal an awkward smile,”...; that’s true.” “So...; we’re not going in?”Ye Yuqiu coughed lightly. Poison Blade shook his head, and then seemed to come to a sudden realization, “I get it. You’re bringing us in to die!” The next moment he suddenly burst out without warning. Poison-dipped dagger ruthlessly stabbed at Roger’s back! Before Roger could react, the sharp short sword had already pierced through his heart. Its speed and strength were so fierce that he could not dodge or block. He could not even take out his life-saving items. This poison blade attack, with all kinds of critical strikes, was enough to instantly kill most martial artists of the same level. Previously, in the Wei Ming country’s secret realm, even that tier 8 martial artist had been killed by this terrifying critical hit. As a mage, Logue naturally did not have a very high physique. One critical hit, and he was taken away! Plop. Logue’s HP was reduced to zero. His eyes widened in anger, and he was lying on the ground in disbelief. “There’s an ambush in the valley. Let’s Retreat!” Poison Blade grabbed the items that Rogge had dropped. He immediately shouted and turned around to run. Ye Yuqiu and the others followed suit. In the valley, Knight, Takeda Ninja, and the others gaped in shock. How did that Kid find out? ! “Rogge...; Rogge is dead...; ...;” The Cardinal of the Knights of Truth stammered when he saw this scene. The rank 7 warriors of the Knights of truth were also shocked. If an ordinary rank 7 warrior had died, the cardinal would not have lost his composure like this. But Logue was the grandson of the Cardinal! The Cardinal was God in the Cardinal! Now, they could only watch as the grandson of the Cardinal died. If they couldn’t catch the murderer alive, the Grand Cardinal would definitely be furious! The red-robed grand cardinal roared, “Do it now! We can’t let them escape!” The Knight and Takeda Ninja looked at each other and nodded their heads. They were both level 8 fighters, and their attributes far surpassed poison blade, Ye Yuqiu, and the other level 7 fighters. This distance wasn’t far. As long as they activated their skills, they would be able to catch up. Even though they didn’t know how Poison Blade’s senses were so sharp that he had actually discovered them, since poison blade had seen through their ambush, they definitely couldn’t let them leave alive! One by one, they would all die! Whoosh! Whoosh! Whoosh! Three figures rushed out. The Knight was the fastest. Takeda ninja followed closely behind, while the red-robed archbishop was at the back. In the end, there were two other level 8 fighters, both from Takama-ga-hara. The Knight was an assassin. His high agility gave him a huge boost, allowing him to quickly close the distance between him and poison blade and the others. Furthermore, the knight also had a long-range attack skill. As long as he got close enough, he was confident that he could instantly kill a few of them. “Run, run, no one can save you!” The knight laughed coldly, his face revealing a mocking expression that was as high as a cat catching a mouse. At the same time, in a hidden area not far away. Xiang Qian Ju, who had been observing the situation in the valley, suddenly had a change in expression. “Poison Blade killed Roger. Sir Wu, Takeda Ninja, and the others chased after him from the valley. There were a total of five level 8s. They had indeed set up an ambush long ago!” Trident laughed coldly. “These guys have been scheming and fighting among themselves. They still want to suppress our people at this time.” Old Man Wu stood up. “Should we do it now?” Everyone looked at shallow gaze. Among all the people present, she was the one with the strongest combat power. The leader of these eleven people was naturally not her. “Wait...; Wait a little longer.” Shallow gaze took a few deep breaths. As a Tier 8 martial artist had obtained the second class skill, their combat power would increase exponentially. Moreover, the rarer the class, the stronger the second class skill would be! This resulted in tier 8 martial artists finding it harder to kill their opponents than tier 7 martial artists. All kinds of powerful skills, class skills, and life-saving tools were used frequently. In a battle between tier 8 martial artists, it was all about strength and foundation! Unless...; They were caught off guard from the start! Xiang Qianou wanted to kill all five level eight warriors, so she couldn’t let any of them escape. Therefore, she had to lure the enemy deeper and deeper. Trident said in a low voice, “Sister Xiang, aren’t you afraid that your own son will die under the blade of the Knight?” Xiang Qianou’s gaze was firm. “My son, Xiang Qianou, will not be so cowardly. I believe in him.” “Of course, if he really dies, I will kill a hundred level 7 members of the Salvation Society to avenge him!” Li Weiguo and old man Wu both sighed lightly. Xiang Qianyu and Xiang Tianxiu had a very delicate relationship. Xiang Qianyu was always out and rarely met Xiang Tianxiu. Every time they met, they would ask how their strength had improved. If they did not meet her requirements, they would pluck Xiang Tianxiu’s butt and give him a good spanking. At this moment, the distance between the knight and Poison Blade had already closed. “Ye Yuqiu, you’ll be the first to die!” The knight laughed coldly. Suddenly, a flying knife shot out from his sleeve. This flying knife was astonishingly fast. When it flew out from his sleeve, it emitted a sonic boom. One second, it was still in his sleeve. The next moment, it almost hit ye Yuqiu’s back. Poison Blade’s eyes and hands were quick. He immediately took a step and rushed behind ye Yuqiu. “Blocking a knife to save someone? ridiculous. Even if you block a knife, you have to have the ability to do so!” “Killing poison blade is the same.” The knight sneered. He didn’t care about Poison Blade’s actions at all. At this moment, Xiang Qianyu suddenly sucked in a breath of cold air. “Poison Blade...;” Just as the Knight had said, if they went to save someone without the ability, there was a high chance that they would be sending themselves to their deaths. All they had to do was to protect their own lives. Poison Blade wanted to do something that was beyond his ability. If he did not die, then who would. The next moment, the throwing knife directly shattered the armor on poison Blade’s back and pierced into his body! However, the expected scene of the throwing knife directly piercing through his chest did not appear. <b>?</b>The flying knife was actually stuck in the bones and muscles of poison blade’s body. He did not die, but his face suddenly lost its color and turned completely pale. This flying knife also brought a huge amount of kinetic energy, almost making him lose his balance. However, Poison Blade’s reaction was extremely fast. Instead, he used this kinetic energy to increase his speed once again, directly charging into the protection of the 11 rank 8 martial artists. The Knight was stunned. Not Dead? A single strike from a rank 8 or rank 9 martial artist was actually not able to instantly kill a rank 7 martial artist? If this were to be released, he would probably be laughed out of his mouth! When Xiang qiantu, Li Weiguo, Trident, and the others saw this scene, their eyes also widened. What kind of trump card did poison blade have? He was actually not instantly killed by the knight. “Damn it! You’re dead for sure!” The Knight roared angrily and sped up again. Takeda ninja and the others were watching from behind. If he couldn’t even kill a mere rank 7 fighter, how could he have the face to lead these rank 8 fighters? Takeda ninja, the Cardinal, and the other rank 8 fighters also sped up when they saw this. The five of them crashed into the encirclement formed by Xiang Qian ‘er and the other eleven people. “Now, do it!” Xiang Qian ‘ER’s gaze was sharp, and she was the first to draw her bow. The huge bow in her hand turned into a full moon in the blink of an eye. In the next moment, a huge arrow that was as thick as a baby’s arm left the bowstring and headed straight for the Knight’s head. A jade-blue halberd suddenly appeared in the Trident’s hand. His right arm suddenly expanded to more than double its original size, and his strength surged wildly as he threw it fiercely. The halberd charged towards the knight with a monstrous wave. Li Weiguo, Old Man Wu, and the others also exerted their strength at the same time. All sorts of powerful skills were thrown towards the knight, Takeda Ninja, and the archbishop. The Knight was suddenly alarmed. He immediately gave up on attacking the poisonous blade. A small blue shield instinctively appeared on his arm. The moment the blue shield was taken out, the huge arrow shot towards Shantou instantly arrived. The two collided with a loud bang. Caught off guard, the Knight’s body was sent flying more than 20 meters. Takeda ninja and the cardinal did not have as sharp a reaction as he did. Takeda ninja was especially focused on charging forward and chasing after poison blade and the others. He did not pay any attention to the huge halberd that was charging at him. By the time he sensed the warning sign, the huge halberd that was filled with killing intent had already arrived in front of him. Slash! The halberd pierced through him from head to toe! Even so, Takeda ninja did not die on the spot. He turned his eyes with difficulty and looked in the direction where the halberd had come from. However, he did not see anyone. Li Weiguo, Old Man Wu, and the others had already used their powerful skills on him. Frost, flame, Poison, lightning...; all sorts of skills were cast on Takeda ninja like a torrential rain. When this wave of skills was over, Takeda Shinobu’s HP was emptied, and he died! The arch-cardinal managed to hold on a little longer than he did. After all, he knew how to use healing skills. However, he only managed to cast [ holy light heal ] on himself in time. He only managed to take out his life-saving items to barely defend himself. However, under the AOE attacks of the 11 tier 8 warriors, one or two life-saving items could not be considered useless. At the very least, it provided the arch-cardinal with some psychological comfort. When this wave of powerful skills was fully unleashed, the knight and the other five tier 8 warriors were left with only him standing where he was. The rest of them died immediately! However, even the knight was riddled with holes all over his body and was dripping with blood. He was half-kneeling on the ground and could not even stand up. “You...; you...; actually knew about it a long time ago?” The knight endured the corrosion of the poison on his body and raised his head in pain. Looking down at him from above, shallow gaze’s expression was ice-cold. “You’ve guessed my intentions with just a little thought.” The knight laughed bitterly. “I really...; admire you. You can even send your own son here as bait...; I’m not as good as you...;” Plop. The remaining HP of the Knight was completely devoured by the poison, and he fell to the ground. He still had life-saving items on him, but they were all gone. Even if he recovered some of his HP and stood up again, he would still die in the face of eleven tier 8 warriors. “Their tier 7 warriors have already distanced themselves from the tier 8 warriors for a long time. They still don’t know that their tier 8 warriors are already dead.”Shallow gaze looked in the direction where they were charging towards, but he still did not see any signs of the tier 7 warriors. Poison Blade, Ye Yuqiu, and the others also walked out from behind. Ye Yuqiu said in surprise, “You were...; really fine just now?” Poison blade waved his hand, “I’m fine. My set equipment is a bit special. It can block a lot of damage.” He took out a large health potion and poured it into his mouth. His health immediately returned. After listening to Ye Yuqiu’s description, Xiang Tianxiu, shield demon, and Nielke realized that the knight had originally planned to attack them from a distance and kill one of them in an instant. However, that fatal flying knife was blocked by poison blade. They all walked up and pinched poison Blade’s body, their faces full of astonishment. “Poison Blade, you did well. You killed Logue first with lightning-quick methods, causing the knight and the others to be furious and chase after him.” “But next time, don’t block a knife for someone else. Our hearts were about to jump out.” Li Weiguo walked up to poison blade and laughed bitterly. Trident raised his eyebrows. “Old Li, you can’t say that. Poison Blade dared to block a knife for someone else. That means he has 100% confidence. No one will rush up to his death, my old friend.” Poison Blade also nodded. “He’s right. I did act with such confidence.” “But then again, even if sir is compared to sister Xiang, he’s only a hair and a half away. You actually blocked his attack and didn’t die. There’s something there, young man.”Trident’s face was full of smiles, he didn’t hide his praise at all. “The others are here too. Let’s do it. Kill them all. Leave no one alive,”Li Weiguo said in a low voice. Everyone nodded. These rank 7 martial artists had followed Sir, Takeda Shinobu, and the others here. They must have known about their mission long ago. Since they knew about their mission and still wanted to attack the construction department, then don’t blame the construction department for being ruthless. If they should be killed, they should be killed. There was no mercy! Not long after, a large number of tier 7 warriors’corpses were strewn all over the place! “The ten of you have done very well. Now, teacher Li will bring you back to your original positions and continue to clean up the monsters on the ground.” “We are going to the underground world to support the two chiefs.” Xiang shallow view patted poison blade’s shoulder. “Yes!” Everyone nodded. After Xiang Qianyi and the others collected the spoils of war from the Knight and the others, they left like a gust of wind and disappeared in the blink of an eye. Li Weiguo waved his hand. “Let’s go back.” “Teacher Li, we’ve killed so many people from the three organizations. I’m afraid they’ll fall out with us, right?”Xiang Tianxiu couldn’t help but ask. Li Weiguo laughed. “No, that’s not the case.” Xiang tianxiu was stunned, “They won’t even fall out with us?” Ye yuqiu calmly said, “If the organization is a tree, a Tier 9 fighter is the backbone. As long as the backbone doesn’t fall down, nothing will fall out.” Li Weiguo nodded his head approvingly, “This time, not only did their three organizations’ambush plan fail, but we killed them instead. They would only grit their teeth and swallow it. They didn’t dare to fall out with us. They didn’t even dare to announce the cause of their deaths.” “Why? It’s because the level nine warrior didn’t fall! And I have good news for you.” Li Weiguo suddenly laughed, his old face smiling brightly. “Xiang Qiantou is currently on a level nine promotion mission. As long as she completes it, she will become the seventh level nine warrior in our construction division!” “Only a few people in the construction division know about this. In the near future, her promotion might become a fatal move!” Lin Xuan, Ye Yuqiu, and the others were slightly surprised. No wonder the higher-ups of the construction department were so confident. As long as there were more and more level nine warriors, the construction department would be invincible. “You guys have to grow up as soon as possible. After all, level nine warriors are the top fighting force. It’s impossible to cover all aspects. Many places still need level eight warriors.” Li Weiguo looked a little worried, “Unfortunately, your group is still very, very far away from reaching tier 8.” Xiang tianxiu scratched his head, “I’ve grown quite quickly recently. I’m already at tier 7 or Tier 8.” Ye yuqiu nodded, “I’m also at tier 7 or Tier 8 now, but I still need 17,000,000 essence points to complete the tier 8 promotion quest. In addition, I still need to keep up with the levels of all sorts of skills...;” The others also looked helpless. If nothing unexpected happened, they would need at least another one to three years to reach level 8. “Let’s go. Continue with our work.”Li Weiguo waved his hand to signal for everyone to follow, “If nothing unexpected happens, as long as the giant Sun Dragon dies, we can go back.” Xiang tianxiu nodded, “Indeed. With so many level 9 warriors attacking the giant Sun Dragon, what else can happen? It’s impossible!” Lin Xuan and the others were speechless.”...; I feel like you’re planting flags again.” .. Somewhere in the underground world. There were no green trees, flowers, or other kinds of monsters here. There were only scorch and burning flames everywhere. After a loud dragon roar, the huge fiery red shadow smashed through the rock wall and disappeared into the rocks. Wherever it passed, the rocks were easily melted like tofu. Gao Qianchi, Lu Pingjiang, Ying, Jack, the gorgeous girl, and the Cardinal did not chase after it. Instead, they stopped where they were. Everyone had injuries on their bodies, and everyone was breathing heavily. However, what they breathed in was scorching hot air, which made their breathing passages feel as if they were burning. Not far away, the rank 9 fighter of the Salvation Society with a full beard lay on the ground and disappeared from the waist down. There was a huge tail that looked like it was made of lava that sank deep into the ground. This huge tail was at least 20 meters long and its cross section was as thick as five meters. Hot and bright blood slowly flowed out from the section. Where the blood flowed, the rocks quickly became extremely red. This was the greatest result they had achieved in this period of time. Previously, they had only chopped off some dragon scales and cut off a few pieces of flesh. This time, he had forcefully chopped off the sun dragon’s tail at the cost of a rank 9 martial artist who was seriously injured and on the verge of death. The Sun Dragon did not continue fighting in pain. Instead, it smashed through the rock wall and turned around to escape. No one wanted to chase after it. This was because it was impossible for a single person to defeat that ancient dragon. The gorgeous girl simply sat down without any form of image. Her fingers trembled as she took out a slender lady’s cigarette. She inserted it into the fiery red blood flowing on the ground, lit it slowly, and took a deep breath. “What do we do now?” No one said anything. The scene was so silent that it was terrifying. At this moment, the Cardinal’s communicator moved slightly. He looked down and saw that it was a message from the pope. After reading it, the cardinal was overjoyed. “Everyone! Good News! The pope has found out the connection between the underground world’s giant dragon and the Giant Sun Dragon!” Gao Qianchi and the others’eyes lit up. “What do you mean?” They were divided into two groups. Gao Qianchi and the others were in charge of chasing after the Sun Dragons. The Pope and the chief commander were investigating the Dragons that had the bloodline of the Sun Dragons. “Have you noticed that ever since the death of those dragons, the strength of the Sun Dragons has been declining?”The Cardinal said with a laugh. Hearing this, Gao Qianchi and the others were stunned for a moment and immediately guessed the answer to the question. “That’s right. Those giant dragons have a unique bloodline connection with the giant Sun Dragon! They are alive, the giant Sun Dragon is strong, and if they die, the giant Sun Dragon will be weakened!” The cardinal said excitedly, “I think we should change our battle strategy!” “Divide our forces and destroy those giant dragons with powerful bloodlines!”Gao Qianchi said in a deep voice. “Right! However, with our numbers, the efficiency is still too low. We must let a portion of the rank 8 warriors participate.”The gorgeous lady nodded in agreement. “Alright, everyone inform their respective rank 8 warriors.”Gao Qianchi nodded. Very quickly, the rank 8 warriors such as Xiang Qiantou, Trident, and Hall immediately received the orders of their rank 9 warriors. They stopped what they were doing and went straight to the new mission location. At the same time, Lin Xuan was following by Ye Yuqiu’s side, leisurely farming monsters. Basically, Ye Yuqiu rushed up to slash and slash, while he was at the back, playing the role of Grandma. The two’s strongest battle record was two people fighting head-on against sixteen lightning wyverns. Moreover, both of them were able to wipe them out while maintaining 90% of their health. Ye Yuqiu was very happy. She praised herself for finding a good teammate. She didn’t need to worry about her health during the battle. She only needed to rush forward recklessly. Ye Yuqiu’s eyes were shining as she said this. Lin Xuan cursed in his heart. Did he help her awaken some strange attribute. Could it be that under ye Yuqiu’s shrewd and capable appearance, there was actually a reckless heart? However, Ye Yuqiu was very happy, but Lin Xuan was very troubled. After a battle, even 90% of his health could not be reduced. This was the blood that he had intentionally scratched the lightning dragon. After just a few breaths, the wound healed and his health recovered. “What should I do about my tier 8 promotion quest?”Lin Xuan felt helpless. “HMM...; the sparking dragon egg is about to crack?” At this moment, he suddenly noticed that the dragon egg he had placed in the space of his consciousness had begun to tremble. There were also rustling sounds coming from inside. It should be the baby dragon breaking through the eggshell. Lin Xuan rubbed his fists and his eyes shone. “Kang Kang, what kind of Little Cutie are you?” Crack. The first crack appeared on the eggshell. Crack. Then the second crack, the third crack...; countless cracks. Crack! The eggshell was completely cracked open, and a cute little dragon cub crawled out. It hadn’t even opened its eyes yet. But Lin Xuan only took a glance at it before he looked away, because his eyes were already captivated by something else. The eggshell under the Dragon Whelp’s feet actually had a seven-colored color. Using [ advanced observation ] , Lin Xuan took a glance at the seven-colored eggshell and was overjoyed. —— Name: sparking flying dragon eggshell Level: Level 7, Level 8 Quality: seven-colored immortality Effect: raises skill quality from dark gold legend to seven-colored immortality. Description: this sparking flying dragon egg is undoubtedly lucky, because it was chosen by the origin of the arcane realm and completely transformed. —— Lin Xuan was both surprised and happy. He had always thought that the one with the seven-colored origin was this little dragon, but he never expected it to be a freaking eggshell! “However, is this a surprise?” Lin Xuan smiled. The eggshell contained the seven-colored origin, which could upgrade a dark gold skill to a seven-colored skill. It also came with a seven-colored immortal-quality little dragon. I’ve struck it rich! Roger, thank you. If it weren’t for you, how could I have gotten such a good thing. Oh, I’m sorry. I forgot that you passed away painlessly. Lin Xuan said in a deep voice, “Use the sparking dragon eggshell to upgrade the quality of the skill [ advanced perception ] to seven-colored immortal-grade.” [ advanced perception ] could sense the position of the enemy and the possible attack position of the enemy. It could be said that ever since he obtained this skill, Lin Xuan had benefited a lot from it. He had thought of many things in that moment, but in the end, he still chose the seemingly ordinary [ advanced perception ] . Because he knew that it did not matter if he increased his attack power, defense, or survivability. No matter what, he was still a tier 7 martial artist. But if his perception became stronger, it was very likely that he could sense the movements of the other party. Whoosh. The eggshell immediately turned into pure seven-colored energy and disappeared. The Little Dragon Cub was shocked. It began to babble, as if it was wondering, where is my eggshell? Where is my first meal? Lin Xuan pulled out his data panel again and immediately saw that [ advanced perception ] had been replaced by another new skill. —— Name: heaven-connecting five senses Level: Level 7, Level 8 Quality: seven-colored immortality Effect 1: unique skill. Other than death, no other living creature or non-living creature can obtain this skill through any means, this includes, but is not limited to, the drops from killing monsters, the drops from killing warriors, and the gains from skill quality upgrades. Effect 2: Perception of any target within a kilometer. Effect 3: Premonition of the enemy’s next attack. Description: From now on, Mom doesn’t have to worry about me being ambushed by the enemy anymore. —— Lin Xuan sighed. Another rainbow-colored skill! “Both of these skills have a unique effect. Does this mean that I have the upper hand?” “Even if a tier 9 martial artist obtains the origin of the mystical realm in the future, it’s impossible for them to obtain the same skill as me.” Lin Xuan immediately thought of the Gao Tian Yuan leader. This person had the puppet manipulation technique. If the quality of the skill increased, it should not be much different from his clone technique. However, he had obtained the avatar through the origin of the secret realm. This meant that the Gao Tian Yuan leader would no longer be able to upgrade the puppet manipulation technique to the avatar. “However, if I can’t upgrade it to the avatar, he might be able to upgrade it to other skills. It might not be this skill tree.” Lin Xuan nodded slightly, but it was just a guess. After all, he was probably the only person in the world who had seven-colored immortal-quality skills. “As for this little dragon cub...;” Lin Xuan glanced at the Little Dragon Cub who was humming him. “Are you willing to follow me?” The Baby Dragon’s big eyes flashed with wisdom. It was very different from the other baby dragons that Lin Xuan had seen before. The baby dragon squeaked and bit his pants. “Okay, okay, okay. Then follow me.” Lin Xuan smiled. He thought for a moment and decided to bring the little dragon out. The Little Dragon appeared in the outside world from the space of consciousness. It was startled and immediately crawled into Lin Xuan’s body. In the end, it stood on Lin Xuan’s shoulder and felt somewhat at ease. Ye Yuqiu also noticed the little dragon and immediately said in surprise, “This is the dragon egg that you hatched previously?” Lin Xuan nodded, “It hatched. This little thing is quite cute. If it’s not useful, then just keep it for fun.” Roar Roar Roar. The Little Dragon Cub seemed to understand what Lin Xuan meant. It immediately bared its fangs and brandished its claws, as if it was very angry. “This little thing is quite smart. It’s very different from normal dragon Cubs!” Ye Yuqiu was even more surprised. It was very difficult for monster cubs to have such high intelligence. It could only eat and eat. When it grew up, it would leave the nest and hunt by itself. It would only fight according to its instincts. The moment it saw a human, it would charge forward like it saw a moving delicacy. It didn’t have any brains. “What talent?”Ye Yuqiu asked. Lin Xuan scratched his head, “I don’t know, but I think it should have a talent above purple. Otherwise, it wouldn’t be so smart.” The Baby Dragon Roared angrily again. You clearly know! But you said that I was only purple! Was that purple? That was the noble seven colors! “I think so too. At least it should be purple.”Ye Yuqiu bent down and gently stroked the baby dragon. The baby dragonnarrowed its eyes and seemed to enjoy it. Seeing that it was so cooperative, Ye Yuqiu simply hugged it into her arms. Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. Big Sis, you’re a warrior. You Don’t have a sword in your hand, but you’re hugging a little dragon cub. What’s going on. .. Somewhere in the Dragon Mountain Range, Hall and Kodo were rushing south. Their goal was a cave not far to the south. From there, they could enter the underground world. The dragon mountain range was very vast, but there were only a few caves that could enter the underground world. They had to travel a long distance. “The underground world map that the Cardinal sent me is a little strange, but I can’t see Anything Strange.”Hall turned on the communicator, looking as he moved forward. He frowned. “Nothing Strange. You are the trusted aide of the head commander. That Old Thing Dares to touch you? Unless he wants to shed all pretense of cordiality with the head commander!”Kodo sneered. He did not put the cardinal in his eyes at all. “However, come to think of it, those old things actually put me in the same group as you. They’re quite perceptive.”Kodo chuckled. Hall rolled his eyes. “With your personality, who can you get along with? I’m the only one who can tolerate you. After all, we’ve been cellmates for several years.” Kodo smacked his lips. “Yeah, we’re cellmates...;” He suddenly changed the topic. “Did you make a move against a Tier 8 Takama-ga-hara?” Hall was stunned. “No.” Kodo scoffed. “Coward. Let me tell you, I killed a Tier 8 Takama-ga-hara! These bastards have kept me locked up for so long, it’s time to make them bleed!” Hall didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. “You really killed him?” Kodo said proudly, “Of course. And I killed him without anyone knowing. No one knows that I killed that fellow. If there’s a chance, I’ll kill more tier 8 Takama-ga-hara martial artists!” Hall looked amused. “Why didn’t you say that you wanted to kill the leader of Takama-ga-hara?” Kodo coughed lightly. “That would have to wait until I have the strength.” The two of them joked along the way and soon arrived at the cave. Then, they jumped and entered the underground world. After entering the underground world, they didn’t run around like headless flies. Instead, they followed the guidance of the other warriors in their communication devices and followed the main group. They were led by a Tier 9 martial artist, Jack from the Salvation Society. At this moment, there were already more than 50 tier 8 martial artists gathered here. These were all the tier 8 martial artists who had entered the secret realm of the dragon mountain range this time. Among them, Xiang Qianwei, Li Weiguo, and the other tier 8 martial artists from the construction division still occupied the majority, a total of 12 people. Hall and Kodo looked at Xiang Qianwei and the others and nodded slightly. This person was also a cellmate. They got along very well in the Shura Prison. They had a good impression of this rising star of the construction division. In Kodo’s words...; It was a pity that he was not born more than twenty years later. Otherwise, he would definitely pursue Xiang Qianwei. “Everyone, we have discovered the connection between the Sun Dragon and the ordinary dragons in the underground world. Your mission is to spread out and destroy these ordinary dragons one by one. Kill as many as you can.” “The more you kill, the weaker the Sun Dragon will be.” After Jack finished speaking, he looked around and said seriously, “We have already suffered the consequence of a rank 9 martial artist being seriously injured and dying. We can not afford to waste any more time. Everyone, please complete the mission resolutely.” “Yes.” The rank 8 martial artists responded in a sparse manner. After all, they were not from the same organization. It was inevitable that there would be no order in their responses. “Hall, Kodo, you guys are familiar with the people from the construction division, and you know the situation in the underground world. Go to the construction division,”Jack instructed. Hall and Kodo were stunned, and they nodded in agreement. “Go, complete the mission as soon as possible.” Jack watched the dozens of type 8 martial artists leave, his eyes flashing with a cold light. These type 8 martial artists quickly split into different teams according to their respective organizations, heading in different directions. Because the construction division had the largest number of martial artists, the tasks assigned to them were also the most important. Xiang Shantou said in a low voice, “We must be vigilant. We have to make sure that the other organizations haven’t set us up.” Kodo waved his hand, “Don’t look at the map that the Salvation Society gave you. Look at Hall’s. This was sent to him by the Grand Cardinal. Don’t look at how strong the Grand Cardinal is, but this year’s grand cardinal is a weakling. He was completely suppressed by the Grand Cardinal. He definitely wouldn’t dare to make a fuss over Hall’s map.” Li Weiguo nodded. “Alright, let’s compare it.” Hall displayed the map in his communicator. Shallow view took out his own map. With this comparison, he immediately discovered many mistakes and omissions on Shallow View’s map. Some of the dangerous locations were not marked. Some of the places were places where the giant sun dragons often moved about, but they were also not marked. There were some places where there was indeed a group of level eight dragons, but there was another group of level eight dragons nearby, and they were also not marked. If they trusted this map and besieged that group of dragons, they would immediately be attacked by another group of dragons. If they were attacked from both sides, it was equivalent to death. Old Man Wu gritted his teeth. “The Salvation Society really doesn’t give up. They actually provided us with so many mistakes in the map.” Li Weiguo sighed softly and said, “It’s a good thing that Jack is so shameless that he let the two of you come with us.” Hall and Kodo both smiled and said, “No matter what, we are cellmates with Xiang Qianyu. We still have some trust in him.” The group of them immediately headed in that direction. When they arrived here, as expected, they found two groups of giant dragons. These two groups of giant dragons lived on two underground mountain peaks, and in the middle of the two mountain peaks was a deep ravine. It was dark and unfathomable under the ravine, and no one knew what was there. Neither Hall’s map nor Xiang Qianyu’s map had any markings on them. Xiang Qianyu was ready to go forward to investigate, but Kodo volunteered, “I’m familiar with this. Let me do it.” As soon as he finished speaking, he cut open his finger, and blood gushed out. After the blood landed on the ground, it quickly formed a small blood bat and flew in that direction. Li Weiguo and old man Wu praised it, “This skill is not bad. It can be used to assassinate and investigate, and it can also be used to attack and repel enemies.” Kodo chuckled and controlled the blood bat to fly. The blood bat quickly flew around the two groups of dragons in a swagger. In the end, it entered the ravine and flew back to Kodo’s side. It then entered the body through the wound on its finger. When the blood bat turned into blood and entered his body, Kodo immediately obtained all the information he had obtained during this period of time. “I saw it...; There are ten adult dragons, twenty-one juvenile dragons in the Dragon Group on the left, four adult dragons and twelve juvenile dragons in the Dragon Group on the right.” “As for the deep ravine, my blood bat didn’t see anything after flying down for a long time. Instead, he felt that the temperature was getting colder and colder. It’s unlikely that there’s any danger in there.” After saying this, Kodo slowly withdrew from that state and shook his head forcefully. “Alright, then we will act immediately!” Xiang Qian Mu nodded. If there were no problems with the investigation, then as long as they killed one group of giant dragons as quickly as possible, the other would naturally be able to solve the problem easily. Over a dozen rank 8 martial artists silently rushed forward, pouncing on the group of giant dragons that had more numbers. At the same time that they rushed forward, two huge light spots suddenly lit up in the deepest part of the ravine. Each of them was one meter in size, shining with a scorching hot flame. Taking a closer look, those were not light spots, they were clearly two huge dragon eyes! The underground world. Shallow view and the others quickly arrived behind the larger group of dragons. Shallow View’s plan was very simple. He would take them by surprise and deal as much damage as possible. As long as the first wave of attacks could kill or injure more than half of the Dragons, it would be a victory. With that, even if the nearby dragons noticed the commotion and rushed over to help, they would not be afraid to face the combined forces of the two dragons. Xiang Qian ‘er’s plan went exceptionally smoothly. These dragons did not notice that they had long been targeted by a group of powerful tier 8 martial artists. Xiang Qian ‘er, Hall, Kodo, and the rest rushed at the front, throwing out powerful skills one after another. Each attack could deal a huge amount of damage to the dragon. Xiang Qian ‘ER’s combat strength was even more powerful. With a single strike, she triggered a critical strike on her back, a critical strike on her vital parts, and a bleeding critical strike. She actually killed a level 8, Level 5 dragon in an instant. With Xiang Qian ‘ER’s battle record, the other martial artists’morale surged, and their combat strength soared. In the blink of an eye, they had killed 5 dragons, killing over 10 of them. At this moment, the nearby dragons heard the commotion and rushed over with wild roars. However, at this point, even if the two dragons merged into one, there was nothing to be afraid of. Xiang Qianmu and the others smiled as if victory was already in their hands. In the next moment, a deafening dragon’s roar erupted from the ground. An incomparably glaring and incomparably thick blazing pillar of light blasted from the ground towards the rocky dome above! Even though Xiang Shensi and the others were more than 300 meters away, they could still feel the terrifying high temperature. KE duo touched the back of his hand and shockingly discovered that the hair on the back of his hand was already charred. “This...;” Everyone’s eyes were wide open as they looked at the figure that slowly appeared within the pillar of light. His body was 100 meters long, his entire body was fiery red, and his eyes were as blazing as the sun. At this moment, that pair of blazing eyes looked at the warriors from afar. “Sun...; Dragon!” Hall cried out involuntarily. Xiang Qianyu and the others had never seen the Sun Dragon before, but he had personally witnessed the battle between a Tier 9 warrior and the Sun Dragon, so he naturally knew the appearance of the Sun Dragon. However, didn’t Jack say that they paid the price of a Tier 9 warrior being heavily injured and on the verge of death to cut off the tail of the Sun Dragon? However, this sun dragon that had appeared from the pillar of light was completely unharmed, and its tail was fine as well! A terrifying thought immediately appeared in Hall’s mind. Another Sun Dragon! “Run! Split up and run, the further the better!” Xiang Shensi’s reaction was rather quick. Even from such a distance, she could already feel the terrifying pressure from the fiery dragon’s eyes. It was definitely not something they could withstand now! Sou Sou Sou! The Warriors finally reacted. If they continued to gather together, they would definitely die. Only by escaping separately, would there be a chance of survival. Right now, everyone’s mind no longer had Jack’s so-called mission, only...; survival! “Roar!” The Giant Sun Dragon let out a long roar, spitting out a pillar of fire. A pillar of fire shot out, enveloping a Type 8 warrior from the construction department. The Type 8 warrior only had time to let out a scream before he was drowned in the pillar of fire, turning into a pile of ash. A one-shot kill! This scene caught the eyes of Xiang Shensi, Li Weiguo, Hall, Kodo, and the rest, causing them to be extremely shocked. They were even more certain that this was the other Sun Dragon! Only a Tier 9 monster would have such a terrifying Suppressive Force on a Tier 8 warrior! “Roar!” Another fierce fire pillar flashed past. Another tier 8 warrior from the construction department died on the spot! Xiang Qianou’s heart was bleeding. These tier 8 warriors were the backbone and elites of the construction department! If any one of them died, it meant that there might be one less tier 9 warrior in the future. She immediately recalled the mission that Jack had given her. “Jack purposely left Hall and Kodo with us. Our construction department has many warriors, so we will naturally assign them to deal with the most dragons. Could it be that they know that there is another giant Sun Dragon hiding here?” “The Salvation Society...;” Xiang Shantou gritted her teeth. At this moment, she felt a sense of danger. Without thinking, she instinctively dodged. Boom! The towering pillar of fire surged. She dodged, but not completely. Her entire left shoulder, from her fingers to her shoulder, disappeared on the spot! Xiang Qian ‘er endured the intense pain and accelerated to escape again. She didn’t dare to turn back. She was afraid that she wouldn’t be able to suppress the urge to go back and save others. At this level, her life wasn’t even her own. She had already prepared the materials for the advancement of the Five Secret Realm Kings. As long as she could successfully complete the rank nine advancement mission, she would be able to become a rank nine martial artist. At that time, the strength of the construction department would be even stronger than before. Therefore, she could not die! After five rank eight martial artists died in a row, the rest of the martial artists had already fled the scene. They rushed into the complicated cave and disappeared from the sight of the giant Sun Dragon. The Giant Sun Dragon roared furiously and finally spat out an incomparably blazing and thick pillar of fire toward the sky. Boom! Boom! Boom! The rock dome above its head could not bear such a distance and shattered with a loud bang. The shattering of the rock dome not only brought about a collapse, but also...; an earthquake! The ground of the mystic realm began to shake violently. All the Warriors on the ground did not know what was happening underground. Some smart people ran up the mountain subconsciously. But before many people could react, the ground began to collapse crazily and sink into the ground. Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu were currently fighting a group of flying dragons. The sudden earthquake made them lose their balance in an instant. However, Lin Xuan had the [ five senses to the heavens ] after all. His perception was completely superior to warriors of the same level, even surpassing some level eight warriors. He had already sensed the collapse of the ground within a certain range. Therefore, the moment the ground collapsed, he gave ye Yuqiu a hard push. Ye Yuqiu instinctively used this force to step on the gravel and return to the solid ground. As for Lin Xuan, because of the reaction force, he fell into the deep underground. Ye Yuqiu was extremely anxious, but she knew that this was an opportunity that Lin Xuan risked his life for her. She could not jump down again, so she could only shout, “Lin Xuan! Try to find a safe place to hide. I will come and save you!” .. After falling for a while, Lin Xuan fell into an underground pool with a plop. Then, he stood up unscathed. “HMM...; not unscathed. I lost 1% of my health...; Wait, I’m already full. Ah, here.” He pushed ye Yuqiu. He fell because ye Yuqiu might lose a lot of health if she fell. It was unknown whether she was alive or dead. But he was almost unharmed. As a person with 517 points of vitality, he naturally had the right to make this choice. “It’s good that I’m alone now. I can finally be freed.” Lin Xuan moved his body, his eyes flashing with a sharp gaze. Previously, he had been protected by Ye Yuqiu and Li Weiguo, making him think that he was really a logistics expert. The Dragon Cub also flew out from a pile of rubble. It was very lucky and was also safe and sound. Roar Roar! It flew to Lin Xuan’s side and rubbed its big head against Lin Xuan’s palm. Lin Xuan immediately laughed, “Right, not just me, but also you.” At this moment, he took some time to look at the perspective of the shield ghost and the other clones. He found that apart from Big Brother Milk, the other four clones had also fallen into the ground. Brother Milk’s avatar was just lucky. There was no earthquake nearby. “My five avatars are very far apart. It seems that the earthquake affected a very wide area. It is very likely that people from other organizations have also fallen into the ground.” Thinking of this, Lin Xuan’s heart suddenly became vigilant. The people from other organizations were not good men and women. If they met a martial artist from the Salvation Army who had never been on good terms with them, they might directly attack him. Moreover...; There were level eight and level nine martial artists in the underground world! If he was unlucky and met these experts, he would not be able to resist them at all. “Be careful, be vigilant! be extremely careful!” Lin Xuan quietly moved along the darkness, not making a single sound. The baby dragon followed suit and flew silently as well. Not long after, he was lucky enough to encounter the corpse of a giant dragon. And it was a Tier 9 level 1 lightning dragon! Its head was smashed into meat paste by a huge rock. It was quite unlucky. [ detected dead target, analyzing...; ] [ adult lightning dragon, Tier 9 Level 1 monster, attributes: Vitality 301, strength 299, agility 381, spirit 665, skills: Lightning Breath, Lightning Flash, lightning shackle...; ] [ cause of death: Heavy Crushing. ] [ there is no space for a clone at the moment. Do you wish to disarm a training clone and possess this death target to become a training clone? ] [ remark: This dead target will immediately be revived at full health. ] “The attributes are not bad. It’s just nice to possess a training clone.” Previously, when Lin Xuan was with Ye Yuqiu, he had never had the chance to find a new training clone. He was very envious. Now, he could finally make his move. He disarmed one of his training clones in Little Spiritual Mountain’s secret realm and turned to possess the dragon’s corpse. In the blink of an eye, the head of the Lightning Dragon inflated and then stood next to Lin Xuan with empty eyes. The baby dragon was shocked by the Lightning Dragon. It fell to the ground and pretended to be dead! Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. “No need to pretend to be dead. This lightning dragon is my training avatar. It’s very safe. It will be our bodyguard from now on.” The dragon cub seemed to understand, but it did not. “Hide at the side first. Come out when you’re needed.” Lin Xuan waved his hand, and the Lightning Dragon spread its wings and disappeared in the blink of an eye. However, he could feel that the Lightning Dragon was following not far away. “Just now, it said that there’s no guarantee of strength if I encounter a level nine martial artist. Isn’t there one now?” Lin Xuan smiled happily. “However, this giant dragon is only level nine and level one. I still can’t defeat those level nine warriors who have been famous for a long time. However, it can also be used as a distraction to let me escape.” “Moreover, even if this training avatar dies because of restraining a level nine warrior, I should be able to quickly find a new body to possess as a training avatar. After all...; There must be quite a number of unlucky giant dragons that have been crushed to death, right?” Lin Xuan had only taken a few steps when he saw another level eight dragon that had been crushed to death by several boulders. He laughed out loud. .. At the same time, somewhere in the underground world, Adamson walked out safely from the rubble that had buried him. He was very lucky. He had almost not been hit by any particularly large falling rocks. After taking a few steps, he noticed that there was an arm on the ground that had been cut off by a sharp knife. The skin on the arm was yellow. It was obvious that it was a warrior from the construction department or the Takama-ga-hara. Adamson did not think much and continued to move forward. After about two kilometers, he noticed a warrior who was pressed down by a huge rock. “It’s Cowboy?” Adamson was very alert at first. When he saw the other party’s face, he let out a long breath and immediately approached. Cowboy and Knight were both code names. Cowboy was also on the Global Tier 8 leaderboard. Of course, he was not as high as knight, but he was still in the top 50. His most terrifying aspect was that huge handgun. With the buffs from all sorts of skills, as long as the opponent was not a knight or a Tier 9, he could explode with a single shot! Adamson hurried over and helped cowboy out of the rubble. “Are your injuries serious? I have the great HP potion here.” Cowboy hurriedly took the great HP potion and drank it in one gulp. His HP barely rose to 70% . “Thank you. I almost crushed the boulder to death just now. I’ve already drunk all the HP potions on my body,”cowboy said with a bitter smile. Adamson said in a low voice, “Sir Cowboy, I just found an arm not far away. The other party probably couldn’t pull the arm out from under the Boulder, so he simply cut it off.” He led cowboy back to the arm. There were bloodstains on the side of the arm that extended into the distance. Cowboy nodded slightly, “It’s indeed a yellow race, but we can’t tell which organization it is based on its clothing!”! “Let’s follow the bloodstains and see what the situation is. If it’s a takama-ga-hara warrior, then we’ll travel together. If it’s someone from the construction department, and the other party is relatively weak, then we’ll kill them on the way.” Adamson nodded, “Yes!” Not long after, they found a warrior who was struggling to move through the rubble. Li Weiguo. This muscular old man was in a sorry state, and he was riddled with holes. He didn’t have the same speed as shallow view, Kodo, and the others. He was a warrior of the main force, so he was destined to not move very fast. One of the pillars of fire from the Sun Dragon was aimed at him. Fortunately, Li Weiguo’s decades of combat experience helped him react subconsciously and Dodge it. The price was that his right arm disappeared from his elbow. However, after escaping from the mouth of the Sun Dragon, he was hit by an earthquake. The Rock Dome kept collapsing, and a large amount of rubble covered his head. Li Weiguo’s left arm was unfortunately hit by the giant rock. He had to cut off his left arm and break free. Now, Li Weiguo only had half of his right arm left, which was very miserable. Fortunately, his legs were intact and he could still move forward. Li Weiguo was well aware of the dangers of the underground world, so he had tried his best to avoid the possible risks and moved forward carefully. However, he did not expect that he would still be targeted. The cowboy saw Li Weiguo from afar and immediately sneered, “It’s him. I know this person. His position in the construction department is similar to Old Ivan of the Arctic army. He has taught many outstanding students, and there are even tier 9 martial artists among them.” Adam was overjoyed when he heard this. “Killing him will definitely earn a lot of battle merits.” “Yes, but this old man has rich battle experience. Even if his arms have disappeared, he probably still has some trump cards. I have an idea now. You Go Over...;”cowboy instructed in a low voice. Adamson frowned slightly. “Isn’t this a little dangerous? What if that old man sees me and slaps me to death?” Cowboy sneered. “I don’t know about the other tier 8 martial artists in the construction division, but this Li Weiguo might look fierce, but he’s actually a foolish and kind person. He definitely won’t kill you directly. At most, he’ll capture you.” “Besides, don’t you have the immortal feather given to you by that guy? You Can’t die.”When cowboy talked about the immortal feather, he revealed a hint of envy and licked his lips. “But the immortal feather...; is very precious. I don’t want to waste it here.”Adamson was a bit hesitant. The immortal feather didn’t need to be used. As long as it was carried on the body, it would immediately be resurrected with full blood when it died. It was produced in the Angel Fortress. Its weakness was somewhat similar to the Ghost Buddha lamp from the Wei Ming country. When resurrected, it would drop by one level. However, as a life-saving treasure, its effects were already very perfect. Cowboy appeared very impatient. “If you don’t go, who will? Do You Want Me, a rank 8 martial artist, to be the bait?” Adamson took a deep breath. “I’ll go.” He took out a short knife and cut his chest, smearing his blood everywhere. He even deliberately grabbed a handful of mud from the ground and smeared it on his body. Then, he stumbled and ran towards Li Weiguo. “Help! Help!” Adamson first used English to save his life, and only shouted in Chinese when he got close to Li Weiguo. Li Weiguo’s first reaction was to be on guard. Only when he realized that there was no one else near Adamson did he relax. “You are Adamson? Why are you looking for me?”He frowned and scolded. Adamson laughed bitterly, “I’m a rank 7 martial artist, it’s easy for me to die here. I can only look for you. Bring me along, I don’t want to die.” Li Weiguo frowned. Adamson was the number one rank 7 martial artist in the world. The head of the construction department, Ye Lijiang, had once said that Adamson was a super elite that all the rank 9 martial artists of the Salvation Society had painstakingly nurtured. Although he was only a tier 7 or Tier 9 martial artist, his attributes were probably 50 to 60% higher than that of an ordinary tier 7 or Tier 9 martial artist. In addition to his skills, equipment, and rune group, his overall strength might be equivalent to two to three ordinary tier 7 or Tier 9 martial artists. If such a person could be killed now, it would definitely be a great benefit. However...; Li Weiguo glanced at Adamson. The miserable look on this person’s face didn’t seem to be fake. He had come to ask for help, but he had killed him. wasn’t that too inhumane. He might as well not kill him. It would be better to take him back to the construction department and lock him up as a hostage. He believed that the warriors of the Salvation Army would be very willing to give up a lot of scarce resources in exchange for Adamson. Thinking of this, Li Weiguo’s brows relaxed. “Alright, you’ll stay by my side, but I can’t guarantee that I’ll completely protect you.” “Alright, Alright, Alright, I’ll follow you closely...;”as Adamson said this, he suddenly clutched his chest and collapsed. “It hurts...; !” Blood suddenly spurted out from the gaps between his fingers, and his face revealed an extremely pained expression. Li Weiguo’s heart tightened, and he immediately squatted down to take a look. The cowboy not far away sneered. He gripped his pistol tightly with both hands, aimed at Li Weiguo, and suddenly fired. Bang! After a loud gunshot, the bullet was released and shot toward Li Weiguo’s heart. The pistol was cowboy’s weapon. He was an assassin who focused on agility. His pistol was used as a sniper rifle. With the addition of various skills, it was very easy to kill him in one shot. In this way, he was not much different from an assassin. At this moment, Li Weiguo’s decades of rich combat experience once again saved him. At the critical moment, Li Weiguo instinctively dodged to the other side. The bullet passed through his chest, but it did not pass through his heart. Instead, it brushed past his heart and blasted out. Even so, a large hole appeared in Li Weiguo’s chest. Blood and internal organs spurted out wildly. His HP plummeted by 40% at this moment. Now, he only had a pitiful 8% left! Adamson also retreated at this moment, trying his best to stay as far away from Li Weiguo as possible. He was unable to confirm Li Weiguo’s thoughts. It was very likely that the other party felt that he was about to die and would drag someone down with him. As the number one on the Tier 7 leaderboard in the world, a good seedling carefully nurtured by the Salvation Society’s Tier 9 martial artist, he would definitely be a good candidate to take the fall. Li Weiguo could only force himself to kneel on one knee, supporting his body to not fall. He smiled bitterly. He was indeed a fool. He should have killed this kid the moment he saw Adamson. But now, he had been tricked by someone else with kindness! Not far away, cowboy revealed himself and sneered, “Li, we meet again. Just like before, you were stabbed in the back by your kindness!” Li Weiguo gasped for breath, “It’s you...;” The cowboy sneered, “It’s me! Previously, when you chased me in the secret realm of drowning city, I still remember that grudge. Now, it’s time to send you on your way!” Bang! He raised his hand and fired a shot. The bullet carried boundless kinetic energy and aimed straight at Li Weiguo’s head. At this moment, Li Weiguo also looked dejected. He did not have anything that could save his life. Previously, Ye Lijiang had offered him one, but he rejected it and handed it over to Xiang Tianxiu. He felt that at his age, if he should die, he should die. This kind of life-saving thing should be left to a more valuable young man. Therefore, at this moment, he did not think that he had any chance of surviving. “I’m old, and it’s finally time for me to die...;” Li Weiguo let out a long sigh. Instead, he felt somewhat relieved. However, at this moment, a loud and clear dragon roar suddenly sounded. The next moment, a blinding lightning bolt suddenly cut through the air and accurately shattered the bullet in mid-air! Cowboy was shocked. he shouted, “Who is it? !” Adamson was also stunned. He immediately took a few steps back and hid behind a rock. It was not that a tier 8 martial artist could not block Cowboy’s bullets. Although Adamson’s attributes were very strong, a tier 8 martial artist who could block cowboy’s bullets was clearly not an ordinary tier 8 martial artist. He was not someone that he could contend against. Li Weiguo was also stunned for a moment. He thought that he would die without a doubt. However, the loud sound that flashed in the air, as well as the angry roar of the cowboy, made him open his eyes again. He also looked in the direction of the Lightning. Then, the three of them saw a huge lightning dragon waving its wings and roaring as it swooped down! Huge wings, terrifying lightning, bulging muscles, and that overwhelming aura! A Tier 9 Dragon! Li Weiguo sighed softly. So it was a Tier 9 dragon. He thought it was a tier 9 warrior from the construction department who had come to save them. Then, he closed his eyes again. A dragon was still a monster after all. When facing human warriors like them, monsters only had one word: Kill! With the strength of this tier 9 dragon, it was not difficult to kill the three people present in one minute. Cowboy’s reaction was also very fast. Run! He did not care about Adamson at all, nor did he kill Li Weiguo who was on the verge of death with a single shot. He immediately used a skill to turn around and run. Roar! The Lightning Dragon roared and charged out. It actually directly flew over Li Weiguo’s head, pouncing towards cowboy. Its speed was extremely fast, as if it was a god that controlled lightning. In the blink of an eye, the distance between it and cowboy had shrunk to over 10 meters. A bolt of lightning spurted out from its mouth, instantly condensing into a lightning shackle, sealing off cowboy’s escape route. Cowboy’s eyes were about to crack, and he could only grit his teeth and face the Lightning Dragon. Buzz Buzz Buzz. The terrifying purple lightning rapidly brewed in the dragon’s mouth. In the next moment, the lightning breath formed a pure beam of light, directly enveloping cowboy. A tier 8 martial artist, even if it was one of the top 50 tier 8 martial artists in the world, faced with the huge difference in attributes between a Tier 9 dragon and a Tier 8 martial artist, did not have any ability to resist. His equipment would be shattered, his body would be destroyed, and his bones would be destroyed. In the blink of an eye, he would be reduced to a pile of dust. By now, Adamson had already run far away, but when he turned around and saw the terrifying lightning pillar, his heart was still filled with fear. Tier 9, Tier 7, what a terrifying difference. Usually, he would see tier 9 martial artists at the Salvation Convention, but they had deliberately restrained their auras, so he did not feel anything. After arriving at the Dragon Mountain Range’s secret realm, Adamson had already brushed past death several times. When the Lightning Dragon wanted to chase after Adamson again, Adamson had already used his skill to escape far away. With a flap of his wings, a strong gust of wind blew, and his body floated up, disappearing in the blink of an eye. Li Weiguo was stunned for a moment. “You didn’t kill me?” He was completely dumbfounded. Why didn’t this Type 9 dragon follow the discussion. However, it was good that it didn’t follow the plan. At the very least, it had saved its life. Li Weiguo walked towards the cowboy’s corpse and found a few items among the pile of dust. They were all very ordinary, only one of them was dark gold. However, the item that dropped was the dark gold skill book [ sniper bullet ] . As long as it was used at the right time, it could increase the power of the next bullet by 5 to 10 times. However, this skill could only be used on pistol-type weapons. Li Weiguo definitely wouldn’t be able to use it, but he could hand it over to other fighters, or he could just hand it over to the construction department to exchange for battle merits. “Not only did I not die, but I even picked up some spoils of war. This isn’t like my luck, right?”Li Weiguo shook his head and chose a direction to continue moving forward. Lin Xuan, who was hiding in the dark, saw all of this and smiled. The Lightning Dragon was his training avatar. He was the one who guided the Lightning Dragon to launch an attack on the cowboy and saved Li Weiguo’s life at the same time. Lin Xuan deliberately waited for a while before speeding up to catch up. “Old Li! Li Weiguo!” After being used by Adamson for his kindness, Li Weiguo became much more vigilant. He instinctively prepared himself. As long as the other party was not from the construction department, he was prepared to kick the other party to death. Although he had lost both his hands, he still had legs. Moreover, he also happened to have skills related to legs. However, when he saw that the person who came was Lin Xuan, Li Weiguo immediately heaved a sigh of relief. “We finally met one of our own.” Lin Xuan said in surprise, “Indeed, this small injury on your body is a little miserable.” Li Weiguo was so angry that he blew his beard and glared at him. “You call this a small wound?” His left arm had completely disappeared, and the right forearm of his right arm had disappeared. A big hole had been opened in his chest, and it was so cold that it could even be ventilated. What kind of F * cking small wound was this? “You drank all the Life Potion?” “Of course!” “I have it, I have it.” Lin Xuan took out five bottles of great life potion and handed them over. Li Weiguo was stunned. “You have quite a lot of potions...; that’s right, you’re a pharmacist.” “I owe you these life potions. If I can make it back alive, I’ll pay you back double.” After saying this, he gulped down two bottles of great life potion, barely raising his HP to more than 50% . “I finally feel like I’m not going to die at any time,”Li Weiguo sighed. “What happened just now?”Lin Xuan coughed lightly and asked. Li Weiguo sighed. “You have no idea what happened just now. It was beyond the scope of my imagination.” n also pretended to be emotional. “That Tier 9 dragon is so strange. It actually didn’t turn back and kill you.” Li Weiguo,”...; although I also feel strange, I still feel like you’re cursing me to death.” “Let’s go. Let’s continue moving forward. It’s best if we can find our construction division’s Tier 9 martial artist. I have to quickly tell them that news.”Li Weiguo sighed lightly. “What News?” “Another giant Sun Dragon! The huge earthquake was caused by that giant Sun Dragon. At least three of our construction division’s tier 8 martial artists died under its attack.”Li Weiguo gnashed his teeth, “And the person who arranged this mission was a level 9 warrior of the Salvation Society, Jack!” Lin Xuan was enlightened. No wonder such a huge change could happen in the dragon arcane realm. The Giant Sun Dragon had needed so many level 9 warriors to besiege it, but it still didn’t die. Now that another one had come, how could they continue to fight. “The Giant Sun Dragon hasn’t been killed yet, and it has already started to fight among itself. How can we build a community of human destiny with these insects? !”The more Li Weiguo thought about it, the angrier he became. “However, I guess that the Salvation Society might already have a way to kill the solar dragon. It’s because they have the confidence that they dare to liquidate us one step ahead of time.” Li Weiguo said seriously, “I also suspect that they might make a move against the two chiefs!” “After all, no matter how many of US rank eight and rank seven warriors die, we can’t compare to one rank nine warrior.” “Chief Gao, chief Lu, no matter which one dies, it will be a huge blow to the construction department.” “Unfortunately, after the earthquake, the communication device seemed to have been interfered with, and it couldn’t be used anymore. Otherwise, I could have informed them as soon as possible.” Lin Xuan nodded slightly. Li Weiguo’s analysis was very correct. The ultimate intention of the other party couldn’t just be a tier 8 warrior. No matter how many tier 8 martial artists they killed, they could not compare to a tier 9 martial artist. Gao Qianchi and Lu Pingjiang were in danger! But they might still be in the dark, so they had to tell them everything as soon as possible. “It’s too inefficient for the two of us to move together. Why don’t we split up and find people? If we meet a martial artist from the construction department, we’ll immediately tell them about this,”Lin Xuan suggested. Li Weiguo nodded subconsciously, but he quickly reacted. “No, a logistics warrior like you doesn’t have much combat power. If you work alone, aren’t you sending yourself to your death?” Lin Xuan shook his head seriously. “I’m just a level seven warrior. So what if I Die? As long as I can inform the two chiefs about this, my death won’t Be a pity!” Li Weiguo’s eyes reddened. What a good kid. Is He so thoughtful. In the past, I didn’t even notice it. But the more it was like this, the more he didn’t want such a good successor to die in vain. “How about this, you find a cave or something and hide well. Don’t expose yourself. I’ll go find someone!” Li Weiguo said seriously. Lin Xuan,”...; Alright!” He knew that Li Weiguo was still doing this for his own good. If he didn’t agree, Li Weiguo probably wouldn’t leave either. In order for Li Weiguo to focus on finding the warriors of the construction department, he had to agree verbally for the time being. Before he left, Lin Xuan stuffed a few more bottles of great life potion into Li Weiguo’s mouth. He had plenty of potions anyway, so he could still make them if he couldn’t. “Now I’m the only one left. I have a Tier 9 dragon protecting me, so I can take this opportunity to do a Tier 8 promotion quest.” Lin Xuan frowned as he pondered. “Is there anything that can lower my hp below 50% ?” After thinking about it, it seemed that he had to make a potion that would continuously poison him. Moreover, the poison had to be strong enough to recover his HP at the same rate. “There’s still a long way to go. I really need to find a safer place to sit down and make the potion.” Lin Xuan searched around and soon found a large hole. He simply ran to the bottom of the hole and conveniently moved a few stones to block the entrance. Then, he began to think about the composition of the medicine. The existing poison medicine was completely useless against him. Not only could he not lose health after drinking it, but it would also activate skills that would increase the recovery rate of his HP even more. Those who did not know better would think that drinking poison could restore health. Therefore, Lin Xuan had to make a very terrifying poison potion. The poison was so strong that it could cause him, who had 517 points of physique, to lose health as well. Moreover, the duration of the poison could not be short. A bottle of potion would have to be effective for at least 20 minutes. After making these plans, Lin Xuan began to prepare the potion without any sleep or food. There was a giant lightning dragon hovering above the entrance of the cave. Ordinary monsters did not dare to approach it. Even if a level nine warrior approached it, they would be afraid and immediately leave. It was not that a level nine warrior could not defeat this level nine and level one lightning dragon, but the underground world was extremely dangerous now. If the fight attracted more monsters, it would be troublesome. Therefore, it was better to avoid the trouble altogether. In this way, Lin Xuan was almost undisturbed in the process of preparing the potion. One day later, Lin Xuan laughed happily. The first version of the Super Venom Potion was successful! He stared at the bubbling green potion in the bottle and smiled. “Drink!” After poisoning the potion, his HP immediately dropped by 15% . Moreover, it was still dropping at a rate of 1% per second. Before Lin Xuan could be happy, his HP tenaciously bounced back. In less than ten minutes, it was back to full! Lin Xuan,”...; F * ck me.” “The first version of the potion is invalid. Prepare to develop the second version!” Lin Xuan once again forgot about food and sleep while concocting the potion. Another Day passed. The second version of the Super Venom Potion was newly released. This time, the color was darker than before, turning dark green. After gulping down the potion, his HP dropped by 20% . Moreover, it was dropping at a rate of 2% per second. Soon, his HP fell below 50% . However, it only lasted for about 20 seconds. The rate of 2% per second decreased by 1% per second. Then, it decreased by 0.5% per second. In the end, his tenacious hp recovery rate increased to 1% per second. Lin Xuan looked up at the sky and sighed. “Why is it so hard to lose hp? !” One day, two days, three days. Third Edition, fourth edition, fifth edition.. Until the seventh edition of the potion! After finishing one bottle, Lin Xuan strictly recorded the first damage, continuous damage, and duration of the potion. Then, he was pleasantly surprised to find that this potion was feasible! His HP had been suppressed to around 48% , and the maximum duration of the suppression lasted for 18 minutes. Although there was still a gap between what he had imagined, it was not far off. He could use it in large quantities. “This potion is already so terrifying when used on me. If it was used on someone else...;”Lin Xuan smiled. “Since you’re so fierce, I’ll give you a super powerful and domineering name. I’ll call you Super Venom Potion!” Lin Xuan nodded seriously. “This name is really good. It sounds awesome. As expected, I have a talent for naming.” He ordered the potion stand to start producing the super venom potion immediately. He had to stock up on the Super Venom Potion, or else he would have to recover his HP in 18 minutes. After doing all this, Lin Xuan walked out of the hole and stretched his body. “Then, it’s time to start my tier 8 promotion Quest!” Lin Xuan’s eyes were sharp. Soon, he sensed a tier 7, tier 9 monster nearby and hurried over. A few minutes later, the level-seven or level-nine monster was unwilling to fall, so Lin Xuan rushed to the next monster. One, two, three.. The numbers were rapidly accumulating. If he encountered a level-eight or even a level-nine monster on the way, he would immediately avoid it. There was no need to fight with these too powerful monsters. “However, I didn’t find the corpse of a level-nine monster again. It’s a bit awkward.” Lin Xuan smiled helplessly. He originally wanted to possess another level-nine monster’s corpse, which would be equivalent to having two super bodyguards, and the safety factor would be maximized. “Maybe it’s because the level-nine monster is so strong that it’s hard to be crushed to death by falling rocks. This also proves that I was really unlucky when I first met that level-nine lightning dragon.” Lin Xuan looked at the Lightning Dragon that was circling not far away and could not help but laugh. “HMM...; is there someone nearby?” [ five senses to heaven ] suddenly sensed that a group of warriors from the construction department was being surrounded. A few of them were familiar to Lin Xuan, such as Xiang Tianxiu and Lu Luo. However, their bodies were all covered in blood. Outside these warriors, there were more than ten tier 7 warriors led by three tier 8 warriors from the Gaotian Plain. These takama-ga-hara martial artists were like cats catching a mouse. They slowly and steadily tightened their encirclement and stared at Xiang Tianxiu and the others with a faint smile. “Look, we’ve caught a big fish! Xiang Tianxiu!”The leading tier 8 martial artist sneered. Xiang tianxiu, Lu Luo, and the others gritted their teeth, but they couldn’t do anything. They could only retreat step by step. A rank 7 martial artist versus a rank 8 martial artist. The other party wasn’t some unknown rank 8 martial artist. They were all famous figures on the global rank 8 list. Xiang Tianxiu and the others had no chance of winning at all. It was also because of this that the other party had this cat-and-mouse mentality. They wanted to see fear on Xiang Tianxiu’s and the others’faces through this neither fast nor slow encirclement. However, they were disappointed. Showing fear in the face of the enemy would make the enemy even more excited. Xiang Tianxiu and the others had long known this. Therefore, not only did everyone not have the slightest bit of fear, they even gritted their teeth and glared at the Takama-ga-hara martial artist. They wished they could eat his flesh and drink his blood! “How boring. Kill them all. Don’t waste time.” The rank 8 warrior in the lead seemed to feel bored and didn’t want to continue playing. He waved his hand, indicating for the others to make a move. “Hey!”The others grinned and pounced on him. At this moment, a loud dragon’s roar pierced through the silent air. The Takama-ga-hara warriors were shocked. This sound was so close. Was it a powerful monster approaching? In the next moment, a terrifying thunder breath fell from the sky and directly drowned the Takama-ga-hara warriors. These warriors didn’t even have the ability to resist and instantly melted under this dazzling thunder light. The dazzling light also made Xiang Tianxiu, Lu Luo, and the others unable to open their eyes. They had no choice but to close their eyes. When they opened their eyes again, the dozen or so Takama-ga-hara warriors surrounding them were already gone. Their life forms had turned from humans into a pile of dust. When the breeze blew, they flew everywhere. Whoosh! Everyone looked up and saw a giant lightning dragon flapping its wings and disappearing in an instant. Xiang Tianxiu was extremely shocked. “It was that Lightning Dragon that saved us?” Lu Luo was also stunned. “The monsters can differentiate between factions? That’s not right. We have killed quite a number of monsters too.” The others looked at each other with dumbfounded expressions. Monsters had always been synonymous with chaos and disorder. They would kill anyone they saw without mercy. That Lightning Dragon could instantly kill a tier 8 martial artist with a single skill. It was obviously a Tier 9 monster. Why didn’t it also take care of the construction department’s martial artists? They couldn’t figure it out. No matter how hard they tried, they couldn’t figure it out. “Perhaps...; It has gained sentience?” This question arose in everyone’s hearts. However, they did not have the time to guess the answer to this question. Since the people surrounding them were already dead, there was no time to waste if they did not run now! In the distance, Lin Xuan retracted his gaze. “That’s it. I won’t appear. Just get the tier 9 dragon to help.” After controlling the Lightning Dragon to help Xiang Tianxiu and the others escape, Lin Xuan continued his tier 8 promotion quest. Every 18 minutes, he would drink a bottle of super poison potion, keeping his tenacious hp below 50% . Time passed quietly. His kill count also increased rapidly. 30,35,50.. Three days later, he stood on the corpse of a Venom Wyvern and laughed at the sky. “100!” “Class advancement requirement met!” “Now, I’m only missing five materials to become a secret realm king.” On his way here, Lin Xuan encountered several territories belonging to Secret Realm Kings. They were all super powerful tier 7 or Tier 9 monsters. As he only had 50% hp, he did not rush in just to be on the safe side. However, now that his class advancement requirement had met, there was no need to keep his HP below 50% . Without the suppression of the super poison potion, his HP skyrocketed like a spring bamboo shoot after a rain. In just a few minutes, his HP was fully recovered. “Kill!” Lin Xuan turned around and found the valley, standing together with the Frost Dragon King and its five spouses. More than an hour later, all the Dragons in the valley had died. Lin Xuan dug out a tooth from their bodies. This tooth was shining with golden light, and it was the material for advancing to the king level of the Mystic Realm. “Next!” Lin Xuan excitedly rushed to the next location. The second, the third, and the fifth! When night fell, Lin Xuan obtained five materials for advancing to the king level of the mystic realm. As usual, he found a safe place and asked the Lightning Dragon to stay nearby. Then, he opened the data panel. He took a deep breath and thought of the information he had read in the books. From level 1 to Level 6, there were no abnormal signs. But from level 7 to level 8, and from level 8 to Level 9, there would be abnormal signs. The contents of the abnormal signs were all strange, but they were mostly related to the class. If it was a lightning teacher like Xiang Tianxiu, the abnormal sign might be a lightning dragon or a lightning eagle. If it was an ice blade like Ye Yuqiu, the upgrade might have been a giant sword soaked in frost. The color of the class was the same as the color of the upgrade. “I heard that the bigger the upgrade, the better. The bigger the upgrade, the stronger the overall strength. I wonder how big I’ll be.” “It shouldn’t be too big, right? If it’s too big, it’ll be too scary. It might attract others to covet it.” Lin Xuan thought about the pros and cons of advancing. The pros were very simple. He had become stronger. After he became a rank 8 fighter, he could at least defeat and kill ordinary fighters below rank 8 or rank 6. If the other party was a seeded fighter nurtured by various organizations, it wouldn’t be a big problem for him to fight one or two levels higher. But the cons were also right in front of him. If he made too much noise during his advancement, it might attract unnecessary trouble. At that point, he could be completely exposed! Not only would he reveal his location, but he might even reveal his connection to the clones. After thinking about it for a while, Lin Xuan decided to advance. What was there to be afraid of? Anyway, the Lightning Dragon was nearby. Even if a level 9 martial artist came, he could at least get the Lightning Dragon to help him, and he could still escape. Moreover, if other organizations’Level 9 martial artists came, would the construction department’s Level 9 martial artists not come? Lin Xuan took a deep breath and pressed the upgrade button. The upgrade materials turned into flowing light and surged into his body. A powerful aura emerged from the depths of his body and entered his limbs and bones. A golden light pillar that was as thick as ten meters rose from Lin Xuan’s head and shot into the sky! In the light pillar, the shadows of four weapons appeared. Shield, sword, book, and Dagger. All the Warriors in the surrounding dozens of kilometers saw this pillar of light and the four shadows in the pillar of light, and they were instantly shocked. “Someone advanced to rank 8? But why is it such a strange phenomenon?”Xiang Qian looked at the sky. “The Golden Pillar of light is a golden class. Could it be Adam? I heard that he has already reached rank 7 or rank 9.”The Pope of the Knights of truth raised his head and frowned slightly. “But I remember that Adam is a warrior class...;” “Among the rank 7 warriors who entered the dragon mountain range this time, there aren’t many who have a golden class. But what do you mean by four weapons appearing at the same time...;”Li Weiguo was looking for a thousand feet high road, he suddenly noticed this pillar of light and was very surprised. “The color of the pillar of light is golden, which means that it’s a golden class. But the diameter of the pillar of light is over ten meters. There are four kinds of weapons in the pillar of light, which means that this person’s class is very unique...; This is unprecedented and has great potential. It’s very likely to be above Adamson. No matter who it is, as long as it’s not a warrior of Our Salvation Society, we have to kill them.” The Type 9 expert of the Salvation Society was the closest to the pillar of light. After pondering for a while, she immediately gave up on chasing after nilke, and charged towards the pillar of light. Nilke was currently fleeing on his bear, and after the beautiful lady gave up on him, the warning in his heart slowly subsided. “I don’t know who that is, but if it wasn’t for that strange phenomenon, I might not have survived.”Nilke laughed bitterly. Lin Xuan was still in the process of advancing. It would still take some time for the advancement materials of the secret realm kings to completely integrate into his body. He naturally knew that there would be some strange phenomena when a rank 7 advanced to rank 8 or rank 8 advanced to rank 9. He had read all of these in books. But he didn’t expect that the strange phenomenon he triggered would be so eye-catching. Everyone within dozens of kilometers could see it clearly! They could even estimate the diameter of the beam of light! A few minutes later, Lin Xuan slowly opened his eyes. He immediately felt that the strength in his body had increased by several times. Especially his HP, which had skyrocketed! If he were to turn it into a game, his HP bar would have already exceeded the screen! “New class skill [ Dominator’s blood ] ! So Powerful!” Lin Xuan smiled confidently. At this moment, purple mist came from all directions. [ five senses to the heavens ] immediately issued a warning. Lin Xuan instinctively covered his mouth and nose, not inhaling a single breath. “Eh, you actually know my methods?” A lazy and charming voice came from the mist. In the next moment, a scene that made one’s blood boil suddenly appeared in front of Lin Xuan’s eyes. A gorgeous woman was walking towards him, naked and twisting her waist. Every step she took was graceful. Her eyes were like silk, and every frown and smile was teasing Lin Xuan’s nerves. The Desire in the deepest part of his heart was immediately aroused, and it was as if Thunder was stirring the fire in the Earth. Lin Xuan subconsciously wanted to walk towards the woman. But in fact, the gorgeous woman was standing on the ground, not moving at all. She sneered as she looked at the unfamiliar young man, walking towards her step by step. As long as she was a little closer, she could directly twist the young man’s throat. But in the next moment, a dragon’s roar suddenly sounded. A dazzling bolt of lightning crashed onto the ground! Bang! The gorgeous girl did not even have the time to react before she was struck by the Lightning. She screamed in pain and retreated repeatedly. The clothes on her chest were torn and she was bleeding crazily. Her skills were also interrupted. Lin Xuan recovered from the charm state in an instant. He quickly understood his situation and his expression changed. As expected! A level 9 martial artist was really coming, and he wanted to kill him without saying a word. Run! This was the only thought in Lin Xuan’s mind. He turned around and ran. He used [ swift lightning ] and rushed more than 100 meters in the blink of an eye. The Lightning Dragon flapped its dragon wings and charged straight at the beautiful lady. The lightning breath in its mouth was once again ready to submerge the beautiful lady. “Damn it!” “Why would a tier 9 dragon appear at such a critical moment? !” The beautiful lady gritted her teeth. She was a mage, and she had been caught off guard by the Lightning Dragon’s direct attack. As a result, she had lost a lot of HP. Naturally, she could no longer take on the Lightning Dragon head-on. She had no choice but to continuously dodge its attacks. Moreover, she was not Gao Qianchi, Lu Pingjiang, or the Pope, who had been famous for a long time. If Gao Qianchi and the others were here, the Lightning Dragon would only be able to slow them down. It would not be able to truly injure them. However, the gorgeous lady was not able to do so. She had just advanced to Tier 9 a few years ago, and now, she was at tier 9, Tier 1, just like the Lightning Dragon! “F * ck! which martial artist is that? ! How come I’ve never seen him on the global rank 7 list!” The gorgeous girl was forced to retreat by the Lightning Dragon. She cursed viciously in her heart, but she was also very confused. That young man was too unfamiliar. If the other party really had boundless potential, how could she not have seen it before. Taking advantage of the lightning dragon restraining the gorgeous girl, Lin Xuan hurriedly pulled away. “Fortunately, fortunately, her strength is considered weak among level 9 warriors, so she didn’t chase after us.” After running for four to five kilometers in one breath and hiding in a cave, Lin Xuan finally let out a long breath. At this time, he finally had time to calm down and check his attributes again. Because he had advanced to a Tier 8 fighter, his previous class skill [ attribute bestowal ] had a small increase. Previously, he had only added 30% of the highest attributes to the other three attributes. Now, he had increased 30% to 40% . Thus, his current naked attributes were: Vitality 532, strength 350, Spirit 360, agility 355! Before his upgrade, his attributes were: vitality 517, Strength 272, spirit 282, agility 277! “One upgrade brought me such a huge benefit.” Lin Xuan sighed. “Now that my strength is much stronger, I can go out and hunt tier 8 warriors from other organizations.”He sneered. The Salvation Society, the Truth Knights, and the Takama-ga-hara had long seized the opportunity to kill the people from the construction division and the Arctic army. He could only run before, but now he could fight back! Just as he was about to find his target, his [ five senses to heaven ] immediately sensed four figures chasing after two figures flying across the ground. Lin Xuan was familiar with the two people running in front of him. They were Hall and Kodo. Kodo’s situation was abnormally miserable. The left side of his body had almost disappeared, and his ribs and organs could be seen. Even his intestines could only be carried in a bag and tied to his waist. Hall carried Kodo as he ran. However, Hall was not an assassin. His agility was not high, and in addition, there were many injuries on Hall’s body. The distance between them and the pursuers was rapidly shrinking. Whoosh! Whoosh! Whoosh! More than a dozen bitter-free stabs pierced through the air, piercing towards the ground in front of Hall. Hall had no choice but to make a sharp turn, forcefully dodging this attack. However, he had been running at high speed just now, and because of this sharp turn, he lost his balance on the spot. He fell out, and Kodo was flung away like a rag doll. The four pursuers walked up with a cold smile. Their clothing indicated that 2 of them were from the takama-ga-hara, while the other 2 were from the Salvation Society. “I never thought that the one who would kill me one day would be someone from the organization, and it’s even my former comrade.”Kodo laughed bitterly, as he spoke with his last breath, “John, is our friendship for so many years fake?” The Type 8 warrior of the Salvation Society, John, replied indifferently, “Our friendship is based on our loyalty to the organization. If you want to blame someone, blame yourself. If you don’t follow the organization’s arrangements and don’t carry out the organization’s missions, what use are you?” The other Type 8 warrior of the Salvation Society, Python, replied coldly, “Furthermore, your thoughts are already leaning towards the construction department. The organization doesn’t need a traitor.” Hall laughed bitterly, “Before I die, I want to ask, Jack arranged for us to be with Xiang Shensi and the rest. Is he trying to send us to our deaths, to die at the mouth of that Giant Sun Dragon?” John shouted, “Respectfully address me as Sir! Sir Jack’s plan was all for the organization! “If you were willing to carry out the mission before and lure Xiang shallow view and the others into a place of certain death to prove your loyalty to the organization, of course you wouldn’t have to die, but now...; HMPH!” Kodo shook his head. “I understand...;” After saying this, he seemed to have aged a few decades in an instant, as if he had entered the twilight of his life. “Do it, send the traitor on his way.”The python lit a cigar and raised his decapitation axe high. Hall and Kodo looked at each other with sorrowful expressions. “The one who died with me was not a comrade from the same organization, but you.”Hall sighed. Kodo also sighed. “Yeah, the one who died with me was actually you stubborn old thing.” “Our personalities are so different, but we can actually chat and become friends in the Shura Prison. How interesting.” At this moment, the two of them let go of their usual prejudices. Instead, they felt like heroes cherishing heroes. John and the Python both snorted. The python even increased the strength of the decapitation axe in its hand and ruthlessly chopped at Kodo’s neck! However, before he could chop down with the axe, he felt an extremely terrifying death warning coming from the back of his heart. As an experienced level 8 warrior of the Salvation Society, the Python instinctively turned around and forcefully changed the direction of the attack of the decapitation axe. It turned around and stood horizontally in front of itself. Dang! In the next moment, the short sword fiercely struck the axe. The sound of metal colliding suddenly rang out. What shocked the python was that the axe actually emitted an extremely rich power. This power was so strong that it actually made it stagger back more than ten steps, almost colliding with Hall and Kodo. The Python roared angrily and instinctively struck again. But his axe hit nothing, and there was no one there. Hall and Kodo didn’t have time to react. Their vision blurred, and four bottles of great life potion fell into their arms. “Stop brewing emotions, take the potion quickly.” Lin Xuan’s voice suddenly sounded. Hall and Kodo were overjoyed. They had been chased by John, the giant python, and the others, and all their supplies had been exhausted. Not to mention the HP Potion, they had even run out of HP potions. Now, these two HP potions were like rain in the desert! The two of them did not even think about why someone would come to save them. They did not even have the time to see who the other party was. They simply picked up the HP potion and gulped it down! After consuming the two HP potions, their HP had barely risen from less than 10% before to 50% now. However, although their HP had recovered, their missing limbs did not grow back so quickly. Almost half of Kodo’s body had disappeared. As a result, his combat power had decreased significantly. “Who are you?” John could see that Kodo was only one person. Moreover, he looked very young. Therefore, he did not pay much attention to him. Instead, he sized him up. On their side, there were two people from the Salvation Society, four from the Gaotian plain, and a total of six rank 8 martial artists. What was the use of the other party coming to rescue them. Could it be that they could run away with the heavily injured? The Python was shocked and angry. “John, be careful. This guy is very strong, and his movement speed is very high. It’s very strange.” Hall and Kodo finally had time to see that face clearly. Obviously, it was an unfamiliar yellow face. “Who?” “I’ve never seen him before.” Hall and Kodo looked at each other. They had seen the level eight warriors of the construction department who came to the Dragon mountain range this time. Who the F * ck was this person! ! Lin Xuan chuckled. After he saw that it was hall and Kodo who were being surrounded and killed, he was ready to make his move. At first, he wanted to let the Lightning Dragon take care of these people. However, John, the giant python, and the others were standing very close to Hall. If he let the giant lightning dragon use its long-range skills to kill them, it was very likely that Hall and Kodo would be affected. Moreover, Lin Xuan also wanted to try how strong he would be after he became a rank 8 martial artist. In addition, there was actually a more important point. Advancing to a rank 8 martial artist had caused such an eye-catching phenomenon. It was difficult to continue pretending. The gorgeous girl knew what he looked like. As long as she got the informant of the Salvation Society to investigate, they would know who he was. In this way, everyone would know that Lin Xuan, an ordinary logistics warrior, had inexplicably advanced to level eight, and that he even possessed powerful combat strength. If someone were to investigate further, it was very likely that the things that he had tried his best to hide would be discovered. After some thought, Lin Xuan decided not to pretend anymore. He decided to expose part of his identity and admit that he had the cloning technique. He was the poisonous blade, and the poisonous blade was him. Therefore, he rushed forward and drew his short sword to fight with the Python at close range. Reality proved that Lin Xuan’s current strength was so strong that it exploded. Before the attack, he had already used the [ advanced observation technique ] to obtain information about the python. The highest attribute of a level 8 or level 3 warrior was strength, which had reached 389 points. John, who was beside the Python, was a level 8 warrior. His main strength and sub-agility had reached 414 points and 301 points respectively. As for the four Takama-ga-hara warriors, their levels were between level 8 or level 1 to level 8 or Level 4. Their strength was uneven, but none of them had higher attributes than 400 points. Comparing their attributes with his, Lin Xuan immediately knew that this wave was stable. He was really strong! “Guys, can you still fight? I can’t deal with them alone.”Lin Xuan smiled. “I can do it, but he can’t.”Hall stood up. Kodo cursed, “If you kill someone and throw it to me, I guarantee that I’ll be alive immediately!” Hall recalled Kodo’s methods and felt slightly disgusted, but he still said reluctantly, “Alright, this is a life and death situation after all. I’ll pretend that I didn’t see it.” John’s gaze turned cold. What do you mean, you treat us like air when you speak? You’re so arrogant? ! “That person from the construction department, no matter who you are, if you dare to come and save people today and disturb our organization’s internal cleansing, no one will be able to save you!” John flipped his palm, and a fiery red greatsword suddenly appeared. His gaze was cold as he ruthlessly slashed at Lin Xuan’s head. Four Takama-ga-hara warriors, two of them attacking Lin Xuan’s back, and the other two attacking hall with the giant python. Hall roared, and the light armor attached to his body immediately stood together with the three of them. When fighting with all his might, humans could always burst out with greater potential. This kind of thing that was related to willpower and tenacity was something that was difficult to fully display in the digitized world. Hall relied on his tenacious will to fight with his back to the wall to hold back the python trio, not retreating an inch! Dang dang dang dang! On Lin Xuan’s side, he had already exchanged more than a dozen blows with John. Every blow was evenly matched, and they were equally matched. Under such circumstances, Lin Xuan was still able to defend against and counterattack the two Takama-ga-hara warriors. He had even stabbed a takama-ga-hara warrior in the chest with his sword, almost piercing through the heart. John’s expression was calm on the surface, but his heart was already surging with waves. This person’s combat ability was too strong. One against three, he was not at a disadvantage! He could even leave a wound on the enemy first! One had to know that he was a rank 8! Although he was not in the top 100, Top 200, or top 300 on the global rank 8 list, he was at least 982. Even if he could not be compared to the martial artists of the same level that were carefully nurtured by the organization, it was absolutely no problem for him to look down on the rank 8 martial artists that were lower than him. And this young man opposite him, he could easily fight against three people at once, how could he be a nobody! But this face of the other party, John had really never seen it in the global tier 8 rankings! “Could it be that he had just advanced not long ago?” John was shocked, because he had also seen the shocking light pillar just now, and saw the shadows of the four weapons within the light pillar. If he had just advanced, it would be too terrifying. A level 8 and level 1 could actually fight against a level 8 and level 8, and he even blocked two level 8 and Level 2 at the same time. What kind of F * cking battle genius was this! Clang! Clang! Clang! The sound of metal colliding could be heard continuously. The more Lin Xuan fought, the more he got into the state. Even though the weapons of the three people had almost surrounded him, even though there were a lot of wounds on his body, the more he fought, the braver he became. He actually forced the three people to retreat by himself! PFFT. Lin Xuan seized the opportunity and directly sent his short sword into the heart of a Takama-ga-hara martial artist. Critical hit! Poison critical hit! Wound critical hit! This takama-ga-hara martial artist had lost quite a lot of HP by Lin Xuan’s sword just now. Now, he was not at full HP. With the three critical hits stacked on top of each other, this martial artist had no chance to react at all. He died on the spot. “Kodo, this person is yours!” Lin Xuan kicked the corpse and landed beside Kodo. Kodo’s eyes lit up. He immediately grabbed the corpse and used his skill. The flesh and blood of the corpse gradually dried up, but the half of his body that had disappeared was recovering at a speed visible to the naked eye. His skill [ devour flesh and blood ] could only be used on living creatures and corpses that had just died not long ago. This corpse was exactly what he wanted. “Thank you! Hold on for a little longer, I’ll be able to join the battle soon!” Kodo laughed out loud, extremely carefree. After using the skill for a while, Kodo let out a strange cry, “F * ck, there’s poison in this meat...; but it’s not a big problem.” John was both shocked and angry, and he attacked Lin Xuan with all his strength. All kinds of powerful skills were unleashed, covering all of Lin Xuan’s vital parts. “Die!” However, his skills missed again. Lin Xuan appeared behind him in a flash, and his short sword stabbed fiercely. Poof, poof, poof. In the blink of an eye, three bloody holes were left. John endured the pain, but a large number of green vines suddenly appeared on his back, wrapping around Lin Xuan’s arm in an instant. Lin Xuan was surprised. “I’ve already used the same skill once. Do you think I’ll fall for it again?”John sneered. Without thinking, Lin Xuan immediately prepared to use a pyroblast on John’s face and blow him up. He wasn’t going to use pyroblast at first, but now, he had no choice. At this moment, Kodo opened his mouth and spat out a blood arrow. The blood arrow pierced straight into John’s back and suddenly released purple blood. John’s attack froze. “Poisonous blood arrow, it can stun him for a second. Kid, get rid of the vines!”Kodo shouted. Lin Xuan laughed, “Okay!” The short sword in his hand flew up and down like a sickle cutting grass. In an instant, the vines were cut into pieces. Then, the short sword stabbed at the previous wound again. Vital Point, Poison, wound, three critical strikes again! John could only watch as his HP plummeted from 80% to 15% ! Moreover, the continuous damage from the poison continued to cause his HP to drop like a waterfall! “Bastard!” John roared crazily. After getting rid of the dizziness from the poison blood arrow, his entire body suddenly burst into flames. He wanted to use the flames on his body to force Lin Xuan to retreat so that he could take out the great hp potion from the storage compartment to replenish his HP. “You want to use this to force me to retreat? You’re such a smart kid.” Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. Lin Xuan’s physical resistance was the highest of all resistance, followed by his fire resistance. John’s move might have been effective enough to force many people to retreat. However, it was completely ineffective against Lin Xuan. Lin Xuan did not retreat at all. He drew his sword and stabbed again! Another three-fold critical strike. John’s eyes widened, and his HP was instantly emptied. Even to his death, he could not understand how this young tier 8 martial artist could do it. While his flesh was thick, his movement speed was extremely fast, and his damage was so high. ‘you’re not a martial artist. ‘You’re a human-shaped battle Mystic Realm King!’! After John Fell, the remaining high heaven plains martial artist was terrified. Once again, Lin Xuan seized the opportunity and killed him instantly. The Python was still fighting with Hall, and the three of them had just gained the upper hand. However, when he turned around, he found that John and the other two had already fallen in a pool of blood! The Python turned pale with fright. Hall was stunned for a moment and suddenly burst into laughter. Even the wounds on his body did not hurt at all. “Good, good, good! This is too F * cking good!” At this time, the wounds on Kodo’s body had mostly recovered. His organs had almost completely healed, and his intestines had automatically returned to their original position. Only a few of his bones had yet to recover. He directly jumped up from the ground and said with a sinister smile, “It’s finally my turn to fight back. Python, I’m going to suck you dry!” Lin Xuan and Kodo rushed forward together. John’s death had dealt an extremely strong blow to the python. John, a level 8 fighter, was dead. How could a level 3 fighter fight him! Not long after, the Python and the other two takama-ga-hara fighters also fell to the ground, their faces full of fear. After confirming that there was no danger, Lin Xuan sat down. John was a level 8 fighter after all. The pressure he was under was too great. Even though he had such high attributes and so many rainbow and dark gold skills, he was still under a lot of pressure. However, his new class skills, [ blood of the Conqueror ] , and his dark-gold skill, [ Emperor Engine ] , had helped him a lot. Although he had fought against three opponents by himself and had many wounds on his body, his HP did not drop to a dangerous level. In fact, his HP did not even drop below 65% during the entire process. Hall and Kodo also sat down next to Lin Xuan without any sense of propriety. Two middle-aged men in their fifties, one on the left and the other on the right, stared at Lin Xuan fiercely, which made his hair stand on end. After a long while, Hall said, “Young Man, who are you?” Kodo also said seriously, “I’ve seen all the level eight warriors of the construction division who came to the secret realm this time. You’re very young and strange.” The two of them had never seen Lin Xuan before. They had only seen poison blade. Even if they had seen Lin Xuan’s face from inside information, they would not pay too much attention to him. After all, he was just a logistics warrior. “You two really don’t know me? Think about it, think about my skills.”Lin Xuan smiled. Since he had decided to reveal part of his identity, Lin Xuan planned to start with these two people. “Skills...; with your reminder, I really thought of someone.”Kodo was stunned. He suddenly realized that this young man’s fighting style was very similar to poison Blade’s! He also had extremely high movement speed. He also had extremely high attack damage. His attacks were also imbued with poison. Moreover, even his attack style was very similar. He would first cause the wound, then attack the wound again with the second attack to cause critical damage. Hall was stunned. In his line of sight, Lin Xuan and Poison Blade’s images gradually overlapped. Apart from their different faces, the two of them were practically cut from the same mold. “You...; Are You Poison Blade? !” Hall and Kodo stared at Lin Xuan in shock. Lin Xuan smiled and nodded. “I have a skill called [ clone technique ] . Poison Blade is a clone that I created.” “I’ve never told anyone about this. The two of you are the first to know.” Hall and Kodo were even more surprised. What the hell? Clone? “We don’t believe it, unless you create a clone on the spot to take a look.”Kodo shook his head. Lin Xuan nodded and immediately used [ avatar ] , and poison blade appeared beside him. After putting poison blade into a series of equipment such as the evil set equipment, he looked exactly the same as poison blade in the past. Hall and Kodo’s mouths were wide open, and they could not close them for a long time. F * ck! It’s true! “This, this, this...; But why can your doppelganger talk?” “Also, back in the Shura Prison, your clone actually displayed such powerful combat strength? This is impossible. Logically speaking, the attributes that the clone inherited from the main body are very low.” However, after thinking about it carefully, both of them felt that something was wrong. Back in the Shura Prison, Poison Blade’s performance was no different from that of a normal person. How could it be just a clone? Lin Xuan smiled. “This is my personal secret. I can’t tell anyone.” Hall and Kodo had to give up. Lin Xuan waved his hand and canceled the clone. The two watched the clone disappear. Only then did they confirm that Lin Xuan had a skill similar to the [ clone technique ] . “I really didn’t expect that Poison Blade, who was ranked on the global tier 7 list and had made great achievements, was just a clone...;”Hall didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. “Your original body is actually a logistics warrior. You’re really smart. No one will notice you like this. Even if someone is afraid and wants to kill you, they will only kill your clone and won’t hurt you.”Kodo clicked his tongue in wonder. Lin Xuan just smiled. “You two, I still have a lot of great life potions here. Keep them well.”He took out more than ten bottles of great life potions and handed them over. Hall and Kodo did not refuse and accepted them directly. “What do you two plan to do now?”Lin Xuan asked. Hall and Kodo looked at each other, and for the first time, confusion appeared in their eyes. They had worked hard for the organization for the first half of their lives. But now, the organization they were loyal to had betrayed them because they were closer to the construction division. “I’m loyal to the Knights of truth so that the world can finally reach the scene mentioned in the doctrine. There are no monsters on the Earth, and everyone can walk freely and safely on the Earth. There’s no need to worry about food and drink, and everyone can live in peace and stability “But...; nothing has been achieved. Instead, the Knights of truth began to fight fiercely among factions. I’m tired and tired.” Hall let out a long sigh. Kodo said calmly, “I don’t have any ideas. Since the Salvation Society can’t tolerate it, I’ll go somewhere else.” “I’m sure the construction division won’t refuse a level eight or level nine senior fighter, right?” Lin Xuan laughed, “Of course not.” “Hall, you should join the construction division with me.”Kodo pulled on Hall. Hall thought for a while and said, “I have to think about it carefully. I’ll give you an answer after some time.” “But now, the three of us should act together.” Lin Xuan nodded. “Oh right, I met with Li Weiguo from our organization. We guessed that the other organizations might be going against the two chiefs of our construction division.” Hall and Corto’s expressions changed slightly. They were going to attack a Tier 9 martial artist? This was a big deal. “My previous goal was to find the two chief executives as soon as possible and tell them about this.” “In addition, once we find the two chief executives, our safety will be guaranteed.” Lin Xuan said in a deep voice. “You’re right. Now that the Dragon Mountain Range has collapsed beyond recognition, it will be difficult for us to return to the surface. We must find the two chief executives of the construction division,”Hall and Kodo agreed. “Oh, right. We just found a legendary treasure. It contains a large amount of life force. I reckon that even if a tier 9 warrior eats it raw, it can recover a lot of HP.” “There’s no use for us to keep it. Since you’re a pharmacist, I’ll leave it to you.”Hall took out a red fruit from his storage compartment and handed it to Lin Xuan. Lin Xuan took a look. Ancient dragon blood fruit, dark-gold legendary quality. It was really a legendary treasure. This thing was the same as what he had obtained in the devouring ant nest of the Wei Ming nation’s secret realm. It could be used to make super-life potions! And super-life potions were almost the only item that tier 9 warriors could recover their HP. “Good stuff. Thank you.” Lin Xuan threw it into the space of his consciousness and immediately got the potion table to start making super-life potions. Lin Xuan was about to say something when he suddenly saw a blinding red pillar of light shooting up hundreds of kilometers to the north! What followed was a loud dragon roar! Then, the sounds of various attacks came from that direction. “Giant Sun Dragon!” “The level 9 warriors must have found the giant Sun Dragon and are making a move!” “The Salvation Society, together with the Knights of truth and Gao Tianyuan, are going to attack the two members of the construction department at the same time,”Lin Xuan said seriously. Hall and Kodo nodded. “Let’s get there as soon as possible!” The three of them sprinted toward that direction. Not only them, but almost all the warriors in the underground world saw the blinding light beam. Everyone knew that it was definitely the work of the giant Sun Dragon. Not long after, the three of them arrived here, and they could hear the terrifying explosions from afar. The three of them hid behind the rocks and saw the Type 9 warriors fighting with the Sun Dragon. Gao Qianchi, Lu Pingjiang, Jack, the gorgeous girl, the Pope, the Cardinal, the commander, Ying, and the two commanders of the Arctic army were among them. This sun dragon had no tail. It was obviously the heavily injured Sun Dragon from before, and not the second Sun Dragon that Hall and Kodo had encountered. Lin Xuan looked to the side and saw Bruno and the others. Bruno also noticed them. At first, he was a little surprised that Hall was with the Warriors from the construction department, but he still nodded. Lin Xuan looked at the battlefield. The most attractive part of the battlefield was Gao Qianchi. A pair of fists that seemed to be made of steel kept hitting the giant Sun Dragon’s body. Every time the fists landed, they would shatter the dragon’s scales and splash the dragon’s blood. The Sun Dragon was beaten until it cried out in pain. Its huge dragon eyes stared at Gao Qianchi, full of resentment. Lu Pingjiang, who was next to it, brandished a long sword. When Gao Qianchi was unable to split his body, he either blocked or counterattacked the Sun Dragon. As for the other level nine martial artists, although they were all fighting, Lin Xuan felt that these people were not going all out. Instead, they were all making their own plans. For example, after the giant Sun Dragon died, where would the drops belong to. Or, to protect their own strength so that they could fight for it. “Almost all the level-nine warriors are here, but they must have used a lot of potions to deal with the Giant Sun Dragon,”Hall said in a low voice. “The Giant Sun Dragon is also seriously injured. I’m afraid that it will die soon,”Kodo said. “How should I remind the two people from the construction department?”Hall frowned. Kodo took out a purple bead. “Echo Bead. It can record sound. After it is smashed, the recorded sound will be released.” “Good stuff. I heard that this is not a controlled item of the Salvation Society. You also made this?”Hall mocked. Kodo sneered. “I have long felt that there is something wrong with the old fellows of the Salvation Society. It is not wrong to secretly give them some treasures.” Hall laughed loudly. Kodo was about to record the sound of the warning. At this moment, the Dying Sun Dragon let out an incomparably loud dragon roar. The sound was filled with penetrating power, causing everyone present, except for the tier 9 martial artist, to involuntarily cover their ears. At this moment, their minds were blank, and they could barely react. Of course, the tier 9 martial artist would also be affected by the dragon roar, but this effect was not enough to interrupt their attacks. “Not good, the giant Sun Dragon is about to counterattack! Quick, stop him!”Jack shouted, but immediately took half a step back. “Everyone, don’t hide anymore, quickly take out your trump cards!”The gorgeous girl screamed and also retreated. The Shadow, Pope, and cardinal archbishop all did the same. They casually cast a skill and immediately took half a step back. No one dared to withstand the dying counterattack of a Tier 9 Battle Mystic Realm King. The giant Sun Dragon’s eyes flashed with hatred as it charged at the person who attacked it the most fiercely. Gao Qianchi! Among all the attacks of the level 9 martial artists, Gao Qianchi was the one with the fiercest output. His fists would pierce through the giant Sun Dragon’s scales every time, giving it a heavy blow. Therefore, even if it died, it would drag Gao Qianchi along with it! Gao Qianchi’s expression changed slightly, and he immediately retreated. Lu Pingjiang’s expression changed greatly, and he immediately rushed over. “Old Gao!” Seeing this scene, Lin Xuan and the others’faces turned pale. They were still one step too late. Just now, as long as Jack, Shadow, the Pope, and the others went all out, they would definitely be able to kill the Giant Sun Dragon before it struggled to its death. However, everyone had their own little plans, and none of them went all out. In this way, the battle power of a group of level nine warriors was less than half of their numbers. And now, the Pope and the others took half a step back. They did not want to be affected by the dying counterattack of the Giant Sun Dragon. Then, who would be the one who would be severely injured or even killed by the dying counterattack? It would definitely be a thousand feet tall! Lin Xuan looked at the Pope, Ying, Jack, and the others. Sure enough, these people looked anxious, but they did not move at all. While they shouted to save Gao Qianchi, they continued to retreat under their feet. Among all the level-nine warriors, only the chief commander subconsciously took a few steps forward. Bruno saw the Cardinal Archbishop Retreat, but he was still a little disdainful. After all, the Cardinal Archbishop had always had a bad reputation in the Knights of truth. But when he saw the pope take half a step back as well, his eyes suddenly revealed a look of disbelief. “How could this be...;” “Didn’t you say that every member of the Knights of Truth should have their creed as the first rule of life?” “But why did you...;” Bruno was the holy son, raised by the Pope alone. The pope had always told him that he should always believe in the god of truth, and should always follow the Creed. The teachings said that all our friends should support and help them, and all our enemies should destroy them. The teachings also said that betrayal was the worst sin. What the Pope was doing now did not follow the teachings at all, and even went against them! Bruno usually saw members of the Knights of truth going against the teachings, and every time he would step forward and shout. Even if the other party was Roger, the grandson of the Cardinal, he would not leave any face. If the Pope knew about this, he would even praise him. Bruno had always been determined to sweep away the parasites and pests within the organization and turn the Knights of Truth into the clear and bright organization that it had been when it was first established. However, now, Bruno’s values were completely shaken. Because the person he regarded as a role model, who was supposed to be the most religious, had done the most wrong thing. At this time, all eyes were on Gao Qianchi. Some people wanted him to die. Some people knew that Gao Qianchi had a high chance of not dying and that he might have something that could save his life. Some people prayed that Gao Qianchi would survive. Gao Qianchi’s reaction seemed to have predicted this scene. “Sister Ye’s guess is right. How can I solve the problem of the dragon mountain range with you insects?” Gao Qianchi shook his head slightly. Facing the charging giant Sun Dragon, he took half a step back, his left palm forward, his right elbow backward, and his right fist rapidly accumulated power. Everyone could not help but look at his right fist and found that it was as heavy as a ton. There seemed to be a mountain on the fist that was as big as a casserole! The surrounding light seemed to be absorbed by the giant fist. In the next moment, under everyone’s watchful eyes,. The 1,000-foot-tall right fist fiercely collided with the head of the Giant Sun Dragon! Bang! An earth-shattering explosion! Monstrous Flames! Hall was shocked and immediately used his [ Armor of light ] to protect Lin Xuan below. Kodo spread his blood wings and enveloped Lin Xuan. Boom! A terrifying airwave swept out. The glaring flames enveloped an area of 1,000 meters around the man and the dragon. The towering dust prevented people from seeing the situation clearly. The Pope, Shadow, and the others did not know the situation and did not act rashly. However, Lin Xuan used his [ five senses to heaven ] to sense a result that surprised him. The heart that was one thousand feet tall was still beating! However, it was much weaker than before. “There’s too much dust. I don’t know if the Giant Sun Dragon is really dead. Let me blow the wind away.” Shadow waved his hand, and a strong wind rose up from the ground, quickly dispersing the dust. Everyone immediately saw that Gao Qianchi was still in the same position as before. His muscles were bulging, and his clothes were completely engulfed by the flames. His eyebrows and body hair were also completely charred by the flames, and his entire body was bare. Many parts of his body were charred black. Especially his right fist, which looked like it had been completely charred. The four fingers that were facing the giant Sun Dragon’s head had completely lost their flesh and blood, leaving only the white bones of their fingers. But even so, Gao Qianchi was still standing. The Giant Sun Dragon in front of him had already become a corpse that had fallen to the ground. “Chief Gao, are you alright? I still have the last bottle of super life potion here, let me help you!”The gorgeous girl exclaimed and immediately rushed towards Gao Qianchi. “Chief Gao, My Truth Knights have a healing divine art. Let Me Help You!”The grand cardinal quickly approached. Jack, Shadow, and the others did not stay where they were. Instead, they immediately rushed over. It was simply too difficult for tier 9 fighters to see each other’s HP. They could only roughly estimate that thousand feet had lost at least 70% of his HP. With this amount of HP, if everyone swarmed over, they could kill Gao Qianchi! Lu Pingjiang was both shocked and furious. “What are you doing? Retreat!” The gorgeous woman’s eyes were like silk as she said, “Then why are you being so cautious? Didn’t you guys already use up all your super-life potions? I still have one bottle here. Do you need me to tell you how precious the super-life potions are? I’ll give it to you for free, but you guys don’t want it?” At this moment, a bottle of potion was thrown from behind a rock beside them. Gao Qianchi didn’t notice the attack power of the potion. Moreover, he realized that the potion didn’t land on his body, so he didn’t smash it in the air. Crack. The potion shattered beside his feet. The dense life aura immediately drowned him. Gao Qianchi was surprised to find that his HP was recovering rapidly. The various charred injuries on the surface of his body were also recovering at a visible rate. The gorgeous lady, Pope, Shadow, and the others were all incomparably shocked. What was going on? Everyone had almost used up all of their lifesaving potions. Where did this bottle of lifesaving potion come from? ! Moreover...; it was the type that could take effect upon hitting the ground without removing the stopper! Gao Qianchi looked at the place where the potion was thrown. “Who is that?” The gorgeous girl’s eyes also moved. “Who is it? He actually hid a bottle of great life potion.” Lin Xuan knew that there was no need to hide it, so he walked out directly. “Chief Gao, chief Lu, I’m Lin Xuan, an agent of the construction department, a logistics warrior.” The gorgeous girl was stunned. This face was so familiar that she had never forgotten it! It was the level eight warrior who had triggered the ten-meter-long beam of light, and the Phantom image of four weapons appeared in the beam! But...; how could it be a logistics warrior? The gorgeous girl was a little confused when she heard Lin Xuan’s self-introduction. Gao Qianchi was surprised. “Okay, stand behind me.” Lin Xuan smiled and pointed to the other side. “Chief Gao, there are two more over there.” As soon as he finished speaking, Hall and Kodo walked out. Jack saw that the two of them were safe and sound, and there were no wounds on their bodies. He immediately frowned. It was not only him, but the Pope and the cardinal were also the same. They had clearly arranged for people to kill these two traitors, but why were these two still alive and kicking. The pope coughed lightly, “Hall, I’m very happy to see that you’re fine. Quickly come over and stand by my side.” Jack also squeezed out an ugly smile, “Kodo, not bad, not bad. You actually survived. Come to my side.” Hall and Kodo glanced at their own rank 9 warriors, but they both stopped in place at the same time. “From today onwards, I will leave the Knights of Truth,”Hall said indifferently. “From today onwards, I, Kodo, will also leave the truth...; Bah, I said it wrong, I will leave the Salvation Society,”Kodo said with his arms crossed. Not far away, Bruno heard these words and turned pale with fright. “What is Lord Hall saying?” The pope’s face darkened, “Hall, what do you mean?” The chief commander became anxious, “Hall, you can’t say these words carelessly. How can you leave the organization?” Hall said calmly, “John, Python, and the other four highland warriors killed us. Who ordered it? Do you need me to say it in public?” The pope’s expression changed slightly as he looked at Jack. Jack frowned deeply. Hall already knew about this. It seemed that John, Python, and the others were most likely dead. Although he did not understand how hall and Kodo managed to escape from the encirclement of six Type 8 warriors. However, Hall and Kodo’s appearance in this place made it difficult for them to back down. Gao Qianchi and Lu Pingjiang, on the other hand, wore a thoughtful expression. This scene had exceeded their expectations. Internal Strife? How interesting! At this moment, the situation had become extremely awkward. One could even hear a pin drop. At this moment, Gao Tian Yuan’s leader, shadow, spoke first, “Since they already know, there’s no need to continue pretending.” “Let’s do it. Even if thousand feet Gao has a bottle of super life potion that can increase his HP, he won’t be a match for us.” “Kill all of these people. Nothing will happen.” Shadow’s tone was very calm, as if he was talking about a trivial matter. The Grand Commander was shocked. “This...; why kill thousand feet Gao?” Ying frowned. “What do you mean? You still don’t Know?” The pope laughed bitterly. “There are some things I haven’t told him.” Ying waved his hand. “Just don’t get in the way.” The first regiment commander was inexplicably shocked. “Pope, if we surround and kill Gao Qianchi, we will completely lose all decorum with the construction department! If our six major organizations lose decorum with each other, it will definitely turn into a world war. The gains won’t make up for the losses!” The pope said calmly, “This is the decision of the higher-ups. You Don’t need to know why. You only need to carry it out.” “If you are not willing to carry it out, then don’t participate in the battle. Go and stay outside. Unless, you also want to betray the organization.” The head commander frowned deeply. He had always admired Gao Qianchi’s forthright and capable personality. He had never thought that he would become Gao Qianchi’s enemy. After deep thought, he walked straight towards the periphery of the battlefield. “I’ll deal with Gao Qianchi. Pope, you deal with Lu Pingjiang.” “Leave the two regimental commanders of the Arctic army to Jack and the Cardinal Archbishop.” “Lady, I’ll leave the rest to you to kill. Don’t let any of them escape alive.” Ying said calmly, and in an instant, everything was arranged properly. Bang! He stomped on the ground fiercely and instantly rose up, instantly standing together with Gao Qianchi. Even the air emitted a series of explosions. The Fist Shadow and the saber light collided, and the sound of explosions swept in all directions. The two fought further and further, and soon they were more than 1,000 meters away from Lin Xuan and Gao Qianchi. At the same time that Ying and Gao Qianchi fought, the battle between the others also happened in an instant. The battles between them were also very far apart. Because the attack range of a level nine warrior was larger, they needed more space to fight. If they were too close, they would be accidentally affected. If it affected the enemy, it would be fine, but if it affected their own side, it would be hard to say. The gorgeous girl laughed strangely and directly charged at Lin Xuan. She knew how terrifying Lin Xuan’s talent was, so the first person she wanted to kill was Lin Xuan! Hall and Kodo’s expressions changed drastically. They did not expect that a level-nine warrior would be so shameless as to personally deal with a level-eight warrior. Hall gritted his teeth and shouted, “Run! We can hold on for as long as we can!” Kodo cursed, “F * ck, I just narrowly escaped death, and now I have to face a real level-nine warrior. I’m not convinced!” Even though he said so, Corto did not take a step back. Instead, he went up to the gorgeous girl. Their lives were saved by Lin Xuan. Now that Lin Xuan’s life was in danger, they could not abandon him. The gorgeous woman sneered. Even though hall and Cordo were both level eight and level nine, they were only ants in her eyes, and could be killed with one move. What made her even more amused was that Hall and Cordo tried to stop her with their bodies of flesh and blood, but Lin Xuan still stood where he was and did not move. He did not look at her, but at the sky. “After killing so many monsters and warriors, its strength has actually risen to level nine, level two...;”Lin Xuan muttered. “Is there anything good in the sky that is worth seeing?” The gorgeous girl sneered. The Purple Mist had already enveloped hall and Kodo. The moment their arms touched, they immediately began to rot! It was not only flesh and blood, but also bones! The two were both shocked and angry. Although they had long known of the lady’s methods, hearsay and direct contact were two completely different things. Only those who had truly fought with a tier 9 warrior would be able to experience the terror of a Tier 9 warrior! Just as the gorgeous lady was about to increase the toxicity of the purple mist, a sense of foreboding rose in her heart for no reason. This foreboding did not come from hall and Kodo in front of her, nor from the tier 9 warriors fighting behind her. Instead, it came from...; the top of her head! The gorgeous girl instinctively raised her head, and the next moment, she suddenly saw a giant lightning dragon! The Giant Lightning Dragon was brewing wild thunder in its mouth, and it came crashing down! Lin Xuan said calmly, “The sky is really so beautiful.” The gorgeous girl screamed, and the purple mist immediately withdrew, instantly wrapping around her body tightly. Hall and Kodo immediately retreated. They looked down and saw that more than half of their palms had disappeared. The flesh on their forearms had also been completely corroded. Even their white bones had become pockmarked. The two of them quickly took out the great life potion and gulped it down. Then, they stared at the Lightning Dragon in the sky in bewilderment. It was obviously a Tier 9 monster that could make the gorgeous girl scream and immediately defend with all her strength. However, why would the Lightning Dragon suddenly appear and attack the gorgeous girl? Hall couldn’t figure it out. Kodo couldn’t figure it out either. But they knew very well that now was a good time to counterattack! Without saying anything, the two threw their powerful skills at the gorgeous lady. Even if they couldn’t seriously injure the gorgeous lady, as long as they could deal a little damage to her, it was enough. Boom! The lightning breath landed on the ground with a loud bang, colliding with the purple mist protecting the gorgeous lady. The blue and purple colors intertwined and disappeared. The air was filled with the smell of burning. But after the purple color was completely exhausted, the blue color still existed. The Gorgeous Lady’s pupils suddenly contracted. In the next moment, the remaining lightning breath hit her tall chest. Bang! The gorgeous lady’s body flew out. Her chest was sunken, her clothes were burnt, and her skin was completely charred. The Lightning Dragon let out a long cry and swooped down again, attacking the gorgeous girl. The gorgeous girl rolled on the ground and got up. She screamed and rushed toward the nearest level nine martial artist. “Jack, save me, save me!” She screamed at the top of her lungs and completely lost her composure. Obviously, she was completely no match for the Lightning Dragon. Lin Xuan glanced at Gao Qianchi and Ying, who could not be separated, and then looked at the other battles. All of them were going back and forth, up and down, equally matched. He cursed silently. There was actually such a weak beauty among level nine warriors? He had really opened his eyes today. Hall was clearly shocked by the beauty’s fear of death. “She’s at the Salvation Society. Is she usually like this?” Kodo shook his head. “Usually, she’s...; Quite Steady.” Jack and the cardinal were currently fighting with the two commanders of the Arctic army. He did not even care about the sudden arrival of the giant lightning dragon. Because the four of them were evenly matched in terms of strength, once they were distracted, a huge flaw might appear. However, at this moment, the gorgeous girl’s scream made his heart jolt, and he subconsciously looked behind him. The next moment, he immediately saw a giant lightning dragon swooping down! The two Arctic army commanders immediately seized the opportunity. One of them formed an ice chain in his palm and took the opportunity to catch Jack off guard. The other held a huge ice spear in both of his hands and stabbed it at Jack’s heart! Jack did not expect this and could only take out his trump card to block it. An obsidian shield suddenly appeared in front of him. The ice spear struck the stone shield and both of them shattered. Jack’s skill [ obsidian shield ] was also on cooldown for eight hours. “F * ck, why did you suddenly come here? !” Jack roared and threw a spear at the Lightning Dragon in the sky. The Lightning Dragon had no choice but to dodge the spear and gave up on diving. The beautiful girl was still in shock. “I don’t know where that Lightning Dragon came from, I can’t beat it...;”she gritted her teeth. Jack cursed in his heart. Although he knew that you were very weak among the rank 9 warriors, but you were so weak that you couldn’t even beat a rank 9 or rank 2 Lightning Dragon. It was too much. “Forget it, let’s ignore those rank 8 warriors first. What can a few rank 8 warriors achieve? Join us to besiege these two Arctic soldiers.” Jack snorted coldly, “As for that lightning dragon, it must be passing by. We have too many rank 9 warriors fighting here, it doesn’t dare to stay long.” The gorgeous lady nodded, “That makes sense.” “As long as we organize those two to get rid of the other Sun Dragon and rush over, no matter who it is, they will all die.” The gorgeous girl nodded and immediately joined their attack on the two commanders of the Arctic army. With the addition of a level nine warrior, the pressure on the two of them increased greatly. On Lin Xuan’s side, he smacked his lips. “You look down on me, a level eight warrior?” “You look down on my training avatar?” Lin Xuan laughed instead. The less the other party valued him, the more chance he had to fish in troubled waters. On the ground not far away, there was the corpse of the Giant Sun Dragon! That was a level nine battle mystic realm king that even the powerful level nine warriors such as Gao Qianchi, Ying, and the Pope could not kill quickly even if they surrounded and attacked him! If he could use it as his training avatar, he might be able to completely change the situation of the battle! However, Lin Xuan could not just walk over and resurrect it. Otherwise, his core and most secretive ability would be exposed to everyone. He would become the target of everyone. Even if his training avatar was very strong, he was still unable to fight against a level-nine warrior. If an enemy tried to assassinate him, it would be impossible to guard against them. Moreover...; There was another giant Sun Dragon in the Dragon Mountain Range’s secret realm, but the Salvation Society and the others still decided to completely fall out with the construction department and the Arctic army here and fight. Lin Xuan was sure that they definitely had a trump card, and it was a trump card that could completely change the situation of the battle. “Guys, cover me. Let’s go and take the spoils of war dropped by the Giant Sun Dragon!” Lin Xuan coughed lightly and said in a low voice. Hall and Kodo’s eyes lit up. “Okay! Let’s Go!” The spoils of a level nine battle mystic realm king were definitely not ordinary items. At the same time, in another part of the underground world of the Dragon Mountain Range. Two old men with pitch-black skin were hammering the other sun dragon on the left and right. Every time they punched, even if their skin was burnt, their expressions didn’t change at all. In such a fierce attack, the light on the Sun Dragon’s body was dimming at a speed visible to the naked eye. Moreover, every attack of the two old men would leave black spots on the Sun Dragon’s body. The black spots squirmed on their own as if they had a life of their own and slowly spread out. The more the Sun Dragon fought, the slower and older it became. However, its deathbed counterattack still left a huge wound on the bodies of the two old men. Large patches of charred black appeared on their chests. One of the old men’s entire arm was swallowed by the blazing light. When it was pulled out again, the entire arm, flesh, and bones, had disappeared. However, there was no pain on the faces of the two old men. They were as cold and monotonous as machines. Bang. The Sun Dragon failed to kill its opponent even though it was on the verge of death. It let out a long cry in despair and fell to the ground. The two old men picked up the items dropped by the Sun Dragon and looked at Lin Xuan and the others from afar. “It’s time to go...;” “I don’t have much HP left. I can only fight for another half an hour before I’m devoured by the Sun Dragon...;” “It doesn’t matter. Completing the mission is our greatest reward to the organization.” The two old men spoke one after another. After they finished speaking, they stomped on the ground and dashed over. On the other side. Lin Xuan and the other two quickly arrived before the corpse of the giant Sun Dragon without any obstruction. The tier 9 warriors completely ignored them. Even if they really took the drops, it did not matter. After the battle was over, the loot would still belong to them after killing the three tier 8 warriors. At this time, Lin Xuan could finally see the death of this horrifying monster up close. Its hard and huge skull was completely caved in. It was smashed in by Gao Qianchi’s punch! [ detected dead target, analyzing...; ] [ Sun Dragon, Level 9 battle Mystic Realm King, attributes: Vitality 366, strength 521, agility 345, Spirit 601, Skills: Sun Pillar, Bloodline Link, Blazing Sun Body...; ] [ cause of death: Head hit. ] [ no doppelganger available at the moment. Do you wish to disarm and possess this dead target? ] “Remarks: This dead target will immediately be revived at full health.” Just as Lin Xuan was about to speak, two old men with pitch-black skin all over their bodies suddenly appeared in his perception like a gale. At the same time, he also sensed the stench that came with the wind. It was coming from the two old men. “Danger...; an extremely dangerous aura! It’s more dangerous than any level nine warrior I’ve ever seen!” Lin Xuan subconsciously shouted with all his might, “Chief Gao, chief Lu! A powerful level nine warrior is approaching! Pay attention!” Lin Xuan used all his strength to shout out this voice, and it immediately caused Gao Qianchi to be on high alert. The other level nine martial artists also heard this voice. They didn’t have any doubts for a few seconds, but their hearts immediately tightened for no reason, as if a powerful existence had pinched their hearts. The gorgeous girl, Jack, and the other weaker level nine martial artists had an even more obvious reaction. As for Hall and Kodo, they felt even more terrified, as if a great disaster was about to befall them. “It should be those two.” Jack said in a low voice. The beautiful girl was overjoyed, and the nervousness from before immediately disappeared. “Those two are here, we will definitely win!” The morale of the two was high. In contrast, the two commanders of the Arctic army were bewildered, continuously revealing their flaws. One of them was even severely injured by the cardinal. In the next moment, two old men appeared at the center of the battle like a gust of wind. The moment they appeared, they stole everyone’s sight. Everyone instinctively stopped and looked at them. The leader of the Gaotian plains, Ying, smiled calmly. “They’re finally here.” Gao Qianchi frowned. That was the trump card that the Salvation Society and the others were so confident in? Who Was It? He thought that the intelligence work of the construction division had been done well. A few years ago, the Salvation Society’s Intelligence Department was full of people from the construction division. Those who didn’t know would have thought that it was the construction division’s branch in the Salvation Society. However, after that, the Salvation Society carried out a purge. Some of the informants from the Intelligence Division escaped and died. Even so, the construction department had placed many informants in the Salvation Society. “The level of secrecy is too high. Didn’t any of the informants get the relevant information?” Gao Qianchi frowned deeply. Ying smiled faintly. “The battle should be over. With you and Lu Pingjiang dead, the construction department’s combat strength will be reduced by at least 30% .” Gao Qianchi did not say anything. Instead, he looked at the two old men. The two old men were very strange. There were large patches of black spots on their exposed skin, and some places had even turned completely black. What made Gao Qianchi even stranger was that their eyes were also pitch-black, like black holes that were constantly rotating! Gao Qianchi could smell danger from them. It was an indescribable danger! The warrior named Lin Xuan was right. It was a great danger! Jack and the gorgeous lady stopped fighting and took a few steps forward. They said respectfully, “Greetings, Lord Five and Lord Six.” The two weird old men nodded slightly. “Who are you going to kill?”Five asked calmly. Jack pointed at the tall and sturdy Gao Qianchi. “That one.” Ying hurriedly shifted to the side to avoid being pointed at by Jack. The gorgeous lady pointed at Lu Pingjiang and the two commanders of the Arctic army. “And the three people over there.” Five and six nodded. “Okay.” The next moment, the two figures suddenly disappeared from their original positions. The two commanders of the Arctic army felt a great sense of foreboding, and they instinctively retreated. However, they were still one step too slow. Two black hands suddenly stretched out from their hearts. Crack. Their hearts were suddenly crushed. Their HPS plummeted like a waterfall. However, tier 9 martial artists had very long HPS. They would not die on the spot just because their vitals had been shattered. The two of them still had around 15% of their HPS left. As long as they could shake off the attacks and keep a distance between them, they would not die. However, something frightening had happened. A large stretch of black spread from their wounds to their entire bodies! Wherever they passed, their skin would shrivel and wither, losing its luster and moisture. It was as if they had suddenly gone from being in their thirties or forties to being in their seventies or eighties. The two commanders were incomparably terrified. They wanted to pull away, but they discovered that their speed had been reduced to an extremely frightening degree. They lowered their heads to take a look. The aging had already spread to their feet. Plop. The two of them could no longer hold on. Their bodies suddenly fell to the ground, letting out muffled sounds. Shockingly, their HPS had already been reduced to zero. Five and six withdrew their hands, their gazes gradually shifting to Gao Qianchi and Lu Pingjiang. Lu Pingjiang’s hair immediately stood on end when he was looked at, as if the other party was not a short and thin old man, but a peerless fierce beast, a fierce beast even more terrifying than the giant sun dragon that had just died! Whoosh! In the next second, five and six once again disappeared on the spot. Gao Qianchi and Lu Pingjiang’s hearts were filled with an unspeakable sense of great danger, and they immediately retreated explosively. Shadow was even faster than him, afraid that he would be accidentally injured by these two old men. He used his skill and instantly retreated more than 200 meters. As expected, in the next moment, five appeared beside Gao Qianchi. His black right hand grabbed at Gao Qianchi’s heart. However, Gao Qianchi seemed to have not reacted and continued to retreat. Ying let out a sigh of relief, his expression complicated. He was an ambitious person and had never been willing to be inferior to others. However, he still chose to cooperate with the Salvation Society this time because he had seen a video with his own eyes. It was the video of these two old men killing a level 9 realm king. One second. In just one second, that level 9 realm king that was filled with fighting spirit and invincible had collapsed to the ground, his entire body aging. Ying did not know when the Salvation Society had obtained such a powerful weapon, but he knew that he would never be able to defeat the king of the Level 9 secret realm. Facing the invitation of the Salvation Society, he could not refuse, and he knew that he should not refuse. It was better to follow another expert to divide up another expert, than to maintain a ridiculous neutrality. The construction division was the target of the division. “Gao Qianchi, you can only hold on for ten seconds at most, but you still have to die.”Shadow looked at the battle between Gao Qianchi and Gao Qianchi. It had to be said that Gao Qianchi was worthy of being the second chief of the construction division. He was extremely experienced in battle. Not only did he dodge the most fatal attack and protect his heart, but he also forced Five’s hand to hit his left arm. But even so, his left arm was aging at a speed visible to the naked eye. Gao Qianchi made a prompt decision. He pulled out a knife from the storage compartment and directly cut off his left arm! Lu Pingjiang was not so lucky. He only avoided the heart, but six’s hand still penetrated his chest and crushed his right lung. The aging was spreading uncontrollably. “The battle is over.”Jack and the gorgeous girl let out a long breath. The pope smiled. “It’s our honor to fight alongside the Salvation Army.” The cardinal laughed loudly. “I’ve said it before. The Salvation Army is our staunchest ally. Some people even said that they want to cooperate with the construction division. Does the construction division have such strong combat strength?” The “Some people”he was referring to naturally referred to the chief commander who was standing at the periphery of the battlefield. At this moment, the chief commander saw this scene from afar and his face was filled with complete disbelief. The Salvation Army...; actually had such a strong person? Hall, Kodo, Bruno, and the others were shocked beyond words. Even though Kodo was a fighter of the Salvation Army, he did not know that his own organization still had such a terrifying trump card. “No wonder...; No Wonder.”Kodo sighed. Hall was dispirited. “What should we do?” After sensing the auras of the two old men, no one thought that Gao Qianchi and Lu Pingjiang could survive. At this moment, everyone’s eyes were on Gao Qianchi and Lu Pingjiang. No one cared. Beside the giant corpse of the Sun Dragon, a logistics warrior named Lin Xuan quietly squatted down and gently touched the Sun Dragon. “Possession confirmed.” Lin Xuan muttered. In the next moment, the Sun Dragon was restored at a speed visible to the naked eye! Its head was restored, its flesh and blood grew, and its bones were reconstructed.. Lin Xuan retreated repeatedly and used his acting skills that surpassed Oscar’s. He was so terrified that he shouted at the top of his voice, “The Sun Dragon has been resurrected!” In a flash, he ran behind Hall and Kodo. Hall and Kodo were also stunned for a moment. They immediately retracted their gazes and looked at the giant Sun Dragon. They saw an even more shocking scene. The already dead and terrifying giant Sun Dragon had really stood up again! Its body once again emitted an aura that only existed before it was alive. Moreover, the giant sun dragon’s injuries were recovering rapidly. In the blink of an eye, it had returned to its peak condition. Especially that tail. It seemed to have appeared out of thin air, completely ignoring the laws of physics and scientific principles. Hall and Kodo were stunned. After the giant Sun Dragon’s aura was released, everyone stopped moving, including Gao Qianchi and the others who were fighting. Five, six pulled back their hands and looked back at the giant Sun Dragon. The Sun Dragon also looked down at them from above. Jack and the gorgeous girl couldn’t help but open their teeth. “What...; What’s going on?” “You ask me...; I F * cking ask...; Ask Who!”The gorgeous girl’s eyes were full of fear. Jack remembered another terrifying thing. “Five and six, how much time do they have left?” The gorgeous girl was stunned. “They took a transport plane from the organization and killed another Sun Dragon. It has already taken them at least nine hours...;” Jack’s expression changed slightly. “Then their lifespan will soon come to an end...;” The Pope and shadow looked extremely surprised. How could this be? The Sun Dragon was clearly dead, so why did it stand up again. This was completely out of their expectations, and the two leaders of the organization were also stunned. “Roar!” The Sun Dragon roared and spat out a material-like column of flame. The column of flame was more than ten meters in diameter, and it was blazing hot, as if it was going to burn everything! Five and six were instantly drowned! The pope shouted, “Don’t just stand there, quickly attack the Sun Dragon!” The situation was rather awkward because no one moved. No one could understand why the Sun Dragon had come back from the dead. Furthermore, the Sun Dragon was clearly in its peak condition. Who would be able to catch up and stroke its whiskers. What was even more awkward was that even after the pope shouted, he did not move. Shadow, the Pope, Jack, and the others stared at each other, all of them thinking of letting someone else attack. Boom! A black light suddenly erupted from the pillar of flame. The figures of the five and six people gradually became visible. However, their clothes had almost been burned to the ground, revealing large patches of skin. Just like their exposed skin, there were large patches of black spots under their clothes. Lu Pingjiang panted heavily and walked to Gao Qianchi’s side. He said in a low voice, “For a moment, I thought I saw an eye on that person’s stomach, but it disappeared in an instant.” Gao Qianchi frowned. “I didn’t see it, but I also had a strange feeling. Even though these two old men had their backs to us, they seemed to be watching us.” “The Salvation Society must be carrying out some secret operation behind our backs. These two old men weren’t even tier 9 warriors in the past. How did they suddenly have such powerful combat strength?”Lu Pingjiang said in a low voice, “I’ve already anchored this mystic realm. Should I send a signal to sister Ye and the others now?” Gao Qianchi shook his head. “Let’s Wait a little longer. I still want to get more information from the Pope and Ying...; I have a feeling that the war is about to begin.” Lu Pingjiang’s expression was solemn as he nodded repeatedly. Boom Boom Boom! The sun dragon continuously spewed out flames. In comparison, the black light emitted by chapters five and six became weaker and weaker. Five suddenly said, “I don’t have enough time.” Six nodded. “Me too.” “Self-destruct. Try to cause as much damage to it as possible.” “Okay.” In the next moment, the bodies of the two people began to expand crazily like balloons! When Hall and Kodo saw this scene, their pupils constricted. They pulled Lin Xuan and ran out. At the same time, they also pulled Bruno, who was hiding behind a rock, out. The Pope, Shadow, Jack, and the others also felt the threat. They quickly used their divine abilities and used all sorts of speed, displacement, and flash skills to increase the distance between them. Boom! A terrifying black light exploded with a loud bang. It even contained blood, flesh, and bones. The Giant Sun Dragon also let out a mournful cry. The flaming pillars of light that kept spewing out from its mouth became mute because of this. Even so, the giant sun dragon was not seriously injured. Only half of its face was directly blown away. One of its dragon eyes exploded, revealing its mouth and a row of sharp dragon teeth. The terrifying Shockwave swept in all directions with the battle at the center. Rocks were crushed, and flesh and blood splattered. Even though Lin Xuan had been pulled far away by Hall and Kodo, he still felt pain on his face as if it was being cut by a knife. Soon, the dust dispersed. Only the giant Sun Dragon was still standing where it was, and the two weird old men were gone. Well, maybe they weren’t gone, but they weren’t all over the place. As long as they were patient enough to search, they should be able to find a human. However, although five and six were dead, no one dared to take a deep breath. Because the giant sun dragon was still there, and it didn’t look like it was seriously injured. Everyone held their breath. Meanwhile, Lin Xuan was gasping for air. Bruno quickly covered his mouth. Whether it was the pope, Shadow, thousand feet, or Lu Pingjiang, none of them had high HP. Some of their powerful skills were still on Cooldown. Everyone had to work together to kill the Sun Dragon. However, based on the current situation, it was impossible for them to work together. It was impossible for them to work together for the rest of their lives. The Sun Dragon looked around, and its gaze fell on Gao Qianchi. The others were overjoyed. The gorgeous girl even whispered, “Yes, yes, yes, that’s the place! Kill him!” Gao Qianchi’s entire body tensed up, ready to deal with it at any moment. The Sun Dragon, which only had one eye left, did not continue to look at him. Instead, it turned around and looked at Lin Xuan and the others. The gorgeous girl frowned but also nodded. “That’s fine too.” The Giant Sun Dragon moved closer to Lin Xuan and took a few glances. Its breath even swept across hall and the rest’s faces. However, Hall and Kodo did not dare to move, afraid that they would attract the giant’s hatred. For some reason, the giant Sun Dragon did not attack Lin Xuan in the end. Instead, it turned around and looked at Jack and the gorgeous girl. In Lin Xuan’s opinion, those two were also the easiest level-nine warriors to kill. The gorgeous lady’s expression was even uglier than when she was crying. Under the gaze of the Sun Dragon’s single eye, she could not even think of resisting. “I don’t taste good, don’t look at me, don’t look at me.” She was mumbling something. Perhaps it was because of her words that the sun dragon really turned its gaze away and looked at the pope. Just as the gorgeous lady was rejoicing that she had survived, the Sun Dragon suddenly turned its head, and a pillar of flame shot out from its mouth, instantly enveloping her and jack beside her! The Beautiful Woman’s shrill scream came from the pillar of flames. Jack also let out a shrill scream and quickly rolled out. The Beautiful Woman’s HP plummeted like a waterfall. She immediately imitated Jack and rushed out of the range of the flames. After rushing out, the beautiful woman’s clothes were all burnt. However, under her clothes was not a naked jade body, but her entire body was charred black! If this had happened before the global digitization, this degree of Burns would have basically killed her. However, the gorgeous woman was a Tier 9 martial artist after all. Even if she was the weakest tier 9, Tier 1, her HP was still quite tenacious. Just as the gorgeous woman let out a long breath, the screams of Jack, the Grand Cardinal, and the others came from the side. “Get out of the way!” The gorgeous girl was suddenly alarmed and instinctively dodged. However, after being burned by the flames, her ears had been burned away, and her hearing was severely damaged. By the time she reacted, it was already too late. The sharp claws of the giant sun dragon swept past her waist like it was hitting tofu, directly crushing everything below her waist! The gorgeous girl immediately felt a chill at her waist. She looked down and saw that there was nothing below her waist. The ground was covered with pieces of flesh that were not even the size of a finger. Thud. She fell to the ground. Only then did she realize that her lower body had been cut into pieces by the Sun Dragon! “AH — !” The gorgeous girl screamed. It was hard to imagine what was happening before her eyes. The Sun Dragon raised its left front paw and slammed it down. PFFT! The gorgeous woman’s scream stopped abruptly. When the giant Sun Dragon raised its claw again, there was only a pile of meat paste left on the spot. It was impossible to tell that the meat paste was a sexy and hot woman when she was alive. Everyone present felt a chill in their hearts, but at the same time, they were also horrified. A level nine fighter, codename girl, died so easily? ! After slapping the gorgeous girl to death with its claws, the Sun Dragon did not stop for even a moment. It swung its tail and swung it fiercely at Jack and the Grand Cardinal. Bang! The two of them were sent flying far away. Blood spurted wildly from their mouths as their HPS plummeted. “Retreat!” Shadow and Pope inwardly sighed as they roared at the same time. They all knew that they could no longer fight this battle. All of their plans and schemes had been completely destroyed because of this sun dragon that had risen from the dead. If five and six were still alive, they might still be able to fight this sun dragon that was at its peak condition. Unfortunately, they were dead. Moreover, it was impossible for the ninth rank martial artists to work together without any ill feelings like before. To put it bluntly, the effect of cooperating now was probably worse than not cooperating at all. Whoosh! As soon as Ying Gang finished speaking, he immediately rushed out like a ghost. In the blink of an eye, he had pulled away a few hundred meters. Although the Pope was a mage, he ran very fast. The other tier 9 warriors followed suit and immediately retreated. What they were looking at now was naturally the speed at which they ran. Whoever fell last would die! Gao Qianchi and Lu Pingjiang shouted at Lin Xuan, “Run! Don’t just stand there!” Then, the two of them ran away separately. Hall took Lin Xuan, Kodo took Bruno, and ran away! At this moment, they wished they could grow another pair of legs and not be targeted by the giant Sun Dragon. “No need...; to run...; so fast.” Lin Xuan was tossed up and down, his stomach churning, and he hurriedly said something. Seeing that Hall hadn’t stopped, he pointed to the shadow. “You...; Look, the giant sun dragon is...; chasing him.” Hall glanced over from the corner of his eye and exclaimed, “It really is!” “Stop, stop, Stop!” Only then did hall and Kodo stop and look in the direction of the shadow. The Sun Dragon at its peak did not eat everyone as they had imagined. Instead, it inexplicably and inexplicably chose to chase after the shadow! “Pope! Help me! We are allies!”The Shadow tried his best to avoid the incoming fireballs and roared angrily. The pope covered his ears and ran away. “I can’t hear you, I can’t Hear You...;” Ying was instantly furious. “Jack, you...; you should just forget about it.”Ying saw Jack running over from not far away and was about to ask for his help. However, he saw Jack’s chest collapse and blood oozing out of his seven orifices. He might not even be able to save his own life, so he immediately swallowed his words. “Looks like I can only use the ghost Buddha’s Cup...;” Ying gritted his teeth and used the Ghost Buddha’s Cup before the pillar of flame descended. The faint blue ghost flame enveloped him and isolated him from all damage from the outside world. Ying opened his data panel and saw that his level had dropped by one level. His heart was bleeding. At his level, every level required a huge amount of essence. Now that he had lost one level, who knew how many years it would take for him to level up again. Standing in the middle of the ghost fire, Ying took a deep look at Gao Qianchi. “If I can’t kill him this time, I won’t have a chance next time.” Boom. The ghost fire burned out, and Ying’s body completely disappeared. In the next moment, his vision blurred, and he appeared in the central square of the famous Reed Country. The warriors around him all showed respect and lowered their heads. Ying ignored them and walked straight out of the secret realm of the famous Reed Country. He returned to his office, closed the curtains, and turned off the lights. His body sank deep into the sofa, thinking about countermeasures. “I don’t know why the Salvation Society has such powerful warriors like five and six. But I know that the Salvation Society’s Angel Fortress has some strange movements. All of this may be related to the angel fortress...;” There were many thoughts in Ying’s mind. “Activate the puppet of the Salvation Society. I must get the information of the angel fortress as soon as possible. I have a feeling that the world is going to change drastically...;” In the secret realm of the Giant Dragon mountain range. Seeing that Ying was forcefully teleported back to the Wei Ming country through the Ghost Buddha’s Cup, the Giant Sun Dragon spat out two streams of white gas from its nostrils and chased after the pope. The pope cursed in his heart and had no choice but to defend while retreating. At the same time, he also took out his life-saving trump card. One Dragon and one man, one chasing and one escaping, gradually disappeared into the distance. When Gao Qianchi and Lu Pingjiang saw this, their speed also gradually slowed down. Gao Qianchi shook his head repeatedly and his mind was in a mess. Everything that had happened today had completely exceeded his expectations. Not to mention the two old men named “Five”and “Six”from the Salvation Society. The Sun Dragon that had risen from the dead was the most terrifying! The construction department knew that the other organizations would definitely target them, but they were still willing to come to the dragon mountain range to help because they knew that monsters were the greatest enemy of humanity. However, they had underestimated the ambitions of the other organizations, and they had also underestimated the Sun Dragon. Now, no one could stop the giant Sun Dragon. It would definitely fly out of the dragon mountain range and engulf the entire world, turning into a terrible nightmare. “Old Gao, the communicator is working!”Lu Pingjiang fiddled with the communicator and said in surprise, “There must be a strange magnetic field near the giant Sun Dragon, which will interfere with the communicator.” “Okay, notify everyone immediately to leave the arcane realm and board the transport plane. We have to return to the organization as soon as possible and discuss the next countermeasures.”Gao Qianchi nodded. At this time, Lin Xuan and the others also approached. “The two of you already have no place to belong. Where do you want to go now?”Gao Qianchi asked. Hall and Kodo smiled bitterly. “We’ve already become the traitors they speak of. Indeed, we have nowhere to go.” “Then why don’t you come to our construction division first?”Gao Qianchi smiled. These two were both at level 8 or 9, and their combat strength was quite strong. If they could be absorbed, it would be a considerable strengthening for the backbone of the construction division. “Alright, then we’ll go to the construction department to take a look.”Kodo was very forthright. Hall hesitated for a moment before nodding his head in agreement. Under the protection of Gao Qianchi and Lu Pingjiang, the group left the arcane realm safely. Outside the arcane realm, five transport planes were already prepared. After waiting for a while, Xiang Qiantou, Li Weiguo, and the others also walked out of the arcane realm safely. Every agent had to go through registration to make sure that no one was left behind. Gao Qianchi looked at the list of agents and sighed. “Many people died.” Lu Pingjiang crossed the name “Poison Blade”. “This child made a great contribution in the Shura Prison. I didn’t expect him to die in the dragon mountain range this time.” Gao Qianchi’s expression was complicated. Soon, all the construction department agents boarded the plane under Gao Qianchi’s orders. They did not stay in the secret realm for the sake of spoils of war. The Arctic army also boarded the transport plane. Gao Qianchi and Lu Pingjiang said goodbye on behalf of the construction department. Lin Xuan, Ye Yuqiu, and the other elite agents sat in the same transport plane as the level eight and level nine warriors. However, it was different from when they came. The atmosphere in the cabin was very heavy now. No one spoke. Everyone seemed to be thinking about something. Some people stared at the photo in their hands, as if they were recalling the scenes where they spent time with their comrades. Some People’s eyes were empty, as if their thoughts were still in the dragon mountain range. “Ahem...;”kodo coughed lightly and nudged hall with his elbow. He felt that he should say something to liven up the atmosphere. Hall was speechless. I understand that you want to liven up the atmosphere, but do you think I’m someone who can liven up the atmosphere? At this moment, Hall suddenly noticed that there was something wrong with Xiang Qian ‘er’s aura. He stared at Xiang Qian ‘er and said in surprise, “You...; You’re a Tier 9 fighter?” Kodo also looked at her when he heard that. He was surprised to find that the aura on Xiang Qian ‘ER’s body had changed greatly. It had become like a deep ocean or a dark cloud that was brewing with angry thunder. Glancing at shallow eye smiled. “I was lucky enough to complete the tier 9 promotion quest.” “What’s Your Quest?” “Kill 20 Tier 8, Tier 9 secret realm kings with lightning-type skills.” Hall and Kodo nodded slightly. This kind of simple kill quest was the easiest to complete. They had heard that some people would survive in a secret realm for many days during the promotion quest, or maintain their HP below that of the Kill Quest. The difficulty of this promotion quest was uncertain, but it was mostly related to one’s own strength. The stronger one was, the more difficult the promotion quest would be. Lin Xuan could not help but curse inwardly when he heard their discussion. Wasn’t his tier 8 promotion quest to keep his HP below 50% and kill 100 Monsters of the same level. To him, it was too difficult! He couldn’t suppress the recovery of his HP. At this time, the warriors were chatting when they suddenly talked about Lin Xuan. “Oh right, I’m afraid there’s something you guys don’t know yet.”Kodo chuckled. “Lin Xuan is already a tier 8 warrior!”Hall laughed. Ye Yuqiu, Xiang Tianxiu, and the others were very surprised. “That’s not right. Your warrior level has risen so quickly?”Ye Yuqiu was the most surprised. Ever since Lin Xuan fell into the underground world, she had been looking for Lin Xuan, but she couldn’t find him. In the end, she received an order from Gao Qianchi and inexplicably boarded the transport plane home. “The fighter level has increased faster. Actually, it has something to do with a small secret on me.”Lin Xuan laughed, “There’s a small matter that I haven’t told everyone about.” Hall and Kodo looked at each other and almost couldn’t hold back their laughter. You call this a small matter? If this matter was revealed, it would shock everyone in the cabin! Xiang Tianxiu drank a mouthful of water. “Speak, what small matter?” “Actually, the poison blade is my clone, so it’s actually equivalent to two people obtaining resources. Naturally, the level increase would be faster.” PFFT! Xiang Tianxiu was stunned and immediately spat out the water in his mouth. The person who was more shocked than him was Xiang Tianxiu’s mother, Xiang Qianou. “Young man, you have to be reasonable. Don’t make things up out of thin air,”Xiang Qianou said seriously. From a certain point of view, poison blade owed her a favor. And it wasn’t just her. Hall, Kodo, and old Ivan all owed him a favor. If it were not for Poison Blade, Lu Luo, and silver fox, even if the construction department had the means, they would not have been able to anchor the Shura Prison and use the key of the day to open the portal to the mystical realm. On this matter, Xiang Shensi was very serious. When Lu Pingjiang heard this, he also walked over. “A clone? It Can’t be. Poison Blade can talk, and he looks like a different face. How can he be a clone?” “I know you have a good relationship with poison blade, but don’t use such words to numb yourself. We feel unfortunate about his death...;” Gao Qianchi was interested. “Clone? Can you summon poison blade again?” Lin Xuan nodded. “Yes.” “Huh?” Everyone couldn’t help but look over. Lin Xuan coughed lightly. “But...; the clone was naked when it was first created. I hope everyone can be mentally prepared.” The atmosphere in the cabin suddenly became strange. The male compatriots had strange expressions. The female compatriots blushed. Lu Luo covered her eyes, but her big eyes still flashed through the gaps between her fingers. Ye Yuqiu was also a bit nervous, but she still maintained her normal expression, “Don’t worry, we’re professionals. We’re not afraid.” Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry, “Okay, then he’s coming.” He used [ Avatar ] , and the naked poison blade immediately appeared in front of everyone. To avoid unnecessary awkwardness, Lin Xuan immediately took out a piece of clothing from his storage space to block the vital parts of the poison blade. But it still took time to move, so the small poison blade was still exposed to the air for 0.0001 seconds. Xiang Tianxiu’s expression was strange, and he subconsciously said, “It’s...; It’s quite big.” Xiang Qianwei felt like she was about to explode. “You’re saying this in front of your mother?” Xiang Tianxiu looked aggrieved.”...; I won’t dare to do it again.” “You dare to do it again? !” Lin Xuan took out a vicious suit from his storage space and put it on poison blade. As a result, poison blade had completely returned to his usual appearance. Xiang qianwei exclaimed, “It really is poison blade.” “Can he...; Speak?”Lu Luo asked seriously. Poison blade replied, “Of course he can.” “Hiss...;” Everyone in the cabin sucked in a breath of cold air. Holy Sh * t, it really was a doppelganger! “Shield Ghost, flame burst, did you know about this?”Ye Yuqiu asked. Shield ghost and flame burst looked at each other and smiled, “We knew long ago, and we hinted at you when we were in Longhai City, but you didn’t seem to notice.” Ye Yuqiu was stunned. She suddenly remembered that Lin Xuan had suddenly disappeared. When she went to look for shield demon and flame explosion with guilt, the two of them had said something to her. “Don’t worry. Lin Xuan is very strong. He won’t die.” Ye Yuqiu remembered that when she and Lin Xuan were partners in the Dragon mountain range, whenever she felt that Lin Xuan was too weak and should stay behind her, Lin Xuan would smile bitterly and explain that he was actually quite strong. Everything was connected! A few hours later, the transport plane landed smoothly. The construction department officers swarmed out one after another, looking relieved. The experiences in the Dragon Mountains these days had left many people with psychological trauma. Some had lost comrades, some had lost loved ones, and some had lost confidants.. But those who survived could not stop moving forward. They had to keep moving forward. Soon, the construction division and the Arctic army sent a serious condemnation to the Salvation Society, the Knights of Truth, and the Takama-ga-hara in the official name. They condemned these three organizations for their inhumane and bottom-line evil acts. At first, the other small organizations did not take it seriously. Isn’t it common for the six major organizations to scold each other? We Don’t care. But when the construction company announced the details of the Dragon mountain range, the warriors of the small and medium-sized organizations were shocked. F * ck. The Salvation Society actually played such a big game behind their back. The Dragon Mountain Range’s secret realm had a strange movement and a large number of monsters surged out. The construction company and the Arctic army were there to help. In the end, they were plotted against by the Salvation Society, the truth knights, and Gao Tianyuan, who attempted to kill the construction division and the Arctic Army’s Tier 9 warriors. Moreover, the two commanders of the Arctic army were really dead! Gao Qianchi and Lu Pingjiang were also seriously injured because of this. Regarding the accusations of the construction division and the Arctic Army, the Salvation Society and the other three organizations were speechless, as if they were dead. Then, the construction department also announced a terrible news. There was a level 9, Level 9 battle Mystic Realm King in the dragon mountain range. It was a giant sun dragon that was burning with flames. It was already dead, but it had come back to life. Its whereabouts were currently unknown. The construction department warned the small and medium-sized organizations in western Europe not to go near the Dragon Mountain Range Mystic Realm. When this news came out, the warriors of the small and medium-sized organizations were not shocked, but terrified. A level nine warrior who had fought against the King of the Mystic Realm! Such a terrifying monster was actually not killed. If such a monster could wreak havoc, other than large organizations, the other small and medium-sized organizations would not have to survive. That was because, other than large organizations, there were almost no level nine warriors in those small and medium-sized organizations. Not long after, the Truth Knights announced new news. Pope St. Gregory was dead! The Cardinal Archbishop was seriously injured! The one who killed the Pope was the giant Sun Dragon. The one who seriously injured the cardinal was also the giant Sun Dragon. Under such circumstances, the grand leader of the Knights of Truth took over as the acting pope, quickly rectifying the internal situation and fending off the monsters. In the end, the construction division threw out a heavy piece of news. The senior and senior officer of the construction division, Xiang Shensi, completed the rank 9 promotion mission in the Dragon Mountain Range and successfully promoted to a rank 9 warrior. This news attracted the interest of many small and medium-sized organizations. This time, the construction division did not lose a rank 9 warrior, but they gained a rank 9 warrior. In comparison, The Salvation Society lost three rank 9 warriors, Jack and whiskers were seriously injured. The Truth Knights, the Pope had died, and the Cardinal was seriously injured. The Arctic army, two commanders had died. Under these circumstances, the strength of the construction division was even more obvious. India had been selfish and did not go to the Dragon Mountains to help. Instead, they had preserved their strength. There was also a tier 8 warrior who had taken the opportunity to complete the tier 9 promotion mission and become a Tier 9 warrior, successfully reversing the previous decline. Other than these big news, there was also a piece of news that was neither too big nor too small. It also attracted the attention of some people with good intentions. During the Asura prison incident, as a spy of the construction department, he infiltrated the interior of the Gaotian plain and anchored the eighth level of the Asura prison. Then, he saved Xiang Qianyue, Hall, Kodo, Old Ivan, and other powerhouses. The person who had made great contributions was poison blade! It was actually the clone of a logistics officer of the construction department! Once this news was released, not to mention the people from the small and medium-sized organizations, even the construction department’s officers were shocked beyond words. No one would have thought that a person who seemed to have real feelings was actually Lin Xuan’s clone. Some female officers even had feelings for poison blade. After hearing this news, their emotions were very complicated. They wanted to rush up and fight Lin Xuan to the death. F * ck you, release my husband! .. Lin Xuan finally had a rare moment of free time, and he could relax all over. Every day, he would either read a book or switch to the perspective of the training clones. He was very happy. Many people were wondering why the giant Sun Dragon did not wreak havoc everywhere. Of course, it was because Lin Xuan had allowed it to return to the Dragon Mountain Range and continue training in the underground world. The underground world was much broader than Lin Xuan had imagined. He controlled the giant Sun Dragon to fly for an entire day without seeing the border. Through the training of the Giant Sun Dragon, Lin Xuan had obtained a lot of good things. The Dragon Blood, Dragon Teeth, dragon skin, and the like that were abundant in the dragon mountain range were all available. There were also many materials that were unique to the dragon mountain range that could be used to make new potions. In addition, Lin Xuan had also obtained all kinds of attribute items through collecting, trading, and other methods. He wanted to take advantage of this rare free time to make up for all the attributes that he could make up with attribute items. After a month, his level as a warrior did not increase, but his skills, equipment, and rune group’s levels had all caught up, reaching level 8, Level 1. His attributes had been largely replenished through the consumption of attribute items. His vitality had increased by 22 points through the consumption of rhino horns, giant tiger bones, and so on. Currently, he still had 58 points to be replenished. His strength had increased by 40 points through the consumption of strength spinach, beetle shells, bullet ant eggs, and black honey. He still had 50 points to be replenished. Spirit had increased by 38 points through consumption of sweet sweet flowers, heart cleansing grass, heart of Heaven Root, and so on. There were still 42 points that needed to be replenished. Agility had increased by 35 points through consumption of blue mint, tumbleweed, core of Gale, and so on. There were still 55 points that needed to be replenished. Currently, the naked equipment’s attributes were: vitality 554, Strength 399, Spirit 402, agility 399! Seeing this attribute, Lin Xuan nodded his head in satisfaction. It was pretty good. If it wasn’t for the fact that his skills and equipment were still at tier 8, with his attributes, he would probably be able to fight against a Tier 9 monster. The most basic and core attribute of a fighter was naturally their attributes. But to fully utilize their attributes, they still had to rely on their skills and equipment. No amount of data could be left behind, or else it would be a total collapse of their combat power. .. Xia Jing City, in the meeting room of the Director General of the construction department. Several directors had gathered together. Except for the one who was guarding the drowned city, the rest had all returned here. The main seat was ye Lijiang. The left hand was the first, with a height of 1,000 feet. The right hand was the first, with 10,000 gaps. Below them were Lu Pingjiang and Lu Pinghai. Now, there was one more, looking at the shallow view. Ye Lijiang gently knocked on the table with a serious expression. “Everyone, our informant in the Salvation Society has delivered a crucial message “It might be related to the two old men that Lao Gao and Xiao Lu met in the dragon mountain range.” Hearing this, Gao Qianchi and Lu Pingjiang, who had already recovered from their injuries, became energized. “What message?” Ye Lijiang looked at Wan youxi. Wan youxi immediately pushed out the Rubik’s Cube in his hand. A Ray of light shot out from the center of the Rubik’s Cube and landed on the pure white projection screen. There was no picture on the projection screen, only a low voice. “Record, today is September 7th. I was ordered to deliver food and fresh water to the warriors of Angel Fortress. While chatting with a warrior, I discovered something. Three years ago, there was a strange movement in the Black Sea suppressed by Angel Fortress. Three of the seven elders of the Council of elders sent out three of them, but they failed.” “On September 10th, I met that warrior by chance in a bar. He was so drunk that he even wanted to touch me. Sh * t, I’m not gay, but I still got some useful information. He said that there was a second strange movement in the Black Sea under the fortress. Two years ago, the seven elders sent out all of them, but when they came back, there were only six people. The seventh elder disappeared without a trace “On October 7th, I was once again ordered to deliver food and fresh water to the angel fortress. By chance, I discovered that the second elder had entered the angel fortress and headed to the Black Sea a year ago, but he did not return “October 8th, playing cards “October 9th, playing cards. I lost a lot of essence, damn it “November 7th, something big! I delivered food and fresh water according to the rules. At this time, the second elder suddenly appeared from the Black Sea below. When I bowed to him, I saw a strange black spot on the back of his hand “November 8th, another big event! The Senate held an emergency meeting. I didn’t know the contents of the meeting, but I saw a strong black light bursting out from the meeting room, shattering all the glass in the meeting room “It was also November 8th. I was told by my colleague George, who was ordered to clean the meeting room, that the various green plants placed in the corner of the wall had aged and withered “On the 12th of November, George died in a level six arcane realm...; it shouldn’t be, he’s quite strong, at least stronger than me “On the 19th of November, when I was ordered to deliver a message to the grandson of the fourth elder, I heard him complaining to his friends before knocking on the door. He said that his grandfather’s appetite had changed for some reason. Usually, he liked to eat tuna sushi that was specially prepared by a chef hired from Gaotian plain, but now he was very keen on all kinds of fried and baked foods, and those foods were considered junk food by the fourth elder not long ago “On the 24th of November, I heard that the grandson of the fourth elder had disappeared without a trace. The Salvation Society conducted a large-scale search, but in the end, they were unable to find the murderer. This matter was left unsolved. It’s so strange. That’s the grandson of the fourth elder. Shouldn’t we search the entire place to find the murderer?” “On the 26th of November, Mary came to find me to sleep.” “On November 27th, she continued to sleep with Mary.” “On November 28th, Mary’s sister came. They slept together, and their waists hurt a little.” “On November 29th, Mary’s sister said that the department next door had developed a new medicine that could permanently increase the combat strength of a Type 7 warrior. Currently, it can be obtained free of charge. She also said that old tom looked radiant after drinking that medicine, as if he was younger by more than ten years. However, Mary advised me not to try it.” “On December 6th, a lot of people received new drugs, but they mysteriously disappeared. Could they have been taken away by the Military Police?” “On December 9th, I was suspected by the logistics officer. The reason was that they thought that I didn’t take bribes and that I might be a spy planted by the construction department. This son of a B * tch, I really wanted to punch him.” “On December 10th, the logistics officer said that as long as I was willing to drink the new drugs, he could stop the military police from investigating me and let me go to the logistics department immediately to get the drugs.” “Rustle, Rustle, Rustle...;” There was a long silence behind them. Just when everyone thought that there was no audio behind them, there was the sound of smashing and throwing. It was as if many glassware and wooden furniture had been smashed. Then, a strange, hoarse, but devout, fanatical roar suddenly sounded. “Your devout believers are calling here, the powerful, ancient, and invincible ruler of the deep sea! Please wake up and cleanse this dirty and filthy world...;” Before he could finish, a few more curses were heard in the audio. “Why is he here? I remember this was his previous residence, and he even smashed things into a mess.” “Normal people who drink new drugs will either become stronger or die. He’s the only one who has a strange change. Bring him back. The fourth elder should be happy to research something out of him.” “Mm, bring him back. Seal this room as well. Don’t let anyone enter.” Following that, there was the sound of footsteps gradually getting further and further away. Only then did the audio slowly stop. “Hu...;” Xiang Qianmu’s nerves were tense the entire time. After listening to it, he let out a long breath. He was clearly only listening to the audio file left behind by the informant, but it was as if he was facing some indescribable and terrifying thing. “What do you think? Let’s express our opinions,”ye Lijiang said slowly. Lu Pinghai frowned and said calmly, “Let’s not talk about other things. That fourth elder...; did he have someone else’s soul in his body?” Lu Pingjiang nodded slightly. “As expected of my younger brother. He said what I wanted to say.” Lu Pinghai rolled his eyes. Wan youxi said calmly, “On the surface, the Salvation Society only has seven elders of the Senate as level nine warriors. However, five and six powerful level nine warriors suddenly appeared, and their skills are extremely strange. It’s hard not to associate them with the so-called new medicine.” Gao Qianchi noticed the end of the audio. “What is this deep sea ruler that this informant idolizes so fervently?” “An evil god, right? It’s similar to the god of Truth.”Xiang Qianyu finally couldn’t help but say something. He had participated in this meeting after all. It wasn’t appropriate for him to not say anything from the beginning to the end. “Oh right, I remember that you were once an exchange member of the Knights of Truth for three years.”Wan youxi was stunned for a moment before he reacted. “Yes, at that time, she went to the Knights of Truth to exchange information. I even gave her a task to try to find out what the god of truth that the Knights of truth always worshipped was.”Ye Lijiang nodded slightly. Xiang Shantou spoke, “The god of truth seems to only respond to prayers from people who truly believe in it. Moreover, the replies are also intermittent. They are all cryptic and difficult to understand. It is very difficult to analyze anything useful from them.” “However, when I flipped through the historical records of the Knights of Truth, I discovered that the god of truth had once used this method to infuse power into more than one person.” “All the Popes had received this kind of power before. Some lucky ones would also receive a response from the god of truth through their prayers, and their levels would leap. They might even leap from a first-stage warrior to a fourth-stage warrior or a fifth-stage warrior.” When Xiang Shantou said this, he paused for a moment before continuing, “I still feel that those secret realms are not just secret realms. They are becoming more and more perfect, becoming more and more like a real world. Then, it is very likely that there are many creatures in those worlds that are innately powerful, or even far more powerful than us.” “The so-called God of truth and the ruler of the deep sea are probably all such things.” After she finished speaking, ye Lijiang and the others all nodded slightly. At their level, they had already come into contact with many secrets, and they had their own guesses about the secret realms. “What are everyone’s opinions? Do you think so too?”Ye Lijiang looked at the others. Gao Qianchi nodded. Wan youxi nodded. Lu Pinghai nodded. Lu Pingjiang was wandering in his mind. When he saw his brother Nod, he quickly nodded as well. “Since the opponent we are going to face is likely to be an existence beyond level 9, then I’m afraid we can only use the necessary countermeasures.” Ye Lijiang frowned. Xiang Qianyi was stunned for a moment, then immediately reacted. A necessary counter-measure? Could it be that the construction department also had the so-called God of truth and the ruler of the deep sea? “You don’t know. This matter has always been known to only tier 9 warriors, because it is an extremely important secret. If it is leaked, it will definitely attract the attention of other organizations,”ye Lijiang said lightly. “Where?”Xiang Qianyu said seriously. “Kunlun Ruins!” Ye lijiang said calmly, “Kunlun ruins, famous reed country, Angel fortress, Jie Ri City, and Xiao Ling Mountain. These secret realms should be one of the few secret realms that have buildings.” “We don’t know where the buildings came from, nor do we know why, even if they are destroyed, the secret realm buildings will still be restored to their original state 24 hours later.” “But we know that the building couldn’t have appeared out of thin air. It must have been built by some kind of creature.” Ye Lijiang continued, “As for that existence, I made a promise to her that I wouldn’t tell her her name. She doesn’t exist anywhere in Kunlun ruins, and we can only meet her by chance. If she doesn’t want to meet people, then no matter how hard we try, we won’t be able to find her.” Xiang Qianyu was surprised when she heard this. Ye Lijiang had actually faced that existence before, and she could actually communicate with humans freely? “Although I’ve never liked to place my hopes on others, if we really want to fight against the god of truth and the ruler of the deep sea, we should seek her help,”ye Lijiang sighed lightly. “Then how do we find her?”Lu Pingjiang asked curiously. “We can try to find a sword-related professional or a mage-related professional,”ye Lijiang said lightly, “She looks like a burly person or an armor-type professional. Not only can we not find her, but we will also have bad luck in Kunlun’s ruins.” Thousands of feet tall.., ”...; I was wondering why I was so unlucky in Kunlun’s ruins all those years ago. The first time I stepped on dog shit, and the second time I fell into a deep pit, I was either blown by a strong wind or chased by monsters. I could choke on dry food even if I ate it...; So, Sister Ye, you already knew about it!” Ye Lijiang coughed lightly. “I only figured it out later.” “Then, what should we do now?”Lu Pinghai asked. “Gather all the warriors above Tier 8, select their occupation and appearance, and send those who meet the requirements into Kunlun ruins.” “Tell them that the mission is to survive in Kunlun ruins for a month. In the end, they only need to hand over 10% of the spoils of war to the organization. “As long as there are people who meet the requirements, if she is in a good mood, she will appear and communicate with them.”Ye Lijiang slowly made up his strategy. “Okay, we will execute it now.” Wan youxi and the others nodded. When Li Weiguo walked into the dining hall of Xijing City, Lin Xuanzheng was having a meal with Ye Yuqiu, hei, and Bai Xinghe. Everyone was having a good time, and they even started playing small games. They were having a great time playing small games such as going to three gardens, crossing every seven, grasping every three, and answering questions. Hall and Kodo were not familiar with the rules of the game at first, but after Silver Fox introduced them, the two of them immediately blended in, and they were even more familiar with the game than Silver Fox, who was a local. Silver Fox, Bai Xinghe, Xiang tianxiu, and the others had failed in the game. There were many small notes stuck on their faces, but they were still defeated time and time again. They were very valiant. “Everyone, even though you guys are having a good time, I want to interrupt you with a piece of news. Ah, no, a piece of news.” Li Weiguo coughed lightly and walked over. “Teacher? !” Xiang Tianxiu saw Li Weiguo’s face, which was dignified without anger, and stood up with a whoosh. His back was straight, and his expression was somewhat panicked. Apart from his mother, he was most afraid of this teacher. Ye Yuqiu couldn’t help but laugh, “Face...; face.” Only then did Xiang Tianxiu realize that his face was covered with a bunch of small notes. He hurriedly took them off. Li Weiguo didn’t know whether to laugh or cry in his heart, but his face didn’t show the slightest bit of emotion. Instead, he waved his hand, “It’s fine. Everyone should really relax after coming back from the Dragon Mountain Range.” Only then did Xiang Tianxiu let out a long breath. “Teacher Li, what’s the urgent matter?”Ye Yuqiu asked. “The monsters in Kunlun ruins are a bit restless. We need to arrange new people, but we need to meet the special conditions to enter this time.” Li Weiguo smiled, “And most importantly, we only need to hand over 10% of the gains from entering Kunlun ruins to the construction division. The rest can be kept.” “You can also choose to use battle merits and essence as 10% of the income. We can discuss it.” This time, everyone was a little shocked. The organization needed resources to become bigger and stronger. The part of the income that warriors handed in from entering and leaving the mystic realm was also taxes. The lower the level of warriors, the less they had to hand in. For example, warriors below the third rank were almost not accepted. From the third rank to the sixth rank, they received around 20% . They could also use battle merits and pure collateral. Above the seventh rank, they received around 30% to 35% . It was precisely because of this that the construction division could use the resources obtained by the high-level experts to continuously train new people, making the organization appear prosperous and capable. And if it was like other organizations, where the strong ate all, there would be a situation where once the strong died unexpectedly, the people behind could not replace them. But now, Li Weiguo said that only 10% of the income tax was needed to enter and exit Kunlun ruins. This was definitely a huge concession. What exactly were the leaders trying to do? “What are the specific conditions?”Ye Yuqiu’s interest was piqued. Li Weiguo immediately said slowly, “Mage class, sword class, but not an armor class. In addition...; . The big and burly ones can’t do it.” When he said this, everyone was at a loss. First, a mage could understand. Second, a sword-related job but not an aegis job. It was a bit difficult to understand, but it could be understood. What the hell was the third one. It was all about face. Li Weiguo’s face was full of melancholy. “I also want to know because I’m sure that the first one doesn’t meet the requirements.” Although Li Weiguo was over sixty years old, he had a robust figure and bulky muscles. He was taller than everyone present, and he was a typical “Big five and Big Three.”. “Old Li, do you know...;”Lin Xuan coughed lightly and asked. Li Weiguo smiled bitterly and shook his head. “I know what you want to ask. Although I’m Old and senior, I don’t understand why we have to send people into Kunlun ruins at this juncture.” “What’s more puzzling is that we have to meet certain conditions.” Hall and Kodo hesitated. “Can we do it?” Li Weiguo glanced at them. “If you two are willing to join the construction division, the door to Kunlun ruins will definitely be open to you.” Hall and Kodo smiled bitterly. “I haven’t thought about it yet...;” They also knew that they wouldn’t be able to return to their hometown for the rest of their lives. However, after all, they had been in the Truth Knight Order and the Salvation Society for too long and had developed feelings for each other. They weren’t used to joining other organizations all of a sudden. “It doesn’t matter. Stay in the construction division and take a look. You will eventually join.”Li Weiguo smiled. Hall and Kodo both nodded their heads. In reality, they had seen all aspects of the construction division during this period of time. They had seen the efforts the construction division had made for low-level fighters. To put it bluntly, low-level fighters could only live like individuals in the construction division. And in other organizations, such as the Knights of Truth and the Salvation Society. In the eyes of high-level fighters, low-level fighters were servants and servants who ordered them around. To put it bluntly, they were even slaves and cannon fodder. “Can a seventh-level warrior enter Kunlun Ruins? I heard that Kunlun ruins is the most dangerous of the three secret realms we control.”Ye Yuqiu asked. Li Weiguo nodded, “Kunlun ruins is indeed very dangerous, but its dangers and benefits are dynamic. You should know that Kunlun ruins is divided from the outside to the inside into D, C, B, and a zones. There are seventh-level monsters, eighth-level monsters, ninth-level monsters, and extremely powerful ninth-level monsters.” “Zone A, B, C, and Zone D. the dangers and benefits are decreasing gradually.” “But every once in a while, the Kunlun ruins will send down a mist. The monsters inside the mist can not break out, and the monsters and people outside the mist can not enter.” “If Area B and Area A are covered, then it proves that the strongest monster will only appear at level 8 or 9. If Area A is covered, then the strongest monster will appear at level 9 or 9. If Area A is exposed...; then a level 9 warrior will need to make a big move to clear it out.” Li Weiguo said slowly. Lin Xuan listened with great interest. He knew very little about the information of Kunlun ruins. He did not expect that there was such a unique mechanism of the mystic realm. “This time, it is to cover area A and area B.”Li Weiguo nodded. “I encourage you all to give it a try, because the harvest in Kunlun ruins is really rich!” “If you can get one or two ancient runes such as soul absorbing runes and protection runes, it is already a big deal.” Those runes should be called runestones. They were different from the runes embedded in equipment. Those runestones were consumables, and they were only produced in the Kunlun ruins. Everyone nodded slightly. Li Weiguo gave some more instructions before turning around and leaving. After hearing what Li Weiguo said, everyone lost the mood to continue playing games. “Let’s Go! Go and register!” Xiang Tianxiu shouted and was the first to rush out. Lin Xuan and the others followed closely behind. Not long after, they arrived at the registration area that Li Weiguo mentioned. At this moment, the little sister who was in charge of registration was meticulously screening the applicants. “Song gang, his class is black sword warrior.” “No.” “Why?” “You’re too strong. You Don’t meet the requirements.” “No, I’m 1.8 meters tall and 83 kilograms in weight. I’m only a little heavier than the standard weight. How Can You Be Strong?” The construction staff named song gang left while swearing. He was quite indignant. When everyone came here, they saw that there were two distinct groups of people in front of them. Those who met the requirements were very happy, while those who didn’t met the requirements were quite unhappy. They could understand the other requirements. F * ck, the five big and three rough ones can’t do it. What does that mean? They’re discriminating against us because we’re strong and tough? “Five big and three rough...; After all, we can’t use standards to measure them. We can only rely on people’s subjective vision to judge them. This will indeed make many people feel unhappy.” Ye Yuqiu saw this scene and felt somewhat helpless. Lin Xuan and the others had never encountered such a situation. Lin Xuan’s ostensible class was a pharmacist. It was originally not possible, but since everyone knew that he had a doppelganger that was a poison blade, then it was fine. Following that, Ye Yuqiu, Silver Fox, black, Xiang Tianxiu, Bai Xinghe, flame burst, cold field, and the others all obtained the qualifications. Shield Ghost was an armor class, so it naturally didn’t meet the requirements. The weapon Lu Luo used was a sickle. Even if she wanted to use a sword at the last minute, she wouldn’t be able to use it. It also didn’t meet the requirements. “Everyone, please make your preparations. We will enter Kunlun Ruins Tomorrow.” “Here are the things you need to pay attention to in Kunlun ruins. Please go back and read it in detail. Remember it in your heart.” The little girl in charge of registration pointed at the box next to them. Inside the box were thin pamphlets. Lin Xuan picked one up. On the cover were a few simple and plain words. A must-have manual for exploring Kunlun ruins. Author: Ye Lijiang. “Wow, this is actually written by the first president himself?”Xiang Tianxiu exclaimed. Ye Yuqiu frowned slightly. No one knew what she was thinking. Then, Lin Xuan returned to his dorm. Because this was Xijing City, the construction department assigned them new dorms. Ye Yuqiu and the others didn’t stay in the dorms. Instead, they stayed in their house in Xijing City. Therefore, the dorms near Lin Xuan were empty. However, this provided a quiet environment for him to read the manual carefully. Lin Xuan opened the manual and read it carefully. After reading it three times in a row, almost every word was engraved in his mind. Then, he let out a long breath. “The Kunlun ruins always feels like a very strange mystic realm.” “Just like the mystic realms such as Wei Ming kingdom and Jie Ri City, the Kunlun ruins is also a scene of ruins. Moreover, the buildings seem to have been frozen at a certain time. Even if they are destroyed, they will immediately return to their original state after 24 hours, as if they have fallen into some sort of time and space reincarnation.” Lin Xuan used to think that after he became stronger, he might be able to explore the secrets of this world. For example, why did global digitization come into being. And for example, how did the mystic realm appear. But now, he felt that the number of secrets in front of him was increasing. It was like a prank. “Or is it because I’m not strong enough?” Lin Xuan Thought for a moment and finally came to a serious conclusion. Two days of preparation time passed by like a flash of lightning. During these two days, Lin Xuan also emptied out the useless things on his body and traded them for a large number of essences and secret realm pearls. These essences were not invested in the warrior level, but in the skill level. Secret Realm Pearls were used to upgrade many skills to dark gold quality. As for equipment, he also used the equipment essence to level up. He had a lot of equipment essence, and he could even produce and sell it himself, so there was no need to go to the market to buy it. Soon, it was time to gather and enter the Kunlun ruins. “Let’s go. There is an additional light gate of the mystic realm in the Kunlun ruins. We can shorten the journey.” Li Weiguo was still the leader of this operation as usual. He led more than 500 qualified personnel of the construction division through a light gate of the mystic realm and arrived at a third-tier mystic realm, the waterwave field. The land here was fertile, the weather was good, and there were few monsters. It was one of the few mystic realms in the construction division that could be used to cultivate food crops. Then, they passed through the light gate of one of the secret realms in the Shuibotian secret realm and arrived at another level five secret realm, Gale Valley. Finally, through the second door of the mystic realm in Gale Valley, they arrived at Kunlun City. Kunlun city, like Lingshan City, was built outside the mystic realm. However, Kunlun city was not as large and crowded as Lingshan city. The Kunlun ruins was extremely precious to the construction department, so the people who entered the Kunlun ruins had to go through strict inspection. This also meant that the scale of Kunlun city would not be too big. Li Weiguo brought Lin Xuan and the others here and handed over the relevant documents to the director of the construction department of Kunlun City, Zhou Dingshan. Then, he watched them enter Kunlun city. Li Weiguo pulled Zhou Dingshan to drink. During the banquet, Li Weiguo asked casually, “Old Zhou, is there anything going on here recently?” Zhou Dingshan scratched his head. “Nothing major. It’s just that those bastards in India are a little noisy. However, this kind of thing has happened for a long time. As you know, those bastards have been eyeing the Kunlun ruins for God knows how long.” Li Weiguo laughed. “Indeed. The Kunlun ruins is not like little spirit mountain. It’s almost impossible for spies to infiltrate and it’s also very difficult for them to cooperate with outsiders like before.” “Right. Also, chief Lu Pingjiang went back to recuperate. Now that Chief Lu Pinghai is in charge, I feel more at ease.”Zhou Dingshan drank a mouthful of wine and laughed out loud. Li Weiguo teased, “You can’t let Chief Lu Pingjiang hear your words. Otherwise, he’ll definitely find an excuse to dock your salary.” Previously, for a long time, Lu Pinghai was in charge of Little Spirit Mountain, while Lu Pingjiang was in charge of Kunlun ruins. However, some time ago, Lu Pingjiang was transferred to the Dragon Mountain Range to help out. Due to India’s international reputation, they didn’t dare to attack Kunlun ruins. Now, Lu Pingjiang had recovered from his injuries, but he deliberately found an excuse to stay in Xijing city to slack off. Every day, he would throw tantrums and roll around. Even ye Lijiang couldn’t do anything to him. However, the head of the Dragon mountain range was in a high position. He looked very relaxed, but in fact, he had to deal with many things every day. He was often tense. The battle in the Dragon mountain range was even more exciting. One wrong step could lead to eternal damnation. Ye Lijiang let him be lazy and turned a blind eye to it. His younger brother Lu Pinghai simply ran over to guard the Kunlun ruins. Xiao Ling Mountain was temporarily handed over to Gao Qianchi. While the two were talking, on a mountain peak dozens of kilometers away from Kunlun City. Three Indian martial artists were looking down at Kunlun City, as well as the Majestic Secret Realm Light Gate that stood in the center of Kunlun City. The Indian martial artist in the lead had reached level 9, Level 1. His skin was white, and he wore a white shirt. On his chest, there was the image of a huge bull that was looking up at the sky. The most eye-catching thing was the horns of the huge bull, which actually emitted a golden light. The two Indian martial artists behind him also had pale skin, and their strength were respectively at level eight, level five, and level eight, level six. “Kunlun Ruins...; why is it that every time we offer sacrifices, His Highness King Jie Ri has been intermittently transmitting information about Kunlun ruins to us, and also mentioned some powerful existences that surpassed level nine? Could it be that the construction division also has something to rely on?” The leading Indian martial artist muttered to himself. The two Indian martial artists behind him asked in a low voice, “Sir Ox Horn, are we going to make a move? I heard that the construction division has selected a large group of martial artists to enter Kunlun ruins. It seems like they are making some moves.” Ox Horn shook his head slightly. “Hold back and wait for that Guy to come. Although I am very displeased with people who come from the military officer faction, I have to admit that he has some strength. He can compete with Lu Pinghai.” When he said that Guy’s name, he looked disdainful as if he was high and mighty. “Of course, give me some time. He won’t be my match.”Ox Horn smiled faintly and was quite proud. The two Indian martial artists nodded. “Master Ox Horn is right!” Kunlun ruins. After passing through the light gate of the secret realm, the world was still spinning and strange as usual. This feeling came and went quickly. By the time Lin Xuan reacted, he had already stepped on the solid rock ground. He immediately looked around. Under his feet was a piece of unique granite ground, carved with complicated and exquisite patterns. But now, there were many cracks and cracks in the rocks, and many weeds grew in them. Looking closer, there was a collapsed mountain gate. A huge plaque was hidden among the rubble. It was no longer as glorious as it used to be, and one could vaguely make out the words ‘Kunlun Palace’ Behind the collapsed mountain gate, there was a flight of stairs that extended up into the clouds. Looking Up, there was a mountain peak that went straight into the clouds. The Sun was not bright, but the continuous rain made people’s vision a little blurry. Lin Xuan turned around and looked back. Behind him was the light gate of the mystic realm, and behind it was the rolling fog. This fog was the edge of the mystic realm. Even a level nine warrior would lose their sense of direction after entering, and they would eventually return to their original place after walking one round. Soon, the rest of the people also appeared beside Lin Xuan one after another. It was almost everyone’s first time in Kunlun ruins. They all widened their eyes and curiously looked at this unfamiliar secret realm. “Since there’s no danger in Kunlun ruins this time, let’s split up and explore,”suggested Xiang Tianxiu. “That’s fine.”Ye Yuqiu nodded. The consumables in Kunlun ruins were quite useful. If they formed a team, they might not be evenly distributed. Even though they were all agents of the construction department and some of them had good relationships with each other, if the distribution was often uneven, even blood brothers would turn against each other, let alone just friends. Lin Xuan nodded slightly and casually found a direction and walked over. Kunlun ruins was roughly divided into three parts: the foot of the mountain, the waist of the mountain, and the top of the mountain. The foot of the mountain was Area D, which was the least dangerous. The mountainside was divided into two parts, Area C and Area B. As for the top of the mountain, it was naturally area A, which was the most dangerous. Lin Xuan felt that it was better for him to walk around area D first to familiarize himself with the situation. This time, he had a whole month’s time. There was no need to be so impatient. While everyone was slowly exploring the Kunlun ruins, at the highest point of the Kunlun ruins, between the layers of clouds, stood a secluded hall. There were many green bamboos planted on both sides of the hall. They did not grow wantonly like the green bamboos in other places. Their roots had even lost their green color and turned dark green. They were still green. It was obvious that these green bamboos were usually built by people. In front of the great hall, there were two pools. Lotus flowers bloomed above the pools, but the pools were abnormally clear. There were no fish. In the great hall, there was a graceful figure sitting cross-legged and playing the zither. Her black hair and white clothes hung down naturally. Beside her was a black sword. At this moment, she was playing the zither elegantly and demurely. If one did not listen to the sound, looking from afar, one would immediately feel that she was elegant and graceful, like a fairy in a painting. One could not help but think that this song should only exist in the sky. However, if one listened closer, one could not say that it was the sound of nature. One could only say that it was the sound of a dog that did not listen. At this moment, all kinds of beautiful musical notes were tangled together in a disorderly manner. It was just like the soles of feet that could not be placed in the subway during morning rush hours. At this moment, the green bamboo was fluttering without the wind. It made a rustling sound as if it was protesting against this annoying noise. “It has been so long, but my zither skills have not improved at all. Master is right. I really do not have the talent in this aspect.” After destroying the green bamboos on both sides of the hall, the woman finally stopped. “Why don’t I practice my painting skills again?” The woman searched the hall and finally found a portrait among the miscellaneous items. Looking carefully, she could vaguely distinguish the appearance of a woman. However, this painting was so abstract that even Picasso felt inferior. “This painting seems to have been painted ten years ago...; although I can barely see it, it’s better to forget about it.” The woman sighed softly and put down the painting. She turned around and walked to the side of the pool. She leaned over to look at the pool and also saw her reflection on the surface of the water. Her hair was like dark clouds, her face was set off by the morning glow, her eyes were like stars, and her lips were like Dan. Her skin was ice-cold and her skin was translucent, and it could be broken with just a blow. Between her brows, there was a heroic air, and she looked majestic without being angry. Her overall temperament was even more otherworldly, as if she was a celestial being. “There is no time to change here. If we calculate according to the Earthlings’24 hours as one day, it has already been a hundred years, three months, and five days. Master, when will you be able to come and save me?” The woman stood up from the pool again and walked back to the main hall. After searching through the pile of junk, she found an exquisite token. The front of the token was engraved with the words “Kunlun”. On the back were three small words. Ji Ruyue. “Time passes by in the blink of an eye, a hundred years. If this continues, I’m afraid I’ll forget my own name.” She laughed at herself. At this moment, she suddenly felt something and looked in the direction of the light door of the secret realm from afar. Her eyes seemed to pierce through the layers of clouds and saw the staff members of the construction department who had entered the Kunlun ruins. “More Earthlings have come to explore? The last time they came in was...; more than a month ago.” “Ever since that woman surnamed Ye, i rarely meet interesting people.” Ji Ruyue frowned slightly, then slowly relaxed. “Forget it, let’s go and have a look. Maybe we can find interesting people.” She gently tapped the ground, and her body floated out like the wind and disappeared into the clouds. Upon closer inspection, a cloud appeared beneath her feet, carrying her body. Ji Ruyue walked around, her gaze sweeping over Ye Yuqiu, Xiang Tianxiu, and the others. “That girl isn’t bad. She’s pretty too. I like her very much.” Ji Ruyue chuckled and was about to approach. But at this moment, she unintentionally noticed flame blast and cold field. “This...; how can there be an avatar here? Could it be that master and the others found me?” Ji Ruyue’s state of mind, which had been calm for a hundred years, suddenly rippled. She followed the aura of the two avatars and found the original body of the avatar, which was Lin Xuan, who was searching for treasures in the village at the foot of the mountain. “That’s right, it’s a familiar smell, an avatar...;” “Why would the secret technique of Kunlun Palace fall on an Earthling?” Ji Ruyue’s beautiful eyes flashed with confusion. She followed Lin Xuan from afar and observed him carefully. After observing him for a while, she came back to her senses. This person was no different from an earthling. His behavior, behavior, and even his speech were completely different from the disciples of Kunlun Palace. At this moment, she suddenly realized that this person could sense the existence of the monsters from far away and easily circumvented the territory of these monsters. “Five senses connecting to the sky? Isn’t that the sect-guarding secret art of the Heavenly Dragon Temple? !” Ji Ruyue was even more confused. In that moment, she felt a more familiar scent. Kunlun Palace and the Heavenly Dragon Temple had a close relationship. She had naturally seen the sect-guarding secret art of the Heavenly Dragon Temple performed by the disciples of the Heavenly Dragon Temple many times. “This earthling...; what is his background?”Ji Ruyue’s frown deepened. At the same time. Lin Xuan bypassed the gathering place of a large group of monsters and finally found a rune in one of the houses. There were too many monsters. Although he could deal with three or four of them, it was still a bit of an exaggeration to deal with dozens of them at the same time. “Water purification rune, blue quality, useless.” Lin Xuan used a high-level observation spell to take a look and immediately smiled helplessly. He had searched for so long in the village at the foot of the mountain, but only found such a worthless rune. It was indeed a bit of a waste of time. It seemed that to find a high-quality rune, he had to go to a higher place. At this time, a faint female voice came from behind him. “The water purification rune can be purified in a moment by throwing it into the polluted water, making it drinkable. How could it be useless?” Lin Xuan was shocked. He instinctively used flash to increase the distance between them and activated the lightning speed. His speed instantly increased, and in the blink of an eye, he was over a hundred meters away. However, when he turned around, there was no one there. Just as he was still in shock, the female voice suddenly came from behind him. “You actually have two movement techniques on your body at the same time, and one of them can instantly cross the distance, while the other has the effect of divine movement. Not Bad, which sect did you learn it from?” Lin Xuan’s heart was in turmoil. He had pulled such a distance in less than a second, but the other party appeared behind him again as if nothing had happened. It was obvious that the other party’s strength far surpassed his, and it was at least level nine. Therefore, Lin Xuan lay flat on the ground. It was very easy for a level nine warrior to kill him. “Huh? Why aren’t you running away?” The woman’s voice sounded again. This time, she slowly walked in front of Lin Xuan. Lin Xuan saw her face clearly and was shocked. No words in the human world could describe her appearance. Moreover, she had a unique temperament, which was different from all the women Lin Xuan had seen. She did not look like a woman that could be seen on Earth. Instead, she looked like a character from a xianxia novel. “Answer my question.” The woman said calmly. Lin Xuan coughed lightly. “I...;” He immediately began to organize his words, because he really could not answer. His skills were all dropped from killing monsters, so he did not learn them from any sect. Thinking of this, Lin Xuan subconsciously cast a high-level observation skill on the woman. —— Name: Ji Ruyue Level: ? Occupation: ? Attributes: Constitution? , strength? , spirit? , agility? Skills: ? Equipment: ? —— Damn it, other than a name, he didn’t know anything. The woman frowned. “You actually have the qi-observing skill...; this is a secret skill that only the direct disciples of Kunlun Palace can learn.” “Tell me, what happened on Earth? Did My Master and the others bring people to find me?” Lin Xuan was even more confused. What qi-observing technique? What Master? What was this all about. At this moment, Ji Ruyue suddenly frowned slightly. “Someone is coming.” She suddenly grabbed Lin Xuan with one hand and flew up in the next moment. Lin Xuan watched helplessly as he left the ground and flew into the clouds. The residential buildings became extremely tiny under his feet. He shuttled through the clouds, his body freezing cold to the bone. Plop. Ji Ruyue casually threw him on the floor of the grand hall. “Okay, let’s talk here.” Lin Xuan looked out of the grand hall and saw thick clouds. He couldn’t see the ground at all. “Where is this?” “The peak of Kunlun Mountain.” “Area a? !” Lin Xuan was even more shocked. This woman could actually fly with him. wasn’t this the ability only immortals had in xianxia novels. Ji ruyue mumbled, “Area a? That woman said the same thing before.” On the ground, Ye Yuqiu happened to come to the place where Lin Xuan had just stood. “Strange, I heard a voice just now. How come it disappeared in the blink of an eye?” Ye Yuqiu looked surprised. She seemed to have heard a familiar voice, but there was no one here. However, she did not take this matter to heart. Instead, she continued to search for all sorts of rare runes. .. In the Great Hall at the peak of the mountain. Lin Xuan and Ji Ruyue stared at each other. “I asked you where you learned the Incarnation and the five senses heavenly connection from. You told me that you conjured it yourself?” Ji Ruyue was so angry that she was amused. “Even if you lie, you can’t do it this way.” Lin Xuan was helpless. “I’m not lying.” “Then what is the origin of the mystical realm you mentioned? How come I’ve never seen it before?”Ji Ruyue questioned. “It’s called the origin of the mystical realm. I saw it with a high-level observation technique.” “What high-level observation technique? It’s clearly the qi-observing technique.” Lin Xuan was even more helpless. He felt as if he was talking to a character from a xianxia novel. After another day of communication, the two of them gradually came to a common language. “I see. The woman named Ye who came in ten years ago is the leader of your construction department?” “Not the leader, the first chief.” “Oh, right, the first chief.” Ji Ruyue was deep in thought. “You don’t know about the Heavenly Dragon Temple, but you mentioned that you went to the Heavenly Dragon Zen Temple and participated in its trials.” “Let me tell you then. The Heavenly Dragon Zen temple is the core area of the Heavenly Dragon Temple. Only the most talented personal disciples can enter the trials.” “The five senses are a reward for passing the trials.” Lin Xuan was quite surprised. The skills he had were the secret techniques of the Kunlun Palace and the Heavenly Dragon Temple respectively. Why did he suddenly feel like a hero. It was so strange. When he transmigrated here, he thought this was an apocalypse where monsters ran amok! Lin Xuan asked, “Then tell me, what is the master you speak of?” Ji Ruyue sighed. “That’s good. I haven’t had anyone to talk to for more than a hundred years. Now I finally have an interesting person. Sit down and don’t move. I’ll tell you slowly.” Lin Xuan took out a few packets of beef jerky from his storage bag and ate as he listened. Ji Ruyue ate as she spoke. “The Kunlun Palace and the Heavenly Dragon Temple are the top sects in our continent. In addition, there’s a mortal country called the famous Reed Country.” “Master also told me that there’s a fertile place in the far west. The city is the state there, and the largest and strongest city is called Jie Ri. That’s why we call it Jie Ri.” Lin Xuan’s eyes widened when he heard that. Wei Ming country! Jie Ri City! They were all linked together. “Then how did you appear here?”He asked. Ji Ruyue’s eyes flashed with a cold light. “Devil Disaster.” “I don’t know what to call them. Outer Realm Heavenly Demons? Demon humans? Demon Beasts? Demon Race? Anyway, master and uncle-master call them devil disaster.” “Those devils are very powerful. They can crush mountains with one punch and break rivers with one palm. Kunlun Palace, Heavenly Dragon Temple, and a group of small and medium-sized sects joined forces to fight them, but they weren’t able to beat them back. Instead, they suffered heavy casualties “The Kunlun ruins you saw was the Kunlun Palace that was destroyed “In the end, master and the others decided to use their lifespans as energy to force me to use the universe formation to teleport the sect “The universe formation was left behind by the founding ancestor. He said that it had the effect of stellar transposition and the ability to move the universe. It allowed the entire sect to be separated from the mainland and appear in another place, and then...;” Lin Xuan immediately reacted. “And then you and the Kunlun Palace appeared here?” “Yes. Besides, I was the only one left in the sect. The other disciples seemed to have vanished without a trace.”Ji Ruyue’s expression was sorrowful. After Lin Xuan heard Ji Ruyue’s description, he suddenly felt as if he had opened the door to a new world. This world did not seem to be just a small earth. There were more worlds beyond Earth! Ji Ruyue saw his expression and asked curiously, “You don’t seem surprised. Instead, you seem...; Happy?” Lin Xuan coughed lightly. “I’m surprised, I’m really surprised!” Ji Ruyue said with great interest, “I told your...; chief ye before, but I didn’t go into details, but I hinted a lot. Her reaction was much more intense than yours. She didn’t expect that there was a world outside the world she lived in.” Lin Xuan sighed in his heart. It was indeed harder for Aborigines to accept new ideas than transmigrators like him. After all, he could even accept transmigrations. What was there to be surprised about there being more worlds outside the world. “I think you’re an interesting person. I’ll give you some additional information.”Ji Ruyue suddenly stood up and pointed in a few directions. “There are ancient and powerful existences awakening in those directions. I can only sense them roughly, but it’s obvious that they aren’t from Kunlun Palace or Heavenly Dragon Temple.” Lin Xuan was stunned at first, and the map of Kunlun City quickly appeared in his mind. Then, he shockingly discovered that the directions ji ruyue pointed out were India, the Truth Knights, and the Salvation Society. “Stronger Than You? Could it be a level 10 warrior?” Ji Ruyue laughed. “The distance is too far. My senses are very weak. I’m not sure if they are stronger or weaker than me.” “As for Level 10? I don’t understand. This should be your Earth’s military system, right?” “According to the Kunlun Palace’s system, I’m now at the completion of the core formation stage. In addition, I also cultivate my physical body. I really don’t know the specific strength.” After saying that, Ji Ruyue said helplessly, “After the Kunlun Palace became a ruin, the spiritual energy became extremely thin. Only the main hall on the top of the mountain still has some. As for the mountainside and the foot of the mountain, there are almost none.” Lin Xuan nodded slightly. Peak of the core formation stage...; it seemed that it was really a cultivation world. From this realm to the level of a martial artist, there was probably no way to compare. Unless one day he found the origin of the mystic realm and upgraded the quality of the high-level observation skill to seven-colored immortality, then he would probably be able to see Ji Ruyue’s specific level. “Then why don’t you go out and take a look?”Lin Xuan asked tentatively. Ji Ruyue shook her head, “I went out before. At that time, there were ferocious monsters everywhere on Earth. I even saved a few people, but after I saved a few people, I realized that there was no spiritual Qi on Earth at all, causing the spiritual Qi in my body to scatter outwards. Moreover, every time I used a spell, it would consume several times more spiritual qi than before. After that, I never went out again.” Lin Xuan was stunned. Why did this look like a diffusion phenomenon. Matter would flow from the high-density area to the low-density area and eventually reach an even distribution. “Spiritual Qi, can I take a look?” Ji Ruyue waved her hand. Lin Xuan immediately felt a gentle breeze on his face, with a faint fragrance. With a light sniff, he immediately felt refreshed, as if the impurities in his body had been washed a lot by this refreshing qi. “This is spiritual qi? It feels like some kind of energy-rich gas. If I breathe for a long time, perhaps my warrior level will naturally increase.”Lin Xuan was very surprised. Lin Xuan wanted to say something, but Ji Ruyue’s expression changed slightly. “There’s something very powerful outside.” Lin Xuan was stunned. “In Kunlun Ruins?” “No, outside Kunlun ruins.” Lin Xuan immediately reacted. “Kunlun City?” “Is it called Kunlun city outside Kunlun Ruins? It should be there.”Ji Ruyue frowned slightly. “I feel a powerful existence approaching, but it doesn’t seem like its real body.” “Maybe it’s here to attack your construction department.” Lin Xuan asked, “Very powerful?” “Very powerful. No one in Kunlun city can block that thing. It’s very likely that all of you will be wiped out.” Lin Xuan asked, “Compared to you?” “If it came in its original form, I might not be able to win, but only a part of it is coming now. As long as I make a move, it has no chance of winning,”Ji Ruyue said slowly. At this point, an incomparable confidence rose in her body. “Then can I ask you to make a move?”Lin Xuan could not help but ask. Since ji ruyue had said so, it was probably impossible without her help. It was very likely that several level nine warriors were ganging up on Kunlun City. Ji Ruyue laughed instead. “Then the question is, why should I help?” “I’ll give you a chance to convince me.” She simply sat down, placed her palm on the zither, and began to play the zither slowly. The ear-piercing and messy notes immediately rushed into Lin Xuan’s mind, violently attacking his ears and auditory nerves. Lin Xuan had no choice but to overcome the ear-piercing noise and think hard. Ji Ruyue gave him a chance, which meant that Ji Ruyue could make a move or not. She just lacked a reason. What he needed to do was to give her this reason. “One, although we are from two different worlds, we look similar. The people outside who attacked Kunlun city are different. They are not my kind. I think Kunlun Palace is a noble sect, and they are ethical. You can choose to save them “Two, you are not familiar with that powerful existence. If you can kill that thing and have some understanding of that existence, it should be very useful to you.” “Three, why did that powerful existence attack Kunlun City? I dare to guess that the target is not the construction department but you. The other party has also sensed your existence.” Lin Xuan did not continue. If they squeezed together, he could give a few more reasons. However, he felt that these three were enough to convince Ji Ruyue. He noticed that Ji Ruyue’s hand that was strumming the strings paused, but it did not stop completely. Lin Xuan tried hard to force himself to listen to the brain-piercing demonic music for more than ten minutes, but Ji Ruyue finally stopped. “Is the piece I played good?” Lin Xuan’s heart sank. Wasn’t this a death sentence. Now was the time for him to ask for help. If he answered honestly that it wasn’t good, then he wouldn’t ask for help at all. But if he said that it was good without conscience, wasn’t that a little too unethical.. One could be heartless, but one couldn’t be F * cking negative! After pondering for a while, Lin Xuan said seriously, “I think there’s a lot of room for improvement.” Ji Ruyue was stunned, and then she burst into laughter. “Interesting. You’re really interesting.” “If you say that I play badly and that I’m honest, I’ll be unhappy.” “If you say that I play well, I’ll be even more unhappy because I don’t like people who lie.” After saying that, she slowly stood up. “It’s been a hundred years, and this is the first time I’ve made a move.” Lin Xuan let out a long breath. He was really afraid that he had said the wrong thing and made Ji Ruyue unhappy, so he really wouldn’t go out to help. Meanwhile, in Kunlun City. Lu Pinghai stabbed the broken sword into the ground, trying his best to keep his body from collapsing. His chest was full of holes, and his blood formed a small pool of blood under his body. Zhou Dingshan, the director of the construction department of Kunlun City, was now embedded in the city wall. His limbs were all smashed into meat paste. He was bleeding too much and was unconscious. Li Weiguo, the leader who escorted Lin Xuan and the others to the Kunlun ruins, had a broken right leg. He leaned against the broken walls and barely managed to not collapse to the ground. Beside them, the agents of the construction department died in battle. Even a section of the city wall of Kunlun city had collapsed. In Kunlun City, a large number of residential buildings were filled with smoke and endless cries. In front of Lu Pinghai and the others were two rank 9 warriors and more than a dozen rank 8 warriors. They were all from India. At this moment, they were not injured at all. Ox Horn slowly took a few steps forward, his face full of joy. “Lu Pinghai, you would never have thought that I could defeat you so easily even though I am only rank 9 and rank 1!”Ox Horn laughed loudly. Ka La, the level 9 martial artist beside Bull Horn, frowned slightly and took a few steps back without saying a word. Lu Pinghai straightened his body with great effort. His gaze was fixed on the arm bone in Bull Horn’s hand. Bull horn sneered, “You really know what’s good for you. You could tell at a glance that this thing was extraordinary.” Lu Pinghai spat out a mouthful of blood. “Nonsense. You injured me with that thing. I couldn’t tell.” Niu Jiao said,”...; That’s true.” “Forget it. There’s no point in talking nonsense with you guys. Kala, I’ll leave the matter of attacking to you. Kill them all. Leave No one alive.” Hearing Niu Jiao’s arrogant tone, Kala frowned again. “Niu Jiao, you and I are both level nine martial artists. You Shouldn’t order me around,”he said coldly. NIU jiao also said coldly, “But my position is higher than yours!” Kala took a deep breath, clenched his fists, and walked toward Lu Pinghai. Lu Pinghai sneered, “How many years has it been? The noble and officer factions in India are still fighting among themselves.” “Besides, it’s weird that you don’t rank people based on their strength.” “I remember that Kala reached level nine and level four a few years ago. Niu Jiao just reached level nine recently. It’s easy to tell who’s stronger and who’s weaker.” “Kala, my heart aches for you. If you were a member of the construction department, you would have long become a core member of the higher-ups. It’s a pity that you’re a member of India!” These words hurt Kala deeply. Niu Jiao said fiercely, “You’re about to die, yet you still want to sow discord between US Indians. Damn it!” “Kala, kill him! I don’t want the credit for killing Lu Pinghai. I’ll leave it to you.” Kala said calmly, “I know. The fight between our factions is still a family matter. It’s not for outsiders to interfere.” Lu Pinghai laughed loudly. “It’s okay. I’m just enjoying myself before I die. As long as I can make you unhappy, I’ll be very happy.” Kala pulled out a huge axe from the storage compartment. The huge axe shone coldly under the sunlight. It was as big as a door and extremely scary. Lu Pinghai was not afraid. He looked at the huge axe. Kala took a deep breath and swung the axe down! Clang! The next moment, there was the sound of metal colliding. Kala immediately felt a huge rebound force from between his thumb and forefinger. The force was so strong that he almost held his weapon tightly. Kala took a few steps back and looked at Lu Pinghai in shock. Lu Pinghai was also stunned for a moment. “My Head, still there?”He wondered. “Of course it’s still there.” The voice of the strange woman rang out slowly. The Ox Horn and Kala eyes a blur, immediately found in front of a beautiful fairy-like woman. Anyone, regardless of gender, regardless of the old and young, to see her at the first sight will be a heartfelt sigh. How could there be such a beautiful woman on Earth. “Sword, come.” The strange woman shouted in a low voice. She stretched out her hands, and the air suddenly condensed on its own. In the blink of an eye, it turned into two ice-blue longswords that stabbed towards the two of them. Bull Horn and Kala had just seen the ice-blue longswords a second ago, but in the next second, they felt a chill in their chests. The Icy Blue Longsword had already pierced through their hearts. Moreover, the ice and frost froze their bodies at a terrifying speed, instantly submerging their consciousness. The two of them became lifelike ice sculptures on the spot. “Break.” Ji Ruyue said indifferently. The two ice sculptures instantly shattered, exploding into ice cubes on the ground. Just like that, two tier 9 martial artists were killed on the spot! This scene caught Lu Pinghai, Zhou Dingshan, Li Weiguo, and the rest of the construction staff by surprise. Who Was this woman? She could actually kill a Tier 9 martial artist in one move. Moreover, ox horn and Kala hadn’t attacked at all. They hadn’t lost any HP, mana, or stamina. They had only used their strange arm bones to completely defeat Lu Pinghai. In other words, this woman had killed two tier 9 martial artists in their peak condition in one move! Did our construction division have such a powerful person? Lu Pinghai immediately reacted. Wait, could she be the person...; Sister Ye mentioned? “Chief Lu, don’t worry. She is willing to help. We are fine now,”Lin Xuan’s voice came from behind Lu Pinghai. Ji Ruyue had brought him along when she came out. Lu Pinghai stared at Lin Xuan in shock. He found it hard to believe. After Ji Ruyue killed Bull Horn and Kala, she did not leave. Instead, she stared at the arm bone that had fallen to the ground. Cold Air suddenly shot out between her two fingers and pierced toward the arm bone. Whoosh. The arm bone suddenly bounced out of nowhere and dodged the attack. Then, a strange magnetic field appeared around the arm bone, and a large amount of earth, wood, and flesh gathered toward it. In the blink of an eye, it took the shape of a giant elephant. The arm bone was the heart, the earth and wood were the skin, and the flesh and blood were the core. The giant elephant was at least ten meters long, and its roar shook the sky and Earth. Especially the pair of sharp and curved tusks. They were rough and dangerous, as if they could pierce through everything. “Creation condensing technique?” Ji Ruyue frowned slightly. She waved her hand, and the black sword on her waist suddenly left its sheath. The giant elephant stomped on the ground and suddenly pounced over! At that moment, it was as if a mountain had descended from the sky, wanting to suppress everything. Ji Ruyue stabbed out with her sword. That sword seemed to have taken away all the light. Everyone’s gaze couldn’t help but look in that direction. Boom! The black sword was like a black dragon. The moment it came into contact with the elephant, the elephant tusks were shattered, and then the elephant’s body was shattered like tofu! In the blink of an eye, the elephant was reduced to ashes as easily as breaking dried twigs. Plop. The arm bone seemed to have lost all its strength and fell to the ground. Ji Ruyue stepped forward. With a slight movement of her two fingers, she carved some strange patterns on the arm bone before keeping it in her bag. “I’ll go back to Karakorum first. If you have any questions, you can come and find me.” After Ji Ruyue finished speaking, she returned to Karakorum as fast as she could. Lu Pinghai and the others only felt a gust of strong wind blow past, and the other party had already disappeared without a trace. “In less than three minutes, two rank 9 martial artists died, and the terrifying giant elephant also disappeared...;” Lu Pinghai was dumbfounded. Because the ox horn had summoned the terrifying elephant through the arm bone, which was why Kunlun city was in such a state. In Lu Pinghai’s opinion, the elephant was at least level nine, maybe even higher than level nine. “Lin Xuan, did you call that woman out to help?”Lu Pinghai asked. Lin Xuan nodded. “Chief Lu, I’m sure you have a lot of questions. Ask her while she’s in a good mood.” “Okay!”Lu Pinghai didn’t care about his injuries. He wiped the blood off his body and rushed into Kunlun ruins. Lin Xuan and Li Weiguo were left staring at each other. “I still don’t understand what happened...;”Li Weiguo scratched his head. Lin Xuan handed over a few bottles of great life potion. “It’s okay, Old Li. You know too little. It’s normal that you don’t understand.” Li Weiguo said,”...; I feel that there’s something wrong with what you’re saying to me.” A moment later, in a residential building at the foot of the Kunlun ruins. Lu Pinghai found Ji Ruyue here. To be exact, it was not that he found her, but that she found him after he entered the residential building. However, Ji Ruyue’s attention was not on him. Instead, she was staring at the white arm bone on the table, deep in thought. “Just ask what you want to ask,”she said casually. Lu Pinghai said seriously, “Are you the person...; that sister ye mentioned? She said not to mention your name.” Ji Ruyue nodded. “This is the agreement she made with me. It seems that she has kept it well.” Lu Pinghai was ecstatic. He had seen this person’s strength with his own eyes. If he could get her to help him deal with the so-called God of truth and the ruler of the deep sea, he would be confident. The only problem now was how to turn her into one of his people. This was because the other party did not look like someone who was easy to get in contact with. “Your injuries are a little serious. I don’t like the smell of blood.” Ji Ruyue shook her head and waved her hand. The surrounding spiritual energy gathered toward Lu Pinghai. His wounds immediately healed at a slow speed. The internal injuries in his body and his internal organs were also recovering. This made Lu Pinghai very surprised. At his level, life potions and great life potions were useless. Only Super Life Potions could restore his HP. However, Super Life Potions required very precious materials, which were very difficult to find. Therefore, as a level 9 martial artist, it was very difficult for him to recover from his injuries. Now, the strange gas that this person casually obtained could produce the effect of a super life potion! It was indeed extraordinary! “May I ask why you made a move just now?”Lu Pinghai asked carefully. Ji Ruyue looked at the lines on her arm bone and said calmly, “Someone asked me to make a move.” Lu Pinghai was stunned. “Who?” Ask? Who could ask her to help? Could it be that ye Lijiang came personally? That was impossible. Ye Lijiang was busy planning the construction division, so it was difficult for him to find the time. “Uh...; I don’t know his name.” Ji Ruyue was finally stunned because she remembered that she hadn’t asked that young man’s name before. Lu Pinghai said,”...; is he from our construction division?” “Yes.” “Good!”Lu Pinghai was very excited. As long as he was one of them. “Any other questions?”Ji Ruyue seemed to be a little tired. Lu Pinghai wanted to ask her if she knew about the so-called god of truth, the ruler of the deep sea. However, he could see the annoyance on her face at a glance. Therefore, he swallowed the words that were about to come out of his mouth. “Not for the time being.” “HMM, if there’s a problem, just tell that young man from before. Tell him to tell me that I want to study this arm bone and it won’t appear for a while.” After Ji Ruyue finished speaking, she disappeared like a cloud. Lu Pinghai was shocked by this astonishing speed. This...; was definitely not a speed that a level nine martial artist could have. This person was at least a level ten martial artist. “Young...; which young man? Could it be...;” Lu Pinghai rubbed his chin, his mind whirling, and finally fixed on Lin Xuan. Just now, Lin Xuan was the only one who walked out of the light door of the mystic realm! He even said something beside him. “With her, we’ll be fine.” This sentence was still ringing in Lu Pinghai’s mind, buzzing. Lu Pinghai rushed out of the secret realm and found Lin Xuan, who was bandaging the wounds of Li Weiguo and Zhou Dingshan. Zhou Dingshan was still unconscious, but he gradually recovered after Lin Xuan drank two bottles of the elixir of life. Lu Pinghai grabbed Lin Xuan’s shoulder with excitement. “Did you invite that woman?” Lin Xuan nodded. Lu Pinghai was overjoyed. “Good, good, good! As expected, the new waves of the Yangtze River will surpass the new waves. With a junior like you, our construction department will be strong!” “Old Li, Old Zhou, I’ll leave this to you. I’ll bring Lin Xuan back to the headquarters to report to Sister Ye.” Lu Pinghai left these words, grabbed Lin Xuan, and ran. In the blink of an eye, they passed through the light door of the secret realm. Li Weiguo and Zhou Dingshan were left in a mess in the wind. “What’s wrong with him?”Li Weiguo was confused. “Did Lin Xuan do something great?” Zhou Dingshan scratched his head. “I want to know too. Besides...; I’m still waiting for Lin Xuan to bandage me! Damn it!” .. In the construction department of Xijing City. Lu Pinghai knocked on the office of the first president. Two passionate voices came from inside. When they walked closer, they heard Wan youxi and Tian Yucai. Tian yucai said excitedly, “President Ye! “Combining my father’s mechanical technology and President Wan’s Mechanical Technology, I designed this new type of defense tower. Compared to the previous defense tower, they are more powerful and have a longer range. More importantly, they are very efficient at absorbing all kinds of energy!” Wan youxi continued, “In other words, the energy that the previous defense tower couldn’t use can be used. The previous defense tower would waste 30 to 50 percent of its energy. It can absorb 80 to 90 percent of it!” After saying that, he laughed, “Xiao Cai’s design on the energy core is really unique. I think we should immediately reform it and renovate all the defense towers in the mystical realm, especially the drowning city. We must prioritize the allocation there.” Ye Lijiang nodded slightly. It was obvious that he agreed. At this moment, Lu Pinghai rushed in with Lin Xuanxing. Tian yucai was surprised. When she first arrived at the construction department, in order to take into account the international influence, she had been designing new machinery in the laboratory tailor-made for her by Wanyou Gap. It was almost isolated from the outside world. However, the construction department and Gao Tianyuan had already fallen out with each other, so they didn’t care about the consequences. So what if the Skyfeather Craftsman knew that his daughter was in the construction department? She had fled to the light, not been kidnapped. Therefore, Skyfeather Cai had also received a lot of news from the construction department. One of them was shocking news. The person who helped her sneak into the construction department from the Gaotian Plain, Poison Blade, was actually a clone created by another agent using his skills. And that person was called Lin Xuan! After hearing this news, she had always felt that it wasn’t real. Because, how could someone like Poison Blade be a clone? He was clearly a real person! This also caused her to not dare to meet Lin Xuan. Now that Tian yucai suddenly saw Lin Xuan, her expression was complicated. “Hey, weren’t you guarding Kunlun Ruins? Why did you suddenly come back?”Wan youxi was confused. Ye lijiang also asked, “Pinghai, what’s so important that you have to come personally?” Lu Pinghai said happily, “Sister Ye! It’s a big deal! The person you’re looking for has been found!” Ye Lijiang was stunned at first, then she revealed an uncontrollable smile. “She appeared?” “Not only did she appear, but she also helped us kill two level nine warriors from India!”Lu Pinghai said excitedly. Wan youxi was shocked. “Holy Sh * t! That person is so fierce?” Ye Lijiang walked out directly from behind the desk. The more she heard, the happier she became. “Who attracted her interest? Is it you who brought her here?” Her eyes fell on Lin Xuan, and her mind raced. “I remember you. You Are Lin Xuan, a level-eight warrior. Poison Blade is your clone, right?” Lin Xuan nodded. Lu Pinghai nodded heavily. “Sister Ye, you guessed right. He was the one who invited that woman. Otherwise...;” He sighed. “Otherwise, Kunlun city would have been destroyed and Kunlun ruins would have fallen into the hands of India.” Ye Lijiang was slightly shocked. “What happened before?” Lu Pinghai told him everything that happened in Kunlun City. He mentioned the horn, the Kala, the strange arm bone, Ji Ruyue, and Ji Ruyue. “The arm bone seems to be more than just a terrifying elephant. It can also block the signal.”Lu Pinghai took out his broken communicator, “I had planned to warn the general director the moment I was attacked, but I couldn’t send the signal.” “However, the woman took away the arm bone. I Can’t say anything. After all, she killed almost everyone,”Lu Pinghai said with a helpless smile. Ye Lijiang nodded seriously. “Let’s go there now. I want to see her.” “Little Wan, I’ll leave the new defense tower to you. Get it done as soon as possible. It’s best to equip the entire drowning city within a week.” Wan youxi nodded. “Understood.” Ye Lijiang, Lu Pinghai, and Lin Xuan moved between the secret realms through a few secret realms’light doors and quickly arrived at Kunlun city. Li Weiguo and Zhou Dingshan were organizing the surviving construction department agents and martial artists to save the injured and clean up the rubble. When they suddenly saw ye Lijiang and the other two appear, everyone became police officers. Li Weiguo and Zhou Dingshan immediately stood up straight. “Chief Ye!” Ye Lijiang smiled. “Teacher Li, I’ve said it before. You Don’t have to call me that.” Li Weiguo laughed out loud. “That won’t do. You’re my student, and you’re also the number one chief of the construction department. Calling you chief gives me face!” Ye Lijiang smiled helplessly. Zhou Dingshan asked, “Why is chief ye here in Kunlun City?” Ye Lijiang pointed at Kunlun ruins and said, “He came for that woman.” Li Weiguo and Zhou Dingshan nodded and watched the three of them enter Kunlun ruins. When the staff of the construction department and the Warriors saw this scene, they also began to discuss. “It’s strange. Chief ye is usually very elusive. Why did he suddenly appear here today?” “Yes, and the two chiefs actually brought a young man in. Is there anything special about that young man? Do you know who he is?” “You don’t even know him. He’s new, right? Lin Xuan! The poison blade that once made a great contribution is a clone that he created with his skills. It’s awesome!” “Holy Sh * t! So it’s him!” The three of them walked into the secret realm. Ye lijiang asked, “How are we going to meet her?” Lu Pinghai smiled bitterly. “No, she said that she’s busy analyzing the arm bone and hasn’t seen anyone for a while.” “But she also said that if we have any questions, Lin Xuan can pass them on.” Ye Lijiang didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. She pondered for a moment, took out a piece of white paper, and wrote her questions on it. “These are the questions that I need to ask. Please give them to her.” Ye Lijiang stared at Lin Xuan’s eyes seriously. “This is very important. Please get the answer from her “I can also promise her that whatever she wants, as long as our construction division has it, we can hand it over to her, as long as it doesn’t go against our basic ethics and conscience.” Lin Xuan nodded seriously. He could see the pleading in ye Lijiang’s eyes. If even the first director of the construction division had such a look, it meant that something big had really happened. “Don’t worry, director Ye. I’ll go right away.” Lin Xuan immediately followed the previous route and headed to the top of the mountain. Ye Lijiang and Lu Pinghai looked at Lin Xuan’s back and sighed in relief. “No matter what, it’s already a good thing for us that she’s willing to help at a time like this.” “India...; We need informants to pass on information. Why would they suddenly attack Kunlun City?” Ye lijiang frowned deeply. .. India’s capital, Old Delhi. The current leader of India was in his office, looking at the huge portrait in front of him with his hands behind his back. He did not say a word. This portrait was five meters tall and occupied the front wall. On the portrait was a majestic and heroic king. He had thick black eyebrows, deep and sharp eyes, and a beard that was as thick as a lion’s mane. His facial features were broad, and he looked majestic without being angry. He was riding a strong and sturdy horse, and his muscles bulged as if he was going to fly up in the next moment. Under the horse’s hooves was blood and fire, steel and iron, and a city that looked like ruins. The sharp eyes of the king looked forward. Moreover, anyone who pushed open the door of the office would immediately see this portrait, and they would be shocked by the powerful aura of the portrait. Dong Dong Dong. The office door was suddenly knocked. “Come in,”the Indian leader said calmly. A rank 8 martial artist walked in. “Leader, ox horn and Kala have been killed. The plan to attack Kunlun city has failed.” The Indian leader nodded. “I understand. You may leave.” The rank 8 martial artist was stunned. The leader was not angry? The tier 8 martial artist did not dare to ask further. He closed the door and quickly left. Only when the footsteps of this person disappeared did the Indian leader take a few deep breaths to calm himself down. “Trash...; Trash!” “Even with such a powerful divine item, they were still unable to break through Kunlun city and take down Kunlun Ruins!” The Indian leader cursed angrily. “They shouldn’t be blamed. It’s that existence that came out of Kunlun ruins.” At this moment, another voice sounded in his mind. It was an ancient, hoarse and hard to hear voice. “Your Highness.” The Indian leader’s expression changed slightly. “You said it was that existence?” “Yes, I don’t know what it is. I can only sense that it should be very strong,”the ancient voice said slowly. “Moreover, my arm bone was also taken away by it. The Mark I left on it has been erased.” The Indian leader was furious. “What? ! It took away your arm bone?” The ancient voice was not angry. “I asked you to attack that place because I wanted to test it out. Losing an arm bone is not a small loss, but it’s not a big problem. I have a lot of arm bones.” “Moreover, it thought that it had dealt with it decisively, but when it erased the Mark I left on the arm bone, I also roughly came into contact with its aura.” “If my feeling is not wrong, its strength is definitely weaker than my main body. It is a target that I can hunt,”the ancient voice said calmly. The Indian leader laughed loudly. “Your Highness King Jie Ri, are you going to start hunting? Kill it and devour it. You will definitely recover as soon as possible!” The ancient voice shook its head, “Don’t be anxious. Wait for the opportunity. I am indeed stronger than it, but I can not guarantee that I am stronger than other existences. What you need to pay attention to is the powerful existences of the truth knights and the Salvation Society. If they notice me while I am devouring it, it will be troublesome.” The Indian leader nodded repeatedly. “Understood, understood. I will send people to gather clues.” In the Great Hall at the peak of Kunlun ruins. Lin Xuan saw Ji Ruyue here again. Just like before, he didn’t climb here by himself, but was carried here by a strange air current. This kind of magical method made Lin Xuan somewhat shocked. It really was the magic of an immortal. However, before he transmigrated, he was also a bookworm who had read a lot of web novels, so he naturally had a lot of xianxia novels. He thought of the core formation stage cultivators described in those novels, so it was not surprising that they had this kind of method. At this moment, Ji Ruyue was not playing the guqin that could play the brain-piercing demonic music. Instead, she stared at the white arm bone on the table and did not say a word. “What questions do you have for me?” Ji Ruyue temporarily averted her gaze from the arm bone. Lin Xuan did not ask her questions immediately. Instead, he walked to her side and pointed at the arm bone. “This thing is a part of the powerful existence that you sensed?” Ji Ruyue nodded. “This contains boundless energy. It’s different from spiritual energy, but it should also be able to be absorbed. I’m thinking of a way to absorb it.” Lin Xuan nodded slightly. Then, he took out the piece of paper that ye Lijiang had given him and began to ask. “First question, do you know the god of truth and the ruler of the Deep Sea? Or do you feel a power similar to that of light and the deep sea? Can you describe how powerful they are? Can you compare them to yourself?” Ji Ruyue didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. “Is this a question?” Lin Xuan scratched his head. “Count me in.” Ji Ruyue knocked on the table. “I’ve never heard of the God of truth and the ruler of the deep sea. Neither before or after I came to Earth “However, I really feel a power similar to the light and the deep sea. It’s in those two directions. The light is over there, and the deep sea is over there.” After saying that, she waved her hand, and the two books flew up from the ground. They followed her finger and pointed in two directions. Lin Xuan corresponded with the direction of the world map in his mind. These two directions corresponded to the Knights of Truth and the Salvation Society respectively. His heart moved slightly. Although he did not know what these two things were, he immediately recorded them down. “The second question is, if the construction division encounters powerful existences that are hard to compete with, such as the god of truth and the ruler of the deep sea, can I ask for your help?” Ji Ruyue did not explicitly refuse, but she did not immediately agree either. Instead, she said seriously, “Master has always told me not to blindly sympathize with the weak just because of sympathy. If I continue to provide help, the weak will treat all of this as a peace of mind. If I don’t have time to provide help one day, the weak will instead be angry and curse.” Lin Xuan raised his eyebrows. Ji Ruyue, this master, was really good at teaching and imparting knowledge. Not only did she teach him skills, she also taught him how to be a person. Lin Xuan smiled and said, “Then, we can treat it as a trade, an equal trade.” “You will have the first choice of the spoils of war that you get after helping the construction division.” He pointed at the arm bone on the table. “For example, these things will naturally belong to you.” Ji ruyue said, “Before I promise you, I have to go to the Heavenly Dragon Temple, which is what you told me before...; Xiao Ling Mountain, right? I have to go there to get something. It may or may not be there.” Lin Xuan nodded. “I will record it on a paper and give it to director Ye.” “No more questions?” “No More.” “Alright, then you can go back. I want to continue studying this arm bone.” Ji Ruyue waved her hand, and a light gas wrapped around Lin Xuan. The wind howled, and in the blink of an eye, Lin Xuan was standing on the ground again. Ye Lijiang and Lu Pinghai were pacing back and forth here. When they suddenly saw Lin Xuan appear in such a way, the two of them were shocked, thinking that this woman’s methods were too amazing. “How was the discussion?”Ye Lijiang asked. Lin Xuan handed the paper to her. “Chief Ye, it’s all written on the back.” Ye Lijiang looked at it and said happily, “Okay, no problem.” “Since you can accept it, then I’ll go now.”A cold voice sounded. The three of them suddenly realized that Ji Ruyue had suddenly appeared beside them. This kind of sudden appearance caught the three of them off guard. “Of course. You can go to Xiao Ling Mountain at any time.”Ye Lijiang nodded seriously. “Then, you can go with me. You have five senses. I might need you when the time comes,”Ji Ruyue suddenly said. Lin Xuan was stunned. “Me?” “Yes, let’s go.” Ji Ruyue grabbed his shoulder and rushed out of the light door of the secret realm in the blink of an eye. Ye Lijiang and Lu Pinghai looked at each other and were slightly shocked. “Sister Ye, that woman seems to think highly of Lin Xuan,”Lu Pinghai said seriously. Ye Lijiang also nodded slightly, but there was still some doubt in his tone. “Lin Xuan does have a lot of potential. If nothing unexpected happens, he can also become a level-nine warrior in the future, but she thinks highly of him just because of that. I really don’t understand...;” “However, in that case, let’s arrange for Lin Xuan to communicate with her, so that we don’t have to directly communicate with her.” .. At the same time, Lin Xuan was grabbed by Ji Ruyue with one hand and ran in a direction. The warriors who were rebuilding Kunlun City were all dumbfounded when they saw this scene. That woman in White was the one who killed two level nine warriors in one move just now, right? Why did she run away with her people in the middle of the day? Those who didn’t know would think that she had eloped. “Big Sister...; are you going to Xiao Ling Mountain?”Lin Xuan opened his mouth and asked with difficulty, facing the wind. “Yes.” “Then why didn’t you...; use a faster method...; but you had to run...;” The cold air that was crazily gushing into her cheeks immediately stopped. Ji ruyue asked in puzzlement, “Is there a faster method?” Lin Xuan cleared his throat and calmed himself down. He said helplessly, “Of course, we’ll go through the Light Gate of the Mystic Realm. Come with me.” The distance between Kunlun City and Lingshan city was very far. However, as long as they passed through a few light gates of the mystic realm, they would be able to close the distance quickly. They would arrive in half an hour at most. Lin Xuan took out his communication device and sent a message to Li Weiguo. “Old Li, what’s the fastest route from Kunlun City to Lingshan City?” Li Weiguo replied very quickly. “First, we’ll find the light gate of the mystic realm leading to the Black Wind Mountain Mystic Realm in the central square of Kunlun City and enter the Black Wind Mountain “Second, find a three-meter-high light gate of the mystic realm near the entrance of the Black Wind Mountain and arrive at the Blue Wave Sea mystic realm. That is the breeding mystic realm of freshwater fish. Be careful not to damage the fishing ground “When you appear in the Blue Wave Sea mystic realm, take a fishing boat to the nearest island. There is a one-meter-high light gate of the mystic realm in the basement. You can reach the fierce tiger forest through it “Finally, when you walk out of the light gate of the secret realm of the Fierce Tiger Forest, you will appear in Lingshan City.” At the end of his speech, Li Weiguo continued, “By the way, director ye has given that woman the identity of a senior agent. You can bring her to most places without being stopped.” Lin Xuan nodded. “Okay!” “Let’s go. I will lead the way.” Ji Ruyue was confused. After all, she rarely left Kunlun ruins, so she naturally didn’t know what the other Mystic Realms looked like. The two of them passed through the three mystic realms of Black Wind Mountain, Green Wave Sea, and fierce tiger forest in turn. In less than fifteen minutes, they arrived at Lingshan City. Among them, at Green Wave Sea, they were supposed to row a fishing boat there, but Ji Ruyue grabbed Lin Xuan and flew there directly, saving a lot of time. Walking out of the light gate of Fierce Tiger Forest’s secret realm, the familiar Lingshan City appeared in front of Lin Xuan. Feng Zhuang, who was big and strong, was unloading a transport truck. The materials on the transport truck were all transported from other cities, which were not available in Lingshan. The merchants earned the difference in price. After unloading some goods, Feng Zhuang stretched his back and suddenly found an acquaintance. “Hey, Lin Xuan!” He waved his hand happily. Ever since Lin Xuan left Xiaoling Mountain to carry out his mission, he rarely saw Lin Xuan anymore. Later, he heard the news that Lin Xuan and poison blade were actually the same person, which almost shocked him. However, after accepting the news, he was actually very proud. After all, he was very familiar with Lin Xuan, unlike the other warriors in Xiaoling Mountain. Many people even wanted to get Lin Xuan’s autographs through him. Lin Xuan was very popular among the young martial artists now. He would definitely be able to sell a few autographs for a high price. Lin Xuan was also stunned. He didn’t expect to meet someone familiar as soon as he returned to Spirit Mountain City. “Old Feng! Not Bad, you’re already at Level Seven Now!” He laughed happily. Feng Zhuang gave him a thumbs up. “Awesome, you can even tell. I just leveled up two days ago.” Then, he looked at Ji Ruyue and was stunned. It was rare to see such a beautiful woman. She even looked like a celestial being. “This is...;” “Great Master, Chief Ye’s Distinguished Guest.”Lin Xuan could not reveal her identity, so he made up a story. “I’m here to accompany her to pick up something in Xiao Ling Mountain.” Feng Zhuang was shocked. Chief Ye, the distinguished guest of the first Chief! He immediately showed respect. “Then you guys go ahead. I’m just happy to see you and say hello.” Lin Xuan nodded and quickly moved forward with Ji Ruyue. Along the way, they met many warriors they were familiar with. They all greeted Lin Xuan with a smile. Some of them had only met him once, but they were also very warm and eager to be Lin Xuan’s brother. They all knew that Lin Xuan was now a very popular person in the construction department. In the future, he might become a level nine martial artist just like Xiang Qian ‘er. If he didn’t curry favor with this kind of person now, when would he do so? “Some people are just trying to curry favor with you, but some people are sincere. It seems that you’re quite popular,”Ji Ruyue said suddenly. Lin Xuan smiled. “I stayed here for a while and saved some people’s lives.” His medicine had indeed saved a lot of lives during the ghost riot at Little Spirit Mountain. Sometimes, life or death was just a matter of a bottle of life medicine. Soon, the two of them entered Little Spirit Mountain’s secret realm. Ji Ruyue looked around and saw ruins everywhere. “Heavenly Dragon Temple...; has become like this, but no one from Heavenly Dragon Temple stayed.” She sighed lightly. This scene of devastation reminded her of the past. “What are you looking for?”Lin Xuan asked. Ji Ruyue coughed lightly. “I don’t know.” Lin Xuan,”...;” You Freaking don’t Know? Ji Ruyue wasn’t embarrassed. Instead, she chuckled and said, “That’s the treasure of the Heavenly Dragon Temple. I’m not sure if it’s lost, but if I can really find it, it should be able to greatly improve my current situation.” “Are you talking about...; spiritual energy?”Lin Xuan immediately reacted. Ji Ruyue could not stay outside of Kunlun ruins for a long time because the spiritual energy in her body would spread out. This was also the biggest limitation of the shackles on her body. “Yes, that thing is called the Heavenly Dragon Soul Stone. It was condensed by the founder of the Heavenly Dragon Temple after he killed a heavenly dragon. It has all kinds of magical effects. Keeping the spiritual energy from spreading out is one of them.” Ji Ruyue looked forward to it. “Back then, my master had asked me to take a look at it many times. Unfortunately, people said that it was too precious and wouldn’t let me see it.” “Stingy old bald donkey, you won’t be missing a piece after taking a look.”She snorted coldly. Lin Xuan couldn’t help but laugh. “How are we going to find it?” “Walk around! Walk around blindly!” “As long as it’s within a certain range, I should be able to sense it. After all, the spiritual energy of that thing is very abundant,”Ji Ruyue said resolutely. “And with you here, you should be able to sense it as well since you have five senses.” Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. “Alright, let’s walk around then.” The two of them flew around Xiao Ling Mountain, sometimes flying into the sky and sometimes entering the earth. Sometimes they flew over the gathering place, and sometimes they appeared in the underground cave. Five days later, they really found it. And it wasn’t Ji Ruyue who found it. It was Lin Xuan who used his five senses to sense it! That thing was calling out to him, as if it was really fated with him. This made Lin Xuan surprised. His five senses were clearly a skill. However, what they found was not a complete heavenly dragon soul stone. It was only half the size, and the other half had disappeared. “Cracked?” Ji ruyue mumbled, “Will this thing still be effective if it’s cracked?” “Besides, it doesn’t look that powerful. Those old bald donkeys kept bragging about how strong they were. I feel ashamed for them.” Lin Xuan cast a high-level observation skill over. As expected. Besides the name, he couldn’t see anything else. Ji Ruyue held the Heavenly Dragon Soul Stone and felt it carefully. She was a little happy. “Good! It’s still effective. The speed of my spiritual essence dispersing has slowed down a lot.” Lin Xuan was about to say a few words to congratulate her, but then he heard a broadcast resounding through the entire small spiritual mountain mystic realm. “Drowning city has suffered a serious injury! Please gather all level eight warriors and set off for Longhai City! We will use the sea transportation there to rush to drowning city!” Lin Xuan’s heart sank. Ji Ruyue was also stunned when she heard the urgent voice. Before Ji Ruyue could ask, Lin Xuan’s communication device vibrated violently. He opened it and saw a red emergency message suddenly pop out. “Lin Xuan, this message was sent by me, Ye Lijiang. Please take her to Longhai City. Drowning City is not a natural disaster, but a man-made disaster! “We believe that the Salvation Society wants to completely destroy our people in drowning city and take it for themselves “In addition, Wan youxi sent a message over there. There is an extremely strange situation in drowning city. It seems that something strange is growing there “President Ye sent the message personally. It means that the situation is very urgent...;” Lin Xuan’s expression changed even more. Not long after he transmigrated to this world, when he was still a pioneer in the germinal organization, he had encountered a drowning city monster that came ashore from the river to attack. At that time, he had felt the terror of the drowning city monster. After becoming an agent of the construction department, he learned that most of the power of the construction department was actually placed in the construction department. Moreover, there was a tier 9 warrior guarding there all year round, no matter what happened in other places.., that level nine warrior would never leave the drowning city. Lin Xuan thought that he would only have the chance to drown the city after becoming a level nine warrior. After all, it was too dangerous there. Why was today.. Lin Xuan’s mind raced. He thought of the question that ye Lijiang had asked Ji Ruyue previously. The God of truth of the Knights of Truth, the ruler of the Deep Sea of the Salvation Society. These were probably powerful existences like Ji Ruyue. It was probably because of these powerful existences that the two organizations had the intention to make a move. Ji Ruyue also saw the contents of the communication device, but she couldn’t understand the words here. “Although I can’t understand it, I can roughly guess that something big must have happened.” “An existence with extraordinary strength has appeared? Is there going to be a fight?” Ji Ruyue’s eyes lit up. Lin Xuan was stunned. “It seems that you suddenly want to fight.” Ji Ruyue suddenly smiled confidently. “With the Heavenly Dragon Soul Stone, my strength has increased a lot. Of course, I want to find someone to fight and see how strong I am.” “Master said that after every increase in strength, I have to find someone to fight and test the limits of my strength.” “Where is the destination? Let’s fly there!” Lin Xuan said in a deep voice, “The destination is Longhai City!” Long Hai City. This medium-sized city had now gathered many martial artists from all over the world. Long Hai City’s construction department director, Chu Pengcheng, was currently in a terrible state. Because there were too many martial artists arriving in long hai city, so many that the statistics couldn’t even be counted. After everyone knew about the rotten situation in drowning city, they all wanted to contribute to that side. Moreover, some of these people were spies planted by various organizations. Chu Pengcheng had to carefully investigate everyone’s background. However, he had just advanced to a rank 8 martial artist a few days ago, but many of the martial artists who had arrived in Longhai city had a higher level than him. This also added a lot of difficulties to his work. Moreover, a portion of the injured people who had been evacuated from drowning city were also being placed in Longhai City at the moment. Xu Xuan and the others were treating them urgently. Chu Pengcheng had used up all of his magic power before running back to read the roster. He verified the identity of each warrior and squeezed his time to the limit. At this moment, Wang Dafu was also reading the roster and comparing it with the internal documents of the construction department. The two of them had not slept for a night, and their eyes were bloodshot. Wang Dafu finished flipping through a stack of flower rolls and let out a long sigh. Then, he let out a faint sigh. “Drowning the city. It just so happened that something big happened at this time, and two tier 9 martial artists fell into it...; our construction department is really plagued with disasters.” Chu Pengcheng snorted coldly. “What’s the use of complaining? We’ll take whatever comes our way. Since it has already happened, then we have to take it.” “I hope so. Please don’t let anything happen to a level nine martial artist...;”Wang Dafu sighed softly. At this time, Wang Dafu saw the burly figure outside and praised him from the bottom of his heart, “That man with the codename ‘Brother Milk’is really awesome. He and Xu Xuan arrived at Longhai City at the same time. As soon as he arrived, he started to cast all kinds of recovery skills on the wounded. Now, Xu Xuan is so tired that his face is pale, but he still acts as if nothing happened.” Chu Pengcheng nodded slightly. “Indeed, that guy is very capable. I heard that he was also outstanding in the Defense Battle of Xiao Ling Mountain when he was fighting against the Ghost Riot. He’s a genius.” “Eh?” At this moment, Chu Pengcheng noticed a man and a woman. “Why don’t I remember those two people? I’ve never seen them before.”Chu Pengcheng pointed at the two people. Wang Dafu took a moment to glance at them. “I’ve never seen them before either, but...; why is that man chatting with shield ghost, flame burst, and the others? Do they know each other?” “And that woman beside him gives me a very dangerous feeling.”Wang Dafu frowned. “I’ll go and take a look.” Chu Pengcheng threw the thick stack of rosters in his hand to Wang Dafu and walked over quickly. Wang dafu cursed, “F * ck, you deliberately threw the job to me, didn’t you?” Chu Pengcheng quickly walked in front of the young man and said, “Hello, director of the Construction Department of Longhai City. Every martial artist who arrives in Longhai City needs to register. You Are?” The young man smiled and said, “Lin Xuan, I also stayed in Longhai City for a period of time, but director Chu may not remember me, but you should remember my other identity, Poison Blade.” Chu Pengcheng was stunned. Poison Blade? The impression was too deep! In order to respond to the call of the head office, long hai city had gathered pharmacists to manufacture a large number of potions. A Spy from the enemy organization was prepared to take this opportunity to destroy long hai city’s warehouse in one fell swoop and destroy all the potions that were prepared to be sent to the front line of drowning city. In the end, the two spies were killed in an instant. Later, it was found that the spy was a warrior who was good at using poison and sword, but he didn’t show up after the battle to claim the credit. In the end, Chu Pengcheng gave this person a code name, “Poison Blade.”. After a while, Chu Pengcheng got a piece of news from his friend. Poison Blade joined the construction division and made a great achievement in the Battle of the guards of Little Spirit Mountain. After that, Poison Blade had become a spy sent by the construction division to the Gaotian Plain. He had infiltrated the Asura prison in the famous Reed Country’s secret realm, and he had successfully set down an anchor point at the lowest level of the Asura prison, he had allowed the chief commander to open the light door to the famous Reed Country’s secret realm, and he had saved Xiang Qianyu and the others. Poison Blade had become famous from that battle. Chu Pengcheng was a little emotional when he heard the news. This poison blade was really awesome. He didn’t expect that not long after, another shocking piece of news would break out. Poison Blade was actually a clone created by a skill. And the real body was a logistics warrior named Lin Xuan! When Chu Pengcheng heard this news, he was shocked beyond words. “You...; you are poison blade. Bah, Lin Xuan!” Chu Pengcheng almost couldn’t even speak properly. He still wanted to call Lin Xuan Poison Blade. Lin Xuan smiled. “Call Me Lin Xuan. Poison Blade is just a code name.” “Good, good, good. No wonder you guys are chatting so happily. You’ve known each other for a long time.”Chu Pengcheng sighed. “Is there anything I can help you with?”Lin Xuan asked. Chu Pengcheng sighed. “There is indeed. The wounded soldiers that were evacuated from drowning city were seriously injured. Some of them couldn’t recover completely even after drinking a few bottles of great life potion.” “Their wounds seem to have a strange power that keeps creating injuries.” Lin Xuan was deep in thought. “I’ll go and take a look.” Ji Ruyue, who was behind Lin Xuan, also followed. Soon, he found the wounded. Looking around, he saw a shocking scene. There were a hundred of them, and each of them had terrible wounds. Some People’s arms seemed to have been torn off by a huge mouth. Some people’s bodies seemed to have been soaked in water for several months, expanding and rotting. More people had black conches growing on their wounds. No matter how hard they tried, they could not pull them out. If they wanted to directly kill the Conches, the Conches would instead use all their strength to drill into these people’s bodies. The Warriors in charge of healing were at a loss. They could only cast a recovery skill every once in a while to ensure that their HP would not drop too quickly. Chu Pengcheng also followed them and sighed helplessly. “In this situation, I’m afraid that the Chief Commander is also at a loss.” Lin Xuan frowned as he watched. He had just used advanced observation skill to take a look at the pitch-black conch shell, but he actually could not see any information. It meant that the other party’s level was higher than his, and it might not be one or two levels higher. That conch was very likely a tier 9 monster! However, it was small in size, and it only attacked one person at a time, so it was ignored. Ji Ruyue, who had been silent all this time, suddenly said, “There is a very strange power residue on their wounds, and it has something to do with the power of the deep sea.” Lin Xuan’s expression changed slightly. The power of the Deep Sea? Did she mean the ruler of the deep sea? The drastic change in the city of drowning was indeed not that simple. “Do you have a way?”He asked. Ji Ruyue nodded. “However, these conch shells must all belong to me.” Chu Pengcheng was overjoyed. “As long as you can recover their HP, these conch shells are not a problem at all. You can take them if you want.” Ji Ruyue nodded. She took a few steps forward, waved her hand, and mobilized her spiritual qi. Dense and invisible spiritual qi immediately fell on a nearby wounded man. The pitch-black conch shell attached to his wound suddenly shrank back into its shell as if it had sensed an extremely terrifying threat. Without the parasitic conch shell and the nourishment of spiritual qi, the wounded man’s wound healed at a visible speed. Lin Xuan stepped forward and poured a bottle of great hp potion into the wounded. The wounded’s HP immediately recovered, and they quickly recovered to their peak condition. Chu Pengcheng was dumbfounded. What the hell! What kind of trick was this? ! Lin Xuan said seriously, “Their maximum HP has been temporarily lowered because of the parasite of the conch. My friend here has removed the conch, and then you can use the recovery skill and the HP Potion.” “I see!”Chu Pengcheng nodded. Ji Ruyue smiled. She suddenly raised her hands, and a large amount of spiritual essence gushed out of her body. However, because the spiritual essence was colorless, no one present could see such a magnificent scene. The large amount of spiritual essence fell into the bodies of every wounded soldier like threads. When the pitch-black conch sensed this aura, it immediately shrank back into its shell. Soon, Ji Ruyue had a large number of conch shells in her hands. Chu Pengcheng quickly squeezed out what little mana he had left and cast a great recovery spell on the wounded. As expected, the wounded were pleasantly surprised to see their HP recovering steadily and slowly! “Thank you! Thank you!” “Thank you so much. Thank you for getting rid of these conch shells.” The wounded soldiers were all in tears as they looked at Ji Ruyue and said gratefully. Ji Ruyue’s heart skipped a beat. It had been more than a hundred years, and this was the first time she had heard someone thank her. The last time someone spoke like this, it seemed to be her junior brothers and sisters. “There’s no need to thank me like this. It’s just an equivalent exchange.” Then, she turned to Lin Xuan. “When are we going to that...; Drowning City?” “Not Drowning City, Drowning City.”Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. Chu pengcheng hurriedly said, “When the chief executives come, we’ll set off immediately. Except for Chief Ye, the other chief executives will come.” Lin Xuan nodded seriously. It seemed that the chief executives all attached great importance to the drastic change of drowning city. “Well...; there are many people coming from the sea over there.” Ji Ruyue suddenly pointed at the direction of Longhai City near the sea. Chu Pengcheng was stunned for a moment. Longhai city was indeed close to the East China Sea, but the sea could only be seen from the highest peak of Longhai City. How could this woman see from the flat ground. Lin Xuan was deep in thought, and he suddenly exclaimed, “Don’t tell me she’s from the Salvation Society?” Meanwhile, on the East China Sea. A destroyer was sailing through the wind and waves. On the deck, there were all the warriors of the Salvation Society. Among them, there were as many as five level nine warriors! There were countless level eight and level seven warriors. Not far away, there was a small island. On the small island, there was a secret realm light door that was more than ten meters high. That was the secret realm light door of the drowning city! At this moment, the battle was breaking out on every inch of the small island. People from various forces and monsters were fighting. After the destroyer arrived at a certain distance, it suddenly turned on the radio. “I heard that the construction department suffered a great loss due to the drastic change in the drowning city. We, the Salvation Society, have come to support you in a humanitarian spirit!” “Please hold on, everyone. We will be there soon!” The radio was very loud, and everyone on the island could hear it clearly. Not only that, but it even spread all the way to long hai city! Except for some warriors who were weaker and had weaker hearing, almost everyone heard this deliberately amplified broadcast! Everyone’s expression changed slightly. The hearts of the Warriors loyal to the construction division sank. The Salvation Society had always been one-sided on the surface, and one-sided behind the scenes. Now, they said that they had come to support the city in a humanitarian spirit, but what were they really doing? The Salvation Society had been coveting the Drowned City for a long time! Now, the construction department had suffered heavy losses of its agents stationed in the drowned city. If the Salvation Society had arrived at this time, anyone with half a brain would be able to guess what their real intentions were. “The situation is very decadent...;” Lin Xuan sighed softly. The Salvation Society would definitely be mobilized in full force this time. Moreover, it was difficult not to guarantee that the people from other organizations would not make a move. For example, Takama-ga-hara and India, which had deep enmity with the construction department. At this moment. Southwest of the construction department. Gao Qianchi stood beside the boundary stone once again. This time, it was not one tier 9 warrior in front of him, but two. Moreover, both of them had been famous for a long time. They were not the glamorous ladies of the Salvation Society or the newly promoted tier 9 warriors like the Indian bull horns. “Last time, you stopped me alone. How many people can you stop this time?” One of the Indian warriors sneered. Last time, his pet Black Panther was beaten into black panther paste by Gao Qianchi. He had always remembered this grudge! Gao Qianchi was expressionless. “Two of your tier 9 warriors have died in Kunlun City. Now, other than the Indian leader who is guarding the Indian capital, Old Delhi, there are only the two of you in India.” “My mission is to stop the two of you.” “Although something has happened in drowning city, the construction department is not a fat meat that anyone can come and take a bite of. Anyone who dares to take a bite of the construction department’s meat will have to pay ten times or even a hundred times the price!” At the end of Gao Qianchi’s speech, an undisguised killing intent flashed through his eyes. Taking advantage of drowning city’s big trouble, he wanted to add insult to injury and seize control of the city. India’s small actions made him feel sincerely disgusted! “Then let’s start the war!” The two Indian martial artists sneered and pounced over at the same time. Gao Qianchi also pounced over with his fists raised. The three of them fought fiercely in the southwest direction of the primeval forest, without any scruples! In Western Europe, the Truth Knights, Dragon City. The acting head of the Pope was still busy with the reconstruction of the truth knights. The previous Pope had died in battle and a large number of people had died, causing the truth knights to suffer heavy losses. The Truth Knights’prestige in the world had also been lost. Originally, many small and medium-sized organizations were affiliated to the Truth Knights and would pay tribute every once in a while. Because of the death of the Pope and the dirty deal between the Knights of Truth and the Salvation Society, many small and medium-sized organizations had already sided with the Arctic army. “Head commander, the informant has sent a message. The drowning city has undergone a drastic change. The construction division has urgently mobilized a large number of people to the drowning city.” “The second message is that the Salvation Society has mobilized all of their forces and rushed to the drowning city in a humanitarian spirit. They even invited us to go together.” “The third news is that India sent a tier 9 warrior to attack the southwest direction of the construction department, but they were stopped by Gao Qianchi alone. The three of them are fighting fiercely in the dense forest, and there is no winner.” Bruno walked in quickly and said in a low voice. Then he looked at the eyes of the head commander and asked seriously, “What are we going to do?” Hearing these two news, the head commander stopped what he was doing and frowned deeply. Bruno had witnessed the sordidness of the Knights of truth, but he did not choose to leave. Instead, he firmly stayed. Because he knew that the person in power was the head commander. Under Bruno’s serious gaze, the head commander shook his head, “The construction division has helped us in the dragon mountain range. Even if we can’t go to drown the city to help, we shouldn’t add insult to injury. As for the Salvation Society, they are obviously fishing in troubled waters. Their invitation contains evil intentions and they want us to completely break with the construction division.” “So, we won’t go. Just Mind your own business. The reconstruction of the truth knights still needs time.” Bruno finally smiled slightly. “Yes.” <b>?</b>Long Hai City. One of the wounded had yet to recover his HP, but he stood up from the stretcher with a determined expression. “I want to go to the drowning city’s secret realm to support immediately. My comrades are still there.” The first wounded stood up, followed by the second and third. Not long after, all the wounded stood up at the same time. No one was afraid. “Our comrades are still there. We need to go back and fight!” Ji Ruyue blinked her eyes. She had experienced such a familiar scene in the Kunlun Palace. Facing the powerful demons, her masters and elders stepped forward. They had been wounded a long time ago, but they attacked again. Even if they had to die, they had to delay the demon’s pace. “The wounded stay in Longhai city to recuperate. Level eight martial artists, follow me to the drowned city to provide support.” At this time, a calm voice suddenly sounded. Everyone subconsciously looked at the entrance of Longhai City and saw Lu Pinghai, Lu Pingjiang, and Xiang Qiantou jump out of the car. Everyone was shocked. The president was here! With the arrival of a level nine martial artist, they had confidence! “The Salvation Society came here under the pretext of humanitarian aid, so they definitely didn’t really save people.” “This battle must be carried out!” “The great battle between us and the Salvation Society has begun.” Lu Pinghai took a deep breath and said in a clear voice. The staff of the construction department showed their determination. No one said a word of fear. In any case, the battle in the Dragon Mountain Range had already torn the skin off both sides. A great war would break out sooner or later. The only difference was the cause of the explosion. The drastic change in the drowning city was obviously the trigger for this great war. “But, chief Lu, we don’t have a boat.” Chu Pengcheng coughed lightly. The boats docked at the seaside were very small. They were used to transport the wounded before. The big ships were all docked at the drowning city. They couldn’t be used now. Lu Pinghai smiled and suddenly pointed to the north. “The ship is here.” Chu Pengcheng was stunned. Then, he thought of something and was overjoyed. In the next moment, another announcement sounded from the sea. “Members of the construction department, the Arctic army is here to provide support!” “Everyone, board the ship!” Lu Pinghai shouted and rushed out with Lu Pingjiang. The construction department’s officers were excited and immediately followed. Lin Xuan also reacted. That’s right. In the battle at the Dragon Mountain Range, two commanders of the Arctic army had died there. They were two level nine warriors! The Arctic army and the construction department hated the Salvation Society to the bone. Providing support was naturally normal. On the beach, a large ship was moored here. The rough design and cold steel were filled with the violent aesthetics of being big was good, and being strong was beautiful. This was the Arctic army’s usual style. This ship was a ship that had been in service with the Arctic Navy before the global digitization. After the construction division and the Arctic Army jointly optimized it, it was transformed into a new type of ship. Just like the defense towers designed by the Wanyou Gap, it could be driven by various energy sources. Only such a ship could adapt to the current environment. Most of the people boarded the ship, including Lin Xuan and Ji Ruyue. Lu Pinghai and Lu Pingjiang walked onto the ship and stood together with a muscular, hairy middle-aged man, talking about the situation. Lin Xuan guessed that he should be a rank nine warrior sent by the Arctic army. He should also be a commander. There were not many familiar faces on the ship. Lin Xuan looked around and could only see hall, Kodo, Chu Pengcheng, Li Weiguo, trident, Old Man Wu, and a few other familiar faces. Some of the rank eight warriors were still injured, but they still insisted on boarding the ship. For example, Li Weiguo was extremely stubborn. Previously, he only had one leg that was a prosthesis. Now, both of his legs were prosthetic. However, the prosthesis that Wan youxi personally designed was really not bad. Lin Xuan glanced at it and felt that Li Weiguo’s current combat strength was even stronger than before. Indeed, his flesh and blood were weak and his machinery had soared. “Young man, long time no see.” An elder came in front of Lin Xuan and said with a smile. Lin Xuan was slightly surprised. “Old Ivan?” Old Ivan laughed and said, “It’s me. Back then, your clone Poison Blade saved me from the Asura prison. I’ll always remember this favor.” Trident also strode over and laughed heartily. “Yes, you saved my teacher. I’ll always remember this favor. Later, when we reach drowning city, be careful and follow us. We’ll protect you.” Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. He nodded repeatedly. “Okay, okay, okay.” After exchanging a few pleasantries, old Ivan and Trident left. Lin Xuan saw that Ji Ruyue was already eager to try, so he hurriedly said, “You want to fly over? Don’t fly.” Ji Ruyue smiled. “Don’t worry. I’m not that stupid. If I fly over now, I’ll be exposed. I’ll definitely be discovered by that existence of the Salvation Society.” “I have half a Heavenly Dragon Soul Stone on me now. My Aura has been greatly concealed. As long as I don’t show myself, it won’t be able to discover me.” Lin Xuan nodded. At this moment, Lu Pinghai looked at the people on the deck and spoke slowly. “Currently, we have some information. The catastrophe in drowning city was not a natural disaster, but a man-made one. It was the result of the long-term ambush of various organizations in drowning city being detonated together.” “The sixth chief commander, Yuan Gang, a Tier 9 warrior who has been guarding drowning city for a long time, is missing “The second Chief Commander, Wan youxi, who went to drowning city to replace the defense tower a day ago, has not been heard from “The blazing sun array that drowning city used to defend against the monsters has not worked either “Therefore, we have three important tasks at the moment “Find Yuan Gang, find the ten thousand travel gaps, and reactivate the blazing sun array!” “Do you understand?” Lu Pinghai asked seriously. “Yes!” Everyone nodded in unison. The chief commander had given them the mission personally. With a target, they wouldn’t wander around aimlessly. “Blazing sun array?” Ji ruyue muttered, “Could it be the fire element part of our mountain gate array?” Lin Xuan stood beside her and was stunned. “You Know About It?” “I do. The mountain gate array of Kunlun Palace is very big. It can cover the entire Kunlun Palace.” “The mountain gate array can be divided into five parts: metal, wood, water, fire, and earth. Blazing sun array is the fire element part. I thought I couldn’t find it. I didn’t expect you to take it away and use it to suppress the monsters here. It’s quite smart.” Ji Ruyue covered her mouth and chuckled. “Then if you can find the blazing sun array, you can immediately activate it, right?”Lin Xuan said happily. The construction department staff in the drowning city must be in a state of being attacked from both sides. There were the drowning city monsters behind, and the Warriors of the Salvation Society in front. If the blazing sun array could be activated to suppress the Drowning City Monsters, the odds of winning would be much higher. “Of course, but why should I waste my time to activate the blazing sun array? My goal is the thing brought by the Salvation Society.”Ji Ruyue smiled slyly, “Why don’t I give you the method? I’m too lazy to do such a small thing.” Lin Xuan nodded. “Alright.” To Ji Ruyue, this was a small matter, but to the entire battle, it was a huge matter. Ji Ruyue casually flipped her hand, and more than ten chess pieces appeared in her hand. Then, she placed them on the deck. “This is the situation of the blazing sun grand array. Don’t look at the white and black pieces, but the white pieces are the core. The black pieces only guide the spiritual energy. You can guide the spiritual energy with anything you take. The only difference is the speed at which you guide it “If the Hei Zi in the inner circle is damaged, you can remove the Hei Zi in the outer circle to fill it “If the Hei Zi in the outer circle is damaged, you don’t have to worry about it. The power will only decrease a little “If the Hei Zi in the outer circle is damaged, it will be a little troublesome.” Ji Ruyue pondered for a moment. “You need...;” Lin Xuan was puzzled. “What do I need...;” Ji Ruyue coughed lightly. “Let me think about it. After all, more than a hundred years have passed. And as the Young Palace Master of Kunlun Palace, how can I be responsible for such trivial matters as repairing the mountain gate array? I usually cultivate.” Lin Xuan,”...;” “I remember now,”Ji Ruyue said seriously. “The purer the fire-type ore and the wood-type spiritual wood, the better.” Lin Xuan nodded. “I do have that. Do you think it’ll work?” There were plenty of such things in his space of consciousness. “It’s barely qualified. However, you can combine these things together to make them more useful.”Ji Ruyue’s eyes lit up, “And this sarira, you got it from the Heavenly Dragon Temple, right? It’s also of the fire attribute, and it’s very pure.” Lin Xuan nodded, and his heart calmed down. He thought for a while, then multitasked and summoned the giant Sun Dragon that he had placed in the dragon mountain range. “A level nine and level nine giant sun dragon should be able to make a great use of it. However, if it goes up against those wicked old men of the Salvation Society, I’m afraid it will die very soon. I have to find a good opportunity to let it in.” Lin Xuan’s expression was serious. When the Sun Dragon flew out of the light door of the secret realm, the entire dragon city was shocked. Some weaker warriors almost wet their pants on the spot. That sky-covering wingspan and incomparably powerful aura was enough to make any human soul below level nine lose control. The head commander was dealing with official business and had rushed out at this time. When he saw the Sun Dragon Rush out of the light door of the secret realm, he turned pale with fright. However, the Sun Dragon did not massacre the newly rebuilt dragon city as they had imagined. Instead, it flapped its dragon wings and suddenly rose into the sky, flying toward the southeast. The head regimental commander was stunned. All the warriors of the truth knights were also stunned. This sun dragon...; what was it trying to do? The head regimental commander rubbed his temples and said, “Nothing happened on our way to the southeast. Only the drowning city of the construction department had an accident. Could it be that the Sun Dragon went there?” “Forget it. It has nothing to do with us. It’s good that the giant Sun Dragon left. It’s like sending away a god of plagues.” The Giant Sun Dragon did not alarm too many people after it rose into the sky. The news did not spread too far. Those who heard the news felt that it was crazy. Monsters were all irrational and only knew how to destroy. They would definitely destroy the giant dragon city as soon as they rushed out of the light gate of the arcane realm. How could they rise into the sky and disappear. .. East China Sea. The ship was hurtling towards the island. “Almost there!” At this moment, someone suddenly shouted. Then they saw the outline of the island in front of them. The 10-meter-high light gate of the secret realm, of course, also came into view. Even from this distance, they could see the fierce fighting on the island and hear the earth-shaking shouting on the island. “I’ve been waiting for you for a long time.” The surface of the sea suddenly began to throb. Then, a figure emerged from the water and said calmly. Lu Pinghai took a closer look. It was an old man. There were large black spots on the old man’s face, and his expression was cold. Lu Pinghai’s heart sank. The large black spots were exactly the same as the old man they met in the giant dragon mountain range. Moreover, he also felt an extremely strong pressure from this old man. “Stay here.” The old man said calmly and suddenly reached out his hand to approach the ship. Lu Pingjiang had long seen how terrifying these old men were. He immediately shouted, “Don’t let him touch you. Speed up the ship!” After saying that, he quickly took out a long spear from his storage compartment and started to fight with the old man. However, he had learned his lesson in the dragon mountain range. He didn’t fight the old man in close combat. Instead, he fought at a safe distance to prevent the old man from getting close to the ship. Ji Ruyue said in a low voice, “There is a very interesting power in that man’s body. It should be from the ruler of the deep sea. If it is touched, it will immediately begin to age.” “Then how should we deal with it?”Lin Xuan’s heart tightened. “I can use my spiritual Qi to ignore this kind of damage, but you guys...; can’t resist it. After all, it is a power of a higher level.”Ji Ruyue shook her head. “It’s best to use long-range methods.” “Got it.” Lu Pingjiang fought with the old man to buy time. The ship landed successfully. The Warriors jumped off the ship and joined the battle. Meanwhile, the officers of the construction department on the island who were surrounded and fighting hard were refreshed. “Reinforcements are coming!” “Kill! Kill these foreign devils!” “I knew the organization wouldn’t abandon us!” The morale of the construction department was boosted, and they killed several people in a short time. Lu Pinghai looked around, but he didn’t see any rank nine warriors of the Salvation Society. “The tier 9 warriors of the Salvation Society must have entered the secret realm. Let’s go in too.” Xiang Qianyi nodded and immediately followed. Both of them entered the secret realm of drowning city. Only a tier 9 warrior could resist a tier 9 warrior. This was already an iron law, and very few people could overstep it. They had to find the tier 9 warriors of the Salvation Society as soon as possible and stop them. Only when both sides were defeated would the level 8 martial artist have a chance to show off. Lin Xuan immediately used his avatar and created the poison blade avatar, allowing him to put on his equipment and immediately participate in the battle. At the same time, his other avatars such as shield ghost, flame burst, milk brother, and the others also played corresponding roles in other places. Ji Ruyue grabbed him. “Let’s go in. That thing is inside. I want to compete with it.” She waved her hand and the warriors of the Salvation Army who were rushing at her were immediately blown away by the airwaves. A path was cleared between the two of them and the light door of the secret realm. With Ji Ruyue’s help, Lin Xuan easily rushed into the light door of the secret realm. The scene around him changed greatly, and he felt wet at his feet. Lin Xuan looked down and saw that there was salty and wet seawater at his feet, and there was an endless beach beside him. In front of him was a vast and boundless ocean! The city of drowning was located in this ocean. Half of it was above the sea, and the other half was below the sea. It was truly a city of drowning. At this moment, the beach was full of shouting and killing. There were corpses, blood, and flames everywhere. There were human corpses and the corpses of monsters. Lin Xuan also found that the corpses of some monsters were abnormally huge. It was likely that the sea monsters living in the depths of the ocean died accidentally and were washed ashore. “So it’s here...;” Ji Ruyue was stunned. “I’ve seen this sky and this ocean before, but it’s a little strange.” “You’ve seen it before?”Lin Xuan was stunned. “I’ve told you before. The country named Reed is a mortal country to the east of the Kunlun Palace and the Heavenly Dragon Temple. Further east of the country named Reed is an ocean called the endless sea. However, this arcane realm seems to have fused with some other strange things. I can’t Tell.” Ji Ruyue pondered for a moment. “However, I know the rules of the endless sea very well. Remember what I said.” “One, find the pink pearl on the beach as soon as possible. You can rely on it to breathe underwater and relieve the water pressure “Two, there are many terrifying sea beasts living in the endless sea. They are extremely sensitive to sound. If any sea beasts come near, don’t make a sound “Three, I’m going to look for that thing. Take care of yourself. But I think that with your strength, you won’t die here.” After Ji Ruyue finished speaking, she disappeared in an instant. Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. Drowning City underwater part. The rocks here have been soaked in seawater for countless years, the surface has a lot of corrosion. There are also a lot of conch, coral growth on it. In a dilapidated room. The stairs here collapsed from above, forming a natural shelter space. Tian yucai was curled up here, holding her broken left arm, not daring to make a sound. A layer of indistinct protective shield emitted from the bead on her waist, enveloping her aura. At this moment, there was still fear on her face. Because not far away, there were several construction department officers who died to protect her. The scene of these agents dying was extremely tragic. Large patches of black spots appeared on their skin, and in the blink of an eye, they withered. They died with extreme unwillingness and distortion. Because even the enemy could not be seen. Finally, when they died, a wisp of black gas floated out of their bodies. All the black gas gathered together, like small snakes. Their bodies meandered, swimming in the seawater. Soon, they left this place, looking for their next target. Tian yucai still did not dare to come out. She always remembered what Wan youxi had told her. Don’t think that the crisis has passed. The enemy was far more cunning than she had imagined. Time trickled by. Three minutes later, Tian Yucai’s pupils suddenly shrank. Because she saw that the python-like black gas had actually returned. It seemed to really have a life of its own, patrolling in this dilapidated room. After a period of fruitless searching, the black gas finally left. Tian yucai revealed a look of luck. Fortunately, she had always remembered Wan youxi’s instructions. If she had gone out just now, she would probably have ended up like those construction department agents who had died tragically. All the nutrients in her body would have become a part of the black gas. “Chief Wan was chased by the black gas and had no choice but to scatter and escape with me. I wonder how his situation is.” “But I...; How am I going to escape? Who Can Save Me?” Tian Yucai’s expression was miserable. She had only come to drown city to install a new type of defense tower, and was even just a helper for Wan youxi. She had actually encountered such a sudden major event. .. In the deeper part of the underwater part of Drown City. There were no longer any residential houses here. There were rough and ancient halls everywhere. The rocks that built the halls were ancient and huge. Each of them was more than two meters long and one meter tall. Moreover, they were a whole natural block! At this moment, Wan youxi was controlling the Rubik’s Cube to continue speeding up, trying to get rid of the pursuers behind him. It was an old man who was chasing after him. Just like the five and six that appeared in the dragon mountain range, there were large patches of black spots on his body. Moreover, his expression was terrifyingly calm. He looked just like a robot. At this moment, a large patch of skin on Wan youxi’s chest had already turned black. Moreover, the aging trend was irreparably spreading throughout his entire body. However, wan youxi had embedded a vitality runestone into the wound. This was a treasure that ye Lijiang had obtained in the Kunlun ruins. It could be used as a one-time consumable item. It could also be divided into multiple uses and could be used continuously. After a few discussions, Wan youxi finally handed over the vitality rune to carry around with him. Wan youxi’s offensive ability was strong, but his defensive ability was weak. Moreover, he was good at dealing with a large number of weaker enemies, but he was not good at dealing with a single strong enemy. In addition, Wan youxi was also a mechanism master in the construction division. Many of the defensive towers were designed by him, indirectly saving many people’s lives. This vitality rune could ensure his safety. The effect of the vitality rune stone was naturally to provide vitality. If Wan youxi was seriously injured and his HP dropped to 20% , the vitality rune would release all of its vitality for a short period of time, quickly healing his wounds and increasing his HP. Now, against this strange aging energy, the vitality contained in the vitality rune would naturally come in handy. “Wan youxi, you can choose to surrender. We need a talent like you.” The old man who was chasing closely behind said calmly. “Bah! If you want me to surrender, then wait another eight lifetimes!” Wan youxi cursed and continued to urge the energy in the Rubik’s Cube to speed up his escape. But he also knew that this kind of super fast speed wouldn’t last for long. The energy in the Rubik’s Cube was limited after all. Once the speed slowed down, it would be the time for him to be caught. “The only thing I can do is to drag it out until the reinforcements come to save me.” Wan youxi clenched his teeth. .. On the beach in the secret realm of drowning city. Before Lin Xuan could do anything, he was immediately targeted by a group of level eight warriors of the Salvation Society. “It’s Lin Xuan! The one who organized the Bounty!” “Kill Lin Xuan, and you’ll be personally groomed by the leader when you go back! Millions of essence! Tens of thousands of mystic realm pearls!” The warrior from the Salvation Society howled, and in an instant, a wolf-like green light flashed in the eyes of the surrounding warriors. They actually gave up on their opponents and surrounded Lin Xuan. “F * ck!” Lin Xuan cursed silently and turned to run. With his attributes, it was no problem for him to deal with three or four martial artists at the same time. But now, there weren’t three or four martial artists running over. There were f * cking thirty or forty of them! If you don’t run, you’ll be pushed down! HMM...; it seemed a little strange to say that he was pushed down. While Lin Xuan was running, the martial artists behind him released long-range skills. These skills almost all carried status effects such as deceleration, and were suitable for use when chasing. Skills of different colors rained down like raindrops. Lin Xuan tried his best to dodge some of them, but there were still many skills that landed on him. However, what shocked the warriors of the Salvation Army was that. Those speed-reducing skills landed on Lin Xuan’s body. Lin Xuan only paused for a moment, and his speed decreased for less than a millisecond before returning to normal. The entire process was almost negligible. Some of the Warriors of the Salvation Army even wondered if their eyes were playing tricks on them. Their skills actually didn’t hit at all. “Chase! Keep chasing!” “One or two decelerations can’t slow him down. Then Five, ten! I don’t believe he can still run!” Colt, the Level Eight Warrior of the Salvation Society, who was the leader, cursed angrily. “Yes!” The Warriors of the Salvation Society did not believe it anymore. They kept releasing long-range skills. Reality proved that, let alone five or ten deceleration skills. Even if 50 or 100 deceleration skills landed on Lin Xuan, most of them would be reduced by the negative status resistance brought about by his high constitution. These deceleration skills, the strongest effect can decelerate 90% , last 1 second. But when it landed on him, it slowed him by 90% , went straight to 10% , went from one second to one millisecond. Some of them quickly ran out of Mana, and even drank all the Mana potions they brought with them. Every single one of them had cast at least 20 deceleration skills from the moment they discovered Lin Xuan. “This won’t do...; I’ve run out of Mana...; I’m so tired, that guy can run too fast...;” A warrior struggled to squat down. He would die if his HP was exhausted. Although he would not die if his mana and energy were exhausted, there were serious side effects. He would feel dizzy and headache if his mana was exhausted. He would feel sore all over if his energy was exhausted. Moreover, if he exhausted his mana and energy many times in a short period of time, the side effects would deepen until he fainted! Soon, more and more warriors of the Salvation Army had side effects like him. Some of them had mild symptoms, while some were more serious. Colt looked forward, but Lin Xuan was still alive and kicking. He ran as fast as a wild horse. Colt gnashed his teeth. “Chase him! We Can’t Give Up! That’s Lin Xuan who asked all the level-nine warriors to jointly issue a reward!” Hearing the reward, the warriors of the Salvation Army regained their spirits and barely managed to stand up. Lin Xuan turned his head to glance at them and muttered, “What’s going on...; am I tired of chasing after me?” The situation changed very quickly. The people being chased were safe and sound, full of vigor and vitality. The pursuers were out of breath and could not wait to rest on the spot. After dragging it out for a while, Lin Xuan saw that it was about time. He immediately hid behind a rock and used his avatar skill to create a clone. In the blink of an eye, the clone put on the flame lord set and held the inferno codex in his hands. Colt was overjoyed. It seemed that Lin Xuan couldn’t hold on any longer! Even if he was an assassin, he couldn’t run far. As long as he could hold on long enough, the Salvation Society would still win. The next moment, Colt saw two people walking out from behind the rock. One was Lin Xuan, and the other was a mage. Colt did not have a high position in the Salvation Society, and he was arrogant. He was too lazy to understand too much information, so naturally, he did not know what flame burst looked like. While he was stunned for a moment, the inferno codex in Flame Burst’s hand had already burst into monstrous flames. Flame Burst! A ten-meter-wide flame burst descended from the sky and enveloped colt and the others! Colt’s pupils suddenly shrank. He could feel the threat of death from this flame skill. He didn’t have time to think. He immediately took out his life-saving trump card. As for the other fighters, many of them didn’t have as keen a sense of danger as he did. Some of them simply didn’t react and were still squatting on the ground, gasping for air. Boom! The flame blast landed and blew up the sand on the ground. There were also all kinds of broken limbs flying in the air. They were the limbs of the members of the Salvation Convention. When the flames had dissipated and the sand had fallen, the miserable members of the Salvation Convention were scattered all over the ground. These people were not instantly killed by the flame blast, but their HPS had dropped by more than 50% . Some of them had just advanced to tier 8 when they chose to join the battle. When faced with the flame blast, they had even lost 90% of their HPS. Fortunately, they all had life potions. One by one, they consumed them, afraid that they would be burned to death by the flames. Among these people, Colt was in the best condition. However, the yellow leaf on his body had also been destroyed. He had spent a lot of money to buy the yellow leaf from the dragon mountain range. It could withstand any attack from a tier 9 warrior or below, and it was gone just like that. “F * ck, when did that fire mage appear? !” Colt roared and was about to get up. The next moment, a cold blade was placed on his neck. Lin Xuan sneered. “Tell me, what is your mission?” These people were obviously a team, and their target was not him. Instead, they discovered him on the way and wanted to capture him alive to collect the reward. Lin Xuan really wanted to know what the ultimate goal of this team of thirty to forty people was. They did not join other battles on the beach, nor did they expand their advantage. “Attack him!” Colt roared. The Warriors of the Salvation Army looked at each other. “No Mana...;” “I don’t have the energy.” “I’ve even drunk all the Mana Potions. I can’t even use a single skill.” Colt wanted to cry but had no tears. It was all because he was determined to kill Lin Xuan that he ended up like this. “Tell me, what is the mission? I don’t want to ask a third time.” “I’ll kill you,”Lin Xuan said coldly. Colt gritted his teeth. “I’ll always be loyal to the Salvation Society. I Can’t possibly tell you a single word...;” Whoosh. A fireball suddenly flew out, enveloping the martial artist with the lowest HP. The latter’s entire body was scorched by the flames, and he started screaming crazily. The surrounding participants frantically tried to help, but they were unable to extinguish the fireball. In the end, the warrior’s voice weakened. With a plop, he fell to the ground without a sound. However, the air was filled with the delicious smell of roasted meat. “Run!” One of the participants suddenly screamed and turned around to run. He ran very fast. In the blink of an eye, he had dashed dozens of meters away. Lin Xuan’s flame burst avatar casually cast a flame burst spell. Boom! The flame burst spell covered an area of ten meters nearby. That person didn’t even have time to scream before he was burned into charcoal under the terrifying high temperature. The martial artists from the Salvation Society who survived were even more terrified. F * ck. It was the first time that we had seen a mage who used the flame burst spell as a fireball spell. This was too terrifying. “Loyal to the Salvation Society?” Lin Xuan said calmly. “If you don’t want to say it, the others should be very willing.” Colt gulped and finally laughed bitterly. “Our mission is to reinforce the blazing sun array and kill the construction department’s agents who are guarding there.” Lin Xuan was stunned. “Hasn’t the blazing sun array been destroyed?” Colt was helpless. “Someone attacked again and managed to restore a bit of the blazing sun array’s effect, restricting the monsters that rushed out of the sea.” “The agents of the construction department are very powerful and can not be destroyed. We Are there to provide support. After completing the support mission, we have to guard the light gate of the mystic realm so that the Takama Plains warriors can enter safely.” Lin Xuan was slightly happy. Finding Yuan gang, Wan youxi, and repairing the blazing sun array were the three tasks that Lu Pinghai had given them. Among them, the location of the blazing sun array was a secret. Usually, only a few construction department agents would know about it. Even Lu Pinghai and Lu Pingjiang, who did not often come to the drowning city mystic realm, did not know about it. Therefore, finding the exact location of the blazing sun array was the most important thing. Lin Xuan was having a headache. He did not expect that the martial artists of the Salvation Army would come to deliver a Shun Feng Express delivery. However, this person actually mentioned the martial artists of the Gaotian Plain, which made Lin Xuan’s heart sink. It was one thing for the Salvation Army to come, but there was actually the Gaotian plain participating in the battle. The pressure from the two large organizations had been suppressed at the same time, which was enough to make the construction department go all out. It seemed that the Salvation Society not only wanted to take over the drowning city arcane realm, but also wanted to use this opportunity to rebuild the construction division. With this, the Salvation Society would gain a huge advantage. If they had the support of Takama-ga-hara and other organizations, it would not be a problem for them to annex the construction division. When he thought of the evil deeds of the Salvation Society and Takama-ga-hara, Lin Xuan’s heart was filled with anger for no reason. All along, many people from the construction division had been guarding this place, pouring their blood and souls to stop the monsters that drowned the city. One could not return to their home, and one could not see their relatives. In the end, the Salvation Society made a bold move for their own benefit and caused a catastrophe! “Take me there.” Lin Xuan said in a low voice. Colt looked sad. “Can I Live?” Lin Xuan said to the others directly, “Whoever can take me to the specific location of the blazing sun array will be able to live.” As soon as he said that, the eyes of the warriors of the Salvation Army shone brightly, and they were about to stand up in the next moment. Colt turned pale with fright. “I’ll take you!” Lin Xuan smiled slightly. “Don’t worry. If you take me there, I’ll let you go.” Colt calmed down. He no longer had any trump cards. His life was in Lin Xuan’s hands. He had no choice but to trust Lin Xuan. “My friends will take care of your followers,”Lin Xuan said calmly. “Follow me.” Colt was helpless. He could only lead the way under Lin Xuan’s dominance. “Boss Colt, lead the way. We should be fine now, right?” “Why don’t we join forces and kill this mage professional! After all, he needs time to cast his skills.” The remaining warriors of the Salvation Army started to whisper among themselves. Moreover, they deliberately communicated in English so that the mage professional would not hear them. Lin Xuan heard their communication through his flame burst avatar and sneered. Anyway, he had no intention of letting these people live. “Look, there’s a mermaid with big tits!” The flame burst avatar suddenly pointed at the sea and shouted in English. Most of the Warriors of the Salvation Army were stunned and subconsciously looked over. Boom! The flame burst spell with a diameter of ten meters fell from the sky and enveloped all the warriors of the Salvation Army. These people were already at critical health and were instantly killed. However, there were also some people with tenacious vitality who barely survived. However, what made them despair was that another pyroblast landed! After four pyroblast washed the ground, pyroblast nodded in satisfaction and threw the items dropped by these people into the space of consciousness. On the other side, after killing people and scattering dust, Lin Xuan released his doppelganger. Moreover, because Lin Xuan had deliberately taken colt far away, he did not attack those people. In addition to the deafening shouts on the beach, Colt did not hear the explosions behind him. He knew that his life was in Lin Xuan’s hands, so he could only lead the way with trepidation, hoping that this kind of betrayal could exchange for his dog life. Colt led Lin Xuan to turn left and right, bypassing the Warriors and monsters that were fighting. Soon, the two of them arrived at a group of reefs, which had many caves. This was the natural habitat of the monsters. In the center of the group of reefs, there was a flat and huge open space. Strange patterns were carved on the open space. A large number of white chess pieces and black chess pieces were densely packed in it, as if following some kind of pattern. Lin Xuan was stunned. “It’s really like what Ji Ruyue demonstrated. Are They Chess Pieces?” At this moment, a fierce battle was going on here. More than ten construction department agents stood back to back in the inner circle, with more than thirty martial artists of the Salvation Army standing in front of them. There were two familiar faces among the construction department agents. Hall and Kodo. It was precisely because of them, together with the protection of the blazing sun great array, that the construction department agents were not all defeated. After all, the two of them were veteran tier 8 warriors and were very strong. It was not a problem for them to fight against four or five weaker tier 8 warriors at the same time. What was worse was that in front of the construction department’s agents were the attacks of the warriors of the Salvation Army, and behind them were the bloodthirsty monsters that surged out of the sea! Previously, the blazing sun array had been greatly destroyed, and the temperature of the drowning city had dropped drastically. The monsters were like wild dogs that were free to roam freely. Now, the inner ring of the blazing sun array had been repaired a little, and it was releasing some high temperature again, filling the air of the entire drowning city’s secret realm, forcing the monsters to retreat. Those monsters were not rational, but they knew that it was the blazing sun array that restricted their movements. Therefore, they wanted to attack the people standing inside the blazing sun array! Under the pincer attack of the Warriors of the Salvation Conference and the Monsters of the Drowning City, the construction department staff were in a huge crisis. They were all heavily injured, and some of their wounds even showed white bones. Under their feet, blood had accumulated into small puddles. But even so, they did not give in to the cold warriors of the Salvation Army and the Bloody Monsters of drowning city. They continued to fight. Even if they had to use up the last drop of their blood, they had to defend! Colt swallowed his saliva when he saw this scene. In his opinion, these construction department agents were too strange. It would have been fine if they had surrendered in such a situation. Why did they have to persist. Moreover, he also saw Hall and Kodo. Those two people were not agents of the construction department before. After they joined the construction department, they were actually assimilated by the construction department. Could it be that...; it was really as the higher-ups said, the higher-ups of the construction department could brainwash the lower-level warriors? Colt shivered. He could not imagine how miserable he would be after being brainwashed. wasn’t he just a puppet? He said in a low voice, “I brought you here. Can you fulfill your promise and let me go?” Lin Xuan did not say a word. The short sword directly pierced into his throat. Critical hit, wound critical hit, poison critical hit! The multiple critical hits stacked together, and the man’s HP was not 100% . At this moment, he was instantly killed by Lin Xuan’s sword. Colt’s eyes were filled with unwillingness. He wanted to speak, but all he could do was make a sound, because his windpipe had been cut off. He regretted it. Why did he choose to betray the organization and live a miserable life? If he had been more determined, he would not have led the way even if he died. At the very least, he would have died with a little dignity. Lin Xuan gently placed Colt’s body on the ground, not making a single sound. He pondered for a few seconds and casually wiped Colt’s face to get the facial information. Then, he used the avatar skill to create a clone and used a high-level disguise spell. Soon, the clone became Colt. Then, he quickly put on the clothes on the body. Lin Xuan did not rush forward recklessly. There were too many warriors of the Salvation Conference and the Monsters of the drowning city. Rushing forward recklessly was obviously the behavior of the iron-head doll. It would be strange if he did not die. However, Lin Xuan was very clear that as long as he could completely activate the blazing sun array, he could immediately expel the monsters in the drowning city. What he needed to do was to disguise his identity and quickly approach them. This strategy was very simple, but it was very effective. What the clone needed to do was to use colt’s identity to sneak into these warriors of the Salvation Army and approach the blazing sun array to secretly repair it. Once the repair was completed, the pressure on the construction department’s staff would be greatly reduced. “Hey Brother, I’m Coming!” The clone jumped out from behind the rock and shouted. “Oh, it’s colt. Just in time! Although these guys are few in number, they are very good at fighting. Look at their injuries, they are already so serious, but they still haven’t collapsed.” The small martial artist leaders who surrounded the construction department’s staff laughed and greeted him. In his opinion, colt was no different from usual, and he did not have any doubts. “Wait, where are the people you brought?”The leader was stunned. Colt showed a lingering fear. “They were ambushed by monsters and died. I barely survived...;” Most of the monsters in the Drowned City lived in the sea, but it did not mean that all the monsters were in the sea. Some monsters like to live in the sand and pretend to be ordinary. When unlucky pedestrians pass by, they are caught by their jaws, dragged into the sand and suffocated to death. Moreover, when the great array of blazing sun was operating at full power, the temperature of the drowning city was very high, forcing most of the monsters to hide in the sea and sand. But now, the great array of blazing sun had been destroyed a little, and the temperature had dropped to a level that the monsters could accept. Those monsters living in the sea would naturally climb onto the beach and attack the Warriors. The reason that Lin Xuan made up was very normal. The only doubt was that the others were too unlucky, while he was too lucky. Thirty to forty people died, and only he survived. The little leader let out a long sigh. “This is life...; It’s okay, it’s good that you can survive. Join the battle and kill these stubborn guys as soon as possible.” Colt nodded and said in a low voice, “Right, I have a way to completely destroy the blazing sun formation. Get them to cover me.” The little leader was overjoyed when he heard that and said in a low voice, “Good! Don’t worry, go ahead and destroy it! Your safety will be guaranteed by us!” Hall, Kodo, and the other construction department agents’hearts tightened. Facing so many enemies, they were already under great pressure. Now that there was a rather strong tier 8 martial artist, the pressure was even greater. The only good news was that the enemy’s reinforcements were only one person, not the dozens of people they had imagined. “We can still hold on! Wait! As long as our reinforcements come, we will be saved!” Hall used his light armor to block one person’s skill and roared. The construction department’s agents, whose bodies were already riddled with holes, forcefully braced themselves and tried their best to resist. Lin Xuan controlled colt and walked to the edge of the blazing sun great array. The small leader immediately assigned two warriors of the Salvation Army to protect him. The words Ji Ruyue had told him appeared in Lin Xuan’s mind. He did not need to care if the black spots on the outer ring were broken. If the black spots on the inner ring were broken, he could dig out the black spots on the outer ring to fill them up. If the white spots on the inner ring were broken, he could use the combination of fire-type ores and wood-type spirit wood to repair them. There was also the sarira that he had obtained from Little Spirit Mountain. It contained a large amount of fire energy and could be used as the core of a large array. “Lord Colt, it’s very difficult to destroy these chess pieces. Can you really do it?” The warrior on the left asked in a low voice. “Yes, our boss spent a lot of effort to smash one.” The warrior on the right also said suspiciously. Colt snorted. “You don’t believe me? Watch carefully!” The two laughed awkwardly and didn’t say anything else. Then they saw Colt take out a bright and sparkling ore from the storage compartment. Then he took out a small knife and scraped some from the ore. He quickly ground it into powder and sprinkled it on the edge of the Blackie. The next moment, a scene that shocked the two appeared. The Blackie actually loosened on its own. Colt casually took it out and easily took out the Blackie. “This...; What kind of magical ore is this?” “My God, Lord Colt, you actually have research on formations. I heard that this is something that only exists in the Kunlun ruins mystic realm of the construction department. It’s very mysterious.” The two warriors were stunned. Colt smiled confidently. “This is called the five elements complementing and restraining each other. You guys don’t understand.” This thing was very simple. The total energy of the blazing sun array was fire. But when it was refined to every chess piece, the energy contained in it was different. Wood made fire. If one wanted to display fire energy, one needed the help of wood energy. And if one wanted to have a huge amount of wood energy, one needed the nourishment of water energy. After that, water needed gold, gold needed earth, and earth needed fire. Thus, a five elements cycle was completed. However, the components of five types of energy needed to be carefully grasped. The final display was fire, while the rest were supplementary and could not overpower the host. In addition, one also needed to consider the five elements’mutual restraint and could not let the two opposing energies get too close. It was precisely because of this that the chess pieces of the blazing sun grand array were distributed so strangely that outsiders could only scratch their heads. Moreover, if the chess pieces were not sturdy enough, they could easily be destroyed by external objects. Therefore, this point had been taken into account in the design of the array. The more one wanted to break it with brute force, the harder it was to destroy. Lin Xuan used the orthodox method, which was also something she casually mentioned when she was with Ji Ruyue. The place where colt was standing just now was a chess piece that contained water energy. As long as the item that contained fire energy was sprinkled on the edge, it could be completely taken out by using fire to counter water. Compared to breaking it with brute force, it was much better. The small leader saw this scene from afar and was overjoyed. “Good, good, good! Colt really has some ability.” When Hall and Kodo saw this, their hearts thumped. This was bad. There was actually someone in the salvation society who knew very well about arrays. If this continued, the entire blazing sun great array would probably be torn to shreds. “We must kill him!” Kodo growled, “Let me do it!” After saying this, he consumed some of his HP and formed a poisonous bee, silently closing in on Colt. Lin Xuan had five senses, so he had naturally noticed Kodo’s actions. He did not know whether to laugh or cry. It’s me! It’s me! I’ve hit the wrong person! But the blazing sun array had not been completely repaired, so he could not be exposed. Colt pretended not to see the wasp and walked to the next chess piece. At this time, the Wasp was already approaching. Colt suddenly cried out, “It’s dangerous!” After saying that, he took a step back. The Wasp’s Stinger did not hit him, but hit...; The Warrior of the Salvation Army beside him. The warrior only felt a pain in his neck and immediately fell down. The leader was shocked. “F * ck! Go over and protect Colt! The enemy is making a move!” The Warriors of the Salvation Army panicked. Those who were close to colt immediately came closer. In their eyes, Colt’s methods were simply too awesome. He had easily done what their leader couldn’t. Of course, they had to protect such people. As long as colt was given enough time, he could easily destroy the blazing sun array. These construction department agents would naturally fall by themselves! Whoosh whoosh whoosh. In an instant, five or six martial artists of the Salvation Army appeared around Colt. They all wore serious expressions, as if they valued Colt’s life more than themselves. However, Lin Xuan knew very well. What these people really wanted to protect was not colt, but colt’s ability to easily dig out chess pieces. In the end, these people’s goal was still to completely destroy the blazing sun great array and kill Hall, Kodo, and the other construction department agents. Seeing that the poisonous wasps that he had used his HP to transform into did not work, Kodo immediately cursed inwardly. “That fellow has too many people protecting him. It’s very difficult to kill him,”he growled. “Even if it’s difficult, we have to kill him. With him around, it’ll be very difficult for us to rely on the blazing sun formation to hold on!” Hall also growled. The reason why they had been able to hold on until now was because of the high temperature emitted by the blazing sun formation. The high temperature emitted by the blazing sun formation caused the lifesaving meeting’s martial artists’hp to drop at every moment. If the blazing sun array was broken, they would lose without a doubt. Kodo gritted his teeth. “I’ll do it! If one poisonous bee can’t kill him, I don’t believe that even ten or twenty won’t be able to kill him!” He consumed 20% of his HP in one go and created twenty poisonous bees. These blood-formed poisonous bees flapped their scabbard wings at an extremely fast speed. They used extremely tricky angles to shuttle between the Lifesaving Convention’s members. In the blink of an eye, they had arrived next to colt. However, what shocked colt was this. Just as the wasps aimed at Colt’s back and launched their attacks together, Colt’s speed suddenly increased, and he hid behind a martial artist of the Salvation Convention. Through the resistance of the martial artist of the Salvation Convention, he was able to stay in a safe environment. And in order to protect him, the martial artist of the Salvation Convention had been stung by the wasps everywhere on his body. It would have been fine if the Bees had only hit other parts of his body. However, his HP had dropped drastically. However, there were a total of twenty poisonous bees attacking him at the same time. Naturally, they would not only hit his arms, thighs, buttocks, and other harmless parts of his body. Many of the attacks had directly hit vital parts, such as his throat! Bang! The martial artist of the Salvation Army, who colt had used as a human shield, spat out white foam from his mouth and fell to the ground on the spot. Although he wasn’t dead, he was still severely injured. His HP was reduced to around 8% . With such injuries and HP, it was obvious that he could no longer continue fighting. The small chieftain gritted his teeth. “Take him out and rest!” The martial artist that was fighting hurriedly sent out a person to drag this person out of the battlefield and to the side. “Protect Colt Well! Don’t let anything happen to him!”The small chieftain roared once again. At the same time, he brandished his weapon and rushed out to fight with Hall. Colt sneered. “Let’s see how long you can protect him!” After saying that, he did not hold back on his HP as he created another ten poisonous bees. This time, he had learned from experience. The poisonous bees he created were smaller and more crafty. Moreover, the previous poisonous bees needed to shoot out poisonous stingers. Now, they only needed to drill in to release the venom, causing a large amount of damage. As long as more than two poisonous bees hit colt, he could guarantee that he would be heavily injured! If three of them hit colt at the same time, he would definitely die. “The blazing sun array must be repaired. No one can interfere with our mission!” Kodo roared and controlled ten poisonous bees to fly over at an even faster speed. The little leader swung his weapon and smashed it fiercely at Kodo. However, Kodo was not afraid at all. He focused his attention on controlling the poisonous bees. He knew that someone would block it for him. Clang! The weapons collided with the armor. The leader retreated seven or eight steps. Hall gasped for breath, and the armor of light on his body shattered. “You’re really going to hand over the protection to me? Aren’t you worried that I won’t care about you?” Hall cursed. Kodo said, “Didn’t you say before that an evil person like me can not be killed by others? You must be the one to kill me.” Hall didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. These words were said when they were imprisoned in the Asura prison and had nothing better to do. At that time, Hall was still the vice-leader of the truth knights, and Kodo was also an expert of the Salvation Society whose code name was ‘Blood Devil’. The two of them had completely different perceptions, personalities, and actions. Hall’s sense of justice was overflowing, so it wasn’t strange for him to say those words. However, the two of them had stayed together in the Shura prison for so long. Later, because they were biased toward the construction division, they were expelled by their respective organizations, and they finally came together to fight together. The friendship between them had long been as strong as steel. “Damn it...;” The small leader cursed in his heart and could only look for another opportunity. Once again, Kodo controlled the poisonous bees to launch an attack on Colt. At this time, Colt had already dug out two more chess pieces from the ground. What shocked Kodo was that he actually failed this time! Just as the wasps were about to collide, Colt’s speed soared again, and he hid behind a martial artist of the Salvation Army. Crack. The martial artist’s face turned green, and he fell to the ground. He had to be dragged out by others to detoxify the poison. But colt was still intact and was already preparing to dig out the other pieces. “This guy...; What class is he?” Kodo gritted his teeth. Colt’s agility was far beyond his expectations. He could tell what class he was from the outside with just one glance. The armor-type class wore heavy armor, and their bodies were fat. Their weapons were mostly large shields, giant shields, and even tower shields. Mages wore long robes, and their armor was weak. Their weapons were mostly staffs or codex. Assassins wore light armor, and their weapons were short knives, daggers, short swords, and so on. Warriors wore medium armor, and their weapons were mostly long swords, battle axes, and so on. Some people even carried medium shields. The problem was that from the looks of it, Colt did not seem like an assassin. That was because he was wearing chain mail and had a broadsword slung across his waist. He was clearly a warrior class! Colt gritted his teeth. “You can dodge once or twice. I don’t believe you can dodge three or four times!” Colt’s eyes were bloodshot. He did not even care about his own HP. He had created a large number of poisonous bees to poison colt. However, each time, it wasn’t colt who fell. Instead, it was the martial artists protecting him. At the same time, more and more chess pieces were dug out by Colt. The more Kodo watched, the more anxious he became. The small leader...; also became more and more anxious. In order to protect Colt, as many as nine martial artists of the Salvation Army had fallen. Although these people hadn’t died, they had lost their combat power for a short period of time. There were only a total of 30 plus Salvation Army fighters surrounding the construction department officers. Now, almost one-third of them were gone. This meant that it was impossible to completely suppress the construction department officers. And for the construction department officers, it also meant that the pressure was greatly reduced! Hall became more and more courageous as the battle went on. He was like an invincible God of war. No one could surpass him by even an inch. At this moment, the leader suddenly noticed that colt was putting back some of the chess pieces that he had dug out. He was stunned for a moment and quickly asked, “Colt, what are you doing?” Colt replied, “I’m putting some of the chess pieces back in. It can hinder the energy transmission of the array. What you don’t understand in this aspect is also related to the five elements theory.” “Don’t worry. As long as I put back the chess pieces that should be put in, we won’t even need to use brute force. The entire blazing sun great array will collapse on itself.” The leader felt that something was wrong, but he couldn’t think of anything at the moment. He could only say, “Alright, we’ll support you with all our strength!” Hall and Kodo looked at each other. The blazing sun array could be destroyed like this? How did we not know. Lu Pinghai and Lu Pingjiang didn’t tell him that either. “However, that person seems to know the theory of the five elements...; since he said so, perhaps the blazing sun array can really be destroyed this way,”Hall said seriously. Kodo said, “I’m trying...; but I’ve already used 40% of my HP, and I haven’t hurt him yet!” Hall said,”...; this person is too slippery.” As time passed, Colt’s movements became faster like a dancer on the tip of a knife. In the end, the poisonous bees couldn’t even catch up to his speed. Kodo was exasperated. Since he couldn’t attack colt, he might as well let the poisonous bees attack the other warriors. After all, he had used up his HP in exchange for this. He couldn’t waste it. Many of the members of the Salvation Army were caught off guard and hit by these poisonous bees. Although they didn’t die or suffer serious injuries, the poisoned state still stuck to their bodies like maggots in the tarsal bone, continuously reducing their HP. In addition, the high temperature of the blazing sun formation reduced their HP. Even before the battle began, their HP had already decreased by 20% to 30% . This was a terrifying number, enough to cause fear in people’s hearts. “It’s about time...;” Colt muttered. The leader of the Salvation Society was getting more and more suspicious. When Colt had just started setting up, the temperature on the field had indeed dropped a lot. At one point, more and more monsters had appeared in the sea, attacking the construction department’s agents. However, as Colt placed more and more chess pieces, the temperature on the field had instead risen rapidly. The monsters could not stand the temperature and had to retreat. Their numbers had dropped from fifty to sixty at the beginning to more than a dozen now. If this continued, their numbers would probably drop to zero! One had to know that compared to the monsters in other secret realms, the monsters in drowning city were especially afraid of high temperatures and flames! “Colt, stop...;” The leader approached Colt and shouted. Colt laughed strangely and suddenly accelerated toward the agents of the construction department. At the same time, he shouted in Chinese, “I’m Lin Xuan!” Hall and Kodo were stunned and then overjoyed. In the next moment, under the shocked eyes of the leader and the others, Colt took out the sarira from the space of consciousness and smacked it toward the core of the blazing sun array! The sarira landed in the center of the blazing sun array. In an instant, it burst out with the brilliance of the Sun! The dazzling brilliance made everyone present unable to open their eyes. Meanwhile, the monsters that rushed out from the sea and were about to attack the construction department staff screamed in unison at this moment. Their skin was torn open and their muscles and bones were broken! They lived in the sea for a long time. Some monsters even lived in the sea that was 100 meters or 1,000 meters below. The living environment had always been low temperature and high pressure. Although their body structure was somewhat special, even if they went ashore, they would not explode from the inside out. But the high temperature was always their fatal weakness that they could not avoid. The blinding light and rolling heat waves that burst out from the sarira did not cause any harm to humans. But after the heat wave swept over, almost all the monsters were dead. The air was filled with the smell of roasted meat, and it was all seafood. The few remaining monsters that were barely alive all roared in fear and quickly dived back into the sea. After more than ten seconds, the blinding light slowly weakened. Only then did everyone see the situation around them. The little leader and the other warriors of the Salvation Army were shocked to find that the inner ring of the blazing sun array under their feet had already completely lit up. The little leader clearly remembered what the higher-ups had told him. Even if the outer ring could not be destroyed, the inner ring had to be destroyed first. Because the inner ring was the most important part of the blazing sun array, it provided almost 80% of the temperature and heat. “The blazing sun array...; the inner circle has been completely repaired? !” The small leader was shocked. Hall and Kodo were ecstatic. “Great! This is F * cking great!”Hall, who had always been calm and steady, was ecstatic. He couldn’t help but swear. Kodo was ecstatic. They had relied on the blazing sun array to hold on. Now that the inner circle of the blazing sun array had been completely repaired, they wouldn’t be affected by the high temperature standing in the array. However, the warriors of the Salvation Army outside the array would continue to lose blood because of the increasingly hot temperature. In addition, the monster of drowning city had also retreated. In order to protect Colt, the Warriors of the Salvation Army had seriously injured several people. As the situation changed, Kodo found that they had an advantage! The small leader also knew that they could not continue fighting. The mission given by the higher-ups should be completed, but they should also put their own lives first. He gritted his teeth and shouted, “Retreat!” The Warriors of the Salvation Army turned their heads dejectedly and prepared to retreat. Hall, Kodo, and the construction department staff all heaved a sigh of relief. After a long and intense battle, many of them had already exhausted their mana and energy points. Now that the enemy had retreated, they had lost their will to fight. They instantly relaxed, their bodies aching and powerless. They could no longer fight. The leader gritted his teeth. If they could take advantage of this opportunity to launch a surprise attack, they had a high chance of completely annihilating the enemy. However, he knew that they could no longer continue fighting. However, he also knew that the construction department’s agents could only watch them retreat and could not pursue them. However, just as they were about to run away, the small leader suddenly realized that the injured people were already dead! The small leader was stunned. What happened? ! “Did I let you go?” Lin Xuan’s faint voice came from behind the rock. In the next moment, the poison blade avatar rushed into the middle of the Salvation Army’s martial artists like a gust of wind. The sword flashed and blood splashed! Puff! Puff! Puff! In just a few seconds, the short sword pierced into the bodies of several martial artists of the Salvation Army. Several martial artists of the Salvation Army died on the spot. They fell to the ground unwillingly, their eyes still filled with disbelief. The reaction of the small leader was not considered slow. He subconsciously took out a huge shield to block in front of him. The short sword of the poison blade pierced into it, making a sound of metal colliding with metal. Both of them retreated at the same time. The small leader retreated five to six steps. The hand holding the huge shield even felt numb. He was even more stunned. He was an armored soldier. The main point was physique, while the secondary point was strength. Moreover, the huge shields such as the huge shield, huge shield, and tower shield all had additional strength. Unless the other party’s strength was much higher than his, or he was holding huge hammers, huge axes, huge swords, and other extremely huge and heavy weapons, it was almost impossible to shake him. But now, the other party was able to display the strength of a huge sword with just a short sword? ! The small leader’s eyes were wide open. Poison Blade, he was clearly just an assassin class! Lin Xuan also appeared from behind the rock, throwing a large HP potion at Hall, Kodo, and the other construction department agents from afar. Bang. The large HP potion crashed onto the ground, and the green vitality energy rose like smoke. The construction department’s agents recovered a lot of their HP on the spot. The recovery effect of this grand hp potion was comparable to a group Grand Recovery Spell. Hall and Kodo felt the changes in their wounds, and they looked excited. “Charge over and destroy them in one fell swoop!” The combat power of the poison blade doppelganger created by Lin Xuan’s skill was obvious to the construction department’s agents. One person was equivalent to four or five people. Moreover, Lin Xuan himself could use potions to participate in the battle. The addition of these two people was no less than a heart-strengthening needle to them! “Damn it! Damn it!” The small leader roared crazily and blocked continuously, but every time, he would take five or six steps back. Every time, his arm became more and more numb, and he could no longer hold the heavy shield. Dang! The poison blade found a flaw and struck out. The small leader’s shield was knocked away on the spot, and his chest was exposed in front of the poison blade. Seeing this opportunity, Kodo immediately used his HP to create a goshawk and flew over. Puchi. The goshawk’s sharp claws slashed across the small chieftain’s wound, bringing up a pool of poisonous blood. Poison Blade Burst! The short sword accurately and craftily pierced into the small chieftain’s throat. Critical hit! Critical hit on the wound! Poisoned critical hit! The little leader’s eyes were wide open, and he died on the spot! The Big Brother was dead, and the morale of the remaining warriors of the Salvation Army fell greatly. It was not long before they were killed by Hall and Kodo. “Phew...;” The construction department let out a long breath, and for a moment, they were in a bit of a daze. Originally, they were attacked from both front and back, and there was absolutely no chance of survival. In the end, Lin Xuan’s trick of disguising his identity and repairing the formation directly defeated the monster of drowning city in one move, and killed the warriors of the Salvation Army, turning the tables! Kodo laughed heartily. “Lin Xuan! You’re so awesome! If you hadn’t shouted, I would have sent your clone flying.” Hall scolded him with a smile. “You’re still talking. That colt is clearly Lin Xuan’s clone, but you kept attacking him with your skills. If it weren’t for you, Lin Xuan would have been able to repair the blazing sun array in advance.” The construction department staff at the side all laughed out of goodwill. Kodo said proudly, “Actually, I’ve already noticed it. That’s why I’m intentionally so angry. In fact, I’ve been attacking those World Salvation Army Warriors.” Hall said, “Really?” Kodo coughed lightly. “Really!” Everyone laughed again. Lin Xuan also laughed and dismissed two clones. “But, Lin Xuan, your clone’s skill is really awesome!” “At the critical moment, one person can be used as two or even three people.”Hall clicked his tongue in wonder. Kodo immediately said, “And, you can create two clones now? Is it because the quality of the skill has increased?” Just now, the Poison Blade clone and the Colt clone were obviously two clones. Lin Xuan rubbed his nose and could only nod. “Yes.” The two of them sighed again. Lin Xuan, this new wave, would probably wipe out the entire beach, not to mention killing the previous waves like them on the beach. “By the way, your method of repairing the array is so ingenious. Why is it different from what we know?”Hall said in puzzlement. “That woman taught it. She knows it very well.” Hall and Kodo nodded. “I see.” They had also seen the beautiful woman who came to Longhai City with Lin Xuan and entered the secret realm of drowning city together. Moreover, they felt that she was extraordinary at first glance. It didn’t seem strange that they knew the method of repairing the blazing sun array. “What are your plans next?”Lin Xuan asked. “The blazing sun array has been repaired. It’s time to go into the sea.”Kodo chuckled. Hall scratched his head. “But how are we supposed to move freely in the sea? I’ve never been to the drowning city, and I don’t know much about the situation. I really can’t figure it out.” “The Pink Pearl. If we put it in our mouths, we can move freely in the sea. Even if we’re in the sea ten thousand meters deep, we won’t be injured.”Lin Xuan nodded slightly, “However, the Pink Pearl is a consumable item. The deeper the place, the faster the consumption of the pink pearl will be.” The two of them came to a realization. “Let’s spread out and search. If we meet the construction department’s agents who are fighting with the warriors of the Salvation Army, we can also help them. We can’t rush this.”Lin Xuan smiled. “You’re right. Let’s spread out and search.” The construction department’s agents immediately split up and searched every corner of the beach. At the same time. Outside the secret realm of drowning city, on a nameless island in the East China Sea, the battle between two level nine martial artists was still going on. Lu Pinghai’s fierce battle with the old man had even caused a corner of the island to collapse, causing the seawater to flow backward. Lu Pinghai’s current condition was not good. Large black spots appeared on his arm. However, his physique was relatively high, so he could barely suppress the spread of the black spots. As a result, the black spots did not affect his combat power too much. However, his maximum HP had also been temporarily lowered. If he could not completely remove these black spots, his maximum HP would continue to decrease, perhaps even permanently. In comparison, the old man was barely injured. When Lu Pinghai’s sword light landed on his body, it felt as if it had landed on a hard steel plate. The blood that flowed out of the wound was not dark red, but a strange black-gray liquid. “Are you sure you don’t want to surrender? If you believe in the ruler of the deep sea, you will gain power far beyond your current level. Perhaps, you will be able to break through the limit of a level nine martial artist.” The old man said calmly as he chased after Lu Pinghai. Lu Pinghai sneered, “Then, you will turn into something neither human nor ghost like you?” The old man didn’t get angry. He just shook his head slightly and said, “Every level nine martial artist is precious. Only a level nine martial artist can bear the gift of the ruler of the deep sea. If you don’t want to believe, it’s okay. We can help you.” Lu Pinghai was alarmed. In the next moment, a blinding purple-black light shot over from the horizon. Lu Pinghai’s rich combat experience had helped him a lot. He moved his body forcefully, trying his best to avoid his heart, throat, and other vital parts. However, even so, the purplish-black light still hit his right arm. Bang! His Arm exploded with a loud bang, and the purplish-black energy raged wildly. “Ah!” Lu Pinghai screamed in pain and flew out, landing on a small hill on the Nameless Island. In less than three seconds, two figures appeared in front of him. One of them was the old man who had fought against him previously. The other person was the leader of the Gaotian Plains, Ying! Lu Pinghai gritted his teeth and endured the pain to cover the wound on his broken arm. “As the leader of a large organization, you don’t need to guard the headquarters. Can you just run around?” Long before they left, ye Lijiang had guessed that the salvation society would invite the Gaotian Plains, India, and the Truth Knights to participate in the battle. Among them, Takama-ga-hara had a high chance of joining the battle. However, Lu Pinghai didn’t expect that it would be Ying himself. Ying, a level nine martial artist. However, after using the Ghost Buddha’s lamp to escape in the dragon mountain range, his level had dropped by one level. Even so, his strength was on the same level as ye Lijiang’s. In the eyes of the leaders of the six major organizations, he was definitely one of the best. Lu Pinghai admitted that he was no match for him. If it was just an old man, Lu Pinghai could still move around and buy time. However, Ying’s sudden arrival almost sentenced him to death. The old man said, “You came at the right time.” Ying’s expression remained unchanged. The old man said, “Ying, are you willing to believe in the ruler of the deep sea?” Ying suddenly laughed. “If I can become stronger and maintain my self, I can believe in anyone.” “The ruler of the deep sea can do it, the god of truth can do it, and so can India’s King Jie Ri.” The old man frowned for the first time and did not continue this topic. “What does the Salvation Society plan to do? Kill Him?”Ying pulled out the purple-black tachi at his waist. The old man shook his head, “Capture him. We haven’t used a level 9 warrior for research.” Ying shrugged. “Alright then.” The old man reached out his hand and was about to grab Lu Pinghai’s shoulder. The next moment, a loud dragon’s roar came from the sky. The sound wave was almost tangible and resonated throughout the East Sea. On the Nameless Island, the martial artists who were fighting suddenly felt their hearts palpitate and stopped fighting. Three hundred nautical miles away from the Nameless Island, on a transport ship filled with takama-ga-hara martial artists, the Takama-ga-hara martial artists also showed fear. Dragon! This kind of monster only existed in the dragon mountain range. Could it be that a powerful dragon ran out of the Dragon Mountain Range and came all the way here? The old man stopped his actions and looked at the sky. When Ying heard this familiar Dragon’s roar, his expression changed slightly and he looked over as well. In the next moment, a hundred-meter-long dragon that was flickering with a dazzling light suddenly appeared in the clouds. The scales all over its body were shining brightly like a blazing sun! It was a level 9 Mystic Realm King, the Sun Dragon! Ying’s expression changed drastically. He recognized this Sun Dragon. It was the sun dragon that had risen from the dead in the Dragon Mountain Range! Back then, he had been chased by this sun dragon and had to use the ghost Buddha lamp to escape. He had even lost a level because of it, which made his heart ache even now. Now, this damn thing appeared again! “The truth knights...; didn’t do anything at all? !” The Shadow’s face twitched. The Sun Dragon rushed out of the dragon mountain range, but didn’t start a massacre in Dragon City. Instead, it went straight to drowning city in the East Sea? What the Hell Is This? I don’t understand! Roar! The Sun Dragon roared at the two of them again. The old man suddenly stretched out his palm, and the black spots on his palm surged. In the blink of an eye, they condensed into a large black shield and blocked in front of him. Ying laughed dryly. “Can you let me hide behind you?” The old man nodded. “Ally, yes.” Ying hurriedly hid behind the old man. In the next moment, the giant Sun Dragon suddenly spat out a blazing pillar of flame from its mouth. Boom! The flame collided with the dark shield. The red light and the black light interweaved and disappeared. The blinding light made the martial artists on the Nameless Island close their eyes. Lu Pinghai took the opportunity to flip over and fall into the sea. Crack. The flame was shattered. The Dark Shield was also shattered. The Sun Dragon flapped its wings and prepared to take off. After a while, it spat out the Sun’s breath again. However, the old man suddenly stretched out his other hand. Black spots appeared on his palm, and in the blink of an eye, they condensed into a black spear that was more than ten meters long and more than half a meter thick. It was dark and evil, surrounded by black light! The shadow glanced at the spear, and a great fear rose in his heart. This attack was definitely enough to heavily injure him! “Go!” The old man suddenly threw out the black light spear, and it left his hand. Lin Xuan, who was controlling the giant Sun Dragon, suddenly narrowed his eyes. He had never expected that the old man could immediately gather black spots to form a new attack after using the Black Light Shield just now. “These guys from the Salvation Society are really weird...;” Lin Xuan tried his best to control the giant Sun Dragon to dodge. However, the black light spear was fast and fierce. In the blink of an eye, it pierced through the air and appeared in front of the Giant Sun Dragon. Poof! The black light spear pierced through the giant Sun Dragon’s chest like it was piercing through tofu. Lin Xuan grunted. He felt the same pain, but the pain was much weaker. What was worse was that the black light spear suddenly disappeared and turned into black energy that rushed into the wound. Lin Xuan immediately felt an endless stream of aging energy plundering the giant Sun Dragon’s body. Wherever it passed, every cell, every piece of scale, every bone was aging at a speed visible to the naked eye. Clearly, the Sun Dragon was still in its peak state a moment ago. It was as bright as the sun in the sky. In the blink of an eye, the Sun Dragon was aging. Its scales were dim, its horns were shriveled and broken, and its whiskers were shattered like strips of paper. It was as if the blazing sun in the sky had turned into the setting sun in the west. When Ying saw this scene, his expression was solemn. This was not the first time he had seen such a method. However, every time he saw it, it would make him extremely vigilant. The Salvation Society did not know what exactly they had obtained from the Black Sea that was suppressed by the Angel Fortress. It was able to allow an unknown level 8 martial artist to possess such combat strength in one leap. Now, the Salvation Society had used such a terrifying ability to deal with the construction department and the Giant Sun Dragon. It was hard to guarantee that one day, it would not be used on him. Ying silently took half a step back, carefully observing the old man’s situation. In his mind, the old man’s body’s full appearance when he first saw him appeared. After a short comparison, Ying had some guesses in his heart. Black spots. After continuously using the black light shield and the black light spear, the black spots on the old man’s body decreased by a lot. Overall, it seemed that there was also a lot less strange aura. At the same time, the intense threat that Ying felt from the old man’s body seemed to have weakened by a lot at this moment. “Could it be that using power will consume the strange energy in my body?” Shadow was deep in thought. Roar! In the sky, the giant Sun Dragon let out a miserable cry and suddenly fell to the ground. Seeing that he had severely injured the giant Sun Dragon, the old man’s expression did not change. There was not the slightest bit of joy or happiness. It was as if he had just done a trivial thing. “This giant sun dragon has been resurrected from the dead. It has great research value. You can bring it back,”the old man suddenly said. Shadow nodded slightly. So far, there was no monster that could come back from the dead. If the research of this sun dragon could produce results, it would probably be subversive. However, when the Sun Dragon almost fell to the sea level and shadow thought that the Sun Dragon had almost lost all its ability to resist, the Sun Dragon suddenly raised its head and rushed over at the fastest speed. It was as if the Sun had suddenly returned. The distance between the two was not far. In the blink of an eye, the Sun Dragon was within 200 meters of the old man. This distance was enough. The Sun Dragon’s body suddenly emitted a blinding light. Between the dragon’s scales, the gaps between the flesh and blood suddenly shot out a dazzling light. It was as if some terrifying energy was crazily brewing and expanding in the Sun Dragon’s body, wanting to burn and destroy this world together. In the Drowning City’s secret realm, Lin Xuan, who had been controlling the giant Sun Dragon, had bloodshot eyes and spurted blood from his mouth. Even so, he did not retreat at all. Self-destruction! This was the ultimate move of the Giant Sun Dragon, and it was also the strongest attack that burned all of its vitality. Back then, this giant Sun Dragon that was personally killed by Gao Qianchi used self-destruction to heavily injure many rank nine warriors. “Even if I have to self-detonate, I will still kill you!” Lin Xuan felt as if he was facing that strange old man directly. Back then, he had personally witnessed the terror of these old men of the Salvation Society in the Giant Dragon Mountain Range. Even Ji Ruyue said that the aging energy they possessed was the bane of most close-combat martial artists. It was best to use long-range methods against the enemy. If the destruction of this giant Sun Dragon’s training clone could heavily injure or even kill this old man, it would definitely be an extremely valuable life-for-life exchange. The Shadow’s pupils suddenly shrank, and he immediately used his skill to escape as fast as he could. For the first time, the old man revealed a look of shock. This was a strange emotion that he had almost never experienced since he believed in the ruler of the deep sea. Because he could clearly feel that even if the Sun Dragon died, it would drag him down with it! But monsters would never be like this. Unless they knew that they were going to die, they would self-destruct. But the old man did not kill it, and still wanted to drag the Sun Dragon back to the Salvation Society to study it. The distance was only two hundred meters. He could no longer avoid it. The old man pushed his hands forward at the same time. The few remaining black spots on his body rushed towards his palms. Finally, they formed a black light shield. Several kilometers away, Ying saw the Black Light Shield and shook his head slightly. He could feel that compared to the Black Light Shield when he first faced the Sun’s breath, the current black light shield was much weaker and thinner. “He can’t block it.” “However, if they can both be injured or even die together, it’s also a good thing for me.” Ying sneered, “The drops from the ninth rank secret realm king and the secret of the Salvation Society’s Special Combat Power will all belong to me.” Boom! The next moment, a terrifying explosion sounded. The flame instantly shattered the weak black shield. The old man’s body was swallowed by the Endless Flame, but he was still standing in the flame. A large amount of seawater was instantly evaporated, and the Sun Dragon and the old man’s figures were obscured by the water vapor. What followed was a tsunami that was as high as 50 meters. With the explosion point as the center, it swept in all directions like a landslide. On the Nameless Island, the martial artists were shocked. They rushed to the rocks and other fixed objects, trying their best to stabilize their bodies. Splash. A large amount of seawater fell from the sky like a torrential downpour. One Man and one dragon, two broken bodies fell into the seawater. Ying immediately sped up. He soon saw the remains of the Sun Dragon and the old man at the bottom of the sea. There was no flesh and blood on the body of the Sun Dragon. The bones of its tail and limbs were also destroyed in the self-explosion, leaving only a 100-meter-long skeleton. The old man was almost the same. All the flesh and blood on his body were burnt to ashes in the terrifying self-explosion. His bones were even burnt to the point that they looked like glass. However, Ying did not see any drops around the remains of the Sun Dragon. “This...;” “At the very least, it should have dropped the materials for advancing through battles.” Ying’s expression was stunned. He was unwilling to give up. He searched again, but there was still nothing. Ying could only shift his gaze to the old man. “There are even black spots on the bones...;” Ying saw the situation clearly and felt a chill. He took out an ice box that was emitting a dense chill and placed a half-black and half-white arm bone in it. When he looked back at the giant Sun Dragon’s bones, the latter had already become extremely fragile under the effects of the aging energy. With just a gentle push of the waves, the remaining bones of the sun dragon were broken into countless small pieces and completely disappeared into the vast waves of the eastern sea. Ying shook his head gently and pondered for a moment. Then, he flew straight toward the light door of the secret realm and soon entered it. Not long after, the surface of the sea churned. Lu Pinghai held his breath under the sea for a long time. When he sensed that the threat had disappeared, he revealed his head. “This sun dragon that came back from the dead is too strange.” “When it was in the dragon mountain range, it chased after shadow, chased after the Pope and the Cardinal, killed a girl, heavily injured Jack, and now even died together with the old man from the Salvation Society...; Everything seems to be beneficial to our construction department.” Lu Pinghai shook his head and felt a headache coming on. No matter what, he could not understand why this sun dragon would help the construction department. Could it be that it was also an employee of the construction department? Lu Pinghai did not know whether to laugh or cry as this strange idea appeared in his mind. He quickly dismissed it. “The most important thing now is to find Yuan Gang and Wan youxi and save them as soon as possible.” After the old man died, the aging energy lingering around his wound also disappeared. Only then did he take out a bottle of super-life potion to recover from his injury as soon as possible. In the secret realm of drowning city. Lin Xuan panted heavily and spat out several mouthfuls of blood before he gradually recovered. Controlling the giant Sun Dragon to self-destruct, he could almost feel the pain. Even if the pain was weakened, it was almost like it exploded from the inside out, like a blown-up balloon. However, when he saw Ying’s greedy look while searching for the dropped items of the giant Sun Dragon, he could not help but laugh in misery. The sundragon had actually died a long time ago. The loot had fallen once in the dragon mountain range. Now that it had come back to life, it was impossible for it to fall again. “The Salvation Society should not be able to mass-produce that kind of strange old man. Otherwise, this earth would have been their world long ago.” “Killing one more would be my gain.” Lin Xuan smiled. He did not care about the loss of the sundragon. After drowning the city, it should not be difficult to find such a corpse. With a little patience and luck, finding the corpse of a Tier 9 monster should not be a problem. “It’s time to continue searching for the Pink Pearl.” Thanks to his super high vitality, his HP quickly recovered to its peak. Lin Xuan stood up and was about to walk out of the hiding place. At this time, the leader of the Gaotian Plains, Ying, suddenly passed through the gate of light of the secret realm and flew into the drowning city. He did not pay attention to the warriors fighting on the beach. He only had eyes for level nine warriors. Level eight warriors could be destroyed easily, so he naturally did not care. The shadow flew straight towards the drowning city and then disappeared into it. Only when the shadow’s figure completely disappeared did Lin Xuan cautiously walk out of his hiding place. After all, the other party was a peak level nine martial artist. If the other party really had the intention to kill him, there really would be nowhere to run. The appearance of the shadow also attracted the attention of other martial artists. Hall, Kodo, Li Weiguo, and other construction department agents, as well as trident, Old Ivan, and the Arctic army were all very shocked. Since the leader of the Takama-ga-hara was here, it meant that many Takama-ga-hara warriors would be swarming in. The morale of the Warriors of the Salvation Army soared. Reinforcements were coming! Lin Xuan continued to look for the pink pearl. He had never seen this thing before. Presumably, it should be the pearl that was emitting pink light. If he really wanted to find it, it should not be difficult to find it. Moreover, this thing was a consumable. Every warrior who went deep into the drowning city would need to use it, so the number would not be too small. As expected, after he helped a construction department officer kill two martial artists of the Salvation Army, he saw a shell on the beach that was emitting a strange light. With one look, he knew that it was not ordinary. Lin Xuan ran over and opened it. There was indeed another pink pearl the size of a pinky finger with some impurities in it. Lin Xuan washed the Pearl, put it in his mouth, and tried to bury his head in the sea water. He opened his eyes, opened his nostrils, and opened his mouth. To his surprise, he found that he could see clearly under the water, and he could breathe and speak freely. However, the sound of speaking in the water was much weirder than in the air. “This pink pearl doesn’t look good, and there are a lot of impurities. It must be able to hold underwater for a very short time. I have to find more, otherwise, if I am underwater and use up the Pink Pearl, it will be no different from death.” Lin Xuan continued to look for the pink pearl. He would also help those construction department agents who were fighting for themselves. “How is it? How’s the search going?”An hour later, Lin Xuan met up with Hall, Kodo, and the others again. Hall and Kodo smiled bitterly. “We only found 16 in total. It’s not enough for no one to get one. What About You?” “Five.”Lin Xuan also gave a wry smile. Hall continued, “I just met an old brother who fought in drowning city for three years. He said that a pink pearl the size of a thumb with less impurities can move freely at a depth of 300 meters for about an hour.” Lin Xuan nodded. “That’s not bad. It took a lot longer than I expected.” At this time, old Ivan walked over. “Our Arctic army seems to have found a good place. It’s under the reefs in the east. There are many shells there, almost all emitting pink light.” Lin Xuan’s eyes lit up. “However, there are still many corpses of monsters there. I’m afraid that danger lurks everywhere,”old Ivan said seriously. “What are you afraid of? We have so many level-eight and level-nine experts gathered together. Are you afraid of the corpses of Monsters?”Kodo smiled proudly and asked casually, “What are the corpses of Monsters?” Old Ivan glanced at him and said calmly, “Tier 9 monsters.” Kodo,”...;” “I think we should be more cautious.” Hall couldn’t hold it in and laughed out loud on the spot. The surrounding air was once again filled with joy. If a Tier 9 monster died there, it meant that there was a more powerful monster that could kill a Tier 9 monster. Going there was no different from courting death. “Let’s go somewhere else and keep looking.”Trident smiled helplessly. The crowd dispersed again. Lin Xuan was deep in thought, but he rushed straight to that place. The corpse of a Tier 9 monster represented great danger. But to him, it was not danger, but opportunity! “Possessing the corpse of that Tier 9 monster as a training clone, not only did I obtain a powerful instant combat strength, but I also allowed it to obtain pink pearls there. Great Benefits.” Lin Xuan smiled happily. He followed the direction that old Ivan had told him to go. As expected, not long after, he saw a group of reefs. There were many reefs like this in the secret realm of drowning city. Almost all of them were inhabited by a large number of monsters. Lin Xuan did not approach rashly. Instead, he let Poison Blade’s clone scout ahead. Under the buffs of various skills and equipment, poison blade advanced close to the shadows. His sense of presence was almost zero. He was most suitable for this kind of scouting work. Through Poison Blade’s eyes, he saw the huge shells that were emitting a pink light under the water. Each of those shells was as big as a washbasin! And within these shells, there were a large number of corpses. Many of them had already turned into white bones. There was not a single trace of flesh and blood left. And among these white bones and corpses, there were three huge corpses. Even if they were dead, they still emitted an aura that made the weak tremble. It was obviously the tier 9 monster’s corpse that old Ivan had mentioned. Among the three huge corpses, two of them had almost no flesh and even some of their bones had been eaten. However, many small shells were still parasitic on the two ghastly white bones. The soft flesh in the shells stretched out and licked the remaining flesh on the white bones. As for the third huge corpse, it was still intact. There were not many small shells on the parasitic corpses. Lin Xuan felt a chill in his heart. It turned out that these pink shells grew by devouring flesh and blood. No wonder there were so many pink shells here. Because there were so many corpses here for them to eat! At this moment, when he shifted his gaze to the Three Corpses, a voice sounded in his mind. [ large number of dead targets detected, analyzing...; ] [ most of the targets have lost most of their flesh and bones. They are unable to possess and become training clones. ] [ some of the targets can be possessed. The target information is as follows: ] [ fish, Tier 8, level 2 monster. Attributes: ...; ] [ flatfish, Tier 7, level 3 monster. Attributes: ...; ] [ ...; ] [ armored snapping turtle, Tier 9, Level 1 monster. Attributes: Vitality 615, strength 513, agility 315, Spirit 100. Skills: Armor, rapid swimming, playing dead. Cause of death: poisoning. ] Lin Xuan was stunned after reading the information. The cause of death was all poison? The poison that could kill a Tier 9 monster was probably not ordinary poison. But how could those pink shells be fine? Lin Xuan Thought for a while and decided to let poison blade explore the way first. As a precaution, he let poison blade take off all his equipment and put them into the space of his consciousness. He only wore very ordinary tier 1 equipment. This way, he wouldn’t feel any heartache even if he died. Poison Blade entered the group of reefs one step at a time. One step, five steps, twenty steps.. When Poison Blade’s feet touched the seawater, his feet suddenly felt a stabbing pain. Then, in less than a second, his feet lost consciousness. Then, below the knees, below the waist, his entire body finally lost consciousness. He directly collapsed into the seawater. The pink shells felt the waves of the sea and slowly wriggled over, beginning to parasitize. Lin Xuan casually dismissed the clones, leaving only a few pieces of Tier 1 equipment in the sea. He frowned even more. Through the probing of the poison blade, he already knew what kind of poison it was. This poison was called the heart-burning poison, different from any other poison Lin Xuan had seen before. Ordinary poisons would almost always reduce blood in the form of numbers. After a period of time, they would disappear on their own. Even the more powerful poisons such as Poison, putrefaction, neurotoxin, and so on would at most increase the amount of blood loss or reduce blood in the form of percentage. However, this heart-burning poison was different. It was actually related to level and attributes. The higher the level, the stronger the attributes, and the more terrifying the heart burning poison was. In addition, the heart burning poison also had a paralyzing effect. Just now, the poison blade had only taken 1 minute and 5 Seconds to die from contact with the seawater. Moreover, this was under the premise that the poison blade had also inherited the attributes of his main body, with an extremely high vitality and an extremely high hp recovery rate! In other words, the damage that the heart burning poison dealt to his main body was almost the same. “No wonder a level nine monster would die here. This poison is indeed extraordinary.” Lin Xuan also thought of something deeper. He might be able to use the burning heart poison in this area to create a natural trap. Because even a level nine warrior might die if he fell into it! “I’ll remember this place. If I’m hunted down in the future, I might be able to use it.” After thinking about this, Lin Xuan began to think about how he should go in. After all, even if he wanted to possess the armored snapping turtle’s body as a clone, he had to come into contact with it personally. “There’s plenty of time. Why don’t I just study this poison on the spot and research the antidote first.” Lin Xuan summoned the poison blade again and let him take a container close to the sea water. He carefully scooped up a bottle of sea water and brought it back. Lin Xuan found a safe place and began to study it. He studied it for a few days. After all, this was the heart-burning poison that could kill even tier 9 monsters. If he could find an antidote so easily, it would be too unworthy of its name. But Lin Xuan was not alone. He had five clones! Lin Xuan put part of the seawater into the space of consciousness and passed it to the other clones. As Ye Yuqiu and the other tier 7 warriors were still exploring Kunlun ruins, shield ghost, flame burst, cold domain, and brother milk were still at tier 7, therefore, they didn’t participate in the Battle of Drowning City. Instead, they stayed in long hai city to participate in healing, defense, and other tasks. However, this also happened to give Lin Xuan a lot of room to operate. The main body and the five clones studied at the same time, and finally, on the fourth day, they thoroughly studied the heart burning poison. Thus, Lin Xuan obtained detailed information about it. —— Name: Heart Burning Poison Level: Tier 9, Level 1 Quality: Golden Effect 1: when the poison comes into contact with any living creature, it will cause a paralyzing effect. Effect 2: the damage caused by the poison is related to the target’s level and total attributes. The maximum damage is 10% of the target’s HP per second. The duration is 10 seconds. —— Looking at this 10% of the target’s HP per second, Lin Xuan was a little dumbfounded. What the hell? Is this poison? It was like a death solution, the kind that would kill you if you drank it. As long as you touched the heart-burning poison, you would be paralyzed. If you were paralyzed and couldn’t leave the range of the poison, you would continuously reduce your HP without any time limit. Even if you had HP Recovery and Life Potions, you wouldn’t last more than two minutes. The antidote is ready. I should try using my doppelganger first Lin Xuan took out a bottle of heart-burning poison antidote from his space of consciousness and handed it to poison blade. After Poison Blade’s test, the antidote could suppress the effects of heart-burning poison by 70% . Not only would he lose hp continuously, but he would also be paralyzed. Similarly, he could reduce the effects of heart-burning poison by 70% . Coupled with his HP recovery speed, he could easily take out some pink pearls after walking around in the sea. At worst, he could just take out a few and enter later. Using this method, Lin Xuan quickly took out all the pearls from the pink shells. He also dragged out the armored snapping turtle’s corpse and possessed it as his training avatar. With a level nine monster as his bodyguard, Lin Xuan’s confidence was greatly increased, and his sense of security was also greatly increased. Even if he encountered a level nine warrior from an enemy force, he could also throw away his car to protect himself, leave the armored snapping turtle behind to stop him, and escape on his own. “It’s almost time...;” Lin Xuan smiled slightly and was about to meet up with the other officers of the construction department. At this time, he suddenly felt a muffled buzzing sound coming from under his feet. It was as if a violent explosion had occurred deep underground. The sea water was turbulent, so he could feel the tremors on the ground. “F * ck...; it can’t be the same situation as the dragon mountain range, right?” Lin Xuan was stunned. Wasn’t the dragon mountain range the same time? Because of the appearance of the second giant Sun Dragon, the surface of the mystic realm collapsed, and many warriors fell into the underground world inexplicably. Then, Lin Xuan suddenly noticed a white mark on the distant horizon. Taking a closer look, it wasn’t a white mark, but a huge wave! “To be able to see a wave five centimeters high from this distance, how high is that tsunami? !” Lin Xuan was shocked. A hundred-meter-high tsunami! It might be more than that! Not only him, but the other warriors on the beach also noticed this terrifying tsunami. The construction department’s agents and the Warriors of the Salvation Army stopped fighting one after another. Everyone knew that fighting under such circumstances was purely courting death. All the warriors subconsciously rushed to the nearest rocks and trees. In fact, logically speaking, when the tsunami occurred, they should have escaped to the nearby highlands as soon as possible to avoid the seawater. But this was a secret realm, not the outside world. The beach here was very flat. Other than a few coconut groves and reefs, there was no highlands. And many people were far away from the secret realm’s light gate. Running straight over was obviously not a good way to escape. The only way was to cling tightly to the fixed object and pray that the boundless power of the seawater would not wash them away. It should be known that many people on the beach had almost not found many pink pearls. The staff of the construction department were still fine. They searched first under Lin Xuan’s suggestion. The Warriors of the Salvation Army were in trouble. They were fighting all the time. Some people did not even know what pink pearls were. Under such circumstances, being sucked into the sea and falling into the sea was almost equivalent to death. In the sea, human warriors lacked a point of force. It was difficult for them to use all kinds of methods. Moreover, the most terrifying fire skill of the drowning city monster was almost impossible to use remotely in the sea. Once it entered the sea, the drowning city monster was a hunter, and humans were the prey! Boom! A terrifying wave surged over. The wave that was more than a hundred meters tall gave people the feeling that it didn’t even seem like it rose from the sea, but more like it fell from the sky. It was as if there was a supreme God standing on the clouds, pouring down the Milky Way in the sky toward the human world. The turbulent waves submerged everything, scouring everything! The force brought by the 100-meter wave far exceeded the limit that any warrior could resist. Even the level eight warrior Li Weiguo, who was known for his strength, was only able to hold on for more than a minute before he was swept away by the huge wave. Hall, Kodo, and the others were the same. In the blink of an eye, there was no sound. They disappeared into the huge wave, and no one knew where they were swept away. Lin Xuan’s strength had already surpassed most level eight warriors, but even so, he was still swept away by the huge waves after only three minutes. The turbulent water carried him everywhere. Lin Xuan only felt that the world was spinning, and he couldn’t see anything clearly. If it were any other warrior, they would have vomited and fainted by now. However, Lin Xuan relied on his super high physique and did not faint. At the same time. The transport ship that carried more than 100 Takama-ga-hara warriors arrived at the Nameless Island. They were all at level eight, and none of them were lower than level eight. Under the leadership of the leader, the Takama-ga-hara warriors split into two teams. One team stayed on the Nameless Island to fight against the agents of the construction department, while the other team passed through the Secret Realm’s light gate and entered the drowning city. “I heard that the water in the drowning city’s secret realm is very deep. If we want to move underwater, we need something special.” “Yes, I think it’s called the Pink Pearl.” “Why didn’t the organization give us the Pink Pearl? What if we also want to go underwater?” “We can look for them when the time comes. The first place we have to fight is the secret realm’s beach. It’s not submerged by the sea.” “That’s true.” The Takama-ga-hara warriors whispered to each other and lined up to enter the secret realm’s light door. Then.. They saw a vast ocean! The Takama-ga-hara warriors were dumbfounded. What about the beach? What about the huge beach mentioned in the information? ! “Leader, so how are we going to fight on the beach?” All the Takama-ga-hara warriors floated on the surface of the water and asked seriously. The leader was also speechless. “How...; how the F * CK Would I know?” .. At this moment, the seawater carried Lin Xuan deeper into the sea. Lin Xuan barely took out a pink pearl from the storage compartment and put it in his mouth. At this moment, he felt as if he was slowly merging into the underwater world. As the depth increased, the power from the seawater became much weaker. After drifting for a while, Lin Xuan felt that he had completely gotten rid of the power of the seawater and could move freely underwater. He stretched his limbs, moved his facial features, and nodded in satisfaction. With the pink pearls in his mouth, he could move freely underwater. Fortunately, he had accumulated a large number of pink pearls in advance. Otherwise, he would have been blinded by the sudden 100-meter tsunami. “There are a total of 107 pink pearls on my body. They are of different sizes and have different impurities. However, they should be enough to support me to be active underwater for a long time.” Lin Xuan looked at the situation around him seriously. There was seawater up, down, left, right, front, and back. It was ice-cold seawater. Looking down, the seawater was even deeper, as if a terrifying and huge sea beast was about to jump out at the next moment. For some warriors who had deep-sea phobia, appearing in such an environment was even more terrifying than death. Lin Xuan also felt the pressure, but he was not particularly afraid. “There’s almost no reference...; I should go back to the surface and see what’s going on.” Lin Xuan swam to the top of his head. The light gradually enveloped him. About five minutes later, he arrived at the surface of the sea. Fresh and salty air rushed into his nose and lungs, making Lin Xuan feel like he was reborn. He looked around and finally saw something familiar. To the south of him, there was a small dot. Upon closer inspection, it was a group of reefs on the beach. That small dot was the highest reef that was exposed to the surface of the water. “That is the location of the blazing sun array.” “Then, if I remember correctly, that direction is where the heart-burning poison congregates.” Lin Xuan looked to the southeast. The seawater there was filled with the heart-burning poison. It was a place worth using. After confirming the reference object, Lin Xuan immediately swam towards the Drowned City Lord’s building. Not long after, he saw the first corpse. The surface of the corpse was already too horrible to look at. Half of the head had been bitten off, and the left arm and right leg had been bitten off. Judging from the clothes, it was an employee of the construction department. Lin Xuan sighed softly. Since the person was dead, there was nothing he could do. He walked away from the warrior’s body. However, when he was dozens of nautical miles away, the warrior’s body that seemed to be dead suddenly twitched. Soon, his eyes turned completely white, and his facial features were extremely distorted, as if he was a resurrected corpse. His nostrils twitched violently, as if he had smelled the bloody smell in the sea, and he immediately swam in that direction. His speed was even faster than the monsters in the drowning city. Not long after, screams came from the other side. The same situation was happening everywhere in the drowning city. Meanwhile, Lin Xuan suddenly heard two voices in his mind. [ Drowning City News: The Drowning City and the Black Sea are connected, and the seawater is rising. All dead creatures can be turned into drowned corpses. Drowned corpses and zombies have a chance to be resurrected after death. However, the more resurrections there are, the lower the probability is until they are completely dead. ] [ drowning city news: affected by the connection between the two secret realms and the surging energy, the origin of the secret realms is being nurtured at the place where the drowning city and the Black Sea are connected. It is estimated that it will take another 19 days and 11 hours to be born. ] After hearing the first news, Lin Xuan was shocked. After hearing the second news, he was overjoyed. Good news and bad news. “All dead creatures can be turned into drowned corpses...; I remember there are many zombies in the drowning city. These two should be the same type of monsters.” Lin Xuan immediately became more cautious. If he encountered corpses in the future, he must be vigilant. There might be a drowned corpse jumping out of it. As for the origin of the arcane realm, needless to say, it was definitely a good thing! The incarnation of the body, the secret of the Kunlun Palace. The five senses connecting to the sky, the secret of the Heavenly Dragon Temple. Lin Xuan really wanted to know, if he obtained the origin of the secret realm of the drowned city and improved the quality of a certain skill, what kind of heaven-defying skill would he obtain in the end. “In addition, it’s this Black Sea.” “Black Sea, which mystical realm is it from? The construction division shouldn’t have such a mystical realm. I’ve never heard of any mystical realm containing the Black Sea.” “It might be a mystical realm controlled by another organization, or it might even be an unknown mystical realm that hasn’t been controlled by any organization yet.” Lin Xuan also noticed the “Black Sea”in the message and immediately began to speculate. Right now, most of the secret realms on Earth were under the control of the organizations. Especially the super large secret realms, which were all controlled by large organizations. Small and medium-sized organizations could only compete for secret realms of level 6 and below. However, the light doors of new secret realms would suddenly appear every once in a while. No one knew if there would be an unknown secret realm in some remote places. This was also one of Lin Xuan’s guesses. “There are still 19 days until the origin of the mystic realm is fully matured. There is still plenty of time. What I should do now is to enter the drowning city Lord’s Building.” Lin Xuan compared the previous reference object and immediately swam in the direction of the drowning city. .. On the Nameless Island in the East China Sea, a figure flew over from the sky and slowly landed on the island. His body emitted a powerful aura that made the rank eight martial artists subconsciously retreat. The person who came was a middle-aged man with an ordinary face and a well-proportioned figure. However, his temples were already gray. “Lord Tianyu!” More than a hundred takama-ga-hara martial artists who came here through the transport ship, more than 20 of them stayed on the nameless island to help the martial artists of the Salvation Assembly fight against the construction department’s staff. When they saw the middle-aged man, they immediately nodded and bowed. The Sky Feather Craftsman did not pay attention to them, but walked straight to the secret realm’s light door. “Cai, father came to look for you, I really miss you...;” The Sky Feather Craftsman did not look like a level nine martial artist now, not like the deputy chief of the Takama-ga-hara who was above everyone under the shadow. Instead, he looked like a sad father who had lost his soul and lost his daughter. The Gaotian Plains warriors didn’t dare to say anything. They could only watch the sky feather craftsman leave. .. In the deepest part of the secret realm of the drowning city. The depth here reached 10,000 meters. Darkness, coldness, and darkness were the mainstream here. The largest sea beasts of the endless sea also lived here. But now, in the deepest part of the endless sea where darkness was the main tone, a bit of light appeared. But what was surprising was that the light was black. Black light! It was as if a strange black hole was slowly opening up at the bottom of the sea. Some ancient, mysterious, and inexplicable strange aura was also released from the black hole. A giant snake that was more than a thousand meters long seemed to be very curious and slowly approached. It came to the edge of the black hole. Before it could reach in, a tentacle reached out from the black hole and grabbed the giant snake. The giant snake didn’t even have time to react before it was grabbed into the black hole. What followed was the sound of chewing that made people’s scalps tingle. The huge sea beasts were frightened and scattered. At the edge of the black hole, there was a lucky pink shell that was wantonly swallowing the energy of both sides. Its body was expanding. The light emitted from the shell turned from pink to seven colors. .. One and a half days later. “We’ve finally arrived at the city of drowning.” Lin Xuan let out a breath. He swam from the vast ocean with no clue and almost no reference object to the city of drowning. The whole process could not be described as thrilling. It could only be described as soul-stirring. He had encountered at least twenty monster attacks. He had also encountered a sea beast that was more than a hundred meters long preying on a giant squid that was fifty meters long. At the most dangerous time, he hid in the coral reef, only half a meter away from the sea beast. If the other party was bored and struck the coral reef with its tail, he would die on the spot. Other than monsters and sea beasts, it was a terrifying drowning corpse. Drowned corpses were also a type of monsters. They were transformed from the corpses of monsters or warriors. They were just like bloodthirsty sharks. Within a thousand meters, as long as there was the smell of blood, the drowned corpses would rush up and devour the victims like sharks. After the victims died, they would turn into new drowned corpses. The cycle repeated itself, and the number of drowned corpses increased. During this period, Lin Xuan encountered more than a hundred drowned corpses. Even a level 9 warrior would feel numb when they saw it. Seeing such a huge group of corpses, he could only run away, and he was chased for a long time. However, it wasn’t that he didn’t do something meaningful. Because he needed the pink pearl very much to breathe underwater. It could even be said that the hard currency in this arcane realm might be the pink pearl. Therefore, Lin Xuan simply took back almost all the experience avatars in the arcane realm outside, leaving only one in the ring Sun City. And these extra experience avatars were used to possess the monsters in the drowning city and turn them into new experience avatars. Lin Xuan did not let these experience avatars protect him. Instead, he let them spread out as much as possible to search for the pink pearl. He believed that after a period of time, he would be able to obtain a large number of drowning city’s specialties through the experience avatars. In such a thrilling and exciting exploration, he finally arrived at the drowning city’s main city. The Drowning City’s secret realm was composed of the beach, the endless sea, and the drowning city’s main city. Or rather, the drowning city was the core of this secret realm. Lin Xuan looked down and saw a deep and huge city. Its area was beyond the limits of his vision. He estimated that it was at least as big as a modern county-level city. As he got closer, he was even more surprised. That was because the walls of the drowning city alone were more than 300 meters tall. The buildings in the city, from the periphery to the core, grew taller and taller. The outermost residential area was only 50 to 60 meters tall. In the middle circle, the rich area was more than 100 meters tall. As for the Imperial City in the center, it was more than 500 meters tall. It was like a mountain peak in the ocean. “Drowning city is obviously not designed for creatures that are 1.6 meters or 1.7 meters tall like humans.” “Could it be that drowning city is similar to the Kunlun Palace and the Heavenly Dragon Temple and originated from a giant civilization in another world?” Lin Xuan had some guesses in his heart. He looked at the outer, middle, and inner circles of the drowning city again. He felt a horrifying threat from the inner and middle circles. There seemed to be some malicious eyeballs in the dark that were looking at all living creatures, waiting to devour some unlucky wanderer. After careful consideration, Lin Xuan chose to land slowly on the outer circle of the drowning city. Feeling his feet on the solid rock ground, he finally had some confidence. Previously, he had been swimming for a day and a half, but he had nowhere to rely on and had no place to rest. That feeling was too terrifying for humans who had lived on the surface for a long time. “I don’t know much about the drowning city. It would be great if I could meet a veteran who has been guarding the drowning city for a long time.” Lin Xuan sighed and began to explore drowning city along the wall. At the same time, he also checked the houses that he passed by. He found that many houses had their doors tightly closed. Those stone doors were actually made of a whole piece of huge rock. These huge rocks were polished very smooth. Even if they were soaked in water for a long time and were parasitized by all kinds of algae and mollusks, as long as Lin Xuan gently touched them and removed the debris, the door would return to its original state, shining brightly. Lin Xuan tried to push open the huge door, but he found that with his current strength, he was still far from being able to push it open. After walking for a while, he finally found a residence with an open door. After confirming that there was no danger inside, he walked in. What greeted his eyes was a very simple residence. There was a stone table, four stone benches, and a stone bed. Other than that, there was only a stone stove. There were several stone basins on the stone table. These stone furniture and items were quite rough. There were many edges and corners on the edges. If one touched them, they would probably be cut open. “Eh, there’s something in the stone basin.” Lin Xuan climbed to the Stone Table with great effort and found that there was something covered with thick dust in the stone basin. After careful study, he was sure. There was food in it! But it had been so long, it was obviously rotten. The state of the food was frozen in this moment forever. Even if it was destroyed, it would still recover after 24 hours. It was as if it was stuck in a crack in space-time, forgotten by the world. Lin Xuan looked at the furniture in the residential area again. “The stone chairs are not symmetrical. One of them is still lying on the ground.” “The thickness of the dust on the ground is also different. I can barely see two rows of footprints here.” “The footprints are very hasty and rushed. It seems that they suddenly ran out.” Lin Xuan was deep in thought. In his mind, he seemed to have constructed a giant who had suddenly encountered a disaster and instinctively ran away. “The disaster fell on this city. The residents sensed the crisis and instinctively ran away. Did they escape alive?” Lin Xuan had more guesses in his mind. Then, he encountered two houses with open doors. In the first house, he saw two white bones lying on a stone bed. The two white bones did not run away in fear because of the crisis. At the last moment of their lives, they chose to embrace each other and face death calmly. The length of these white bones confirmed his previous guess. Because the length of the bones far exceeded that of a normal human. Their finger bones were even longer than a human’s arm bones. Lin Xuan tried to piece the bones together. He found that these two bones were 20 meters and 21 meters respectively when they were alive. “Let’s call their race giants. These two giants are not like what I imagined. They are not a pair of spouses, but two males?” “HMM...; it seems that the two males might be spouses. I’m not careful enough.” “Wait, there seems to be something under their bed.” Just as Lin Xuan was about to leave, his five senses suddenly moved. His gaze subconsciously moved to the stone bed, and as expected, he found a stone slab there. Strange cuneiform characters were carved on the stone slab. It couldn’t be said that he didn’t understand anything, it could only be said that he didn’t know anything. Looking at these strange cuneiform characters, Lin Xuan was confused. However, as a transmigrator, he knew that the early cuneiform characters and hieroglyphs had a lot in common. They all conveyed information through ‘Pictures’. Based on the shape of these characters, it was possible to guess what they meant. “This word is the sun.” “Is This...; A Star? Or an explosion?” “This pattern is so complicated. The person lying on the ground, an arrow, got up again...; wait, this can’t be referring to the corpse that has risen from the dead, right? !” Lin Xuan was stunned. So when this city had a disaster, the dead had risen from the dead? “This time, the dead were resurrected because the secret realm of the drowned city was connected to the Black Sea, and the energy leaked out.” “Then, what happened before this city fell into the endless sea, which led to the resurrection of the Dead?” Lin Xuan had a bigger question in his mind, and he walked to the second residential building next to him. The second dwelling was no different from the previous one. It was a plain stone table, stone stool, and stone bed. But the furniture here was damaged, as if it was from a battle. There were two remains in the dwelling. One of them was on the ground, and there was a long knife in his chest. However, Lin Xuan looked at it and felt that it might not be a long knife in the eyes of the giant, but a dagger. Not far from this person, there was the remains of another giant. There was also a sharp weapon on the remains. From the location of the two and the traces of battle in the residential area, it was not difficult to find that the two were enemies. Moreover, the result of the battle between the two was that both sides suffered heavy losses and died together. Apart from that, Lin Xuan also noticed the thing that one of them was holding tightly in his hand. A roll of yellowed leather paper. However, he could not tell what kind of creature had peeled off the skin. Lin Xuan pulled it out with great effort. “It should be something similar to the words on the stone tablet of the previous residence, Hmm...; ?” Lin Xuan took a glance and was stunned. There was actually a map on this huge parchment! The map roughly outlined the city wall, the outer city, the inner city, and the imperial city. In addition, there were also cross marks on a few places, which seemed to indicate that there was something important there. Lin Xuan flipped to the back of the parchment and found a few lines of words. These words were similar to the words on the previous stone tablet. They were all cuneiform words. They could be recognized, but only a little. “It’s still ambiguous. It would be great if I could completely understand these giant characters.” Lin Xuan shook his head helplessly. He flipped back to the map and compared the images in his mind before he entered the main city of drowning city. With the highest point in the city as a reference, the images gradually overlapped with the map. “My landing spot is here, in the south of the city zone outside drowning city “I walked along the city wall to the east for a while. My current approximate location should be...; Here!” With his powerful memory, Lin Xuan quickly located his position on the map. His finger moved on the map and landed on a fork not far away. “There’s a fork nearby. I can go over and see what’s There!” Lin Xuan’s interest was piqued. Even if the giant died, he still held the map tightly in his hands. This proved that the map was very important to him. And the marks that were specially marked on the map should be even more important. He just didn’t know if those places were still there after so much time had passed. Lin Xuan originally wanted to take this map with him, but the map was still too big for him. After thinking about it for a while, he decided to draw a new one himself and copy the words at the same time. After he was done, he destroyed the parchment on the spot and then followed the signs to look for it. On the map, the marked point was very close to him. But after walking for a while, he found out that it was a full eleven kilometers away. On the way, he didn’t see any houses with their doors open, so he had to keep going. However, what made him feel strange was that he didn’t meet many monsters. He only met three or four big octopuses, which were only at level 7. These big octopuses recklessly rushed up to attack Lin Xuan, but he killed them with a casual blow. “I’ve finally arrived.” Lin Xuan came in front of an exceptionally tall building, his face beaming with joy. Compared to the surrounding single-story residential buildings, this building was three stories tall. It was like a small giant among the short ones. Moreover, even if the surface was corroded by various corals, shells, and mollusks, this building still revealed its majestic and rough style. Lin Xuan circled around the building. The door was tightly shut, and the windows were tightly shut. It seemed that there was no way to enter. However, after walking around the building, he found that the window seemed to be tightly shut, but in fact, a crack had been opened by the shells growing inside. If it weren’t for his astonishing perception, it would be difficult to notice the subtle difference. With a light kick, he jumped more than ten meters high and clung to the wall. Then, he climbed to the windowsill bit by bit. Through the gaps between the randomly growing algae, he cautiously looked inside, only to see Darkness and darkness. “Doppelganger, it’s time for you to make a contribution!” Lin Xuan summoned Poison Blade and let him charge in first. Poison Blade was wearing a vicious set at the moment. With the support of all kinds of skills, his sense of presence was almost zero. Soon, he quietly sneaked into the building. There were also many snails, seaweed, and shells growing inside the building. Therefore, there was still a glimmer of light. With the help of Poison Blade’s eyes, Lin Xuan saw a shocking scene. There was actually a huge pile of weapons here! Knives! Spears! Each of them was more than ten meters long, and they looked extremely heavy. “No wonder that person marked this place. So this is actually a weapons warehouse? !” Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. “But if it’s equipment, can the advanced observation spell tell anything?” He looked over. The relevant information appeared in front of Lin Xuan’s eyes. —— Name: Marine Race’s standard long saber Level: Tier 8, Level 1 Quality: blue, rare Effect: attacks release saber rays. —— Name: Marine Race’s standard long spear Level: Tier 8, Level 1 Quality: blue, rare Effect: attacks release spear rays. —— “Marine Race? So these giants call themselves marine race.” Lin Xuan was deep in thought. “However, the level eight seen by the advanced observation technique should be different from the level they think they are at.” “For example, Ji Ruyue can’t tell exactly what level she is at.” “The level 8 that I saw after digitizing should be the universal level.” Lin Xuan controlled poison blade to continue exploring the building. On the first floor, there was a hall, six rooms, and a large warehouse. In the large warehouse, weapons such as long knives and spears were piled up like mountains. On the beds in the six rooms, there were six corpses. Each of them had a knife in their hearts. If nothing went wrong, they should have committed suicide. After looking at the first floor, Poison Blade went up to the second floor. The second floor had the same layout. Lin Xuan took a few glances and controlled poison blade to go to the warehouse on the second floor. What greeted his eyes were all kinds of spherical objects. Each of them was one size bigger than an adult man. After using the advanced observation skill to take a look, Lin Xuan immediately reacted. “What the F * ck? Bombs? !” Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. These sea creatures had actually pointed out the skill tree of the bombs. If that was the case, then why did they still need long knives and spears? “However, each of these bombs is too big. Even if they are powerful enough to threaten a level 9 warrior, I can’t use them. Moreover, I don’t know if they can still be used normally, so forget it.” Lin Xuan controlled poison blade and continued to rush to the third floor. He had a premonition that there must be something good in the warehouse on the third floor. Coming to the third floor, Poison Blade headed straight for the warehouse. The door of the warehouse on the third floor was not closed tightly, but there was a gap left. Poison Blade entered the warehouse and saw a wreckage leaning against the corner of the wall. His empty eyes looked at the small window in the warehouse. There was also a knife in his chest. Judging from his actions and gestures, he was also committing suicide. However, Lin Xuan also noticed that this corpse was different from the other corpses. The Giants who committed suicide on the first and second floors were all 35 meters tall. The taller ones were even 40 meters tall. The giant who committed suicide on the third floor of the warehouse was only a little over 20 meters tall. Even though Lin Xuan had only just arrived at drowning city and had come into contact with these giants not long ago, he could guess that the height of the Giants was probably the symbol of their bloodline. The giant royal family was a hundred meters tall and lived in the imperial city that was more than five hundred meters tall. The giant nobles were fifty to sixty meters tall and lived in the inner city. The giant commoners were twenty to thirty meters tall and lived in the outer city. When Lin Xuan saw everything in the warehouse through Poison Blade’s eyes, he had some guesses about the identity of the twenty-meter-tall giant. Because in this warehouse on the third floor, other than a wooden table with drawers and a wooden chair, everything was filled with documents! All kinds of documents were neatly arranged on the bookshelves. And there were six bookshelves here! Lin Xuan controlled poison blade to come to a bookshelf and saw the cuneiform characters carved on it. Or it was more appropriate to describe it as a pattern. This was because a tall person was carved here, and there was a small triangle on top of his head. Poison Blade came to the second bookshelf. The pattern carved here became a middle-sized person. In front of the third bookshelf, a very short person was carved. The fourth bookshelf was carved with fish. The fifth bookshelf was carved with seaweed. The sixth bookshelf was carved with waves. Lin Xuan immediately had a guess. “The first three bookshelves correspond to the royal family, nobles, and commoners of the sea tribe.” “The fish may correspond to the animals in the sea.” “The seaweed may correspond to the plants in the sea.” “The waves...; may correspond to the geography.” Lin Xuan shifted his gaze to the giant who had committed suicide. The documents in this warehouse were obviously very important, but this person could die here. Then, the function of this building and the identity of this person were obvious. This building should be similar to the administrative office that Lin Xuan managed in a certain area before he transmigrated. This person might be the director of the administrative office. “He is clearly just a commoner of the sea tribe, and his height is even lower than that of a subordinate. Yet, he is able to become the director. He must have something extraordinary.” Lin Xuan Sighed and continued to control the poison blade to search for valuable things. He did not look through the bookshelves. Although the documents inside were useful, he did not know much about them. He wanted to know what was in the drawer of this desk. He came to the desk and saw a piece of paper on the desk. It seemed to be a suicide note left behind by this person. However, he could not understand it, so he put it aside for the time being. After searching for a while, he really found a good thing in the drawer. —— Name: Sea Tribe Translation Dictionary Level: Level 8, Level 1 Quality: dark gold legend Effect: by reading this dictionary, you can learn the sea tribe language. Learning speed is related to spirit. Description: The Director of the Management Office of the sixth division of the outer city district left a message: “This dictionary is compiled for the majority of the servant races to learn the sea tribe language. I hope that it can contribute to the maintenance of the great unity of the sea tribe.” —— Lin Xuan was overjoyed. Good stuff! This was definitely the biggest harvest since he entered the drowning city. The entire drowning city was the product of the SEAFOLK. There were a large number of seafolk words and documents here. He could only speculate at most, and could not completely understand them. But now, if he could learn the Seafolk language, he would definitely be able to swim like a fish in the water in the drowning city! Lin Xuan immediately began to read the SEAFOLK translation dictionary. He did not need to really understand it. He just needed to pretend to start reading, and a progress bar appeared in front of him. Because his spirit was quite high, the progress bar rose very quickly. When it rose to about 40% , Lin Xuan felt dizzy. He knew that this was the end of one reading, so he immediately stopped. After a few minutes of rest, he started reading again. This time, he completed the remaining 60% in one go! Lin Xuan opened his data panel and found that a new skill had appeared in his skill pane. [ sea tribe language ] ! When he re-read those documents, he immediately became familiar with them as if he was reading Chinese characters. Soon, Poison Blade flipped through many documents. After reading more than twenty documents, Lin Xuan roughly knew what was recorded in these documents. “They actually recorded cases...;” He smiled helplessly. It seemed that the management office was really in charge of all the affairs in this area. From robbery and murder to arguments between mother-in-law and daughter-in-law, they all had to be managed by the management office. Among them, there were also records of the royal family killing people in the street, causing public anger, but they were eventually cleared of their connections and acquitted. Six hours later, Lin Xuan had read through all the documents through Poison Blade’s eyes. At the same time, after confirming that there was nothing valuable in this place, he released Poison Blade’s clone and let out a long sigh. “The sea race is very powerful, and they have sixteen servant races under their jurisdiction.” “This city wasn’t called drowning city before, but Sea King City.” “The sea race made their fortune in the Sea of beginnings. At their peak, they ruled over 45 worlds, and more than 20 of them had intelligent species. The 16 servant races were part of them.” “In order to effectively rule these races, the sea race selected talents from these races and received the education of the sea race. After these talents returned, they would spread the education of the sea race, making the rule of the sea race more stable.” “According to the bits and pieces mentioned in one of the documents, the rule of the sea tribes had lasted for at least ten thousand years. Almost all the cases recorded in the documents pointed out that at present, the upper class of the sea tribes was extremely corrupt, the lower class was full of complaints, and the people were living in poverty. Many servant races had declared a rebellion and broke away from the rule of the sea tribes “There was a royal who went to the fallen star sea to suppress the rebellion, but he was killed by the rebels instead “The royal family of the Sea clan was unable to maintain their rule. They were completely indulged in indulgences. Under such a background, the end of the world had come.” Lin Xuan recalled the suicide note written by the director of the management office. ”...; Although there were internal and external troubles, the heritage of the sea clan was still intact. They could live for at least two to three hundred years “But when a prince discovered an unknown Black Sea, everything changed.” “The dead, the dead beasts, they rose from the dead and attacked everything.” “At first, the elites from all over could quickly kill the dead, but as time passed, more and more died. Even the elites of the royal family couldn’t stop them...;” “When I wrote this suicide note, King Sea city was already surrounded by black seawater “Even if a savior appeared now, it wouldn’t be able to save the sea tribe “We...; will still sink into the endless darkness and death in the end...;” The director’s suicide note was extremely pessimistic. Therefore, he couldn’t even struggle. After writing the suicide note, he leaned against the corner of the wall, looked out of the window, and committed suicide. “Thank you. The things you left behind are very valuable.” Lin Xuan bowed slightly to the building and turned to leave. As he rushed to another mark on the map, Lin Xuan took out another piece of paper. On this piece of paper were the words that he had copied from the stone slab under the bed of the first residential building. Now that he had learned the sea tribe language, he should be able to understand the meaning of the words. “This is actually a diary...;” Lin Xuan couldn’t help but laugh. Most of the diary on the stone tablet were trivial matters. What was the Auntie next door cursing. The young lady across the street was really pretty. The uncle who lived on the same street had a green grassland appearing above his head and so on. However, before Lin Xuan’s patience ran out, he found a new piece of information in front of him. “Today, we are in charge of transporting energy crystals into the imperial city. I heard that these energy crystals are used to provide energy for the imperial city’s energy shield. The captain told me that the Imperial City’s energy shield has been malfunctioning recently and will be suspended for a short period of time at midnight. The captain even joked about whether we should use that time to sneak into the imperial city.” “I laughed to death on the spot. So what if we enter the Imperial City? The difference in height between us and the royal family is so huge that it’s very easy for us to be discovered and questioned. If they knew that we were sneaking in, there’s a high chance that we will be exiled!”! “I won’t do such a stupid thing.” Lin Xuan’s interest was piqued. The energy shield of the imperial city would fluctuate at midnight, and there might be an extremely short pause. This was very interesting. The imperial city was publicly recognized as the most dangerous area in drowning city, but it was also the richest area. Currently, no warrior had ever entered the imperial city. Even if it was a tier 9 warrior, they could only stop at the inner city. In addition, there was an endless stream of monsters and zombies pouring out of the drowning city. It was already good enough for warriors to be able to guard against them. How would they dare to go deeper. “Maybe there’s something there that can be used to pay for my life.” Lin Xuan’s eyes sparkled, and he was slightly happy. He had long heard that the drowning city’s secret realm produced something that could save one’s life. It was extremely rare. Even a rank 9 warrior might not be able to get one. “I must enter the Imperial City District to take a look.” Lin Xuan set a goal for himself. Immediately after, he rushed to the second marker closest to him on the map. However, he was not so lucky this time. When he arrived here, he was shocked to find that this place had already been preempted. At this moment, this building was emitting a faint blue light, which blocked the berserk undeads outside. Every attack of the zombies would cause ripples on the faint light shield. However, if this continued for a long time, it would probably still shatter. Lin Xuan climbed to the roof of a residential building and looked in through the window. He was surprised to find that not only were there martial artists from the Salvation Society, but there were also agents from the construction department. There were also many familiar faces. There was Adam Sen from the Salvation Society. He had been a level-seven or level-nine warrior for a long time. Not long ago, he had completed his promotion mission and perfectly promoted to a level-eight warrior. The construction department had Kodo. However, compared to the Salvation Society, which had a total of six people, the construction department had very few people. Including Kodo, there were only three people, and they were all injured. Logically speaking, if the nine people met on other occasions, they would definitely fight. But now, they had a common enemy — the zombies, so they managed to maintain a temporary peace. “Adamson! If you don’t know much about the giant language, don’t touch it. I’ve already told you not to touch the things here. Now that you’ve made such a big commotion, you’re going to get us all killed here!” Kodo cursed without holding back. Adamson’s face alternated between green and white. It was hard for him to refute. Because Kodo was right. It was because he found that the door was open and he was greedy for the things here. In the end, he did get the things, but it also caused a huge commotion and alerted the wandering zombies. One zombie alerted two. Two alerted four. Soon, more than twenty zombies nearby gathered and attacked crazily. Their eyes were filled with brutality and they wanted nothing more than to tear everything in front of them into pieces. Kodo and the other two were just passing by, but they were forced to hide here by the zombies. They relied on the faint light shield of the building to barely resist. But they all saw that a giant zombie was coming from afar! Once the giant zombie arrived, the faint light shield could not last long. Lin Xuan did not approach recklessly. Instead, he observed the shape and style of the building from afar. Although the exterior was covered by many underwater creatures, he could still distinguish many details. After taking a closer look, Lin Xuan immediately realized that this building was almost exactly the same as the administrative office of the sixth district of the outer city district that he had been to before. “If it’s the administrative office, then things will be easier.” A book appeared in Lin Xuan’s mind. It was the “Administrative office rules manual”that he had read in the administrative office of the Sixth District. It mentioned that the administrative office had to be equipped with a standard long knife and standard long spear that could arm twenty people in peacetime. In addition, due to the appearance of the black seawater and the zombies, after the royal family’s research, they had successfully developed a deep-water bomb. Each administrative office had to be equipped with at least a hundred small equivalent models and twenty large equivalent models. Finally, each administrative center’s four walls had to be embedded with at least three giant crossbows that could be fired at any time. Each giant crossbow had to have no less than three bullets. This was because this used to be the Sea King City, the political, economic, and cultural center of the sea race. No matter how corrupt the royal family was, they were still very concerned about the Sea King City. Especially the royal family that was in charge of supervising, every once in a while, they would suddenly inspect the administrative centers in various places. They would check whether their weapons and ammunition were in compliance with the regulations. If they didn’t comply with the regulations, they would be given a warning at the very least, and at the very most, they would be exiled on the spot! For the SEAFOLK, being exiled was the greatest punishment. This meant that they would almost never be able to see King Sea City again. They would only be able to stay in the desolate countryside that most of the seafolk spoke of for the rest of their lives. For the prideful seafolk, even if they were just ordinary seafolk civilians, this was something that was hard to accept. “If they are just hiding in an ordinary building, I can’t deal with so many people with my ability. I can only give up.” “But since it’s a management office, I should help.” Lin Xuan quickly approached. His approach immediately attracted the attention of the zombies. The Zombies turned their heads and roared at Lin Xuan in unison. Their voices were filled with a terrifying greed. It was as if they wanted to devour every living thing in the world. Kodo was stunned when he saw the figure. “Lin Xuan? ! What are you doing here? ! Run!” Adamson was also stunned. “Lin Xuan...;” Ever since the news that poison blade was Lin Xuan’s clone was exposed, Lin Xuan had been listed on the Salvation Society’s Dark Net’s bounty list. Although it was called the dark net, in reality, everyone knew that it was the salvation society who had done it. However, in order to cover it up, they had deliberately said that it was the dark net who had paid for the murder. Now that they had fallen out, there was naturally nothing to hide. Adamson was originally the number one person on the world’s Tier 7 list. However, many people said that if Lin Xuan had not been promoted to tier 8 so quickly, Lin Xuan would probably be the number one person on the tier 7 list. Adamson was very angry. In addition to the huge temptation of the rewards on the list, he was very eager to kill Lin Xuan. Under two factors, he desperately wanted to kill Lin Xuan and trample him under his feet. Only then could he become a true powerhouse. Now, Lin Xuan actually delivered himself to his door. He was both surprised and happy. At this time, Lin Xuan smiled and said, “Don’t worry. Since I’m here, I have a way to save you all.” After saying that, he sped up and rushed into the management office. Kodo looked helpless. “A way? What can you do?” “We’re trapped here, and we’re almost sentenced to death, but you still came here...; I don’t know what kind of behavior you’re doing.” An employee of the construction department coughed lightly. “Gourd Baby, Save Grandpa.” Kodo,”...;” Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. “Do I look like the kind of person who would seek death?” “Then tell me, what do you have in mind?”Kodo was helpless. Lin Xuan walked straight to the center of the first floor of the management office. In order to make it easier to defend against enemies, the switches of the giant crossbows on the walls of every management office were all on the first floor. However, there were many switches here. Moreover, some of the switches were not for external use, but for internal use. Seeing Lin Xuan walk to the row of switches, Adamson’s heart trembled. He subconsciously shouted, “Don’t do anything rash. Just now, we accidentally triggered the switch and caused a huge commotion, alerting the zombies.” Kodo rolled his eyes. “What do you mean by ‘we’? It was clearly your greed that caused such a huge commotion. We were just passing by and were forced to hide here because of you.” Adamson turned his face away. Although he was the one who caused the current predicament, he could not help but feel embarrassed after being chased and beaten up by Kodo. Lin Xuan walked to the switch and carefully checked the words under each switch. As expected, these words were easy to read as if they were his mother tongue. Adamson noticed his actions and frowned. “Is your so-called method just to try your luck? No matter which switch it is, just randomly dial it?” “Forgive me for being blunt. Although our two organizations are enemies, we are currently on the same boat. I dare to say that if you randomly press the switch, we will die here before the zombies break through the barrier. Do you believe me?” Adamson did not dare to let Lin Xuan randomly press the switch either. He had already suffered once and did not dare to do it again. Lin Xuan chuckled. “That’s you, not me.” Adamson gritted his teeth. “Alright, then tell me, what do the words under these switches mean? It’s everyone’s first time in drowning city. I don’t believe that you know more than me?” Lin Xuan said, “You want to trick me into telling you the meaning of these words? No Way.” He had already read the words under the twenty or so switches. Half of them were internal. For example, poison gas, bombs, and earth thorns. As long as he pressed the button, this management office would immediately become a terrifying hell, and no one would be able to live. The reason was simple. When they designed it, some of the farsighted royal families had already predicted that the management center might be taken over. Since it had already been taken over, they would let the enemy and the management center perish together. Thus, there were these internal facilities. Adamson should be glad that he had only pressed the alarm switch at the beginning. If he pressed any of the switches, such as poison gas, bombs, earth thorns, and so on, the nine warriors of the Salvation Army would be dead for sure. Lin Xuan placed his hand on the switch that represented the “Giant crossbow”and pressed it heavily. Adamson instinctively tensed up his muscles, but he realized that nothing had happened. Just as he was about to sneer, the sound of cracking suddenly came from the outside of the building. Then, through the window, they saw several giant crossbows unfurling and self-loading. These crossbows could not be carried by the sea tribes. They could only be embedded in the walls of the giant crossbows. One could imagine how big they were to humans! “These giant crossbows are at least 20 meters long!” “Even the crossbow arrows are nearly two meters thick!” Kodo was shocked. What kind of heaven-defying crossbow arrows were these. Whoosh! The crossbow string tightened and the crossbow arrows left the string. Boom! The crossbow bolt fell, and the three zombies were exploded on the spot. Broken limbs fell from the sky like raindrops. More crossbow bolts fell to the ground, and in the blink of an eye, all the human zombies were turned into meat paste. Dong Dong Dong. Not far away, the giant zombie had already walked over with wide steps. The Zombies were not afraid, they only knew how to devour flesh and blood. The three giant crossbows reloaded and took aim on their own. Whoosh! Whoosh! Whoosh! Three crossbow arrows shot out, tearing through the air! The first arrow pierced through the giant zombie’s head. The second arrow blew up the giant zombie’s chest. The third arrow blew up the giant zombie’s right leg. The giant zombie roared and fell to the ground. Then, its voice weakened, and it died soon after. There was complete silence in the management office. It...; ended just like that? ! Kodo was overjoyed. “Good! Lin Xuan, you actually know these giant’s words? !” Lin Xuan nodded. “A little.” “No Wonder, no wonder you could see what switch to press with one glance.”The other two construction department agents were also very happy. Although many warriors had guarded the drowning city for several years, they still had no clue about this abstract giant’s words. Lin Xuan had just arrived at the drowning city, but he already had a rough understanding of the characters. He was really gifted. Adamson looked at Lin Xuan with a dangerous look in his eyes. A martial artist of the Salvation Army whispered beside him, “Attack?” Kodo was indeed a veteran level eight martial artist with battle experience. He immediately sensed the dangerous look in the eyes of the nine martial artists of the Salvation Army and immediately stood in front of Lin Xuan. “You want to fight?” Kodo sneered. One of the Warriors of the Salvation Army chuckled. “He knows the giant’s language. How can we let him stay? I’ll keep you here no matter what!” The other Warrior of the Salvation Army also laughed strangely. “We were just worried about how to find Lin Xuan. Now that Lin Xuan is standing in front of us, I’m already jealous of the huge reward on the bounty list!” The atmosphere between the two sides was very tense. They immediately changed from temporary allies to enemies. However, Lin Xuan’s expression did not change. His finger moved on the switch, as if he was about to press it. Adamson noticed his action and was shocked. He quickly pulled the two people back. “Don’t do it!” The two people were very confused. However, Adamson’s status in the Salvation Society was far higher than theirs, so they could only hold back their actions. “This guy might really know the language of giants. Just as he said, some of these switches are external, and some are internal.” “He can quickly find the switch to control the giant crossbow, and he will definitely be able to quickly find the switch to internal.” Adamson had a myriad of thoughts in his mind. Especially when he saw Lin Xuan’s confident expression, his heart skipped a beat. “It’s a trap!” “Ahem...; Everyone, don’t take their words to heart. Although our two organizations are enemies, we just defeated the zombies together, so we can be considered temporary allies.” “So, let’s stop today and pretend that we didn’t see each other. Of course, we won’t hold back the next time we meet. We’re still enemies.” Adamson said seriously. The Warriors of the Salvation Army were stunned. What the hell? Not taking action at such a good opportunity? ! Kodo was also stunned. However, as cunning and experienced as he was, he quickly understood why Adamson suddenly relented and did not force him. He laughed strangely. “Yo, I didn’t expect you to have such high moral sentiments.” “However, it was clearly Lin Xuan who pushed the switch to repel the zombies. How did it become you and US working together to repel the zombies? Aren’t you being a little too shameless to take credit like this?” Adam laughed. “It’s a small problem. Don’t worry about it.” “There’s still a long time. Let’s meet again next time.” After saying that, he turned around and left. He did not want to stay here at all. Lin Xuan watched them leave with a calm expression. Kodo said in a low voice, “Aren’t we going to make a move?” Lin Xuan shook his head. “There are no more crossbows.” “What about the other facilities?” Lin Xuan shook his head again. “I took the opportunity to look at them just now. Those facilities have been in disrepair for a long time. Only giant crossbows can be used.” “If I could do it, I would have done it just now.” Kodo smiled helplessly. “Alright, since we all survived in the end, it’s a good thing.” The two construction department agents beside them let out a long sigh and revealed expressions of having survived a disaster. That’s right. They thought that they would definitely die, but they did not expect Lin Xuan’s sudden arrival to bring them to life! “Lin Xuan, you really seem to know a lot about giant characters?”Kodo could not help but ask. Lin Xuan smiled. “With a little fortuitous encounter, I do know quite a bit.” “Then where should we go next?”Kodo asked subconsciously. After asking, he could not help but laugh. He was a level eight and level nine veteran fighter, but he actually had to ask a young man what his next plan was. It was a bit embarrassing. Lin Xuan took out a map from his pocket and unfolded it in front of them. “Guys, I was lucky and accidentally got a map. I’ve been to two places, including this place where you are. They are administrative offices.” “Administrative offices?”The three of them were stunned. Lin Xuan explained the definition of administrative offices to them. “I see. It’s like a police station, but it seems to have more authority than a police station.” “You even know the name of this building. It seems that your understanding of the giant language is not simple.”Kodo clicked his tongue in wonder. Lin Xuan smiled. “Our next target is this place. If nothing goes wrong, it should still be the administrative office. Of course, it might be a place of higher value.” “No matter what it is, we should be able to make a profit!” Kodo’s eyes lit up. “You’re right.” The four of them hit it off and immediately headed in that direction. At the top of a residential building not far away, Adamson watched their figures leave and sighed faintly. “Adamson, why don’t you make a move? We have the advantage in numbers. They are definitely not a match for us,”a warrior from the Salvation Army said, puzzled. Adamson said angrily, “Haven’t you seen it yet? That Lin Xuan definitely knows more than half of the giant’s words. He knows a lot!” “If we attack, it’s very likely that he will flip the switch to attack us in the next second.” “Can you block a single arrow from those giant crossbows? !” The warrior’s expression changed immediately and he smiled awkwardly. “I understand...;” Adamson snorted coldly. “Forget it. Next time we meet Lin Xuan, we’ll make a move. We should prioritize completing the mission that Lord Simon and Lord Jack have given us.” “Understood!” Adamson and the others quickly disappeared into the darkness. .. “The third marker...; we’ve finally arrived!” Lin Xuan let out a long breath. A hint of joy appeared on Kodo and the others’tired faces. It had been five days since they met. They had walked in the outer city for five days before reaching this place. It was not because they were too slow. It was because they had encountered many obstacles. They did not know when monsters would appear from the roadside. However, they could not make too much noise when they fought with monsters, or else they would attract the zombies nearby. Sometimes, monsters would come out of the dark houses. It was like a horror movie. Kodo and the others didn’t sleep well these days. They felt that monsters would jump out of their dreams. “This place is very similar to the administrative office, but it’s bigger than the administrative office.” Lin Xuan was slightly confused. “Could it be...; the administrative office of the entire Outer City?”Kodo asked. “It’s very possible. Let’s see if there’s a way in first.” Lin Xuan nodded and the four of them split up to look for a route. Lin Xuan first came to the main door. As expected, the main door was tightly closed without a single gap. Not long after, Kodo and a construction department officer returned and shook their heads helplessly. In the end, the construction department officer ran over excitedly. “The window isn’t open, but I see a rat hole!” Lin Xuan, Kodo,”? ? ?” What a F * cking rat hole. Lin Xuan and the others immediately rushed over. As expected, they really saw a hole in a pile of rubble at the corner of the building! The size of the hole was slightly bigger than an adult’s. An agent from the construction department immediately prepared to climb in. Kodo pulled him back. “There’s no rush. Let Me Go in and have a look first.” He used 1% of his HP to create a small bat and let it fly in. The small bat was clearly flying very awkwardly in the seawater, as if it was drunk. Kodo closed his eyes and focused on controlling the small bat. At first, his expression was normal, but at a certain moment, his expression suddenly changed. Then, his eyes widened in anger and he retreated several steps. Lin Xuan quickly held him. “What’s Wrong?” Kodo said in surprise, “There are a lot of zombies in this building, and they are all giant zombies.” The two construction department agents were shocked. Human zombies were already very difficult to deal with. Giant zombies had endless strength, high attack, and high HP. There was no way to fight them. “How about...; We give up,”Kodo said helplessly. Then, he seemed to remember something. “Or Lin Xuan, do you have a way to turn on the switch and use this management office to kill those giant zombies?” Lin Xuan couldn’t help but laugh. “Did you forget that I have a clone?” “Of course, I can let my clone do it.” Kodo slapped his head and didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. “Yes, yes, yes, I almost forgot.” The two construction department staff members also looked happy. It was good to have a clone. Unfortunately, the clone technique wasn’t that good. Furthermore, some of the construction department’s agents also had doppelgangers, but they were not like Lin Xuan, who could use them without restrictions. Once their doppelgangers died, their main bodies would also be damaged, and death would cause the cooldown time of their skills to be extremely long. This was the first time they had seen someone like Lin Xuan, who could take any risks and die without any punishment. What happened next was not difficult at all. Poison Blade went into the building right under the eyes of the giant zombies and pressed the gas switch in front of them. The giant zombies took a good shower in the management center. Then, Lin Xuan and the other three entered the management center. After they entered, they realized. This place was indeed different from the usual management center. There was even an underground prison here! Just like the previous management office, the things on the first, second, and third floors were the same. Standard weapons, new bombs, and all kinds of documents. Only those documents caught Lin Xuan’s interest. After reading through them, he had a deeper understanding of the political, economic, and cultural history of the sea tribe. For Kodo and the others, entering the management office was like Grandma Liu entering the Grand View Garden. It was extremely novel. “Wow! Such a big knife and such a big spear!” “Wow, so many balls. Are they minerals?” “No, they are bombs.” ”...;” “Wow! So many documents! Wait, Lin Xuan, you can actually read them? Are you telling me that you know a thing or two about the language of giants?”Kodo’s eyes were full of shock. Lin Xuan coughed lightly. “Actually, these giants call themselves the sea tribe.” “Let’s go to the prison to have a look. We’ve finished reading all the documents here.” Kodo and the other two followed behind him and clicked their tongues in wonder. “That’s awesome. I’ve been guarding the drowning city for more than a year, but my understanding of the Giants in the drowning city is completely inferior to Lin Xuan’s.” In the underground prison. The things here finally caught the interest of Lin Xuan, Kodo, and the others. Because most of the items listed here were torture instruments. Moreover, not only were there torture instruments used to deal with the sea tribes, but there were also torture instruments used to deal with the servant races. What made Lin Xuan very happy was that there were two types of servant races whose height and size were very similar to that of humans! “This chain is not bad, and it even emits a flame. It can be used as a weapon!”Kodo took a glance at the bloody chain. The other two construction department agents also chose a sickle and an iron nail. Lin Xuan walked back and forth among the torture devices and used advanced observation skills to see their exact information. In the end, he chose something that Kodo and the other two did not expect. A bronze mirror on the table at the entrance of the prison. “This...; Lin Xuan, why don’t you choose again?” Kodo was dumbfounded. They had circled around a few times just now, and all they had chosen were instruments of torture that could be held in their hands. Lin Xuan actually chose a bronze mirror, which really surprised them. They had also noticed the table at the entrance of the prison just now. But there were only some papers and pens on the table, and other than that, there was only this bronze mirror with the seven-headed sea snake engraved on it. It did not seem to be anything useful. Naturally, he did not pay too much attention to it. Lin Xuan smiled. “This is not something useless.” Just now, when he scanned the torture instruments here, he found that the effects of the torture instruments were indeed quite good. However, when he unintentionally noticed the bronze mirror on the table and saw the effect, his breathing stopped for a moment. —— Name: seven-headed sea snake mirror Effect 1: Royal Token. It can open all official buildings in the outer and inner city areas, including but not limited to administrative offices. Effect 2: it can intimidate the sea race commoners, the sea race nobles, and the servant race. Description: The Sea Race regards the mirror as their honor and the sea snake as their clan tattoo. The more heads of the sea snake, the higher their status will be. —— After reading this, Lin Xuan immediately chose this item. “However, I want this seven-headed sea snake mirror and the rest of the torture instruments!” Lin Xuan directly picked up the torture instruments and put them into the space of his consciousness without any intention of stopping. Kodo and the two construction department agents were stunned on the spot. “Your...; storage compartment...; seems to be ridiculously big.” Lin Xuan coughed lightly. “My storage space...; is indeed a little strange.” “No...; I feel that taking so many torture devices doesn’t seem to be of much use.”A construction department officer scratched his head. “Indeed...; This thing is too big, it takes up a lot of space.”Another construction department officer nodded. “Brother Kodo, do you think...;” The two of them were about to ask Kodo, but they saw that Kodo had also started to choose the torture devices to put in the storage compartment. However, he had chosen the smaller types, which were more suitable for putting in the storage compartment. The two of them looked at each other. “Brother Kodo...;” Kodo cursed in his heart. “Don’t you understand? These torture instruments are all very good equipment. Even if we can’t use them, we can exchange them for contribution points when we take them back to the construction department!” The two of them came to a sudden realization. “F * ck! Take, take, take, take as much as you can!” The four of them walked around and almost took out all the small torture instruments in the underground prison. Lin Xuan looked at the torture instruments that were dozens of meters or even hundreds of meters high and smacked his lips. “Unfortunately, we can’t take these big ones away. It’s too wasteful.” Kodo and the other two were embarrassed. It was indeed a bit greedy to take away such big ones. At this moment, Lin Xuan’s expression suddenly changed slightly. Just now, he sensed two figures approaching nearby. They were not martial artists of the Salvation Army, nor were they agents of the construction department, but martial artists of the Gaotian Plain. These two people seemed to have taken a liking to this building and were looking for a way to enter. However, in less than a minute, Lin Xuan heard two screams. The four people’s expressions instantly became solemn. Lin Xuan’s expression also changed abruptly. They were all dead? It shouldn’t be. His five senses didn’t sense the third person. Who Killed the two Takama-ga-hara Warriors? “There seems to be a battle outside. Let’s walk higher and see the situation,”Kodo said in a low voice. Lin Xuan and the other two nodded. They immediately wanted to leave the underground prison and rush to the third floor of this building. Standing High, they could see far. Standing High, they could see the battle from above. However, just as the four of them walked out of the underground prison, they suddenly saw wisps of black gas coming in through the crack of the door. The black gas seemed to have a life of its own. It seemed to have sensed their existence and slithered closer like a python. Kodo instinctively became alert. He did not feel any threat from the black gas, but he always knew that the unknown was the scariest. The other two construction department agents were not as alert as he was. They were just curious. Lin Xuan’s reaction was the most intense. Because he had seen this black gas before! “Every single Black Spot Elder of the Salvation Society has this black gas.” “Ji Ruyue said that her spiritual energy can block the black gas, but ordinary warriors have no way to block it. They can only use long-range attacks.” Lin Xuan roared, “Retreat! Don’t be entangled by the black gas!” After saying that, he turned on his lightning speed and turned to run. Kodo was stunned and turned to run as well. The two construction department agents reacted the slowest. By the time they reacted, the black gas had already pounced on them like a terrifying python. It was extremely fast! Puchi! One of the agents was pierced through the chest by the black gas on the spot. His body froze on the spot. In the blink of an eye, the skin and flesh near his chest began to wither rapidly. His skin lost its luster and elasticity, and was full of wrinkles and age spots. His muscles were sagging like a cucumber that lacked water. In the blink of an eye, this level eight martial artist who was in the prime of his life had turned into an old man! The construction department’s agent beside him turned pale with fright and immediately pulled away. However, a wisp of black gas had already spread out and was covering the area. The agent was relatively fast and avoided the heart, but the black gas still landed on his arm. The agent looked hesitant and did not know whether he should bear the pain and cut off his arm. Kodo shouted, “Hurry up and do it! is the arm more important or is life more important? !” The agent gritted his teeth and immediately brandished his knife. However, a ball of pure black gas suddenly shot out from the body of the construction department agent who was robbed of a large amount of his life force and hit his chest! His body stiffened and he smiled bitterly. “Brother Kodo, Lin Xuan, run quickly, don’t mind us...;” Plop. Both of their legs could not support the weight of their bodies and they fell to the ground with a plop. Kodo turned pale with fright and ran as fast as he could. The black gas seemed harmless on the surface, but in fact, it could take away life force and cause people to rapidly age and die. It was simply an incurable poison. “Leave this place and run separately!” Kodo roared. Lin Xuan nodded. The two of them ran out of the administrative office as fast as they could and then ran separately without saying a word. In less than ten seconds, the black gas also chased after them. Without any hesitation, the black gas directly split into two and chased after Lin Xuan and Kodo separately. Lin Xuan had only run a few steps when he saw the dead Takama-ga-hara warrior lying on the ground. His figure was hunched and his body was old and frail. It was obvious that he had become like this because his life force had been taken away by the black gas. Lin Xuan felt a chill in his heart and quickly continued to run. The black gas was not far behind him, chasing relentlessly. The speed of the black gas was very fast. Even though Lin Xuan had activated the lightning speed, coupled with the buffs from his skills, equipment, and rune group, his speed had already surpassed most tier 8 martial artists, the black gas still chased relentlessly. It was as if it would never stop until it had completely devoured the life force in the living object in front of him. Lin Xuan cursed in his heart and could only continue to run. Of course, while he was running, his mind was also thinking about how to get rid of the black gas. He would definitely not be able to beat it. This thing was terrifying in this place. There was no way to fight it and it could only run. “I got it. I can lure it to another place.” Lin Xuan suddenly had an idea. He had guessed with a slight guess that the black gas must have been released by the martial artists of the Salvation Army. Although he did not know what they were planning by releasing these harmful things, since the Salvation Army had done so, he must have been prepared. Perhaps they had something on them that could make the black gas ignore them. Or perhaps, they could simply control the black gas. Therefore, the only target that could cause trouble was the Takama-ga-hara warrior. Lin Xuan sighed. “Don’t blame me. It’s our fault that we are now enemies.” However, although he quickly thought of a way, after running for more than ten hours, he still could not find his target. During this time, Lin Xuan had used his five senses to find the construction department’s agent from afar, and it was hall. However, he knew that Hall definitely could not do anything about this thing. If he asked Hall for help, not only would he not be able to solve the problem, he might even die together with Hall. He could only continue running. A whole day and night had passed. Lin Xuan looked behind him. Damn it, the speed of the black gas did not decrease at all. “Could it be that this damn thing has taken a fancy to my physical body?” “That’s right. A high constitution also means a strong vitality...;” Lin Xuan felt helpless. He did not expect that his physical body would be targeted for the first time in such a way. At this moment, he finally heard the sounds of battle coming from ahead. There were also the strange laughter and conversations of two men mixed in. When he heard this, Lin Xuan’s eyes lit up. It was Japanese! He immediately sped up. Soon, he saw two men and a woman. The girl had her back to him and was controlling a strange machine to fight with the two middle-aged men. The two middle-aged men had a lewd look on their faces and had been laughing strangely. The machine controlled by the girl was the image of a hotheaded robot. However, half of the arm was missing, and the chest was cracked. The lines and the flashing energy core could be seen. With such a degree of damage, the machine could still continue to fight, and the quality of the machine was quite good. “However, this girl’s back looks a bit familiar.” Just as Lin Xuan thought of this, he heard a middle-aged man laugh weirdly, “I didn’t expect to see the Miss of the Tianyu family here.” “Hehe, would the eldest daughter of the Tianyu family be willing to talk and eat with the two of us? We would be very honored.”The other middle-aged man looked at the girl’s curves brazenly, especially the latter’s waist, buttocks, and long legs. “Tianyu Cai? I didn’t expect to meet her here.” Lin Xuan immediately reacted. Tianyu cai gritted her teeth. “Aren’t you afraid that my father will know and kill you? !” The two middle-aged men looked at each other and laughed. “I’ll kill you after I’m done. Who knows if we’re the ones who did it? If we bring your relic back, your father might even have to thank us!” Tian yucai gritted her teeth even harder. Boom! The middle-aged man on the left found an opportunity to destroy the machine with a punch. The machine rolled twice on the ground and twitched twice. The light from the energy core had completely dimmed. It was obviously completely destroyed. “Now, I can finally taste the taste of the Tianyu family’s eldest daughter!” The two middle-aged men rushed up with sinister smiles, and they even began to unbutton their pants. Tianyu CAI’s expression was resolute. She pulled out a dagger from the storage compartment and stabbed it directly at her flat chest! Lin Xuan roared, “Don’t do it!” Tianyu Cai was stunned. The two Takama-ga-hara warriors were also stunned. Just as they were stunned, Lin Xuan had already appeared beside Tian yucai in a flash. He grabbed the girl, turned on the lightning speed, and ran away. The two takama-ga-hara warriors cursed, “F * ck! The beautiful girl who talked back has flown away! Chase after her!” In the next moment, the black gas that had been chasing after Lin Xuan pierced through the two of them on the spot. Taking their lives! The two Takama-ga-hara fighters were both shocked and angry. They wanted to escape, but they found that their bodies had aged beyond recognition in just a few seconds. “I...;” The two of them looked at each other and fell down at the same time with a plop. The black gas had absorbed all the life force of the two level eight and level seven fighters, and it had grown even stronger. Soon, it had left the two of them, but it had lost its target. It lifted its head like a python, as if it was sniffing the air for the scent of a living person. After a long time, it suddenly jumped in another direction. .. On the other side, Lin Xuan finally let out a sigh of relief. “You...; you can put me down now. It’s not good to hold me like this...;” Tian Yucai’s face was completely red, as if she was about to bleed. Lin Xuan said, “It’s okay. I’m not tired. I can still run.” Tian yucai was speechless Who asked if you were tired! “But, are you wearing heart armor? It hurts...;”Lin Xuan pointed at her chest and asked curiously, “Did director Wan specially equip you with high-defense equipment?” Tian yucai was speechless Was this a euphemism for steel plate? “No matter what, thank you for saving me. I even planned to commit suicide just now.”Tian yucai sighed. Lin Xuan waved his hand. “It’s okay. I also want to thank the two people just now.” Tian yucai was speechless.”? ? ? What are you talking about?” Lin Xuan was stunned and patted his head. “I forgot to tell you. I was also being chased just now and met the two Takama-ga-hara warriors. It could be considered as...; a diversion. I also survived.” Tian Yucai’s little brain was working rapidly, but she did not understand what Lin Xuan was saying. Lin Xuan said, “If you don’t understand, then don’t think about it. That damn thing is quite scary. If you encounter it, I’m afraid you won’t be able to sleep for a few days.” Tian yucai asked,”...; is it black gas?” Lin Xuan was surprised. “You’ve seen it before.” Tian yucai nodded. “I’ve seen it before. The two construction department agents that President Wan arranged to protect me were killed by a ball of black gas. I hid in a corner and didn’t make a sound.” Lin Xuan said curiously, “It shouldn’t be. Black gas is very sensitive to the aura of living things. You actually survived.” Tian yucai said,”...; Although from your point of view, I’m indeed very surprised, but I really want to give you a punch when you talk like that.” Lin Xuan couldn’t help but laugh. “So, tell me, how did you survive?” Tian yucai took out something. It was a black conch. Seeing this, Lin Xuan immediately reacted. Wasn’t this the thing that Ji Ruyue forced out of their wounds when they had just arrived in Longhai City to treat the wounded? However, upon closer inspection, Lin Xuan found that this conch seemed to be bigger than those conches, with more patterns and deeper colors. Using the advanced observation technique, he found that it was level nine, and he couldn’t see any other information. “It’s very strange. Holding it, I feel like a dead person, and the black gas didn’t smell my aura,”Tian Yucai said seriously. Lin Xuan nodded. “I see.” Tian yucai glanced at him. “Well...; where should we go next? You’re stronger than me. You make the decision.” Lin Xuan looked at the Imperial City District. “I want to go there.” Tian yucai said,”...; let me make the decision.” Lin Xuan couldn’t help but laugh. However, he could understand that Tian yucai had seen two construction department agents die in front of her. At that time, she must have been very helpless and desperate. Naturally, she did not want to stay in this terrifying drowning city any longer. Just as Lin Xuan was about to speak, a voice that sounded like muffled thunder suddenly came from afar. Both of them were stunned. The next moment, they saw the seawater outside the drowning city suddenly throb. It was as if there was a huge beast somewhere in the endless sea that was wagging its tail, stirring up a terrifying undercurrent. Undercurrent! Lin Xuan saw a black dot suddenly fly from the city to the top of the drowning city dozens of kilometers away. Upon closer inspection, it was not a small black dot. It was clearly a giant zombie that had been swept up by the undercurrent! In the next moment, his five senses gave him an intense sense of threat. All the hair on his body stood on end, and cold sweat was dripping down! Tian yucai had not yet reacted, and she did not even know what had happened. Before she could communicate with her, Lin Xuan pulled her into his arms. Tian yucai was stunned. The next moment, she bumped into Lin Xuan’s firm chest, and a bump almost appeared on her forehead. “Don’t Talk!” Lin Xuan roared, turned on the lightning speed, and directly rushed toward the nearest residential building. He wanted to enter the residential building before the undercurrent arrived, so he could barely ensure that his position wouldn’t shift too much. However, the speed of the undercurrent’s arrival was more than ten times faster than he had imagined! One second, he was still tens of kilometers away. The next second, he was already behind them. Lin Xuan’s pupils constricted. In such a short time, the only thing he could do was to quickly change into the imperishable overlord set. Boom! Lin Xuan was only a few meters away from the entrance of the residential area. However, this short distance was completely insurmountable. The massive force was like ten thousand elephants ramming against his body. Lin Xuan instantly felt as if the world was spinning around him. His mind was a mess, and he was unable to make any movements to resist. Bang! Bang! Lin Xuan’s body was carried by the undercurrent as he continuously rammed into the drowned city’s buildings. If not for his Super High Physique and Super High HP, just these few collisions would have been enough for him to chat with Yama. However, he could not focus his mind and summon his data panel to see how much HP he had left. His only thought now was to hug Tian yucai tightly. With his high physique, he could ensure that he could survive in the undercurrent. At most, he would be washed to a strange place. However, Tian yucai was a logistics warrior. She spent every day studying mechanisms and machinery. It would be a miracle if she could survive in such a terrifying undercurrent. This was also the reason why Lin Xuan subconsciously hugged her. It was the same for Tian yucai. She had grown up under the protection of the sky feather craftsmen for the first half of her life. She did not step out of her house. She was the eldest daughter of the sky feather family. It was almost impossible for her to encounter such a terrifying undercurrent. Faced with such a huge impact from the outside world, Tian yucai only had one thought. Hug the young man in front of her tightly and do not let go. Hug him tightly...; hug him tightly.. Tian yucai’s thoughts gradually weakened. In the end, as she continued to spin and collide with him, she also gradually fell into a daze. .. A day later, Lin Xuan opened his eyes with great effort. Intense soreness spread through his entire body. It was as if tens of thousands of bulls had run over his body while he was sleeping. Especially his chest, there seemed to be a steel plate pressing against it. It was very uncomfortable. He raised his head and looked around. There were many corpses and sundries lying on the ground. There were human corpses and sea tribes’corpses. Moreover, judging from the freshness of the corpses, some of them were the warriors who had entered the drowning city this time. The Salvation Society, the Gaotian Plain, and the construction department all had them. There were even more sundries. From the stone tables and stools of the sea tribes to all kinds of documents, they were thrown everywhere. Some of the corpses were even crushed into meat paste by the heavy stone tables and stools. It was a horrible sight to behold. Lin Xuan smacked his lips. It was already pretty amazing that he could still survive under such circumstances. “It’s fortunate that I wore the indestructible overlord set. Otherwise, I’m afraid that I would have ended up like this.” The effect of the Indestructible Overlord set was 6. If the damage received from a single attack exceeded 50% , the damage would be reduced to 50% . It was equivalent to a forced damage immunity. With his high HP regeneration, he could quickly recover more than 50% of his HP. This way, he would be able to force damage immunity for the second time. “Ugh...;” The girl in his arms suddenly moaned Lin Xuan lowered his head to take a look. Tian Yucai’s hair was messy, and she was sleeping soundly in his arms. “She’s pretty lucky. She didn’t lose any HP at all.” Lin Xuan used the advanced observation skill to take a look and let out a long breath. However, he accidentally noticed Tianyu Cai’s flat chest and immediately reacted. “I knew it! Why is it this steel plate? !” Lin Xuan put down Tianyu Cai, slowly stood up, and loosened his muscles and bones. Crack Crack Crack. The bones in his entire body made sounds of collision and stretching, as if he was an old man who had not exercised for a long time. After looking around once more, Lin Xuan realized that the buildings around him were much taller than those in the outer city district. “I seem to have come directly to the inner city district...;” Lin Xuan revealed a look of joy. He had originally planned to go to the Imperial City District. However, drowning city was so huge that it would take a lot of time to run from the outer city district to the inner city district. The journey from the inner city district to the imperial city district was fraught with dangers, and he did not know how long it would take. The undercurrent at the bottom of the sea had helped him greatly. “Wait...; is that...; the imperial city’s energy shield? !” Lin Xuan looked north and suddenly noticed some light. Upon closer inspection, it was a huge glowing shield that separated the two districts! “The time now is more than nine o’clock at night! In other words, I can enter the imperial city directly at midnight with the help of the small gap in the Energy Shield!” Lin Xuan’s spirit was roused. In an instant, all the pain in his body seemed to have disappeared! At this time, Tian Yucai also woke up in a daze. She looked around in shock and fear. However, when she looked around and saw the tall and strong figure of the young man not far away, she immediately calmed down. The terrifying undercurrent seemed to be still in her mind. If it wasn’t for Lin Xuan protecting her along the way, with her own strength, she would definitely be dead. “Lin Xuan, where are we?”Tian yucai walked over and asked. Lin Xuan pointed at the shield that was emitting light. “The border between the inner city and the imperial city. We’ll reach the imperial city in two steps.” Tian yucai said,”...; I wanted to go out, but I ended up going deeper into the drowning city?” Lin Xuan chuckled. “Maybe this is God’s will.” “Can You Walk on your own? If you can, we can leave now. There might be good things in the Imperial City.” Tian yucai said helplessly, “They’re just a bunch of stupid barbarians. What good things can there be...; Hey, Hey, wait for me!” The two immediately moved forward and saw many corpses on the way. Almost all of them were buried in the terrifying undercurrent at the bottom of the sea. After some warriors died, their corpses even transformed into drowned corpses, wandering aimlessly. When corpses became drowned corpses, their strength would drop by two to three levels. Such drowned corpses were naturally not a match for Lin Xuan. Very quickly, the two of them arrived outside the imperial city without any danger. Here, they saw an incomparably magnificent giant wall. The city wall outside the city that drowned was already grand and majestic enough. This giant wall that guarded the imperial city had a glorious and ancient charm. Every once in a while, it would be inlaid with all kinds of precious pearls. Lin Xuan took a few glances and realized that these precious pearls were almost all produced from underwater volcanoes. Every one of them was full and crystal clear, with very little impurities. However, the royal family of the sea race treated it as a decoration and inlaid it in the city wall. Tian yucai was also envious. She couldn’t help but gently stroke the gemstones with different colors. Lin Xuan smiled and said, “Do you like gemstones so much?” Tian yucai praised, “Girls like shiny things.” Lin Xuan shook his head. “Not Necessarily. I’ve never seen a girl like glass shards.” Tian yucai was speechless This guy was quite handsome and had a good figure. Unfortunately, he just had a mouth. “So, how do you want to go in? I heard that no warrior has ever entered the royal district of Drowning City,”Tian Yucai said in puzzlement, “Some warriors who don’t believe in evil tried to force their way in, but in the end, they evaporated on the spot, not even leaving any shards.” Lin Xuan smiled mysteriously. “Unfortunately, I just got some gossip. In a few more minutes, we’ll be able to go in safe and sound.” Tian yucai was suspicious. News? What kind of news was there in this damn place. Roar! At this moment, their conversation attracted the attention of a drowned corpse nearby. It quickly pounced over. Lin Xuan immediately kicked it into the protective barrier. Boom! The light roared. The drowned corpse didn’t even have time to react before it was blasted into dregs by the light from the protective barrier. Tian yucai gulped. “This...; can we really go in? Are you sure there’s nothing wrong with your rumor?” Lin Xuan didn’t answer. Instead, he sat on the ground and asked casually. “You must be hungry. Did you bring food?” Tian yucai said pitifully, “No...; Director Wan and I are just here to replace the new defense tower. We didn’t bring any food. Do you have any?” Lin Xuan smiled. “Of course I do.” Hope flashed in Tian Yucai’s eyes. Her big eyes flashed as she stared at Lin Xuan. Lin Xuan took out a roast chicken, three steaks, and a roast suckling pig from his storage compartment and started eating. He also opened a bottle of apple juice. Soon, he finished everything and burped in satisfaction. Tian yucai said,”...; did you forget that there was someone else beside you?” Lin Xuan was puzzled. “I didn’t forget.” Tian yucai said,”...; then give me something to eat!” Lin Xuan scratched his head. “You want to eat? Tell me? If you don’t tell me, how would I know? Women are really troublesome.” Tian yucai was instantly enraged and turned her face away. However, when a whole roasted chicken leg was placed in front of her, the eldest daughter of the Tian Yu family immediately beamed with joy. She did not care about the demeanor of a lady as she swung her arms and began to bite. She was like a vagabond who had not tasted meat for three years. Twenty-five minutes later, Tianyu Cai, who was sitting on the ground eating the sixth roasted drumstick, suddenly raised her head. This was because she saw that the imperial city’s protective barrier suddenly flickered without warning. “This...;”Tianyu Cai was stunned. Lin Xuan stood up and smiled. “Don’t eat anymore. Our Chance is here!” Tian yucai hurriedly stuffed the remaining chicken drumsticks into her mouth and mumbled, “The god-touching chicken club?” “Follow me. You’ll know if you follow me.” Lin Xuan Strode to the shield. According to the stone tablet written by the marine soldier, the shield flickered once, indicating that it was temporarily closed due to a lack of energy. If the next flicker was very dazzling, it meant that it was really time to enter. Lin Xuan pondered for a moment and summoned his poison blade avatar. Sure enough, a few seconds later, the shield flickered again. This time, the dazzling light almost blinded Lin Xuan and Tian Yucai. “Now!” Under Lin Xuan’s control, the poison blade rushed in. It was unharmed! The light that was enough to destroy an eighth-level drowned corpse did not respond at all. It was as if it had gone silent. Seeing this scene, Lin Xuan’s heart calmed down. He grabbed Tian Yu Cai, who was covering her eyes, and directly rushed into the protective shield. When he looked back, the protective shield was once again flowing with a dangerous light. It seemed that just touching it would immediately cause it to disappear. “It only lasted for about five seconds. This process is indeed very short. If ordinary warriors didn’t get the words on the stone board, they wouldn’t have guessed this.” Lin Xuan memorized the time. Although he didn’t know if it would be useful in the future, it was better to remember it than not to remember it. “This is the Imperial City!” Lin Xuan looked around and saw that this building was much taller than the inner city. He couldn’t help but sigh. At this moment, the pain in Tian Yucai’s eyes also slowly eased, and no tears flowed out. She rubbed her eyes, and the scene in front of her gradually solidified. Seeing that the building had changed again, she was shocked. “You really came in? !” Lin Xuan nodded. “I told you that I would definitely come in unscathed. Don’t you believe me?” Tian yucai blushed. Lin Xuan was right. She did not believe Lin Xuan before. She was originally from the Takama-ga-hara. The reason why she was able to escape to the construction department with a large number of mechanical drawings and become Wan youxi’s disciple, and even joined the construction department with Wan Youxi’s help.., actually, it was all thanks to the ship that poison blade arranged for her. And poison blade was only a clone. All of Poison Blade’s actions were done under Lin Xuan’s control. So, the one who really helped her at that time was actually Lin Xuan. Tian yucai was still a little unfamiliar with Lin Xuan at first, but as she gradually came into contact with him, this unfamiliar feeling quickly disappeared. “Hey, what kind of strange machine is that? !” Tian yucai looked around and suddenly noticed a mechanical device that looked like a mailbox at the entrance of a two-story building. Lin Xuan couldn’t help but laugh. He really loved machines. “What a strange energy transmission mode...; but the transmission power is very high...; and it can reduce the consumption during the transmission process!” “Oh my God, what a genius idea!” Tian yucai instantly took down the mechanical mailbox, her eyes full of surprise. “What’s the use of this thing?”Lin Xuan asked casually. Tian yucai thought for a moment and replied, “If I’m not mistaken, it should be something these giants use to communicate, just like our communication device.” “However, it’s a little inconvenient to leave the communication device at the door. The user experience is a little bad and needs to be improved,”she could not help but add. Lin Xuan smiled and said, “When it comes to machinery, you talk a lot.” Tian yucai was stunned for a moment and immediately blushed. “I’m sorry...; I’m not nagging, I just have a special love for machinery...;” “It’s fine, it’s fine. I don’t think there’s anything bad about this,”Lin Xuan signaled her to continue, “Machinery, forging, medicine, and so on will eventually be reflected in the battle. As long as it’s a method to increase strength, it should be developed and strengthened.” Tian yucai said happily, “As expected, only logistics warriors can resonate with each other!” Lin Xuan rubbed his nose. “I’m not really a logistics warrior...;” “But I think you and Ye Yuqiu have a lot in common. She’s very considerate to Logistics Warriors.” “Ye Yuqiu?”Tian yucai tilted her head, “I have some impression.” After a short silence, Tian yucai completely deconstructed the mechanical mailbox, “Okay, I’ve memorized its structure. It’s very useful. Maybe I can use it in the future.” “Go, go, Go! These giants might have better and more exquisite machinery. I want to see more!”Tian yucai urged. Lin Xuan coughed lightly. “What did some people say before we entered the Imperial City? Aiya, it’s just some barbarians. What’s there to see?” Tian yucai immediately blushed. “I take back what I said before. I think too highly of myself. These giants’machinery is very useful.” Lin Xuan walked forward and said casually, “They are called the sea tribe.” “Sea Tribe? I’ll remember it.”Tian yucai immediately followed. However, the two of them stopped after a few steps. Lin Xuan was very helpless. Tian yucai looked at the machines as if she had seen a handsome man. Her eyes lit up and she pounced on them. He couldn’t even pull her away. However, even though they were dragging their way forward, they gradually entered the palace in the Imperial City District. As for the buildings before, Lin Xuan guessed that they should be where the Duke lived. The palace was naturally where the Sea King lived. “There are better machines in the palace. Let’s Go! Let’s go in and take a look!”Tian yucai was impatient. Lin Xuan smiled and followed. However, as they moved forward, he also felt the great inequality between the upper and lower levels of the sea race. Machinery was probably a high-end technology that only the royal family was qualified to use within the SEAFOLK. Lin Xuan didn’t see any traces of machinery in the outer and inner city areas. After entering the imperial city area, he found that even things like communication devices had become common. The upper and lower levels were completely separated. No wonder the director of the sixth division of the outer city area wrote in his suicide note that the rule of the SEAFOLK had entered its final stage. Even without the appearance of the Black Sea water, the sea tribe would soon collapse on its own. The two entered the hall. However, there were too many rooms here, and they did not know where to start. As for Tian yucai, she did not understand the language of the sea tribe, nor did she know which room had more machines. “Hey, there seems to be a sign here. Lin Xuan, do you recognize the language of the Sea Race?” Tian yucai noticed a mural on the wall, which seemed to depict the imperial city in detail. Lin Xuan’s eyes lit up when he saw the mural. “It really is.” “We are now in...; The Royal Palace Avenue?” “Other than that, there’s also the sea serpent palace, which stores the huge documents of the sea race, the 18 servant races, and the 45th World.” “The Sea Shark Palace stores the best weapons and equipment of the sea race.” “The sea lion palace, the Sleeping Palace of the Sea King.” “The Sea Consort Palace, the Sleeping Palace of the Sea King’s 18 concubines.” Tian Yucai’s eyes lit up when she heard that. “Let’s go to the sea serpent palace first. The documents are stored there, so there must be mechanical drawings!” Lin Xuan said, “That’s what I was thinking too. Let’s Go!” The two of them headed straight for the sea snake hall. After running for more than an hour, they finally arrived at the front door of the sea snake hall. Then, Tian Yucai was stunned. This was because this thick and heavy stone door that was a few hundred meters tall was actually tightly shut! The stone door was extremely smooth. She could not even see the crack in the middle of the stone door. Those who did not know would have thought that this was a door made of an entire boulder! Tian yucai looked aggrieved. “What should we do?” She was like a hungry child now. There was a feast inside the glass, but the glass was ridiculously thick and could not be opened at all. “Why aren’t you discouraged at all?”Tian yucai glanced at Lin Xuan and found that he was still full of confidence, as if he had a way to open the gate. Then she saw Lin Xuan take out a mirror directly from the storage compartment. It was a bronze mirror with seven heads carved on the back. “You...; you still want to look at the mirror at this time? !” Tian yucai was a little confused. “Look carefully,”Lin Xuan chuckled. “Since I’m here, how could I come back empty-handed?” Then, he walked to the door and pressed the seven-headed sea snake mirror gently on it. In the next moment, the thick and heavy door actually emitted the sound of turning. The gears clenched and the mechanism turned. A small crack actually appeared on the door. Tian yucai’s mouth was wide open in shock. Then, the door opened even wider. In less than half a minute, it was completely opened. A huge palace quickly appeared in front of them. A dusty, ancient aura blew over. Tian yucai looked around. There were a lot of documents on each bookshelf! Even after years of wear and tear, these documents were not damaged at all! Tian Yucai’s eyes lit up. She rushed up on the spot. Then, she awkwardly realized that she couldn’t see the language of the sea tribes at all. “Help me take a look. I just want to see the mechanical-related documents.” Tian yucai coughed lightly and requested. Lin Xuan nodded. He walked around the bookshelf and finally stopped in front of a huge bookshelf. “This bookshelf is full of mechanical-related documents, but it would be a waste of time for me to translate them word by word for you.” “How about this, you learn the language of the sea tribe first.” As Lin Xuan spoke, he took out the sea tribe translation dictionary from the storage compartment. Tian yucai flipped through it and her eyes lit up because she had also seen the progress bar in front of her. “So it’s all because of this thing that you can understand the sea tribe’s language! You’re so lucky.”Tian yucai was extremely envious. She heard that the construction department had been guarding the drowning city for many years, but after so many years, no one had learned the sea tribe’s language. They were still in a state of half-understanding. It was very easy to misunderstand the language. This was because many people in the construction department had the foundation of the relevant hieroglyphs. As for the Salvation Society, the Truth Knights, the Takama-ga-hara, the Arctic army, and the Indian warriors, they could forget about it. Their language was not evolved from the hieroglyphs, and it was even more difficult to understand the language of the SEAFOLK. They often spent a lot of effort and spent a lot of money to smuggle out a few documents of the seafolk, but in the end, they had no idea how to translate them for one or two years. It was unbearable. “AH...; I failed. The progress bar only increased by 10% .” Tian yucai pouted helplessly. “I’ll read it after a break. I’ll learn it sooner or later anyway. I’m going to read the other documents.” Lin Xuan said a few words and walked to the most luxurious bookshelf. The documents on this bookshelf were all the history of the royal family. Lin Xuan was very interested in the marine civilization. He really wanted to know what happened to the marine civilization at the end. Was it the same thing that happened to the Kunlun Palace and the Heavenly Dragon Temple? .. One day later, Lin Xuan rubbed his eyes and put down the documents. In one day, he finished reading all the historical documents of the marine royal family. From the first generation of the Sea King who made his fortune in the Sea of origin of the marine race to the last generation of the Sea King who killed himself on the throne in a drunken dream. In the blink of an eye, it was as if he had seen the rise and fall of a powerful race for ten thousand years. “I see. Everything Fits.” Lin Xuan remembered what Ji Ruyue had told him. This mystic realm was very unique, as if it was the fusion of two places. Drowning City, formerly known as Sea King City, was the core area of the sea tribe civilization. The Endless Sea was a boundless sea area in the far east of the world where Kunlun Palace was located. Now, a part of the endless sea was about to drown the city. “According to the documents, all the changes started when the sea of beginnings was contaminated by the Black Sea. The sea tribes tried to remedy it, but many elites of the royal family were buried in the Black Sea “In the end, the Black Sea devoured all the worlds under the control of the sea tribes and also the Sea King City, turning it into the city of death under the sea “All signs indicate that the black seawater is a part of the endless sea. The seawater has been polluted, which is why it has turned black.” “The news of Drowning City revealed that the secret realm of drowning city is merging with the Black Sea. This name makes me very uneasy. Could it be that there is black seawater in the Black Sea?” “Also, why did the Endless Sea suddenly appear here? Or is there a powerful race behind it?” Lin Xuan frowned deeply. The more information he read, the more dangerous he felt. It seemed that some extremely powerful alien race was eyeing Earth covetously. They had devoured the cultivation world where the Kunlun Palace and the Heavenly Dragon Temple were located, and they had also devoured the forty-five worlds controlled by the sea tribes. Now, he was interested in the small earth. Something was wrong! The earth was pitifully small compared to both the cultivation world and the Sea clan’s world. Why was the other party so obsessed with the earth? Lin Xuan couldn’t figure it out, but he knew that these things would be very useful. After telling Ji Ruyue, he should be able to get more information based on the other party’s experience. At this moment, Tian Yucai’s joyful shout interrupted his thoughts. “Lin Xuan, Lin Xuan! The Sea tribes are so powerful! They have developed such a powerful mechanical weapon!” Tian yucai dragged him to a drawing and exclaimed in surprise, “Look, they are also studying the defense tower. This kind of defense tower is even better than the one that Chief Wan and I developed together “It can absorb all the energy in the environment to recharge itself. Besides, the efficiency of the energy transmission and the efficiency of the work are both ridiculously high “I think this will definitely be a huge disruption for our construction division!” Lin Xuan coughed lightly. “How many resources will be consumed to build the defense tower according to this method?” Tian yucai was stunned.”...;” Lin Xuan said, “How many level eight warriors will be trained with these resources?” ”...;” Tian yucai scratched her head in annoyance. “I didn’t think about it.” “As a technician, it’s understandable to research bigger and stronger machines, but you should also think about the consumption.” “If the materials needed to build a machine are even more than a warrior of the same level, then this is a useless machine,”Lin Xuan said with a smile. Tian yucai pouted. “I know, I know...; Why are you nagging like President Wan...;” Lin Xuan couldn’t help but laugh. “Oh right...; I found a potion blueprint in this pile of mechanical drawings. The people of the sea tribe must have put it in the wrong place.”Tian yucai pointed at the huge blueprint under Lin Xuan’s feet, “Look, aren’t you a pharmacist? Maybe you have some insights.” Lin Xuan looked down and saw a few big words. Black Sea water purification potion. Lin Xuan exclaimed and looked at it carefully. “This potion was proposed by the third daughter of the Sea King. It aims to purify the Black Sea water, but it failed in the end...;” After reading the description, Lin Xuan became more interested. It seemed that the royal family of the Sea clan was not all drunk and debauched. Looking at it carefully, Lin Xuan did not understand why the potion failed for a short time. However, when he unintentionally connected the Black Sea water of the endless sea with the Black Sea, and the strange black-spotted old men of the Salvation Society flashed through his mind, all his thoughts were immediately connected. “I’ve thought of it. It’s the power of aging!” Lin Xuan was delighted. The third daughter of the Sea King was not wrong. Her mistake was that she only thought of purifying the Black Sea water, but she did not expect that the Black Sea water not only turned the dead people and beasts into zombies, but also contained the power of aging! “If I want to dissolve the power of aging...; I have to rely on spiritual energy!” Lin Xuan was even more delighted. This purifying potion only lacked the power to dissolve aging. Spiritual Energy was probably the last step of the potion! “Thank you, the third daughter of the Sea King. Although I don’t know your exact name, everything you did back then helped us.” Lin Xuan sighed softly. If this person had thought this far back then and found a way to restrain aging, he wouldn’t have been so happy. Perhaps the entire sea clan wouldn’t have been wiped out. At least some elites would have escaped and rebuilt the sea clan’s civilization elsewhere. “What did you see? Why Are You So Happy?” Tian yucai asked curiously, “What kind of powerful potion is it?” “It’s a purifying potion. Maybe it will have a great effect on the construction division.” Lin Xuan said seriously. Tian yucai was surprised. She didn’t expect that the potion blueprint she had unintentionally found could be so useful. “Wait...; What’s That Thing next to you? !” Lin Xuan suddenly noticed the four-meter-high and ten-meter-long mechanical creation next to Tian yucai. The mechanical creation was green in color and looked like a giant wolf. It was huge and strong, exuding a powerful aura. Lin Xuan used a high-level observation skill to take a look, and was even more surprised. —— Name: Marine Mechanical Giant Wolf (modified) Level: Tier 8, Level 7 Quality: Purple Epic Effect 1: when injured, it can quickly recover through absorbing energy core. Effect 2: Movement Speed + 50% . Effect 3: when receiving fatal damage, the pilot will be ejected and self-destruct. Description: this item was originally a mechanical mailbox of the sea tribe. After being modified by sky feather color, it has turned into a giant mechanical wolf. —— Sky feather color patted her chest proudly, making the sound of steel plates. “Amazing, isn’t it? This is a giant mechanical wolf that I modified with the help of the mechanical parts here!” “Moreover, the firmness of the parts of the sea tribe is very strong. The HP and armor of this giant mechanical wolf are very high!” “We can ride it in this palace. It can also help us save our physical strength.” Lin Xuan praised, “Your mechanical skills are much better than I imagined.” Tian yucai smiled happily, her cheeks slightly red. Buzz Buzz! At this time, the ground suddenly shook, as if something was about to be born. Lin Xuan subconsciously glanced at the news of drowning city. It would take more than three days before the origin of the mystic realm was completely born. “That’s not right. It shouldn’t be triggered by the imminent birth of the origin of the mystic realm...; What could it be?” Lin Xuan put all the valuable things into his space of consciousness and said immediately, “Follow me, Let’s Go and take a look.” Tian yucai nodded. The two of them turned over from the legs of the giant mechanical wolf and rode on its back. There were two simple seats here. It was very suitable for Tian yucai to sit in, but for Lin Xuan to sit in it...; it could not be said that it was close to each other, but at least it was cramped and narrow. “There’s a button next to it. You can press it, and it should expand the space,”Tian yucai coughed lightly and then muttered, “I didn’t expect you to be so big...;” Lin Xuan,”?” Tian yucai was stunned, and then her face turned red. “I’m talking about your body size! It’s very big! I designed it according to my own body size...;” “I didn’t say anything else...;”Lin Xuan scratched his head. “Alright then, let’s move toward the source of the sound.” Tian yucai was even more embarrassed. She didn’t say a word and drove the giant mechanical wolf seriously. Not long after, they arrived at the central area of the Imperial City. This was supposed to be the Sea King’s Palace, the place where the Sea King listened to his subjects’advice and settled his official business. However, there was only a huge and deep pit here now! Lin Xuan roughly estimated that the diameter of this huge pit was more than 800 meters! He did not know what had smashed it. “Be careful! There’s a figure!” Tian yucai suddenly became alert. Lin Xuan followed the sound and really saw a graceful figure at the edge of the huge pit. Seeing this figure, he felt relieved. She was wearing a white robe, three thousand black hair, and a black sword at her waist. It was Ji Ruyue! Even if she could imitate others, no one could imitate her temperament. “Eh? Someone is here?” Ji Ruyue was standing at the edge of the pit and looking inside. When the giant mechanical wolf came, she suddenly turned around. Then, she saw Lin Xuan and Tian yucai jump down from the giant wolf. “It’s You? I didn’t expect you to come in.” Ji Ruyue saw Lin Xuan at a glance and was very surprised. “Who is this little girl? Is She Your Dao Companion?” Tian yucai was confused. “Dao Companion?” After all, she was born and raised in the Gaotian plains. Even though she yearned for the construction department and learned a lot of Chinese, she still did not understand the meaning of the word “Dao companion”for a long time. Lin Xuan coughed dryly. “No, I saved her on the way.” Ji Ruyue nodded. “How did you get in? The protective barrier here has an extremely strong killing aura. I reckon that even if the tier 9 martial artist you mentioned wanted to come in, he would have been severely injured.” Lin Xuan was surprised. It seemed that he had underestimated the strength of the protective shield. Even a level nine martial artist would be severely injured? Lin Xuan told the truth that the protective shield had lost its energy and would flicker at midnight. After hearing that, Ji Ruyue nodded and chuckled. “It seems that your luck is not bad. You even ran into such a thing. You are indeed different from ordinary people.” Tian yucai tugged at the corner of Lin Xuan’s clothes. “Who on Earth is she? Why does she give me the feeling that she’s one of those senior executives of the construction department...;” Lin Xuan couldn’t help but laugh. “She might be even higher in seniority than the senior executives.” Then, he briefly introduced Ji Ruyue to Tian yucai. Tian yucai was greatly shocked and quickly bowed to Ji Ruyue. “You are quite polite, young lady. To be able to create such a mechanism, even though it’s just an unorthodox method in my eyes, it’s still very valuable.”Ji Ruyue, who was thousands of meters tall, gently tapped Tian Yucai’s forehead. “I’ll give you a wisp of spiritual essence to ensure your longevity.” Tian yucai immediately felt her entire body become transparent, as if all the impurities in her body had been expelled. Her stomach immediately began to growl. “I...; I need to go to the toilet...;”tian yucai’s face was flushed red. “Go. I’ve already looked around and there’s no danger.”Ji Ruyue appeared to be very experienced. “Spiritual essence infusion has this effect.” Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. “You seem to be very experienced?” Ji Ruyue nodded, “The Wei Ming kingdom has dealt with the affairs of the mortal world for the Kunlun Palace and the Heavenly Dragon Temple. They’ve even sent us good seedlings. We’ll naturally give feedback. The successive kings of the Wei Ming kingdom will receive the spiritual essence infusion. I’ve personally presided over several generations of the infusion ceremony.” Lin Xuan nodded as if he had suddenly come to a realization. Then, he took out a blueprint from his pocket. “By the way, I’ve browsed through the documents of the sea tribes here and found a medicine that they have been researching. It might be useful for the black gas and black water, but there is one thing that is still missing.” “What is it?” “Spiritual essence!” “Oh?”This time, it was Ji Ruyue’s turn to be surprised. “You said that spiritual essence can slow down the aging process, and it should also be able to resolve the aging process. Why don’t we give it a try and see if this medicine that has been added with spiritual essence can really restrain the black gas?” Lin Xuan said seriously. Ji Ruyue paced back and forth. “We can give it a try.” Lin Xuan was overjoyed. He immediately made a purifying medicine according to the method of the third daughter of the Sea King and handed it to Ji Ruyue. Ji Ruyue picked up the medicine, placed her palm on the bottle, and injected a stream of air into it. Lin Xuan used a high-level observation skill to look again and immediately saw that the information had changed. —— Name: Super Purifying Potion Level: Tier 9, Level 1 Quality: dark gold legendary Effect 1: Purify most negative states, including but not limited to dizziness, deceleration, poisoning...; -LRB-effective on tier 9 warriors) Effect 2: Purify evil, filthy power. Effect 3: restrain aging. Description: it was created by the third daughter of the Sea King, Clesia, Ji Ruyue, and Lin Xuan. —— Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry when he read the description. So You’re putting me at the last place, right. “HMM...; perhaps I need to put it into practice to get the real effect of this object...;”Ji Ruyue nodded slightly and suddenly raised her head to look behind Lin Xuan. “It seems that the opportunity to put it into practice has come.” Lin Xuan was stunned and looked behind him. To his surprise, he found that a ball of black gas was charging at him like a Python! Lin Xuan was initially shocked when he saw the black gas suddenly appear, but he quickly calmed down. He had personally seen how terrifying the black gas was. As long as he touched it, he would be like a maggot in his bones, unable to shake it off. If he were to encounter the black gas alone, Lin Xuan would definitely turn around and run without saying a word. However, Ji Ruyue was right beside him, and she had the super purifying potion in her hands. This was the confidence that allowed him to face the black gas calmly! Lin Xuan took a deep breath and threw the super purifying potion directly at the black gas that pounced at him! Buzz! The potion fell to the ground and immediately formed a dense green gas, completely enveloping the black gas. What made Lin Xuan very happy was that the black gas actually let out traces of screams! In an instant, it condensed into a distorted and terrifying human face! In just ten seconds, the black gas, which was the size of a human brain, completely lost its offensive power. The color also changed from a horrifying dark black to a pure white color. Ji ruyue exclaimed softly, “This thing is indeed not bad. It actually has such a powerful purifying power.” Lin Xuan cast a high-level observation spell on the white gas after purification, but he helplessly found that its level was too high, so he couldn’t see the specific information. “Is this thing harmless?”He asked. Ji Ruyue took a step forward, covered her palm with spiritual energy, and touched it gently. After touching it for a short while, she revealed a happy expression. “It can be absorbed! It’s very pure energy!” Ji Ruyue reached out her hand and grabbed the white ball of gas. She took a deep breath and immediately felt relaxed and happy. Moreover, the spiritual energy that had been flowing out of her body was slowly increasing. “This energy is different from spiritual energy, but it is also of the same type of strange energy.” Ji Ruyue looked at Lin Xuan and handed him a portion of the white gas. “Try it.” Lin Xuan was pleasantly surprised. “Okay, thank you!” Ji Ruyue smiled generously. “After all, it was your Super...; super purifying potion that took effect. I just added a lump of spiritual energy casually.” Lin Xuan took the white clump of spiritual energy and imitated ji ruyue to bring it to the tip of his nose. He took a deep sniff. Buzz! The surging energy immediately surged into his body. Lin Xuan immediately saw that his warrior level was actually increasing! In just a few short seconds, he had risen by a large margin, and was only one step away from level eight or level two. Lin Xuan simply put in a few million essences and conveniently pulled his level up to level eight or level two. “HMM? I felt that your aura seemed to have become stronger just now. Your Earthlings’strength seems to have increased by leaps and bounds. It doesn’t seem to be progressing step by step like ours.” Ji Ruyue keenly sensed the small changes that had occurred on Lin Xuan’s body. Lin Xuan scratched his head and explained his level to her. “Although it’s beyond my understanding, I can roughly understand it...;”ji ruyue nodded. “How much spiritual energy can such a white ball of gas replenish?”Lin Xuan asked. Ji Ruyue completely absorbed the remaining white ball of gas before answering, “It has recovered about one-tenth of my spiritual energy. It’s not bad.” As the two of them were talking, black gas suddenly pounced over like a snake. Moreover, the black gas seemed to be very intelligent. It completely ignored ji Ruyue and pointed straight at Lin Xuan. It seemed to be able to sense who was the soft persimmon. Ji Ruyue noticed this scene and shook her head gently. “No wonder I rarely encounter the black gas when I enter this place. I’m afraid that the black gas would have avoided me long ago when it sensed me.” This time, Lin Xuan was eager to give it a try. “Senior, can you trap the black gas?” Ji Ruyue thought quickly and immediately guessed Lin Xuan’s thoughts. “I understand. You make the medicine as soon as possible. I’ll use the spiritual energy to trap the black gas.” Then, she clapped her hands, and in the blink of an eye, an invisible spiritual energy cage was formed, trapping the black gas inside. The black gas rushed left and right, unable to break out of the spiritual energy’s restraint no matter what. It was so angry that it suddenly formed a face with distorted facial features and roared silently at Ji Ruyue. Ten minutes later, Lin Xuan successfully made the second super-purifying medicine. Just like before, after throwing the super-purifying potion, he quickly purified it. As usual, Ji Ruyue gave him one-fifth of the white gas. “This thing is not much to me, but to you, one-fifth is almost bursting your body...;” Ji Ruyue also specifically explained that she was not a greedy person. Since they had a good cooperation, she did not mind giving a part to Lin Xuan. However, before she could finish her words, the fifth of the white gas had been completely absorbed by Lin Xuan and became part of the warrior level. “The progress bar of level eight and level two has already increased by half...; This leveling speed is even faster than riding a rocket.” Lin Xuan was overjoyed. Ji Ruyue tilted her head. She thought for a long time but could not understand why the white gas not only did not burst Lin Xuan, but was quickly absorbed instead. “Another black gas is coming!” Ji Ruyue sensed something and looked behind her. This time, there were even more black gas. There were three balls, but they were much smaller. “For some reason, this place attracted a large amount of black gas. It seems that you need to prepare more super-purifying drugs.” Ji Ruyue smiled. Lin Xuan nodded happily. “Don’t Worry!” At this time, Tian yucai walked out from her hiding place and tidied up her clothes with a flushed face. “Why...; Are You So Happy?”Tian yucai looked suspicious. “I’m happy about something,”Lin Xuan coughed lightly. Tian yucai was even more confused. In the next two days, they did the same thing and purified more than thirty balls of black gas. Most of the black gas fell into Ji Ruyue’s hands. A small portion was absorbed by Lin Xuan. As a result, his level rose rapidly. Together with the essence accumulated by his eight experience clones, he rose to level eight and level four in one go! Just as Lin Xuan was happily preparing to continue purifying the black gas, a throb suddenly came from the depths of the huge pit behind them! A black light shot out from the bottom of the pit and directly hit the light shield that enveloped the imperial city. The light of the shield dimmed a lot on the spot. If one had to describe it, it was like an old man on his last breath. “So Strange...;”Ji Ruyue looked at the deep pit and felt the aura that made her heart palpitate. At the same time, at the edge of the imperial city. Seven rank nine warriors were fighting fiercely. If they were on land, the aftershocks of their battle would be enough to shatter a small hill. However, in this drowning city, in the Imperial City, the aftershocks of their battle had blasted the buildings over 100 meters away. It could not be said that they were flattened, at least there were no ripples. Dang! An ear-piercing sound of metal colliding rang out, and the 6 people separated. 3 of them were Lu Pingjiang, Wan youxi, and Xiang Shizhen. The other three were Simon and Jack of the Salvation Society, as well as the leader of the Gaotian Plain, Ying. Not far away, on the ground lay a middle-aged man who had been cruelly split into two. He had a square face and a determined face. But even though he was dead, there was no trace of fear on his face. He was Yuan Gang, the sixth chief of the construction department, and he had guarded the city of drowning all year round. Just now, the four of them were dealing with Simon, Jack, and shadow. Yuan gang was already seriously injured. In order to protect Wan youxi, he had to risk his life to block Shadow’s sneak attack. In the end, he was cut in half on the spot. As for their enemies...; Jack had appeared in the Dragon Mountain Range before. He was a rank 9 fighter who had advanced to the Salvation Society in the past five years. Simon was the vice-president who was second only to the leader of the Salvation Society. It was said that his strength had reached rank 9 or rank 7 more than ten years ago. On the other hand, on the construction department’s side, Wan youxi was still able to fight at the beginning. However, the machine tools on his body were being destroyed one after another, and his combat strength had been severely reduced. Xiang Qianyi was still a newly advanced level nine fighter within a year. The Gap was obviously huge. Only Lu Pingjiang’s direct combat strength was strong, but his level was also lower than Simon and Ying. The three of them were able to hold on for so long without being defeated. It was all thanks to them Boom! At this moment, the black light that shot out from the deep pit attracted the attention of the six of them. Simon was overjoyed. “The ambassador has weakened the imperial city’s protective barrier! Jack, let’s go and enter the imperial city area immediately.” Jack was stunned, but he still nodded immediately. Ying ze frowned. “Simon, the three of them can’t hold on for too long. If we continue fighting for a while longer, they will definitely die. Why are we giving up now?” Simon said in a low voice, “Sir Ying, have you forgotten our agreement? As the invitee, you must follow our orders!” Ying remained calm, but his fists were clenched tightly. “Alright, I’ll keep my promise,”he said slowly after ten seconds. “Let’s go now. We can’t delay,”Simon said as he glanced at Lu Pinghai and the other two. “As long as the plan is completed, what can three tier 9 martial artists do?” After saying this, the three of them stomped on the seawater and charged towards the imperial city. Wan youxi and the other two watched as they used up their HP and passed through the Imperial City’s protective barrier. The three of them looked at each other in dismay. Ambassador? Plan? What kind of plan was it that allowed them to give up on killing three tier 9 martial artists? What else was more important than killing three tier 9 martial artists? “No matter what it is, I’m afraid we have to rush over,”said Xiang Qianyi in a low voice. Wan youxi nodded. “How about this? You’re the one with the most serious injuries. Go and find Lu Pinghai. You two set up an anchor point together and heal your injuries while you’re at it. Get Sister Ye to teleport over via the key of the Sun at any time.” Xiang Qianyi nodded. “Let’s go. We’ll head over immediately.”He turned to Lu Pingjiang. The two of them quickly headed towards the imperial city district. At the same time, when they saw the soaring black light in the imperial city district, many of the martial artists in the Drowned City district immediately changed their direction and rushed towards the Imperial City District. Plop. Somewhere in the inner city district, the Sky Feather Craftsman controlled a mechanical giant to kill three drowned corpses. When he saw this black light, he was deep in thought. “I wonder if Cai Cai is there. I’ll go and take a look too.” At this moment. At the edge of the deep pit in the core of the imperial city. Simon, Shadow, and Jack had arrived here. When he saw that there were already three figures standing here, Simon immediately frowned. However, when he sensed the other party’s aura, he immediately felt relieved. Very weak. There were two level 8 and one was even only level 6. “Skyfeather Cai?”Shadow saw Skyfeather Cai at a glance and his heart moved slightly. He knew that Tian yucai meant a lot to the Skyfeather craftsman. If he could bring Tian yucai back alive, the Skyfeather Craftsman would be even more loyal to him. Ying glanced at the woman in white and black sword who seemed to have walked out of a painting. “Is she really only at level eight? Why do I feel that something is wrong?” He only felt that this woman was extremely beautiful, but he could not smell any dangerous aura. When Lin Xuan saw the three of them, he immediately felt as if he was facing a great enemy. Three level nine warriors! Among them, there was even someone like Ying, who was also a peak existence among level nine warriors! “Lord Simon, let me take care of them. You Don’t have to do such a small thing,”Jack said with a flattering smile. Simon nodded. “Okay.” He walked towards the deep pit with his head held high, as if he already had a plan. Jack, on the other hand, walked calmly toward Lin and the other two. It was as if erasing the three of them was just a matter of convenience. Ying reminded, “That girl is the daughter of the Skyfeather craftsman. She is a warrior of our Takama-ga-hara. I want to bring her back.” Jack smiled. “I understand.” “I remember you, Kid.” Jack glanced at Lin Xuan, and the scene of the Dragon mountain range appeared in his mind. Gao Qianchi had almost died in that battle, but at the critical moment, this young man had thrown a super-life potion. The super-life potion didn’t need to be drunk; it could be effective on the ground. In the end, it had raised Gao Qianchi’s HP above the safety line, making it difficult for the others to take action. Lin Xuan smiled as well. “I remember you, too. You weren’t killed by the Sun Dragon.” Jack stopped in his tracks, gnashing his teeth in hatred. Being heavily injured by the Sun Dragon in the dragon mountain range was his eternal pain. He even had a deep psychological trauma towards the Sun Dragon in his heart. Because he had personally seen a gorgeous woman die by his side! “Kid, I’ve changed my mind. I’m going to throw you into this big pit. You’ll be grateful to me!” Jack sneered and suddenly burst into action. He increased his speed and arrived in front of Lin Xuan in the blink of an eye. Then, he felt as if there was a barrier in front of him, blocking him and the kid. He was about to step back when he suddenly realized that there was a barrier behind him too. Not only that, there was also a barrier up, down, left, and right! An air wall? Jack was stunned for a moment. He was actually imprisoned by an invisible cage without any warning? Beside him, the calm voice of a woman could be heard. “Oh, this move was originally used to deal with the black gas. I didn’t expect it to be effective on humans.” Jack was frightened. He slowly turned his head and was shocked to find that the white-clothed, black-sword woman was standing behind him. She clearly didn’t do anything, but she was like an immortal God who controlled life and death. It was as if if she moved, she would be killed on the spot. Jack said in fear, “You...; you are not a tier 8 warrior!” Simon and Ying’s expressions suddenly changed. They also felt the powerful aura from the woman’s body at the same time. It was far beyond what they could feel! Ying narrowed her eyes and suddenly...; retreated hundreds of meters. She stood behind a stone pillar and retreated to a safe distance. “This woman was only at the strength of a Tier 8 martial artist just a moment ago. Now, she can directly control Jack and make him unable to move. It’s extremely terrifying!” Ying had always believed in his first instinct. He believed that danger was danger. He would never put himself in danger. This time, he had accepted the invitation of the Salvation Society and brought the Takama-ga-hara martial artists to besiege the construction division. He had vowed to heavily injure this large organization because he believed that the salvation society was very powerful, it had far surpassed the combined strength of the other five organizations! However, this did not mean that he would swear to follow the Salvation Army to the death. He had never been the kind of person who was willing to submit to others. Simon frowned deeply. “Your Excellency doesn’t look like an agent of the construction division. Can We Cooperate?” Ji Ruyue smiled faintly. “Of course.” Simon let out a long breath. “Then what does your excellency need?” “The thing behind your back, the black gas in your body. I need it very much.” Simon’s expression suddenly changed. “Your Excellency, are you joking?” Ji ruyue said, “Do you think I’m Joking?” Simon was silent. Jack called out, “Deputy Leader, save me, quickly save me!” However, Simon ignored him and shook his head. “Forget it. Since you’re not willing to cooperate with us, I won’t force you.” “Our plan is just one last step away. As long as an ambassador arrives, a life of your level will be useless and worthless.” Jack looked desperate. If the deputy leader doesn’t save me, what should I say to him? Anxious! Ji Ruyue’s interest was piqued instead. “Ambassador? It sounds like you respect those things.” Simon’s face immediately showed respect. “Of course. The Ambassador has given us power, so we should respect him.” Lin Xuan was confused. Those things? Ambassador? But Lin Xuan still instinctively sensed danger. Ji Ruyue could casually imprison a level nine warrior, but Simon only slightly recruited her. This meant that in Simon’s opinion, Ji Ruyue would have as much combat power as she wanted if this so-called plan was achieved! “Oh? Then I’ll stay here and watch. Call the so-called ambassador out to take a look.”Ji Ruyue smiled with interest. Simon seemed to have heard something unbelievable. “Are you sure? If the ambassador is out, other than our saviors and our allies, everyone else will die without a doubt!” “I recruited you just now because I gave you a chance!” Simon said proudly. Ji ruyue smiled and said, “Don’t talk big. Hurry up and call that ambassador out.” Simon sneered. “Alright! I hope you won’t regret it!” He immediately walked to the edge of the deep pit. At this moment, he suddenly turned back. “You can kill me. This is your last chance.” Ji Ruyue smiled faintly. “You have something on you. If I make a move, it will make a move too.” Simon was stunned and laughed out loud. “You really have some strength!” At this moment, he suddenly opened his hands and shouted loudly. However, the voice he shouted out was extremely obscure and ancient. It did not sound like a human voice. It was hard to imagine how a human’s vocal cords could produce such a strange sound. Ji Ruyue stepped back and stood beside Lin Xuan. Lin Xuan suddenly heard Ji Ruyue’s voice in his mind. “Don’t be afraid, this is just a sound transmission spell.” Lin Xuan was surprised, but he did not show it. “The bearded man’s body is surrounded by black fog, ordinary people can’t see it.” “If my guess is right, it should be the so-called ambassador protecting him in some way.” “The other party’s strength is unknown, and I know very little about them. It’s not good to act Rashly.” Lin Xuan nodded slightly. “I see.” Ji Ruyue chuckled. “However, I’ve absorbed a lot of white gas just now, and my strength has recovered a lot. With the protection of half of the Heavenly Dragon Soul Stone, the spiritual energy in my body is very abundant.” As she said this, a faint confidence appeared in her eyes. It was as if she could deal with any sudden crisis. “Hula!” Simon said a bunch of obscure syllables, and in the end, it ended with a hula-like syllable. The sea water suddenly churned strangely. Then, Lin Xuan suddenly felt a sense of alarm. He turned his head abruptly, and immediately saw many black gas coming out of the buildings, rushing toward the deep pit. The black gas seemed to have lost all its offensive power and turned into a puppet that could be controlled by anyone. It came before Simon obediently. Simon nodded in satisfaction. However, after counting the amount of black gas, he was stunned. “Why is there only a quarter left? !” He was so shocked that he couldn’t even speak properly. Lin Xuan coughed dryly. Well...; if I said that I ate a part of it, would I be beaten up? Ji ruyue asked curiously, “You didn’t complete the mission? Will you be punished by the higher-ups?” Simon gritted his teeth, and the middle-aged man’s old face couldn’t help but turn red. “Even if there’s only a quarter of the black eggs, it’s enough.” He spat out an obscure syllable again and threw the black eggs into the deep pit. “Black eggs?” Lin Xuan clicked his tongue. This name was a little disgusting. The Shadow in the distance also watched the black eggs fall into the deep pit. His heart was also a little throbbing. Because he knew that this step was the most important part of the Salvation Society. If he succeeded, it could be said that he had the battle strength to annex the entire world. At this moment, Wan youxi and Lu Pingjiang also rushed over. They stopped in the distance. Because everyone felt that there was a terrifying power gradually increasing in the deep pit. Under everyone’s gaze, the deep pit slowly began to churn. In the extreme depths, something seemed to be breaking through the barrier of space, wanting to completely open up the two secret realms. Lin Xuan looked at the time. What a coincidence. There were still a few minutes until the drowning city and the Black Sea were completely connected. Boom! The black light that soared to the sky appeared once again. This time, the light pillar was even bigger and thicker than before. It seemed to have absorbed all the light in the city of drowning. At this moment, all the Warriors in the city of drowning were frightened, as if their hearts had been pinched by an invisible hand. A thick and pure black egg suddenly rose slowly from the depths of the giant pit. The black egg kept expanding and contracting, as if something was about to be born from it. Sometimes it was a beast, sometimes it was a plant, sometimes it was a bird, and finally it took the shape of a human. Simon had already knelt down devoutly, as if he had seen the true God he believed in. Lin Xuan cast a high-level observation spell over and saw a soul-stirring message. —— Name: Orr Level: ? Race: dark descendant Class: None Attributes: Constitution? , strength? , agility? , spirit? Skills: Dark Element Affinity, ? ? ? Equipment: none —— Lin Xuan,”? ? ?” What the Hell Is This? Ji Ru Yue narrowed her eyes, looking at the stretching and shrinking of the black egg, feel a strong threat. “Wa-wa-o-o-o-no...;” From the black egg came an obscure syllable, as if in rebuke. Simon dropped to his knees in terror and replied in the same obscure syllable. For some reason, Lin Xuan felt that they were talking about the missing black gas. No, the black egg. AOR was very angry. Simon was terrified. In the end, this anger would probably be vented on the onlookers. The black egg quickly turned into a human and walked down from the air, step by step, as if there was an air ladder under its feet. The black egg was about two meters tall and had no facial features. It was completely black and its skin was like leather. There was not a single hair on it. He slowly turned to Lin Xuan and Ji Ruyue. “Bear with the tiredness under the fish’s lips...; you have...; The Black Egg on you.” At first, his voice was very obscure, but soon, he began to stammer in Chinese. When he said the last three words, he was already very fluent! Hearing this, Simon’s expression changed. The black eggs were with them? No wonder they appeared here earlier. So they were here for the black eggs! Simon gritted his teeth. “Damn it! Hand over those black eggs!” Under normal circumstances, the number of black eggs should be four times that of before. With so many black eggs gathered together, they would definitely summon an even stronger ambassador. But now, the number of black eggs was only a quarter of what he had expected. The passage between the two secret realms was too narrow, resulting in only one weaker ambassador appearing. Because of this, the ambassador even reprimanded him severely. Simon was furious. He wished he could tear Lin Xuan and Ji Ruyue apart alive. “Leave this creature to me. The rest will be left to you.” AOR pointed at Ji Ruyue and said calmly. “Yes!” Simon nodded seriously. Ji Ruyue laughed lightly. She could feel the powerful and valiant aura from this black creature. There was also a familiar aura. But it was far from being enough to make her fear it. Moreover, she also wanted to know how strong this strange black creature was. That familiar aura made Ji Ruyue want to know how these black creatures were related to the “Demons”that destroyed Kunlun Palace. “What race are you?” Ji Ruyue asked. “Dark descendants, one of the three supreme races that rule the elemental world!”The black furless creature said proudly, “My name is a’er, the captain of the Second Corps!” Ji Ruyue chuckled. “Oh? You’re a Commander with your strength? That doesn’t look very strong.” AER sneered. “Arrogant!” The next moment, he suddenly stepped forward. One second, he was still in the same place. The next second, he suddenly passed through space and appeared behind Ji Ruyue. The black palm suddenly struck toward Ji Ruyue’s back. Buzz. Ji Ruyue’s body was suddenly shattered. But Orr paused for a moment, because what he shattered was not his real body, but an afterimage. This female creature’s speed was far beyond his imagination. “Interesting, what kind of strange ability is this?”Ji Ruyue smiled in surprise. Orr looked up and found Ji Ruyue was dozens of meters away from him. He was expressionless as he pounced again. Ji Ruyue unsheathed the black sword at her waist and fought with a’er. Clang Clang Clang! One black and one white figure fought non-stop and gradually left the center of the battle. The terrifying aftershock of the battle also gradually faded away. After the two of them left, Lin Xuan’s tense muscles finally relaxed a little. The strength of those two people far exceeded level 9. It was unknown whether they were level 10 or higher. No one dared to get close to their battle. If they got close, they would die. It was precisely because of this that they left, and the others dared to start fighting. As Ji Ruyue left, the spiritual energy cage that imprisoned Jack disappeared on its own. Jack heaved a sigh of relief and quickly walked out, glaring at Lin Xuan. Simon stared at Lin Xuan. “Black egg, hand it over!” Lin Xuan spread out his hands. “Eat it.” Jack,”? ? ?” Simon,”...;” Both of them were extremely shocked. Ate It? Do you even know what that thing is? How can you eat it? ! Simon’s figure suddenly disappeared from where he was. When he reappeared, he had already appeared in front of Lin Xuan at an unbelievable speed. Lin Xuan secretly cursed in his heart and instinctively retreated. However, he was only a level eight warrior. Compared to a level nine warrior, especially a level nine or level seven expert who had cultivated for many years, the gap was too big. The thought of retreating just arose in his mind. Simon’s palm had already fallen down. Boom! Purple-black lightning surged in his palm and directly struck Lin Xuan’s chest without holding back. Bang! Lin Xuan’s body was sent flying dozens of meters away. He only came to a stop when he crashed into a stone pillar. In midair, he spat out a mouthful of blood. The durability of the indestructible overlord set on his body had also dropped by a large margin! His HP had also plummeted by 50% under this attack. From a distance, he could see everything clearly. He was instantly stunned. That Kid wasn’t instantly killed after taking Simon’s attack head-on? Strange. Simon was also stunned. He had thought that Lin Xuan would be blown into countless pieces of meat in mid-air. “It seems that you have quite a lot of life-saving items on you. However, it’s useless. No one can save you!” Simon sneered and charged forward again. This time, terrifying purplish-black lightning struck down from all directions. It covered an area of ten meters around Lin Xuan. Lin Xuan, on the other hand, laughed. That was because his five senses had already sensed a familiar aura. At the critical moment. Tian yucai gritted her teeth and controlled the giant mechanical wolf to jump over and block in front of Lin Xuan. Boom! The giant mechanical wolf was blown into pieces in an instant. It did not even have the chance to self-destruct. Tian Yucai’s consciousness suffered a backlash. Her mind went blank in an instant and she collapsed to the ground. The lightning destroyed the giant mechanical wolf. It was only weakened by a tiny bit before it continued to press down on Lin Xuan. Clang! A soaring sword light came from far away and blocked the lightning. Boom! The blast from the explosion swept in all directions. Lin Xuan was the closest, so naturally, the impact was the greatest. He was sent flying dozens of meters away and hit the stone pillar again. He smiled helplessly, but could not say anything. He could only spit out blood when he opened his mouth. He thought to himself, “It’s all thanks to my high physique. If it were anyone else, not only would they be directly injured, but they would also die from the continuous lightning damage.” Simon, Jack, and Ying felt something and looked into the distance. Wan youxi and Lu Pingjiang came together. That powerful sword light was Lu Pingjiang’s full-strength sword. Lu Pinghai and Lu Pingjiang had very similar attacking methods, but their personalities were very different. One of them was serious and responsible. As for the other, he would never sit down if he could lie down. He would never suggest anything if he could agree. He would never think if he could stare into space. However, at such a critical moment, Lu Pingjiang was definitely a reliable chief. The life of the construction department’s personnel was always the most important thing in their hearts. Seeing that it was them, Simon said indifferently, “You’re here? If you’re here, you’re just sending yourself to your death.” In his opinion, the high envoy could definitely suppress the white-clothed woman. As long as the high envoy killed the woman, no matter how many tier 9 martial artists came, they would not be enough. “Sir Shadow, Jack, you two deal with these two,”Simon said casually. As soon as he finished speaking, two figures appeared not far away. “What if we’re included?” Lu Pinghai, who had lost an arm, and the heavily injured Xiang Shensi also appeared in the Imperial City District. After a period of recovery, their HPS had increased significantly. However, some injuries, such as broken limbs, would directly lower their maximum HPS. Before the limbs regrew, these missing HPS would never recover. Moreover, the loss of limbs would also cause their combat power to drop. When Jack saw them, he laughed loudly. “You still want to participate in the battle with such injuries? What do you want?” “As long as the ambassador wins, it’s useless no matter how well you fight. In the end, it’s hard to escape death.” Lu Pinghai laughed lightly, “Even if I’m heavily injured and have lost an arm, my combat strength is still a little stronger than yours.” Jack choked back his words and his face turned red. He had no way to refute. He was on the same level as Xiang Qian ‘er. Moreover, Xiang Qian ‘er was also a well-known level 9, level 1 martial artist. If both of them were in peak condition, he might not be able to defeat Xiang Qian ‘er. Lu Pinghai was previously a level nine and level five martial artist. Even though he was severely injured and had lost an arm, he still had battle experience. With his current strength, it was hard to say who was stronger and who was weaker when compared to Lu Pinghai. Simon frowned. “There are too many people. You need my support...;” As he said this, he turned to Lin Xuan and shook his head. “He’s just a level eight martial artist. He can’t stir up any trouble.” Moreover, the ambassador had already arrived at the drowned city from the Black Sea. It was impossible for him to gather a large number of black eggs to summon another ambassador within a short period of time. Even if Lin Xuan had the black eggs on him, it would be useless now. After saying this, he rushed towards Jack and Ying. “I’ll Help!” The seven of them quickly fought together. On one side were Wan youxi, Lu Pinghai, Lu Pingjiang, and Xiang Shizhen. On the other side were Ying, Simon, and Jack. Above them were Ji Ruyue and AOR, who were fighting fiercely. Lin Xuan scratched his head. “Why does no one care about me all of a sudden...;” Lin Xuan walked to the side of the deep pit and looked down. He saw endless black squirming as if it had a life. It was disgusting. However, in the endless black, he noticed a seven-colored light. “Wait...; seven-colored light?” Lin Xuan was stunned. Could it be the origin of the mystic realm? ! After a short moment of shock, he was overjoyed. However, a new problem arose. How was he going to get down? The squirming black looked very dangerous. If he continued like this, he would be swallowed up. “I’m afraid I’ll still have to borrow the strength of others.” Lin Xuan looked at the battle situation on the high ground. Ji Ruyue and Aer’s battle was getting more and more anxious. Both sides were exchanging moves, and their moves were endless. However, the number of black eggs was only one-fourth of what he had expected. As a result, AER’s battle strength seemed to be limited. There were a few times when he had the opportunity to seize the opening, but he suddenly got stuck. It was as if he had a very powerful skill, but when he was about to release it, he realized that he did not have enough mana! Ji Ruyue had a lot of black eggs that had been purified, so she had plenty of spiritual energy. At this moment, she seemed to be at ease. Moreover, it was obvious that she was trying to probe, and she had not used her full strength yet. Lin Xuan looked at the battle situation of the seven people again and frowned slightly. Compared to Ji Ruyue and AOR, they were evenly matched. Wan youxi and Simon’s battle was not evenly matched, but they were steadily at a disadvantage. “Chief Wan’s battle style relies heavily on the traps he stored in the Rubik’s Cube.” Tian yucai said in a low voice. Lin Xuan nodded. He had long heard that the Rubik’s cube that Wan youxi used the most was a very special equipment. It could almost be said that Wan youxi was a master of Trap technology. There were a large number of traps stored in it, both successful and defective. It was precisely because of these mechanical artifacts that WANYOU gap had such powerful combat strength. He alone was an army. However, the strength of mechanical artifacts was generally low. Quantity was needed to trigger a qualitative change. When his mechanical artifacts were all destroyed, his combat strength would naturally decline. As for the others, there was no need to mention them. Almost all of them were injured. They could not compare to Simon and Ying who were in their peak condition. Jack? Jack was needless to say. Among the tier 9 martial artists present, his combat power was the lowest. He was just a bystander. Lin Xuan hurried over. It would still take some time for Ji Ruyue and AOR to decide the victor. He might be able to provide some help to Wan youxi and the others. Tian yucai quickly pulled him back. “Are you crazy? Why did you get involved in the Battle of a group of Tier 9 martial artists? Did you forget Simon’s attack just now?” Tian yucai felt pain just by looking at Simon’s attack. But Lin Xuan was already acting as if nothing had happened. She even guessed in her heart that Lin Xuan didn’t have any pain nerves, right? “It’s fine. You wait here. Besides, I’m not as weak as you think.” Lin Xuan waved his hand casually. Tian Yucai’s worry was just unnecessary. He threw out several bottles of potions from a distance. High-level strength, high-level spirit, high-level vitality, high-level agility! After throwing out four bottles of potions, Wan youxi and the other two’s combat strength immediately soared. Although these potions were all tier 8, they would reduce the effect of the tier 9 warriors by at least 50% . However, it was better than nothing. “This is the first time I’ve seen this skill.”Xiang shallow view was pleasantly surprised. All of her attributes had increased by a lot. “What else?” Lin Xuan took out a few more potions and threw them at her. These were all new potions that he had developed. For example, the jump potion could increase the height and distance of the jump. At this time, Simon seized the opportunity to severely injure Lu Pinghai. Lin Xuan turned around and used a super life potion. In the blink of an eye, Lu Pinghai’s critical HP was pulled back on the spot. The others let out a long breath. Simon gnashed his teeth in hatred. “Let’s see how many potions you have!”He sneered. Lin Xuan smiled. “Then I might have to disappoint you.” After saying that, he took out three bottles of super poison potion from his space of consciousness and threw them over. He had specially researched these potions back when he had been completing the tier 8 promotion quest. They did not have any other uses except for their extreme toxicity. Even with Lin Xuan’s high physique, he could be suppressed by this super venom potion to below 50% of his HP for a long period of time. Against other martial artists, even tier 9 martial artists, they would most likely be able to display extraordinary effects. When the shadow sensed the potion, it instinctively dodged it. Jack, on the other hand, did not care. The potion made by Lin Xuan was at most tier 8. High-level warriors had a damage reduction effect on low-level potions. High-level warriors had the same effect on low-level skills. “Even if it’s poison, so what? Sir Ying, you think too highly of that kid.”Jack could not help but laugh. Ying was silent. He just did not want any accidents to happen. Even if the opponent was only a Tier 8 brat, he did not want to be attacked. In the next moment, Jack cried out in shock. “What! What Poison? !” “My HP is dropping so fast!” Jack’s face was filled with fear. Even if a high-tier martial artist had a damage reduction effect on a low-tier potion, his HP was still dropping at a rate of 0.5% per second! Moreover, even after the damage reduction effect, he was still poisoned for a full three minutes! This was too terrifying. This meant that even if he added the HP recovery from his own physique, he would still be poisoned to death two minutes later! Jack was flustered. He hurriedly took out the overlife potion from his storage compartment and was about to drink it. “Is this something that you can drink whenever you want?” Lu Pingjiang sneered. The sword light suddenly shot out from his hand and accurately hit Jack’s Palm! Clang! The overlife potion didn’t hold on firmly and directly fell to the ground. Jack didn’t have Lin Xuan’s potion throwing skill. The potion fell to the ground. If it was gone, then it was gone. Jack turned pale with fright and immediately retreated. He hurriedly took out another bottle of overlife potion. Seeing this, Simon and shadow also immediately surrounded him and blocked in front of Jack. Although this guy couldn’t do anything and was just a bystander, he was still a Tier 9 fighter. He couldn’t let him die just like that. Lin Xuan chuckled. With a flip of his palm, more than 20 bottles of super poison appeared in his hand. “You two, have a good bath!” Simon, Shadow, and Jack felt their scalps go numb instantly. Clang! Clang! Clang! Another large amount of super-toxic poison fell to the ground, creating a dense green gas. When Simon and shadow saw Jack’s reaction, they knew that this poison was definitely not ordinary. They reacted in time and quickly dodged the attack. However, in order to dodge the attack, they had no choice but to take Lu Pingjiang and Lu Pinghai’s attacks head-on. Their HP plummeted. As for Jack, he was weak and his attributes were low. In addition, the green gas had a large area of effect, enveloping him once again. “Damn it...; !” Jack’s eyes turned crimson, and he had no choice but to take out a faint blue item. The faint blue lamp quickly turned into a flame and enveloped him. The faint blue flame isolated the green poisonous gas from the outside world, ensuring that Jack would not die. Jack stood in the Flame and stared at Lin Xuan. Lin Xuan smiled. “Ghost Buddha’s lamp? That’s right. A level nine warrior should have something to protect his life.” “With the alliance between the Takama-ga-hara and the Salvation Society, it’s not difficult for you to get a Ghost Buddha’s lamp.” “But...;”Lin Xuan said with bad intentions, “If I remember correctly, Jack is level nine, level one. If he uses the Ghost Buddha’s lamp, he will drop his level. He will probably drop to level eight or nine!” Jack was exposed, and he flew into a rage on the spot. “Wait! You just wait! There will come a time when you will be alone!” Lin Xuan also smiled slightly. “Lord Jack, next time we meet, I hope you can beat me.” Level One level nine, level eight or level nine, the difference was like heaven and earth. Even veteran level nine warriors like Hall and Kodo could only take one or two moves from a level nine level one warrior at most, and then they would be defeated. Now that Jack had become a level eight or level nine warrior, his strength could not be said to have declined slightly. It could only be said that his strength had plummeted. Meanwhile, Lin Xuan had absorbed so much white gas that he was already at level eight or level four. After a period of time, when Lin Xuan reached level eight or level seven, even if he really fought alone, it was still uncertain whether Jack could kill Lin Xuan alone. In order to save his life, Jack had to teleport away. This made Simon lose face. Moreover, Jack must have dropped his level to become a level eight and level nine fighter. If he wanted to do a level nine promotion mission and become a level nine fighter again, it would probably be impossible for him to do so for three to four years. This was a huge loss. Compared to Simon’s expression, Wan youxi and the others were very happy. Wan youxi laughed. “Good! Lin Xuan, well done!” “Hehe, that guy will definitely be furious when he gets back. He was actually so embarrassed by the tier 8 Potion.”Lu Pingjiang laughed strangely. “It’s just a pity that I didn’t kill him.”Lu Pinghai smacked his lips. Xiang shallow gaze laughed. “Not bad. Jack’s strength has dropped by at least 80% .” Wanyou XI patted Lin Xuan’s shoulder. “What kind of potion is that? After being poisoned, your HP has dropped to such a terrifying level.” Lin Xuan smiled. “I was lucky enough to randomly concoct that kind of potion.” The others nodded. This was understandable. Many potions were indeed randomly concocted like this. It really had something to do with luck. There were even people who jokingly said that pharmacists were a profession that relied on luck. If one was lucky, they could make extremely powerful medicines every day. The quality of the medicine produced each time was the highest! If one was unlucky, the medicine would definitely be made in the blue sky and white clouds if something happened after the preparation. There was nowhere to cry even if one wanted to! At this moment, several figures suddenly appeared at the edge. The leader was a sky feather craftsman, followed by a few rank 8 warriors. “Leader? You guys are here too?” The Sky Feather Craftsman’s voice sounded, looking at them in surprise. Simon and Ying were immediately overjoyed when they heard this. “Craftsman? Why are you here too?”Ying said happily. The Sky Feather Craftsman was the same as Wan youxi. Their main body’s combat ability was not strong, but as long as they had enough mechanical artifacts on them, their combat ability was endless. Jack was severely injured and had to use the ghost Buddha’s lamp to leave. Their combat abilities had dropped drastically. Now that the skyfeathered craftsmen had arrived, they could replace Jack as a burden. Moreover, the mechanical artifacts could ignore abnormal conditions such as bleeding, poisoning, and dizziness. Other than having no intelligence, they were simply the best cannon fodder. With the skyfeathered craftsmen’s help, not only did their combat abilities not drop, they had even increased by a level! Wan youxi and the others frowned deeply. They had thought that victory was in their hands. Who would have thought that a skyfeather craftsman would suddenly appear. This combat power actually increased! “I’m here to look for Cai...; Cai?” The Skyfeather Craftsman was stunned for a moment. With one glance, he saw Tian yucai standing at the edge of the deep pit. He was so happy that he almost could not speak. Tian yucai also saw her father, but she became a little hesitant. She had always felt guilty when she escaped from the construction department with the mechanical blueprints that the Skyfeather craftsman had painstakingly drawn. Now that she saw her father, she naturally couldn’t raise her head. “Cai, I want to bring you back. The construction department isn’t a Good Place...;” The Skyfeather Craftsman walked straight towards Tian yucai. When Tian yucai heard this, she shook her head firmly and took a step back. “Father, Gao Tian Yuan is not a good place. I sincerely suggest that you leave Gao Tian Yuan and join the construction department.” The sky feather craftsman said angrily, “What are you talking about? ! Cai, you must have been brainwashed by the people in the construction department!” After saying that, he looked at Wan youxi and was extremely furious. “Wan youxi, I will fight you to the death!” Tian yucai was anxious. “Chief Wan is my master, you can’t...;” Boom! In the Deep Pit, the rainbow light suddenly pierced the black light, soaring into the sky! Lin Xuan was stunned, he glanced at the news of drowning city. The origin of the secret realm has matured, it has been born! When Ying saw this rainbow light, it immediately corresponded with the Rainbow Light from the famous Reed Country in his mind. This light made him intoxicated, it made everyone’s greed rise from the bottom of their hearts! No matter who it was, at this moment, an idea rose in their minds. That was definitely a rare treasure! Ying’s eyes sparkled. “It must be a good thing!” He directly abandoned Simon and dashed toward the deep pit! He was willing to follow behind the Salvation Society for practical benefits. Now, practical benefits were right in front of him! Lin Xuan was shocked. Ying himself was a powerful level nine martial artist. He must not let him get the origin of the arcane realm. Otherwise, his strength would soar further! Now that things had come to this, Lin Xuan did not hide anything anymore. Instead, he made a prompt decision. He immediately shouted, “The seven-colored light is the light emitted by the origin of the arcane realm. The origin of the arcane realm can allow the dark gold legendary skill to improve its quality once again! Directors, we must not let him get the origin of the arcane realm!” His tone was urgent, and his voice was very loud. Wan youxi, Lu Pinghai, Lu Pingjiang, and Xiang Shizhen were all stunned, and then they quickly reacted. Origin of the secret realm? They didn’t understand. But they understood the last half of the sentence. It could raise the quality of the dark gold legendary skill once again! As everyone knew, the strength of a martial artist could be raised from four aspects. Attributes, skills, equipment, and rune group. Among them, attributes were the foundation of everything. All the attributes provided by skills, equipment, and rune group were based on attributes. And because of the durability of the equipment, it was impossible not to damage a few pieces of equipment in a big battle. The same was true for Rune Group. It needed to be embedded in the equipment, which meant that when the durability of the equipment was exhausted and exploded, the rune group would also collapse. Only the skills were not mastered. After learning the skills, it was more loyal than its wife, more stable than its best friend, and it could never betray them. At present, almost all the tier 9 warriors had three to five dark gold legendary skills. These skills were their most powerful means. They just had no way to continue upgrading these skills. After all, warriors needed to accumulate a large amount of essence to level up, and they had almost eaten all the attribute items they could eat. The upper limit was there, and it was hard to exceed it. Now, Lin Xuan’s words made them understand quickly. The origin of the mystic realm was a method to instantly increase the strength of a level nine warrior! At such a critical moment, they did not have the time to ask how Lin Xuan found out about the existence of the origin of the mystic realm. The four of them made a decision in the blink of an eye. Wan youxi and Xiang Shizhen stayed where they were to intercept Simon. Lu Pingjiang and Lu Pinghai rushed towards Ying, trying to stop him. When Simon and the Skyfeather Craftsman heard this, they were also stunned. Ying was overjoyed. As expected, his feeling was right. That thing that was emitting seven-colored light was definitely a first-class good thing! Ying was very fast. In the blink of an eye, he had reached the edge of the deep pit. He looked at the bottom of the deep pit. In the endless darkness, there were indeed three seven-colored lights flashing! Three? ! Ying was ready to rush down immediately. “Ying, let’s have a good chat.”Lu Pingjiang laughed strangely. “Ying, our two organizations have nothing to talk about. It’s been a long time since we sat down to chat.”Lu Pinghai smiled. Ying sneered, “You can’t Stop Me.” At this point, with the origin of the mystic realm in front of him, he wouldn’t hesitate to reveal some of his trump cards! After saying that, he threw out a puppet from the storage compartment. He casually used the puppet manipulation technique. In the blink of an eye, the puppet became no different from an ordinary person. Moreover, the puppet also emitted the aura of a level nine martial artist, which was far stronger than Jack. “Ghost Shadow? !” The Sky Feather Craftsman was stunned when he saw that face. The Sky Feather Craftsman was too familiar with that face. It was the Ghost Shadow who led the Ghost Shadow Group and had always been enemies with Gao Tian Yuan. In the end, the Ghost Shadow was killed by a single palm strike from the shadow. Because of this, the leader had gained a lot of reputation both at home and abroad. After all, Ying Yi could kill a level 9 martial artist with one palm strike. He must be very powerful. “Ghost Shadow is actually your puppet...;”Lu Pinghai’s pupils constricted. Lu Pingjiang scratched his head. “Ghost Shadow? What Ghost Shadow?” He rarely read the information of the organizations. He had always been — where were they going? Who to hit? Was it over? He started to fish! “So that’s how it is...; You Got the wrong position. You were worried that your subordinates would seize power like you did back then, so you used a puppet to create a villain. You used this villain to gather all the martial artists who were dissatisfied with you, and in the end, you caught them all in one fell swoop! Good move.”Lu Pinghai quickly sorted out the situation, he was shocked. Ying shook his head gently. “You just figured it out? I thought that with your standards, you should have guessed it long ago.” “Go, Ghost Shadow. Stop Them for me.” As soon as he said that, ghost shadow pounced forward. Ghost Shadow was very fast. In the blink of an eye, he appeared in front of Lu Pinghai. His palm turned into a claw and pointed at Lu Pinghai’s throat. Lu Pinghai was shocked and quickly raised his sword to block. Clang! The sound of metal colliding was heard. Lu Pinghai retreated more than ten steps. However, Ghost Shadow’s finger was not damaged at all. “Diamond Wood is indeed extraordinary,”Lin Xuanxin said. Now, he understood that Ying had been buying a large number of high-quality diamond wood to make a large number of puppets. Now, it seemed that Gui Ying was not the only puppet in Ying. There must be more in other organizations. Ying alone was an intelligence network! At this moment, the Skyfeather Craftsman had mixed feelings. For a long time, the leader of the Ghost Shadow Group, who had openly rebelled against the takama-ga-hara, had always been the leader’s puppet.. “Lord Tianyu, we...;”the rank eight warrior beside him asked. “Join the battle and fight for a chance for our leader.”The Tianyu Craftsman took a deep breath and chose to continue following Ying. “Yes.” The rank eight warrior immediately rushed out and joined the side of Gui Ying. Gui Ying was dealing with Lu Pingjiang and Lu Pinghai alone. The three rank 8 martial artists had their eyes on Lin Xuan and Tian yucai. “Miss Cai, come back with us. If you’re willing to go back obediently, we won’t kill the Kid next to you,”one of the rank 8 martial artists said in a low voice. Tian yucai shook her head firmly. “I’m not going back.” “Then I’m Sorry!” The three rank 8 martial artists roared and surrounded them from three directions. Lin Xuan’s gaze passed them and looked at shadow who was about to jump into the deep pit. He was anxious. Three tier 8 warriors, even if they were all tier 8 and tier 6 warriors, as long as he revealed his trump card, there was nothing to be afraid of. He was still worried about shadow seizing the origin of the mystic realm. That thing had greatly increased his strength. Avatar! Lin Xuan did not care about being exposed. He immediately used his skill and three clones appeared beside him. The three clones were shield ghost, flame burst, and poison blade. Because of the sudden turn of events, the three clones had yet to put on their equipment. Shield ghost immediately went up and used his body to block the attacks of the three tier 8 martial artists. Flame burst and poison blade stood at the back and put on the flame lord set and the vicious set as soon as possible. Following that, flame burst and Poison Blade’s continuous attacks bought shield ghost time to put on his equipment again. However, since the Indestructible Overlord set was on Lin Xuan’s body, the shield ghost could only settle for the second best. It wore a set that had relatively high resistance. As soon as the three of them appeared, they immediately displayed astonishing teamwork and combat strength. The three tier 8 martial artists brought by the Skyfeather Craftsman were forced to retreat, unable to resist. When this scene fell into the eyes of the tier 9 martial artists, they were greatly astonished. Shield Ghost? Flame Explosion? It was actually Lin Xuan’s clone? Heavens! However, the situation was urgent now, so they had no way to ask what exactly was going on. Ying stared at the seven-colored light below and was about to jump down. At the critical moment, a low roar sounded. Following that was a swift and fierce air-piercing sound! Ying Xin was suddenly alarmed and subconsciously dodged. Whoosh! A three meter thick water pillar pierced through the seawater in front of him! Ying looked at the spot where the attack was coming from. It was a tier 9 monster armored snapping turtle! Lin Xuan calmed down slightly. This training clone had been hiding nearby since the beginning to deal with the occasional need. Now, he had finally caught up. WHOOSH WHOOSH WHOOSH! The armored snapping turtle continuously spat out water pillars at an extremely tricky angle, aiming straight at Ying’s vital points. Ying Yi was furious. Why did such a thing appear at such a critical moment. Do you have a F * cking grudge against me? Buzz Buzz Buzz. At this moment, a secret realm light door suddenly opened at the edge of the Imperial City. Its momentum was vast and its light shone in all directions, allowing these martial artists who were fighting to see it clearly. Ji Ruyue, who was fighting with AOR, paused slightly when she saw the situation. “Hey, she’s here too? Interesting.” Ye Lijiang stepped out of the light door and sped up. In the blink of an eye, she arrived near the deep pit. “Everyone, I’m here,”she said calmly. Wan youxi, Lu Pinghai, and the others let out a long breath. “Sister Ye!” The key of the Sun was a good thing, but the key of the Sun could either open any light door of a secret realm randomly, or it had to confirm the anchor point before it could open the door point by point. Previously, Lu Pinghai and the others had spent a lot of effort to find a place where the seawater was not rushing, and there were not many monsters to build the anchor point. But even so, they still needed to use a lot of energy to teleport a tier 9 warrior over. The stronger they were, the more energy they would use. It was precisely because of this that ye Lijiang had only just passed through the light door and arrived at the Imperial City District of the drowning city. Ying Shen frowned deeply. The construction department indeed never made empty promises. They had long sensed that something was wrong with the Salvation Society and had prepared for the worst. Ye Lijiang’s personal attack was the ultimate trump card. Thinking of this, Ying no longer hesitated. Risking being injured by the armored alligator snapping turtle, he directly jumped into the deep pit. Seeing this, Lin Xuan also jumped in without hesitation. “Sister Ye! There is something at the bottom of the pit that can upgrade dark gold skills. We can’t let him get it!”Lu Pinghai shouted. Hearing this, ye Lijiang suddenly disappeared from where he was. The next moment, when he reappeared, he was already in front of Ying and jumped into the deep pit ahead of time. “Damn it!” Ying roared and threw out a puppet. The material of this puppet was very different from that of Ghost Shadow. It had a hint of sulfur smell. As expected, in the next moment, the mannequin exploded in mid-air, forming a terrifying airwave. The Airwave swept over the edge of the deep pit, blowing everyone into pieces. A rank 9 martial artist was still fine. He could stabilize his body. A rank 8 martial artist was unable to control his body. He was knocked around by the Airwave. The rank 8 martial artists brought by the three sky feather craftsmen screamed in pain and fell straight into the deep pit. “Ah!”Tian yucai cried out in shock. She lost her balance and fell down as well. The Skyfeather craftsmen narrowed their eyes and rushed to the edge of the deep pit, but they failed to grab their daughter’s hand. Lin Xuan’s falling body was also affected by the air wave. His direction suddenly changed and he fell straight into the center of the Deep Pit! That was the core area where the drowning city was connected to the Black Sea! The whistling sound of the wind blew past his ears. Lin Xuan felt pain on his face. As he fell, the black fluid landed on his exposed skin, causing Lin Xuan to feel a needle-like pain. Falling, falling. He kept falling. Lin Xuan saw that his HP was also decreasing at a constant rate. However, due to his high physique and the huge amount of HP that the Dominator’s second skill, blood of the Dominator, had brought him, the rate of decline was still acceptable. The black color rapidly magnified in Lin Xuan’s eyes. Plop. He landed at the bottom of the solid pit. That’s right, this place was different from what he had imagined. There wasn’t anything soft and sticky at the bottom of the pit, only something black was flowing. Touching it lightly, the black fluid would also produce needle-like pain. Swoosh! Swoosh! Swoosh! Three figures descended from the sky. They were the three high heaven plains warriors who had lost their balance and fallen to the bottom of the pit. While they were still falling, they were stained by the black fluid and lost a lot of HP. After falling to the bottom of the pit, they were even more terrified. “This is...;” The three of them took out life potions in panic and tried to drink them. However, they found that life potions could only solve the crisis temporarily. If they couldn’t leave this deep pit, they would still die. In less than five minutes, they had finished all the life potions on their bodies. “There’s another person over there!” “It’s the Kid from the construction department. I remember that his information shows that he’s a pharmacist!” “He must want a lot of potions. Quickly surround him!” The three of them quickly surrounded him as if they had seen a hungry wolf. Lin Xuan’s expression was calm. Without waiting for the three of them to get close, he took out a giant spear. Giant Thunder Spear. Although he had not used it for a long time, Lin Xuan had upgraded it to tier 8 equipment. “Let’s go.” Lin Xuan’s right arm exploded with power and threw out an illusory giant thunder spear. Boom! The Giant Thunder Spear exploded with a loud bang. With a single strike, the spear killed a Tier 8 martial artist on the spot. After killing the martial artist, the illusionary Giant Thunder Spear reappeared. Lin Xuan did not pause as he threw it out again. Boom! Boom! Another two explosions rang out. The three tier 8 martial artists had very little hp left. Under such a fierce attack, they could not resist at all and died on the spot. Swoosh! At this moment, a figure fell from above. Lin Xuan looked over and found that it was Tian yucai. At this moment, the young girl’s eyes were also filled with panic. Such a dangerous and evil pit was enough to scare her to death. “It’s a bit far from me...;” Lin Xuan ran over quickly. Boom! A fierce wind howled. Lin Xuan suddenly raised his head and saw that shadow had also used the impact of the self-destructing doll to accelerate towards the bottom of the pit. Ying clearly hated Lin Xuan to the core. When he found out that the shield ghost, flame burst, and Poison Blade were all Lin Xuan’s clones, he wanted nothing more than to tear this young man into pieces. Back then, when the germinal organization was still around, Ying had sent a Tier 7 mannequin to the germinal organization to assist them in battle. At that time, he thought that the shield ghost and flame burst were geniuses that had to be killed, and the first to be killed was flame burst. Now, it seemed that his judgment at that time was wrong. What Shield Ghost? What Flame Explosion? Even if he had spent a lot of effort to kill them, he had only killed a clone. The Kid in front of him had actually relied on his clone to play with him for so long! “Die for me too!” The Shadow Palm Condensed Fire, and in the blink of an eye, it condensed into a huge fireball that whizzed over. Boom! The fireball was very fast, and it crashed right in front of Lin Xuan. The towering flame exploded the black fluid, covering Lin Xuan’s face. Lin Xuan’s HP plummeted by 50% on the spot. Fortunately, he had maintained around 70% of his HP just now. Coupled with the effects of the Indestructible Overlord set, he was not instantly killed. Even so, Lin Xuan only had 20% of his HP remaining. He still had to contend with the black fluid at the bottom of the pit, which continued to deal damage. He could not recover his HP for a long time. “He’s not dead yet? !” Shadow was stunned. Previously, Lin Xuan had taken Simon’s attack head-on, but he did not die. Now that he had taken Simon’s attack head-on, he still did not die. Just how many trump cards did this kid have? Lin Xuan glanced at the durability of the indestructible overlord set. It was less than 10% . “This won’t do. I can’t use my equipment to block the next attack. I have to switch clones.” “Wait...;” Lin Xuan suddenly caught a glimpse of the seven-colored light at the corner of his eye. He was shocked to find that a shell floated up by itself. Then, it paused for a moment and rushed toward Tian yucai on its own. The shell was emitting seven-colored light. “The origin of the secret realm!” Ying was overjoyed. He hesitated for half a second and decisively gave up on Lin Xuan, rushing toward the origin of the secret realm. Whoosh! However, the speed of the origin of the mystic realm was even faster. The shell rushed to Tian Yucai’s side in the blink of an eye, and the seven-colored pearl went straight into Tian Yucai’s mouth. Tian yucai was stunned. Why is something going into my mouth out of nowhere? Ying frowned deeply. He couldn’t wait, and he didn’t want to. The origin of the mystic realm had been swallowed by Tian Yucai, and it hadn’t been used yet. Now that he had killed Tian yucai and taken out the origin of the arcane realm, there was still time! He showed no mercy and directly pulled out a short white knife from the storage compartment and stabbed Tian yucai’s throat. When the sky feather craftsman saw this scene at the edge of the pit, he turned pale with fright. “Leader! Stop!” He also jumped, completely disregarding whether he could survive at the bottom of the pit, just to save his daughter’s life. At the critical moment, Lin Xuan used Flash and rushed forward. The muscles in his arms bulged as 400 points of strength burst forth! He grabbed Ying’s right hand! This sudden power made Ying extremely stunned. How could a rank 8 martial artist have such high power? ! “Since you want to die, then I’ll fulfill your wish.” Ying opened his right hand and the short knife fell. At the same time, he grabbed the short knife with his left hand and fiercely stabbed backwards! Puchi. The short knife didn’t encounter any delay and directly pierced into the flesh. But Ying was stunned. Because Lin Xuanming was wearing a middle armor. Logically speaking, even if the short knife pierced through the middle armor, there should be the sound of metal colliding. Why did the latter seem to not wear a single piece of clothing. Ying suddenly turned his head and realized that it was not Lin Xuan behind him, but a clone of Lin Xuan! At the edge of the Big Pit. Lin Xuan’s vision blurred, and he shockingly appeared on the ground. He let out a long breath. This move was the special effect of the avatar. It could instantly switch the position of the original body and the avatar. Lin Xuan had never displayed this move in front of a living person. But now, in order to save his life, he had to show it. “I can’t help it. I’m facing a level nine warrior...;” Lin Xuan smiled bitterly. Ever since he became a level eight warrior, he had faced an additional level nine warrior. One could imagine how much pressure he was under. Lin Xuan walked to the edge of the deep pit and looked at the bottom. The time he bought was very short, but it was enough for the Skyfeather Craftsman to fall into the pit. Before Ying’s short knife fell again, the Skyfeather Craftsman stood in front of his daughter and blocked the knife of the leader of the Gaotian Plain. “Leader, that thing found the CAI on its own. We Can’t blame her. We’ll take it out after we bring her back,”the Skyfeather Craftsman said seriously. Ying shook his head. “The battle situation is unpredictable. I can’t figure it out. I want to get the origin of this mystical realm now. Move aside!” The Skyfeather Craftsman took a deep breath. “I won’t move aside! Leader, Please...;” Before he could finish his words, Ying pulled out a black tachi from the storage compartment and slashed it down! This black tachi was his strongest weapon. Previously, on the Eastern Sea, a ray of light from a few hundred meters away had cut off one of Lu Pinghai’s arms! The skyplume Craftsman’s pupils constricted. He knew that Ying didn’t want to waste any more words. Regardless of whether it was a loyal subordinate in front of him or a former comrade, as long as he blocked Ying’s path of becoming stronger, he would kill! The skyplume craftsman smiled bitterly. He didn’t expect that after following Ying for so long and being so loyal, he would still die in Ying’s hands in the end. Perhaps the Sato martial artist’s betrayal back then was the correct one. This Takama Plains’leader...; was not a wise master. However, the black saber light that erupted did not land. The Sky Feather Craftsman was stunned for a moment. Tian yucai, who had kept her eyes closed and did not dare to look, opened her eyes at this moment and looked over. They saw that the black tachi was now firmly bound by a black vortex that was spinning non-stop. No matter how hard Ying exerted his strength, the muscles in his arms bulged. The tachi could only tremble slightly and could not really land. They looked past the tachi and looked further behind. They saw a white-haired woman. Ye Lijiang! “Ying, is this how you treat the hero of the Gaotian Plain?”Ye Lijiang extended his right hand forward. His fingers trembled, but his tone was unusually calm. Ying didn’t say a word, but he knew that he was held back by Lin Xuan and the Skyfeather Craftsman one after another. It was in these short ten seconds that ye Lijiang arrived at the bottom of the pit. The chance that he wanted to monopolize all the origin of the mystic realm disappeared. “Your strength is stronger than the time in the Asura prison,”Ying said indifferently. Ye Lijiang looked at him deeply. “Your heart is dirtier than the time in the Asura prison.” Ying chuckled and said, “Anything that can make me strong is what I desire. How can it be dirtier?” As soon as he finished speaking, a puppet appeared in front of him. The head and limbs of the puppet were black. Even most of its body was black. Only its heart was not dyed black. “Let the dirtier me fight with you!” Ying suddenly turned his head and rushed toward the remaining two arcane realm origins. The arcane realm origins that Tian yucai had swallowed were already beyond her ability to seize. At this moment, she could only release the pitch-black puppet from its cage and forcibly seize the remaining two. Ye Lijiang raised her brows slightly. From the pitch-black puppet’s body, she could feel the same aura as those black-spotted old men and Simon. At the same time, it was far more powerful than them! The pitch-black puppet laughed out loud, “You finally let me come out to fight? It should have been so long ago!” “You want to kill this woman? Fine! This is the last person I’ll help you kill. After killing this person, I’ll Be Free Forever!” The pitch-black puppet’s black body surged, and in the blink of an eye, it formed a black tachi, which was exactly the same as Ying’s tachi. Hua! The tachi slashed down, and the black blade light was silent. Ye Lijiang instinctively dodged. The rock wall behind her was cut open like tofu. “Interesting, are you the strongest human right now?”The pitch-black puppet laughed strangely, and its voice was like an owl. “You’re very strange.”Ye Lijiang frowned. This puppet was obviously completely out of Shadow’s control, and even its strength was not much different from Shadow’s. Shadow could actually create such a powerful creation? When Ying heard ye Lijiang’s voice, he did not say a word and went straight for the origin of the two secret realms. The pitch-black mannequin was his best masterpiece. The Best Diamond Wood, the most exquisite heavenly thunder stone, and all kinds of peerless treasures were gathered together to create such a mannequin. And when such a mannequin was combined with the black gas that Ying used to restrain it. The combination of the two, formed even the shadow did not expect a huge change! A puppet actually had intelligence! “However, it doesn’t matter anymore...;” “As long as I can obtain the origin of the secret realm, my puppet manipulation technique can go one step further. At that time, I will definitely be able to create even more powerful pitch-black puppets!” Shadow looked at the two huge shells less than ten meters in front of him. When he saw the rainbow light that entered his eyes, his eyes were filled with greed. He stretched out his hand and opened one of the shells, grabbing the seven-colored pearl in it. And when he wanted to get close to the other shell and seize the second origin of the mystic realm...; He felt a huge figure falling from the top of his head. He was stunned for a moment. He looked up and saw that it was the armored alligator snapping turtle. The veins on Ying’s forehead bulged. This armored alligator snapping turtle had a f * cking grudge with him! With so many people here, it was looking for trouble! However, at this time, the armored snapping turtle suddenly appeared. Shadow had no choice but to come up with a countermeasure. Its opponent was not a monster that could be easily destroyed. Instead, it was a powerful tier 9 monster. The tier 9 monster fell from a high altitude. Even he would not be able to withstand this long-planned attack. Moreover, he had already been injured by the armored alligator snapping turtle. If he were to take another hit now, his HP would drop significantly. He had always been a cautious person. He would never put himself in danger. Having less than 60% hp was his bottom line. Hence, he had to dodge this attack! Shadow gritted his teeth and slowed down a little. It was this brief deceleration that caused shadow to slow down by at least a second before he could touch the secret realm’s origin. In this short second, another figure jumped down from the armored alligator snapping turtle. He grabbed the other origin of the mystic realm in his hand! Ying was stunned. He looked up and saw that it was poison blade, one of Lin Xuan’s clones! Poison Blade was still smiling and said, “Thank you.” Then, he put the origin of the mystic realm into his space of consciousness and in the blink of an eye, it was in Lin Xuan’s hand. Ying almost ground his teeth. “Lin Xuan!” He roared at the sky. Originally, these two mystic realm origin belonged to him. But now, he only obtained one and the other one was actually obtained by Lin Xuan! This was a huge loss! Moreover, a thought flashed through Ying’s mind. Why did the armored alligator snapping turtle appear twice and disturb him. This time, Lin Xuan’s clone followed closely behind the armored alligator snapping turtle. A normal monster’s brain would not be able to react like this. They would only attack all humans crazily. This kind of situation where the monster only stared at him was extremely difficult to happen. Moreover, the monster would instinctively seek the advantage and avoid the disadvantage. The black fluid at the bottom of the deep pit would cause continuous damage. Anyone could see it at a glance, and the same was true for the monster. But this armored snapping turtle really came down! Could it be that the armored snapping turtle was Lin Xuan’s...; Pet? But this was not right. How could a mere level 8 warrior tame a level 9 monster. “No matter what, no matter how many trump cards you have, I will never let go of that arcane realm origin!” Looking at the poison blade avatar that disappeared on the spot, Ying suddenly jumped up. He actually jumped more than 50 meters in one leap! After jumping several times with the help of the rock wall, he rapidly approached the ground! Seeing this scene, ye Lijiang, who was fighting with the pitch-black puppet, narrowed his eyes and shouted. “Lin Xuan, run!” Hearing this, Lin Xuan turned around and ran without hesitation. Now, almost everyone was entangled. Ji Ruyue and AOR’s battle was equally matched. Both of them were already covered in injuries. Lu Pinghai and Lu Pingjiang were entangled with the shadow puppets. It was difficult to determine the victor. Ye Lijiang was fighting with the pitch-black puppets. It was hard to see who had the upper hand for a short period of time. Wan youxi and Xiang Shensi were fighting with some of Simon and sky feather craftsmen’s mechanical creations. They could not find any gaps either. At this time, no one could help Lin Xuan. The only one who could help him was himself! Ying Yi jumped back to the ground and saw Lin Xuan running wildly. He sneered and immediately chased after him. Ying was an assassin. His main focus was agility, while his secondary focus was spirit. His agility was extremely high, far surpassing Lin Xuan’s. If Lin Xuan was simply escaping, there was no way he could escape from Ying’s grasp. Without hesitation, Lin Xuan immediately used his avatar and summoned all of his clones. Shield ghost, flame burst, Poison Blade, cold domain, Milk Bro! Five clones, escaping in five different directions! He could switch between the clones and his main body at will. No matter which one Ying chased, his main body would eventually survive. “You have clones, I have mannequins!” Ying sneered and flipped his palm. Five puppets of different materials landed beside him. These puppets were made of various materials by Ying over the years. There was wood, metal, and even glass. In the end, he found the two most suitable materials for making puppets, Diamond Wood and Heavenly Thunder Stone. However, Heavenly Thunder Stone was produced in the Angel Fortress under the control of the Salvation Society and was difficult to obtain. Lin Xuan looked behind him and saw this scene. He smiled bitterly in his heart. That’s right. Ying had a puppet manipulation technique. The puppets that Ying created were not much different from his clones, except that they were not very intelligent, could not shift positions, and were completely destroyed after death. “Run, I want to see where you can run to!” Ying Kuang chased after him relentlessly, laughing coldly. The map of the Drowned City quickly appeared in Lin Xuan’s mind, and he quickly locked onto a few places. “At the current distance, his slowest puppet will need at least ten minutes to catch up to me. I can use lightning speed and flash, and I can still delay for another six minutes or so.” “Sixteen minutes of distance...; I got it, the Imperial City Administrative Office! There’s a bomb there!” Lin Xuan instantly had a target, and he headed straight for the administrative office. The management office was widely distributed in the drowning city. Among them, the outer city district had the most, followed by the inner city district. The Imperial City district had the least, and there was only one management office. However, since it was the management office of the royal family of the Sea clan, its defense force must be stronger. It might even have treasures that Lin Xuan had never seen before. However, the location of this management office was a little off. In addition, after entering the imperial city district, they encountered a black light that soared into the sky not long after. The Imperial City’s Protective Shield was weakened, and all the warriors gathered toward the Imperial City District, naturally, Lin Xuan did not have the time to look for the management office here. But now, this management office that he had never been to before might be able to save his life! “He seems to have a lot of confidence.” Shadow one was doing five things at once. While controlling the puppets, he could also see the direction where Lin Xuan and his five avatars were running in. For some reason, he saw calmness and calmness from Lin Xuan. There was no panic at all. Logically speaking, a tier 8 martial artist was being chased by a Tier 9 martial artist, especially when the opponent was the leader of a large organization like shadow. This tier 8 martial artist could not calm down at all. It was already good enough that he did not kneel on the ground and surrender. Lin Xuan did not immediately reveal his direction. Instead, he had his brother-in-law run wildly in the direction of the administrative office of the Imperial City District. His main body and four avatars were running in five completely different directions. When his brother-in-law’s avatar arrived at the administrative office, he immediately used his avatar to switch between his main body and his brother-in-law’s avatar! In the blink of an eye, he was standing in front of the huge gate of the administrative office. The one chasing after this doppelganger was shadow’s No. 4 puppet. However, even the No. 4 puppet had the combat strength of a Tier 9 level 1 martial artist. With Lin Xuan’s current strength, he was unable to take two consecutive attacks from the No. 4 puppet. Moreover, this was under the premise that he was not stingy with the effects of the Overlord set. However, this equipment was almost equivalent to a life, so how could Lin Xuan give it up so easily. The fourth puppet sneered as it chased after him, and let out a hoarse voice. “Is this where you have the confidence?” Ying sneered even more. He had long tried to push open the doors of the buildings in drowning city to see if there were any treasures inside. However, the weight of the doors was far beyond his expectations. Ying estimated that at least ten level nine warriors with a bit of strength would be needed to forcefully push open the doors. Without hesitation, Lin Xuan took out the seven-headed sea snake mirror from his space of consciousness. The seven heads of the sea snake shot out a dazzling light. The next moment, the huge door actually opened a crack with a rumble, just enough to accommodate one person! Lin Xuan looked back at the No. 4 doll and rushed into the administrative office of the Imperial City District. At the same time, the huge door stopped opening and closed at a constant speed. When Ying saw this scene, he was stunned. He could actually...; control the opening and closing of the huge door? What was that bronze mirror? Could it be the keepsake to open the door? After a short moment of shock, Ying revealed a look of great joy. He did not expect Lin Xuan to have such a good thing. If he killed him and seized that strange bronze mirror, wouldn’t he be able to open the many buildings that drowned the city? Ying was anxious. Puppet number four sped up and rushed into the management office before the huge door closed. Puppet number four did not see Lin Xuan in the hall on the first floor, but with the puppet’s instinct, it quickly locked onto the trail left by Lin Xuan and headed straight for the second floor. However, just as he reached the center of the hall, the ground suddenly sank and a large number of earth thorns appeared! The number four puppet was caught off guard and one of its right arm was directly shattered by the Earth Thorns. “There’s actually a trap? No, such a large earth thorn should be left by these giants!” Ying Xin was shocked and immediately controlled the number four puppet with a broken arm to chase after him. He instinctively sensed something was wrong! However, when he came to the second floor, he found that it was full of huge spheres, but he could not see Lin Xuan’s figure. “These spheres...; What are they?” Ying tried hard to identify them, but he could not see what they were. The only thing he could feel was that these spheres contained a threat, a huge threat! “You’re about to lose a puppet.” At this moment, a voice came from the windowsill. Lin Xuan stood there and chuckled. Puppet number four suddenly burst out. However, he had only taken two steps when a large number of vines suddenly appeared out of nowhere on the walls around him. They wrapped around his feet like green pythons. In the blink of an eye, puppet number four was wrapped up like a mummy. PFFT! PFFT! However, puppet number four’s reaction was also very fast. His left hand was as sharp as a razor as he quickly cut through the vines that entangled him. However, as he cut faster, the vines appeared even faster. Puppet number four tried his best to move forward, but after a few seconds, he only managed to move a dozen meters. And in the Imperial City administrative center that was a few hundred meters tall, this distance was practically negligible. At this moment, through the eyes of the No. 4 puppet, Ying suddenly saw that the outer shells of the giant spheres around him began to peel off. Then, from the edges and gaps of the outer shells, some blazing light was projected. It was as if a majestic energy was rapidly expanding at the core of the sphere! Ying’s pupils suddenly constricted. Lin Xuan stood on the windowsill and leaped out! “Fifty-nine, fifty-eight, fifty-seven...;” Lin Xuan turned on the lightning speed and ran at full speed. Once the flash cooldown was over, he quickly used it. Within a minute, he had pulled away more than eight thousand meters. “Three, two, one!” Lin Xuan suddenly turned his head. He was shocked to see that the management center of the Imperial City had suddenly burst into flames! Boom! The violent bombs directly exploded the entire management center into pieces! Under the blazing flames, the body of puppet number four was also annihilated, turning into a small piece of charcoal. “I wonder what the sea tribe used to make such a large bomb. It can even be used at a depth of 1,000 meters.” Lin Xuan clicked his tongue in wonder, then turned around and fled towards the inner city. The moment puppet number four died, Ying felt a sharp pain in his brain. He felt a burst of pain, and his footsteps slowed down as he chased after Lin Xuan’s clone. The puppet manipulation technique required one to rely on the puppet to control it. In this way, shadow could share vision, hearing, smell, and even use the puppet to speak. However, the disadvantage was that when the puppet died, that thread of spirit would be cut off, causing the main body’s spirit to suffer a backlash, and it was extremely painful. After becoming a rank 9 martial artist, shadow had not experienced the pain of the puppet’s death for a long time. Now, it was a level eight warrior who had caused the puppet’s death! “Good Boy...;” Ying patted his head and quickly calmed his mind down. He continued to pursue. As long as he continued to pursue, Lin Xuan would not have time to use the origin of the mystic realm. As long as he pursued, he would have the chance to obtain the origin of the mystic realm. Therefore, he would never give up! Shadow took out a blue leaf from his pocket and crushed it gently. The blue powder seemed to have spirituality as it gathered on his feet. His other four puppets also had blue powder wrapped around their feet. It was extremely mystical. “The blue leaf from the dragon mountain range can greatly increase the speed after being crushed. This bonus can not only be seen on the user, but also on the user’s pets, puppets, puppets, weapons, and many other items.” Ying’s expression was calm. The production of the blue leaves was extremely low. He had spent a lot of money to buy two pieces from the previous pope. The next moment, Ying stomped on the ground, and the other four puppets also stomped on the ground. Their speed increased explosively! In the blink of an eye, they broke through dozens of meters! Lin Xuan noticed this scene and was slightly shocked. As expected of the leader of the Gaotian Plains, he really had many tricks up his sleeve. He had thought that destroying one of Ying’s mannequins would make him retreat. Now, the other party had used something that caused the main body and the four mannequins to suddenly accelerate. It was obvious that he was unwilling to give up. “Then let’s see how many mannequins you destroy before it’s a pity!” Lin Xuan sneered and dashed toward the management office closest to him in the inner city district. Because he had triggered the bomb and destroyed the mannequins, he was much further away from Ying and the four mannequins. The distance between them was increased, and Lin Xuan let out a sigh of relief. He no longer felt like he had been stabbed in the back. However, this situation only lasted for about thirty minutes. Ying’s second mannequin caught up. The second mannequin was made of Maple Cherry Wood. This kind of wood was not strong, but it was light. Even the Maple Sakura Wood that had just been cut down could float on the surface of the water. Unlike Diamond Wood and iron wood, which would sink directly into the water. The second puppet was not strong, but was good at speed. After that, Shadow, puppet number one, puppet number three, and puppet number five all appeared in Lin Xuan’s and his doppelganger’s field of vision. However, the outline of the management office had already appeared in front of Lin Xuan’s eyes. He did the same thing, using the seven-headed sea snake mirror to open the management office’s door and directly rushed in. Puppet number two also followed closely behind. Poison gas! Fire! Lightning! Under Lin Xuan’s control, several mechanisms directly launched a counterattack against puppet number two. However, puppet number two’s reaction speed was far faster than he had expected. Poison gas and lightning had no effect on it. The only thing that could cause damage to puppet number two was the fire. However, before the fire could be spat out, puppet number two accelerated and directly left the fire far behind. Lin Xuan exclaimed in his heart. As expected of the leader of the Takama-ga-hara. After suffering a loss for the first time, he immediately learned a lesson. Before the trap was set, the puppet had already evaded it. Lin Xuan, on the other hand, stayed in place for a moment because he pressed the buttons of the traps, which delayed him for a while. The distance between him and puppet number two was instantly shortened. “Die!” Puppet Number Two’s palm was like a knife, slashing down fiercely. Before the knife landed, Lin Xuan activated his avatar and swapped his real body with the shield ghost avatar in the blink of an eye. The one chasing the doppelganger was puppet No. 1. At this moment, the distance between puppet No. 1 and the doppelganger was the furthest between Lin Xuan’s doppelganger and the Doppelganger. PFFT. The doppelganger was the only one who had appeared under puppet No. 2’s attack. Facing the fierce attack, the doppelganger only managed to block it for a moment. “Huh?”Shadow asked in surprise. “Why is the HP of this person’s doppelganger so high? Even my puppet’s full-powered attack wasn’t able to insta-kill him.” Of course, he did not know that Lin Xuan’s doppelganger had inherited 100% of the original body’s attributes, including its HP. Tier 8, Level 4. With 584 points of super-high vitality and the 5 times HP provided by the Class Skill Dominator’s blood. The HP of Lin Xuan and his five doppelgangers was ridiculously high! “Since I can’t kill them with one slash, let’s do it again!” Shadow one used five minds and slashed down with his palm blade once more. However, Lin Xuan smiled strangely. Before Shadow’s palm blade landed, he had already dispelled his shield ghost doppelganger. <b>?</b>The second puppet’s palm strike struck the air, almost causing the second puppet to lose its balance on the spot. Ying frowned slightly. “Self-dispelling clones? It’s similar to death. There are only four left now. It’s impossible for him to summon new clones within a short period of time.” Puppet Number Two did not stop. It quickly approached the nearby flame burst clones. Lin Xuan continued to move forward, his expression unperturbed. Throwing away a car to protect himself was obviously the best choice when facing a powerful opponent like Ying. He had been holding onto this thought since the beginning of his escape. But how to throw away a car was also a science. When the clone died, the skills would enter a long cooldown. Even if his skill was upgraded from the clone technique to the advanced clone technique and then to the avatar, the punishment of the clone’s death would always be there. However, there was a huge difference between removing the clone on his own and the clone dying. Removing the clone on his own would return 60% of the cooldown time. When the clone died, it would have a 200% penalty cooldown time! Just now, before the second palm strike of Puppet No. 2 landed, Lin Xuan had already removed his shield ghost doppelganger. He had always kept this in mind. “Shadow’s biggest problem is that he is not familiar with my moves. This is also the biggest reason why I was able to escape in the end!” Lin Xuan was full of confidence as he advanced rapidly towards the next management office. As he advanced, he attacked, slowed down, and destroyed Shadow’s doppelganger through various methods. As puppet No. 2 was more focused on speed, its defense was not strong, and Lin Xuan took care of it. Two hours later, Puppet No. 2 chased Lin Xuan into the management center of the fifth district of the inner city. It was attacked by the drowned corpses of the sea tribes that Lin Xuan had deliberately attracted. Puppet No. 2 had to dodge the attacks of these huge drowned corpses. The moment it soared into the air, Lin Xuan controlled the cage in the management center to fall down and cover puppet No. 2’s head. Just this short delay was enough for the drowned corpses of the sea tribes to smash puppet No. 2 into pieces. After puppet No. 4 was destroyed by the bomb, Puppet No. 2 was crushed by the drowned corpses of the sea tribes! Another two hours passed. Lin Xuan’s flame burst avatar and brother-in-law avatar were caught up. Lin Xuan deactivated them on his own. With the help of the two avatars, he ran all the way from the inner city to the outer city. Ying and the other three puppets were still chasing after him. Lin Xuan used the same trick again, but he did not target the puppets directly. Instead, he detonated the bomb in the management center in advance to create chaos and attract the drowning corpses to buy himself time. Puppets No. 1 and No. 5 were entangled. Only Ying and No. 3 were still chasing after him. Three hours later. Lin Xuan’s cold domain clone was caught up, so Lin Xuan deactivated it again. He took the opportunity to escape drowning city, and swam towards the surface of the sea with the pink pearl in his mouth. Now, in Ying’s eyes, he no longer had any clones! He had fallen into a long cooldown time! Of course, Ying did not know that Lin Xuan’s skill was actually a seven-colored immortal-grade skill, and the cooldown time was quite low. Moreover, Lin Xuan’s clones were not dead. They were dispelled by themselves, and the cooldown time would be returned. Lin Xuan had always been in a state where he could continue to use his clones, but he had never done so. He wanted Ying to misjudge him and think that he was in a long cooldown time. At this moment, Ying chased him all the way but did not manage to touch a single hair on Lin Xuan’s head. His expression was extremely sullen. However, when he saw that Lin Xuan had actually run out of the drowning city’s range, he immediately sneered in his heart. With the terrain of the drowning city, as well as the bombs and traps, Lin Xuan might be able to buy some time. However, after entering the endless sea water, without any obstruction, shadow and puppet number three’s speed could immediately increase. How was Lin Xuan going to run? Lin Xuan turned his head and smiled. As he moved forward, he threw down stones that were flashing with lightning. These stones were very strange. They did not sink or float. They just floated in the sea water strangely, drifting with the current of the sea. “Thunder Stone?” Ying saw the appearance of the stone from afar. With his ability, he naturally recognized it at a glance as a specialty of the construction department’s Super Mystic Realm, the Falling Thunder Mountain. The Thunder Stone Marrow was the most compatible source of energy for the defense towers of the construction department. “Why did he release the Thunder Stone Here?” Ying frowned deeply and cautiously avoided the thunder stone. After Lin Xuan swam for thousands of meters, he immediately urged the energy that he had injected into the thunder stone ahead of time. The Thunder Stone exploded on the spot and released a terrifying energy as well as...; a loud sound! The Thunder Stone was very special. It looked like a stone that was wrapped with lightning and nothing special. But in fact, the lightning energy inside it was colliding all the time. As long as a trace of other types of energy was injected into it, the Thunder Stone would rapidly expand and explode. However, one had to have a very meticulous grasp of the energy in order to achieve this. Otherwise...; in most cases, the Thunder Stone would definitely explode in one’s hand the moment the energy was injected. At that time, it would not be the enemy that would explode, but one’s own people. Roar! A long, indistinct moan was heard from the deep, dark bottom of the sea. It was ethereal, ancient, and ancient. As long as one heard that sound, one would feel as if one’s mind and body were blank, and any distracting thoughts would be cleansed completely. “As expected! The sea beasts are here!” Lin Xuan patted his head and quickly threw this thought out of his mind. Then, he sped up and swam in a certain direction. He had deliberately used the Thunder Stone to make a loud noise, not to set off firecrackers for fun, but to attract the attention of the sea beasts. The Sea Beasts’strength was not equal, but the weakest one was at least at the ninth rank. In the eyes of the ninth rank sea beasts, Shadow and puppet number three would pose a threat. And Lin Xuan was just a mere eighth rank martial artist, so he could not pose a threat at all. Lin Xuan had deliberately lured the sea beasts out to continue disturbing shadow and puppet number three, so as to buy time for himself. “Damn it! That damn thing is coming towards me!” Ying looked down and immediately saw a bright light coming from below, followed by a huge mouth that was gushing towards him. The size of that mouth was far beyond what Ying could see in this lifetime. It was at least more than five hundred meters! It was densely packed with teeth, three circles on the inside and three circles on the outside. It was simply like a Shredder! This sea beast had an ugly appearance. There was a small flesh worm on its head, and the top of the small flesh worm was a glowing tumor. It was a deep-sea Monkfish! Ying felt a terrifying pressure. He did not hesitate and decisively pushed the third puppet over. He used the rebound force to quickly escape from the range of the Monkfish’s big mouth. When the third puppet was about to fall into the monkfish’s mouth, he did not hesitate and directly detonated it! Boom! The energy core inside the No. 3 figurine exploded! The Ankang fish let out a scream and lost its balance and fell to the bottom of the sea. The surging water surged. Ying was the closest, so he was affected the most. He grunted and blood flowed out of his mouth and nose. But his speed also increased because of this! He quickly closed the distance between him and Lin Xuan! “Kid, you destroyed five of my figurine in a row. Even among level nine martial artists, very few can do this.” “Even if you die, you can still be proud.” Ying growled and a black tachi appeared in his palm. In the blink of an eye, he drew the saber light and slashed out! This slash seemed to imitate Moses and was about to split the sea water! Lin Xuan immediately used his avatar. In the blink of an eye, five avatars appeared and flashed in five different directions. Then, his main body and avatars kept swapping and shifting positions! PFFT! One doppelganger died. PFFT. The second doppelganger died. Then the third, fourth, and fifth doppelganger died! However, Lin Xuan relied on the exchange of his main body and doppelganger to successfully charge out of the range of the Black Sword Light’s Attack! Ying was stunned. This guy actually had a doppelganger? ! Why did his skills have such a short cooldown time! “However...; now that his doppelgangers are indeed dead, I’m less than a hundred meters away from him. He probably doesn’t have any means to escape anymore.” Ying Xin let out a long breath, as if she saw the dawn of victory. “A mere rank 8 martial artist can actually make me so miserable. I’ll remember today’s lesson.” Ying Xin said. However, she saw that Lin Xuan actually did not give up. At this time, Lin Xuan’s expression was solemn as he looked at the seawater in front of him. “Closer! Closer!” After seeing the color of the seawater in front of him change, Lin Xuan decisively took out a bottle of medicine and poured it into his mouth. He did not hesitate to drill into the seawater that had a strange color! This sea water...; had been completely contaminated by the heart burning poison! And the heart burning poison was a terrifying poison that could even poison tier 9 monsters to death! Shadow only saw the purplish-black color of the seawater from afar. It was very strange, but he did not think too much about it. What kind of danger could there be in the seawater. It could be that the color had changed due to the illumination of the light, or it could be that some monsters had died and dyed the seawater into this strange color. It did not matter. As long as he could kill Lin Xuan and obtain the Secret Realm’s origin, everything would be worth it. Shadow followed closely behind, charging into the purplish-black seawater in one breath. Then.. His expression changed abruptly! His body immediately fell into a state of paralysis. Moreover, the negative status of the ‘Heart Burning Poison’had also appeared on his body. His HP was dropping at a terrifying rate. In the blink of an eye, his HP had fallen to below 60% . Ever since he had become a Tier 9 martial artist, he had not encountered such a situation for a very long time. Even when he had fought the giant Sun Dragon, his HP had only fallen to around 65% . From what he knew, this situation was absolutely dangerous! Moreover, due to this detestable paralyzing effect, even though he knew that he had to rush out of this strange sea as soon as possible, he still could not move. His brain gave the order, but his legs did not listen to his commands. After a long while, he finally lifted half of his foot and took a small step back. Lin Xuan heaved a sigh of relief at this time. He had finally tricked this guy into coming in. The terror of the heart burning poison, he had to use the death of several clones to barely test it out. There was a high probability that Ying would have to hand over the last life-saving item here. “Goodbye.” Lin Xuan waved his hand, turned around and left quickly. Under such circumstances, he still maintained a high degree of vigilance against Ying. The other party was, after all, the leader of one of the six great organizations. Who knew if there were any other offensive methods that could still be used even when the entire body was paralyzed? If he were to peel off his skin for a moment and Ying seized the opportunity to counterattack, it would be too late for him to cry. Therefore, seeing that he had trapped Ying here, Lin Xuan was completely relieved and returned to the drowning city. Ying stared at Lin Xuan’s retreating figure and gnashed his teeth. It was as if he wanted to imprint this young man’s figure in his mind forever. Lin Xuan’s guess was right. He did have another trick. He could trigger it with his mind without any movement. As long as Lin Xuan dared to get close to a certain area, Ying was confident that he could kill Lin Xuan instantly. “Lin Xuan, I will always remember your name. I hope that next time, you can still have so many ways to escape!” Ying took a deep breath and barely took out the ghost Buddha Cup with his fingers. This process was extremely slow due to the paralyzing effect of the heart-burning poison. When an old woman in her seventies or eighties arrived, she would laugh at Ying’s hand speed. Following which, Ying’s HP continued to drop, slowly dropping to 20% . At this moment, the ghostly blue flame finally enveloped him. The ghostly flame blocked all damage from the outside world. Ying’s expression was ice-cold, and he did not say a word. In the end, the ghostly flame completely enveloped him, teleporting him back to the famous Reed Kingdom. In the central square of the Wei Ming country, Ying slowly walked out of the light. The surrounding martial artists all panicked and knelt down. Ying was silent. He turned around and quickly walked out of the central square, heading towards the Asura prison of the Wei Ming country. “Leader doesn’t look too good. What Happened?” “Previously, leader seemed to have brought a group of eighth rank martial artists to the drowning city. Why did he come back early alone?” “I had a strange feeling just now. The leader’s strength seemed to have decreased a little.” “Do you want to die? ! You Dare to say such words?” “No...; it’s really this feeling...; do you guys think that the leader used the Ghost Buddha lamp to teleport back from the drowning city...;” “Shh...; be careful with your words and actions!” The martial artists did not dare to continue speaking and scattered in all directions. At the bottom level of the asura prison. Ying stood there alone, staring at the asura prison that had recovered to its original state. A few months ago, Ye Lijiang and the others had arrived at the Asura prison with the help of the key of the sun and rescued Xiang Qianou and the others. After a huge battle, the asura prison was filled with devastation. However, 24 hours later, the Asura prison had already recovered on its own. However, the news of the Takama-ga-hara ambushing the experts of other organizations and imprisoning them here had already spread widely. With this matter exposed, Gao Tian Yuan naturally didn’t have the face to do it again, so this place was left empty. Ying stared at the bricks and tiles here, suppressing the emotions in his heart. His breathing became extremely steady, not a single thought in his mind. Immediately, he swallowed the secret region origin. “Raise the puppet manipulation technique.” In the next moment, an intense seven colored light burst out from Ying’s body. “The puppet manipulation technique has been raised to the seven-colored undying level and has become...; The Great Yan thousand machine technique!” After a short period of silence, shadow suddenly muttered and exclaimed. He thought for a moment and took out a strange puppet from his storage compartment. Using a puppet to describe it wasn’t very accurate. Because this puppet wasn’t made of wood and stone, it was made of...; Flesh and blood. This puppet had a muscular body and bulky muscles. His face was firm and firm, with distinct edges and corners. It was filled with the strong hormones of a man. There was a rough beard on the sides of his mouth and cheeks, but it did not appear messy. Instead, it had a wild and unbridled beauty. No matter what angle one looked at it from, it was a top-notch muscular beauty. It had a fatal attraction to both men and women. Ying stared at him for a while and immediately averted his gaze. He actually couldn’t help but want to touch the other party’s chest muscles, which had at least reached C level. However, this puppet wasn’t made by Ying himself. Instead, he accidentally found it in a hidden grave at the bottom level of the asura prison. The strange thing was that after the puppet was taken away, the original place didn’t return to its original state. It was as if the flow of time there wasn’t consistent with the other places in the famous reed country. He directly used the art of great augury against the doll. The Art of great augury could give the doll preliminary intelligence. At the same time, it also allowed shadow to multitask and control a large number of dolls. However, the more he controlled, the rougher his control over each doll would become. It was as if he knew what would happen if he used the great development technique on this strange doll. Would there be an unexpected change? After a short silence, the doll’s eyelashes suddenly trembled. Immediately after, the eyeballs under its eyelids started to spin rapidly. It was as if there were little bugs crawling under its eyelids. Shadow lowered his head and saw the doll’s fingers gently flick up. Shadow one was in a daze. He felt that what was in front of him was not a puppet, but a king who had been sleeping for a long time had ended his long sleep and was slowly waking up. “Mm...;” The puppet let out a low voice and opened its eyes. “After such a long time, someone has finally awakened this king.” “Who is it?” A vigorous voice came from his mouth. His tone was dignified and aloof, as if he was a real king. Ying lowered his head to look at the mannequin, not saying a word. He felt a threat from the mannequin, an extreme threat. Just like the white-clothed woman and the black faceless creature he saw in drowning city, it was a life-threatening threat! The mannequin’s gaze wandered around the surroundings, finally landing on Ying. “Your strength is not bad. Was It you who awakened this king? which generation of descendants are you? Who taught you the great development technique?” The mannequin threw out several questions at once, its tiger-like eyes full of might. Ying remained silent. Instead, he sent out an order in his mind to make the mannequin stand up. However, the mannequin did not change at all. Ying’s heart immediately sank to the bottom of the valley. Obviously, he could not control this puppet that was awakened by the great development technique. The puppet frowned his thick black eyebrows and shouted again, “Can’t you hear this king’s Words?” Ying suddenly smiled humbly and bowed deeply to the puppet. “King, I was too excited when I saw you wake up. I actually forgot the etiquette for a moment. Please forgive me.” After saying that, he actually knelt down as if he was really blaming himself. The puppet’s expression was cold. “If there’s a next time, I’ll definitely kill you!” The shadow lowered his eyes and did not say a word. However, his mind was racing as he quickly thought about the possible identity of the puppet. He combined the clues he obtained from the other organizations’super secret realms. Then, he combined it with the fact that the puppet called itself “This king.”. It was not difficult to guess that the other party’s identity was very likely to be the king of the Wei Ming kingdom. The Wei Ming King! Although the Wei Ming King’s High and mighty attitude made Ying very displeased, but the other party had absolute strength now. Ying was not a fool, so he naturally would not seek death. “Moreover...; such a newly awakened Wei Ming king who wanted to kill a meritorious subject without a word, doesn’t seem like a wise master.” “Perhaps I can find an opportunity to seize his power.” Ying was deep in thought. “Tell this king in detail about the current situation. Do not leave out even the slightest detail, or else I will definitely execute him without mercy!”The puppet said sternly. “Yes.” .. Drowning the city. A few hours later, Lin Xuan returned to the drowning city’s Imperial City District. His actions were very cautious, trying his best to minimize his movements. After all, he did not know how the battle was going. If Ji Ruyue won, the construction division would definitely win. But if AOR won and he still showed up, it would be no different from courting death. “There is no sound of battle anymore.” Lin Xuan used his five senses to sense carefully, and found that there was only a low sound of conversation. There was no longer the white-hot sound of battle from before. He let out a long breath. It seemed that Ji Ruyue was indeed confident that she would win this battle. As for ye Lijiang and the others. Lin Xuan being chased by Ying was equivalent to drawing away a powerful level nine warrior. Ye Lijiang and the others would definitely win if nothing unexpected happened. As expected, when Lin Xuan returned here, he saw ye Lijiang and the others bandaging the wounds of the wounded. Seeing Lin Xuan appear, everyone was pleasantly surprised. Tian yucai pounced over happily. “Lin Xuan! You’re actually okay!” The figure in white and the black sword walked over quickly and chuckled. “I told you all to worry too much. Lin Xuan has many tricks up his sleeve. He won’t die so easily.” She knew things that others did not know. The incarnation was a secret of the Kunlun Palace. Moreover, to learn this secret technique, one had to be fated. Without Fate, even a genius would not be able to learn it. Ji Ruyue had tried to comprehend the avatar many times, but after studying it for ten years, she still could not get in. The power of the avatar was beyond everyone’s imagination. Ye Lijiang gave her a look of approval. Lu Pingjiang, Lu Pinghai, and the others were also happy. “Lin Xuan, you have to tell us about yourself. How did you survive the pursuit of Ying?”Wan youxi was very curious and could not help but ask. Lin Xuan scratched his head and could only give them a half-truth explanation. It was really impossible to explain such a bug-like skill like avatar. None of the people present were stupid. They could tell that Lin Xuan’s words were 90% true and 10% false, but they did not say anything. Everyone had their own secrets. Everyone could understand. “Chief executives, and senior Ji, what was the battle just now? Can you tell me about it?”Lin Xuan smiled. Lu Pingjiang patted his chest. “Let me tell you!” After Lu Pingjiang’s exaggerated description, Lin Xuan roughly understood the battle situation just now. Without a shadow, Simon and the two puppets could not hold on by themselves. In the end, Simon’s body was almost cut off, and he used the life-saving trump card of the Angel Fortress, Angel Wings, to barely escape. The two puppets were almost destroyed by ye Lijiang and the others, wan youxi said with a pained expression, “This thing can be studied for a while.”Only then did he manage to save some of the limbs. As for the battle between Ji Ruyue and that dark-skinned aor...; Ji Ruyue did not display her full strength most of the time. Instead, she was constantly testing the other party’s true strength. Ji Ruyue had been planning to completely kill this dark one from the very beginning so that the dark one would not have the slightest ability to escape. It was precisely because of this that she deliberately did not display too much strength. Otherwise, Orr would definitely turn around and run without saying a word. Under Ji Ruyue’s arrangement, Orr was completely defeated. Orr had always thought that he and Ji Ruyue were 50-50. Even if he could not defeat her, he could still run. Therefore, he did not pay too much attention to how much energy he had left. When he realized that he should run as fast as possible, he was already trapped by the formation that Ji Ruyue had quietly set up. There was no way to escape. Both his body and soul were sealed by the formation! “Where is that guy?”Lin Xuan asked. Ji Ruyue gently wiped the ring and took out a fist-sized black ball. There seemed to be an evil soul howling inside. “It’s inside this thing.”Ji Ruyue chuckled. “This thing is very interesting. Maybe it can help me recover a lot of my strength.” “This process should require a lot of...; Super...; Yes, super purifying medicine.”Ji Ruyue was embarrassed for a rare moment, “I really can’t remember this name. According to our Kunlun Palace, it should be called something or something pill.” Lin Xuan couldn’t help but laugh. Ye Lijiang, Wan youxi, and the others were very surprised. Ji Ruyue actually needed the medicine that Lin Xuan made? Ye lijiang asked, “Senior Ji, Lin Xuan, what is super-purifying medicine? Did Lin Xuan research it himself?” Ji Ruyue smiled and nodded. “Yes, Lin Xuan combined the medicine that the sea tribe here has researched with my spiritual Qi to synthesize this super-purifying medicine. It can completely purify the black gas.” Lu Pinghai, Lu Pingjiang, Wan youxi, and Xiang Qianou were ecstatic. Purify the black gas! This was great news. “Lin Xuan, do you still have the super purifying potion? I still have the wounds left by the black gas. The power of aging hasn’t completely subsided,”Lu Pinghai couldn’t help but ask. Lin Xuan nodded. “Yes.” He immediately took out a few bottles of super purifying potion and looked at Wan youxi and the others. “Chief Wan, Senior Xiang, where are you?” “We want it too.”Wan youxi and Xiang Shensi nodded immediately. Before Simon used his angelic wings to leave, black energy actually surged out of his body. He had used that energy to cause a lot of injuries to Wan youxi and the others. Fortunately, he seemed to have only grasped the basics of that energy. He was not like those black-spotted old men who could condense black gas into spears, shields, and other forms to defend against enemies. At this time, Hall, Kodo, and the others also rushed over from all over drowning city. They were very surprised to see this scene. Especially when they saw that Lin Xuan was still alive, they were even happier. Tian yucai could not help but laugh when she saw the construction department agents gathered together. “Lin Xuan...; That guy is really amazing. He is only a level eight warrior, but he can actually play such an important role in the Battle of a level nine warrior.” “From this angle, that guy is quite handsome...;” She sighed in a low voice. “Cai...;” The low voice of the sky feather craftsman suddenly came from her side. Only then did Tian yucai realize that her father was still by her side. She looked a little flustered, and her face turned red. Her father couldn’t have heard her sigh just now, right. “Father, I just...; I just said nonsense!” The Sky Feather Craftsman was stunned for a moment. “What?” Tian yucai,”...; er...; No, I didn’t say anything!” The sky feather craftsman rubbed his temples. “I didn’t hear what you said just now. That’s not what I was going to say.” Tian yucai secretly stuck out her tongue. Only then did she relax. “Then what are you going to say, Father?” The Sky Feather Craftsman smiled bitterly, “You have a secret realm in your body...; The origin of the secret realm, right? Ying wants to cut you open for that thing. Even if I block him, he will kill me as well. I Can’t go back to the Gaotian Plains now.” Tian yucai rolled her eyes. “Isn’t that simple? Stay in the construction department!” The Sky Feather Craftsman was stunned. “This...;” He was born in the Gaotian Plains and grew up in the Gaotian plains. He had worked with Ying for dozens of years. After such a long time, if he left the Gaotian plains forever, it seemed like he couldn’t get over it emotionally. “The construction department welcomes anyone, even if they don’t choose to join us for the time being.”Ye Lijiang suddenly walked over and said with a smile. The Skyfeather Craftsman bowed slightly. “Chief Ye...; Then, sorry for disturbing you during this period of time.” “Oh right, Cai, can you still take out the origin of the arcane realm? You Shouldn’t bring this thing with you. I think you should give it to the person who needs it.”The Skyfeather Craftsman hesitated for a moment and looked at his daughter. Skyfeather cai stretched out her hand, and the seven-colored pearl quietly lay in her palm. Although this thing had entered her mouth, when she had the intention to take it out, she could quickly take it out without any hindrance. “I don’t know why it chose me, but...; I’m just a logistics warrior. I’m not born to go to the front line. Chief Ye, I’ll leave it to you,”she said seriously. Ye Lijiang looked at her deeply, “I won’t take your thing. The construction division is a place that emphasizes contribution.” Tian yucai firmly handed the origin of the secret realm to her. “Chief Ye, it’s more important than me having it.” <b>?</b>Ye Lijiang nodded heavily. “Okay, on behalf of the construction department, Thank you.” Lin Xuan also saw this scene and scratched his head. Should he hand over the origin of the arcane realm? Hand it over...; After all, he had been running for his life and had spent a lot of effort to get it. If he didn’t hand it over...; it didn’t make sense. Just as Tian Yu Cai said, a level 9 martial artist had the origin of the secret realm, which was totally different from a level 8 martial artist. If ye Li Jiang used it to upgrade a powerful skill to seven-colored immortal, his battle strength would definitely soar, and he might even surpass other level 9 martial artists! At this time, ye Lijiang walked to his side, patted his shoulder, and said with a chuckle, “Don’t worry, let’s go over there and talk.” Lin Xuan was startled, but he immediately nodded. The two of them walked to a stone pillar, a thousand meters away from the crowd. “Don’t worry, I’ve said it before, the construction division distributes according to work. Whoever contributes the most will receive the resources. In this battle, you used yourself as bait to lure Ying away, and your contribution is extremely great.” “Moreover, you were able to survive Ying’s pursuit. It means that your strength far exceeds that of a level eight warrior.” “From these two aspects, this arcane realm’s origin is also a great improvement for the organization.” “This arcane realm’s origin is only one of them. We will reward you later.” Without waiting for Lin Xuan to speak, ye Lijiang made it clear that Lin Xuan did not need to worry. Lin Xuan finally let out a sigh of relief. If ye Lijiang really wanted the origin of this mystic realm, he really did not know what to say. “However, I think you will have a new problem when you go back.”Ye Lijiang suddenly chuckled. Lin Xuan was stunned. “What?” “Shield Ghost, flame burst, cold domain, brother milk, and poison blade are all top tier level eight warriors in our construction department. Now they have all become your clones. Tell me, how many people will be surprised and how many people will find you to settle the score?”Ye Lijiang teased, which was rare. Lin Xuan couldn’t help but laugh. Indeed. Shield ghost and poison blade each had their own charm. Although the five people had different faces, they were all handsome. Many female officers in the construction department were fond of these five clones. Previously, when the news that Poison Blade was Lin Xuan’s clone was spread out, many female officers were very angry. They even threw a small note to Lin Xuan’s dormitory in the middle of the night, asking Lin Xuan to hand over their husbands. “Let’s go home!” Ye Lijiang patted him on the shoulder and walked toward the crowd. .. The Salvation Society. Outside the gate of the secret realm of Angel Fortress Stood Angel City. Like the Dragon City of the Knights of truth, this was also one of the biggest and most important cities of the Salvation Society. In the office of the leader of the Salvation Society. A well-proportioned white man was sitting on a chair. His face was plain, but his gray short sleeves were full of strong muscles. He was the leader of the Salvation Society, Caius. Simon was standing in front of his desk. Caius tapped on the desk lightly, making a rhythmic sound. The more the leader did not speak, the more uneasy Simon became. “Simon, you don’t have to blame yourself too much.” After a long while, Caius finally spoke. When he said this, Simon immediately heaved a sigh of relief. “Although there were heavy casualties this time, three and four died there. Jack was seriously injured and lost his level. You used angel wings to escape and lost a few pieces of dark gold equipment...;” “Although...; even one of the noble ambassadors died.” “Oh right, I’ve already received all of the Ambassadors’anger, you don’t have to worry.” Hearing this, Simon was even more grateful. The leader was so good! “Although there were so many bad results, our most important strategic goal was still achieved.” “Drowning City and the Black Sea have been connected, the ambassadors can continuously descend from the elemental world to Earth.” Simon said happily, “This way, the ambassadors can directly wipe out the other five organizations. According to the agreement, our Salvation Society will become the ruler of Earth!” Kasius shook his head. “The ambassadors said that there’s a small problem.” Simon was stunned. Kasius looked at him, “According to the ambassadors, the Holy Spirits have found the way to Earth, and the ice race is pushing the door open. If nothing goes wrong, it will open in half a month. The location of the communication is...; the frozen tundra.” “And the ambassadors and the ice clan have never been very happy.” Simon was even more shocked. As the higher-ups of the Salvation Society, the ambassador naturally told them many things. The ambassador called their race dark descendants. And dark descendants, Holy Spirit clan, and Ice clan were the three ruling races in the elemental world. However, the Holy Spirit clan communicated with the Truth Knight Order, while the dark descendants communicated with the Salvation Society. The Holy Spirit clan and the Dark Ones had conflicts and cooperated with each other. However, cooperation was more important than friction. Therefore, the Salvation Society had been working hard to rope in the Truth Knight Legion. As for the ice clan...; didn’t they say that the ice clan only cared about their land and never expanded their territory. “So...; my task is to interfere with the normal opening of the door in the permafrost tundra?”Simon probed. CAOS stood up. “Simon, this is the opportunity that I tried my best to fight for you. If I fail again this time, I won’t be able to bear the wrath of the High Ambassador. You will either become a container or fertilizer.” Simon’s body trembled. It was as if he had thought of something terrifying. “Understood, I’ll go and draw up a plan right now!”Simon said seriously. “Go, I’ll wait for Your Good News.”Kasius nodded slightly. .. Construction Department, Xijing City. It had been a week since the Battle of Drowning City. Lin Xuan stood in the crowd and participated in a grand state funeral. Yuan gang’s body was pieced together again. The sixth chief of the construction department was lying quietly in the coffin. The people were watching silently. Ye Lijiang was the host of the national funeral, but she didn’t say anything. Instead, she looked at Yuan Gang silently for a while, then walked to the coffin and lit a flame. “Yuan Gang, our sixth chief, the Great Defender of the construction department, is immortal.” The quiet flame slowly swallowed the coffin. Countless ashes flew into the sky, making the sunlight a little gray. Lin Xuan sighed lightly. More than a year ago, he had also attended such a funeral. That was ye Yuqiu’s uncle, an old man who had taken the green blood pill heart and forcefully stimulated his vitality to level seven. Lin Xuan did not know how to face it. After all, he and Yuan Gang had never met before. After the funeral, he quickly left. On a high platform in the construction department of Xijing City, he leaned against the railing to welcome the cool morning breeze. He looked down at the bustling streets, the noisy vegetable market, and the bustling crowd. Only then did his mood gradually relax. Da Da. The sound of light footsteps could be heard. He turned around and saw that the other party was still the same. He was wearing a small white suit with a slim-fit pair of jeans. It was ye Yuqiu. “I didn’t expect that other than Lin Xuan, you’re also a shield demon, flame burst, cold domain, Poison Blade, and Milk Bro.” Ye Yuqiu also leaned against the railing and chuckled. Lin Xuan only smiled. The other party’s words were not easy to answer. Ye Yuqiu smiled. “I heard that the directors are already discussing giving you a medal to raise your level as an agent. They also want to reward you with drowning city’s most precious life-substitute prop.” “What About You? What are your plans next? Continue exploring drowning city’s secret realm, strengthen your strength, and try to reach level 9 as soon as possible?” Lin Xuan was about to speak. Their communicators suddenly trembled. “Return to the director-general quickly. It’s important.” They looked at each other and saw the surprise in each other’s eyes. Then, they turned around and rushed to the director-general. Xijing City Construction Department conference hall. When Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu arrived here, there weren’t many people. Other than ye Lijiang and a few other level nine warriors, there were only Hall, Kodo, and other level eight warriors. There weren’t many level seven warriors yet. Ye Lijiang saw them and nodded slightly. Then, his gaze stopped on Ye Yuqiu for a moment. “Yuqiu, what level are you at?” Ye Yuqiu was silent for a moment. “Level seven, level nine. I’m still short of a level eight promotion quest.” Ye Lijiang nodded. “Not bad. I hope you can complete the promotion quest after this trip to the permafrost tundra.” Ye Yuqiu did not continue speaking. Lin Xuan raised his eyebrows. The tone of their conversation...; seemed a little familiar. Both of their surnames were Ye. Could they be mother and daughter. However, Ye Yuqiu had never mentioned this topic, and Lin Xuan did not intend to ask. For Ye Yuqiu to have a mother as the head of the construction department, it must have been a lot of pressure for her. “Let’s sit here.” Ye Yuqiu led Lin Xuan to a seat at the back of the conference table. Coincidentally, Hall and Kodo were also here. Kodo scratched his head. “We just came back from drowning city, and now we’re going out to fight again. Lin Xuan, are you tired too? You really want to rest.” Lin Xuan coughed lightly. “I think it’s okay.” Kodo glared at him and said in a low voice, “Kid, you don’t even know how to fish!” Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. “Are we going to the permafrost tundra this time?”He asked. Hall nodded. “Yes, I heard that the Grand Marshal of the Arctic Army personally sent a message to chief ye saying that the permafrost tundra’s situation is special and needs the help of the construction department. I hope that the construction department will take into account our previous relationship and help us.” Kodo scratched his head. “Two commanders of the Arctic Army died in the Dragon Mountain Range to help the construction department. I have to help them even if I don’t have to.” “What is the permafrost tundra?”Lin Xuan asked. “It’s too cold there. To be honest, it’s only suitable for the Arctic army who can withstand the cold. I’m not willing to go there even if the resources are abundant.”Hall coughed dryly. “So, I don’t know anything about the permafrost tundra.” Lin Xuan looked at Kodo again. Kodo shrugged. “Don’t look at me. I used to be a member of the Salvation Society. I don’t need to say more about the relationship between the Salvation Society and the Arctic Army, right?” The four of them burst out laughing. If the Salvation Army and the construction division were enemies, then they were friends. Then the Salvation Army and the Arctic army had always been enemies. It was said that decades ago, the Arctic army was very powerful. It was because they had fallen into the Salvation Army’s trap that their strength had plummeted. Now, their strength had been greatly reduced. Now, the Arctic army and the construction division had joined hands to compete with the Salvation Army. “Let me tell you.”Ye Yuqiu smiled. “I’m more familiar with the information about the permafrost tundra.” “The area of the permafrost tundra is ranked in the top three of all the super-large secret realms. However, because a large number of items are under the ice, it appears to be poor in resources.” “Moreover, almost all the monsters in the permafrost tundra have rough skin and thick flesh. Ordinary physical skills are difficult to deal damage to them. Magic or elemental skills are required, but most of the people who possess such skills are mage professionals. It is very difficult for mage professionals to fight against the monsters in the permafrost tundra alone.” “As time goes on, fewer and fewer people from other organizations apply to the Arctic army to enter the permafrost tundra to explore “Up until now, only the Arctic army and a few small and medium-sized organizations near it would enter the permafrost tundra to explore on a regular basis “However, the permafrost tundra is also relatively safe.”Ye Yuqiu smiled. “There hasn’t been any movement for so many years. I’ve never heard of any monsters breaking out of the secret realm.” Lin Xuan and the other two nodded their heads slightly. “Are there any specialties in the frozen tundra? Do you have life substitution tools?”Kodo rubbed his head. “Yes!” Ye Yuqiu said resolutely, “The frozen heart of eternal winter. Using this item will completely freeze you, isolating you from all attacks from the outside world. It requires at least six or more tier 9 fighters to use their full strength to break it.” “During the period of being frozen by Eternal Winter Ice Heart, your HP, Mana, and energy recovery speed will increase by 1,000% for a maximum of 10 minutes.” Hall and Kodo were delighted to hear this. This was a good item! “In addition to eternal winter ice heart, there is also extreme frost ice heart. The effect is similar to the yellow leaf effect of the dragon mountain range. After using it, you will definitely block an attack,”ye Yuqiu added. Eternal Winter Ice Heart, Extreme Frost Ice Heart.. Lin Xuan secretly memorized these two names. “Lin Xuan! Yuqiu!” A silver bell laughed. The two turned around and saw that it was Lu Luo, Xiang tianxiu, and the others who had also walked into the meeting room. Lin Xuan took a look and found that Lu Luo’s level had already reached level 7 or 8. Xiang Tianxiu was even higher, and just like Ye Yuqiu, he had also reached level 7 or 9. Xiang Tianxiu noticed his gaze and smiled proudly, “Your level has indeed increased quickly, but I haven’t been idle either!” Bang! A loud bang came down on the spot. Xiang Tianxiu’s tears almost fell. He jumped up and turned around to roar. “Who! who the F * ck Dares to hit me? !” Xiang Qianyi crossed his arms and looked at him, “What?” Xiang Tianxiu covered her head and said angrily, “Mom! Don’t go too far! If you weren’t my mom, I would definitely...;” “Definitely what?”Xiang Qianmu glanced at him coldly. ”...; I would definitely not dare to speak to you so loudly...;”Xiang Tianxiu’s tone instantly froze. The surrounding people immediately burst into friendly laughter. The atmosphere, which was originally somewhat stifling, gradually became much more lively. “Everyone is here. Let’s start the meeting.” Ye Lijiang lightly knocked on the table. Shua Shua Shua. People entered their seats one after another. In this meeting room, all the level nine martial artists, as well as the most elite level eight and level seven martial artists were gathered. In addition, there was a participant with an extraordinary status. The white-clothed black sword, the Young Palace Master of Kunlun Palace, Ji Ruyue. She did not sit at the conference table. Instead, she sat at the end of the conference table and looked into ye Lijiang’s eyes. Ye Lijiang said seriously, “The commander-in-chief of the Arctic Army personally sent me an invitation, claiming that several places in the frozen tundra had somehow turned from the tundra into deep ice pools “More importantly, after those ice pools appeared, the Monsters of the frozen tundra began to attack those ice pools.” Lu Pingjiang scratched his head. “Sister Ye, this...; is a little brainless.” Ye lijiang continued, “The commander-in-chief of the Arctic Army told me another thing. Something Strange was giving him a dream.” Lin Xuan was stunned. What the heck, a dream? Ji Ruyue had not paid much attention to this topic, but when she heard the dream, she was suddenly energized. “It’s not a rare thing to have a dream. The Kunlun Palace and the Heavenly Dragon Temple often use this method to send messages to mortals,”she said with a chuckle. “In essence, it’s a way for powerful creatures to communicate with weak creatures, but they are unwilling to show themselves directly.” Lin Xuan nodded slightly. Ye Lijiang nodded, “The content of the dream is very interesting. The grand marshal said that there was a giant ice bear in the dream that told him that the ice pond was very important and gave birth to the children of the ice clan. If the Arctic army can protect the ice pond, the ice clan will not mistreat them “The next day, the grand marshal found that he had an additional power called the power of the Ice Bear in his body. This power allowed him to be closer to the ice. Using any ice skills would greatly increase the power and reduce the loss of mana or energy.” “According to the grand marshal himself, with the addition of the power of the ice bear, his overall strength increased by about 10% .” “Hiss...;” The meeting room was filled with gasps of cold air. The Grand Marshal of the Arctic army was not like Jack, who had just advanced to rank 9 and was now a rank 8 or rank 9 martial artist because he used the Ghost Buddha Cup. The Grand Marshal was a powerful rank 9 or rank 8 martial artist. When he was first promoted, he had single-handedly defeated nine commanders and won the respect of everyone in the Arctic army. At this level, the main powerful skills and main powerful equipment had almost all been upgraded. It was very difficult for his strength to increase any further. Even a 1% increase was something worth celebrating. And the ice bear strength that the ice clan had given him had increased his strength by 10% overnight! Ye Lijiang was very satisfied with everyone’s reaction. She said seriously, “The grand marshal also told me that as long as we can go over and help, we should be able to obtain the ice bear strength that the ice race has given us.” KE duo stood up on the spot. “Chief Ye, you know me. I love to help the most! I’m the one who’s eager for justice and willing to help others. You’re talking about me!” The meeting room burst into laughter. Ye Lijiang smiled. “I’m very happy that everyone is so enthusiastic.” “According to the results of our discussion, all the tier 8 and tier 7 martial artists present will head to the permafrost tundra.” “Lu Pinghai, Xiang Qianyue, and I will be the chief commander.” “There’s still one more day to prepare. Later, the detailed information of the permafrost tundra will be sent to your dormitories. Please prepare carefully.” “Yes!” Everyone nodded solemnly. Ji Ruyue’s interest was piqued. “Should I go?” “Senior ji...; If you’re willing to go, you can go with us. We won’t ask you to do anything,”ye Lijiang said generously. Ji Ruyue nodded. “Alright, then I’ll go and play. It just so happens that I’ve been suffering from indigestion recently.” “Let’s go, Lin Xuan. Come and eat with me.” The meeting had just ended when she pulled Lin Xuan away. “Eat? Indigestion?” Ye Yuqiu raised her eyebrows, feeling very strange. Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. Ji Ruyue had long reached the realm of fasting, so she didn’t need to live in the mortal world. The food she was talking about was actually that unlucky a’er. “I haven’t finished eating after eating for so long. The energy contained in this filth is indeed far beyond my imagination.”In Ji Ruyue’s dormitory, she took out the black ball and smiled knowingly. “Senior, are you used to living here?”Lin Xuan looked around the room. This was specially arranged for her by Ye Lijiang. It was quiet and elegant. Ji Ruyue did not seem to worry about the environment. She had lived here for a week, but the furniture was still the same. Even the position had not changed. “Fortunately, with the Heavenly Dragon Soul Stone, even if I leave Kunlun ruins, my spiritual energy will not dissipate too much.”Ji Ruyue smiled, “In that case, I might as well come out for a walk. After all, I’ve been there for more than a hundred years. I’m already tired of it.” “Alright, quickly purify the rest of the filth. Although I have indigestion, I still want to eat it.”She smiled slyly. At this moment, she was like a greedy little mouse, losing a bit of the dignity of the Young Palace Master of Kunlun Palace. Lin Xuan nodded and took out the super-purifying medicine and poured it on the black ball. A dying scream came out from the black ball. The voice gradually became weaker and eventually dissipated. The black ball also completely turned white at a speed visible to the naked eye. “Eh, it’s dead?”Ji Ruyue fiddled with it and was slightly surprised when she confirmed that there was no black gas in it at all. “According to my agreement with you, I will give you one-fifth of the energy in this.”Ji Ruyue casually pinched and peeled a small ball from the white gas ball and handed it to him, “Take it and eat slowly. Don’t eat too much like me.” Lin Xuan nodded and accepted it. Although this ball of white energy seemed to be very little, it was likely enough for him to level up all the way to level 8 or 9. In this way, the essence obtained by his experience clones could be used to level up his skills. This way, his strength would increase even faster. “By the way, Can You Show Me the origin of the mystic realm you obtained in Drowning City? I’m very curious about what it is,”Ji Ruyue asked. Lin Xuan nodded and took out the seven-colored pearl. Although a week had passed, he did not use it early. It was on him anyway, so he could use it whenever he wanted. “What a strange energy...; It’s a bit like the ten-thousand-year-old spirit herb cultivated in the sect’s spiritual field...; However, this mystic realm origin has many kinds of energy.” “It has the power of the five elements, as well as the mutated powers of lightning, wind, and ice. The more I look at it, the more strange it is!” “No wonder you said that it can improve the quality of skills. If I had taken it when I was still in the refinement stage, I might have been able to master the inner strength of the sect.” Ji Ruyue clicked her tongue in wonder. Lin Xuan was deep in thought. After hearing what Ji Ruyue said, he also somewhat understood. The origin of the mystic realm might be like the Panacea in Ji Ruyue’s eyes. After eating it, one’s comprehension would be full, and they could learn whatever they wanted. “Why don’t you take this thing now, and I’ll guard it for you.”Ji Ruyue chuckled. “Okay.” Lin Xuan swallowed it without thinking. “Improve the advanced observation skill.” In fact, Lin Xuan had been thinking about which skill he should upgrade these days. In fact, compared to warriors of the same level, his attack and defense were not lacking. In fact, he even surpassed them by a large margin. Therefore, after thinking about it, he decided to upgrade advanced observation skill. On the data panel, the words advanced observation skill were shrouded in seven-colored light. When the light dissipated, a new four words appeared under it. All-seeing pupil! —— Name: all-seeing pupil Level: Tier 8, Level 7 Quality: Rainbow Immortal Effect 1: Focus your mind and observe any living or dead objects. Effect 2: see through most illusions and illusions. Effect 3: Focus on any living object that is lower in level than you. There is a chance to intimidate the other party. The greater the difference in level, the higher the probability of intimidation. Intimidation will reduce the damage of the opponent by 30% . —— Lin Xuan was deep in thought. Can he observe any living creatures? He raised his head and subconsciously used his all-seeing eye to look at Ji Ruyue. The next moment, he saw the data that shocked him. —— Name: Ji Ruyue Level: Level 10, Level 7(original level, level 11, Level 3) Race: Human Class: sword cultivator, talisman cultivator Attributes: Vitality 781, strength 891, spirit 834, agility 846(weakening) Skills: Kunlun sky-patrolling sword technique (seven-colored immortality) , Kunlun heavenly talisman technique (seven-colored immortality) , .. Equipment: heaven-destroying sword (seven-colored immortality) , Kunlun Daoist robe (dark gold legend) , Great Dao Talisman (seven-colored immortality) , .. —— Ji Ruyue had a vigilant look on her face as she covered her chest. “Just now...; I felt a very strange look in my eyes! I think I’ve been seen naked.” Hearing this, Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. However, Ji Ruyue’s perception was too sharp. He had only used the all-seeing eye to look at the data panel, but Ji Ruyue already felt that she was being spied on. If he used this skill on other tier 9 or even tier 10 warriors...; it was very likely that it would also cause the other party to feel that they were being spied on. Lin Xuan was immediately prepared. It seemed that he could not use this all-seeing pupil as he wished. If it aroused the other party’s unnecessary vigilance or even hostility, it would be bad. Lin Xuan immediately explained the matter to Ji Ruyue to prevent her from having unnecessary misunderstandings. After Ji Ruyue heard it, she looked at him in surprise. “I can see the data panel on my body too? Strange, why can’t I See It Myself?” She shook her head in annoyance. “However, this skill of yours is quite strong. You can actually see everything about other people’s cultivation methods and martial techniques.” After a pause, she could not help but exclaim in admiration. Lin Xuan smiled. “I’m leaving. I still have one more day to prepare seriously. Try to raise my level as much as possible.” “Okay.” .. India, in the leader’s office. The leader stood in front of the window in silence. However, a voice was speaking loudly in his mind. “Go! We Must Go!” “We must accept the invitation of the Dark Ones!” “They sensed this king’s presence, but they didn’t show any hostility. Instead, they invited us seriously, hoping that we could join the attack on the ice tribe and the woman in white and Black Sword.” “What does this mean? Can’t you tell?” “They are in awe of my strength! They know that they shouldn’t be enemies with me, so they sincerely invited us!” This voice was full of ambition. The Indian leader frowned, “Your Highness King Jie Ri, but...; I’m worried that they are plotting something.” “Didn’t you say that you can devour the energy in their bodies, and they can devour you too? What if they...;” King Jie ri interrupted him, “Idiot! Can’t you see through the current situation on Earth?” “The connection between the Elemental World and Earth is getting closer and closer day by day. One day, the creatures of the elemental world will be able to come to Earth without any hindrance. At that time, Earth will also become a part of the elemental world.” “The Dark Ones’current target is obviously the ice race, as well as that woman in white and Black Sword in the construction department. If we work together with the Dark Ones, we can obtain the fruits of victory effortlessly.” “When my strength has recovered to the peak, what can a mere dark one do?” After hearing this, the Indian leader struggled in his heart. After a long time, he seemed to have made up his mind. “Good! Your Highness, I’ll listen to your decision!” King Jie ri nodded in satisfaction. “That’s right. You have to have confidence in my strength!” “By the way, what did the Dark Ones Say?” The Indian leader said in a low voice, “The specific situation is arranged by the Salvation Society. They said that we should arrange for elite personnel to set off silently and enter the permafrost tundra through the Angel Fortress. There is a path opened up by the Dark Ones there.” King Jie ri nodded. “Okay, then you make the arrangements. With me in your body, you can at least display...; according to your level, it should be at level 10 or Level 2. Yes, level 10 or Level 2 strength!” Hearing this, the Indian leader immediately had a lot of confidence. “His Highness King Jie Ri is indeed very powerful!”He thought to himself. .. Takama-ga-hara, Shadow’s office. In front of him stood a bald man. The bald man was the shame of Level 9, the Salvation Society’s Jack. Of course, he was currently a level 8 or level 9 martial artist. “Sir Shadow, please seriously consider our alliance. Encircling and annihilating the ice race is the most important thing. The high ambassador does not allow other races to compete for benefits.” Jack was very arrogant at this moment, and his words were not polite at all. There was not the slightest bit of surprise on Ying’s face, but he nodded slightly. “Don’t worry, the Gaotian Plains has always advanced and retreated together with the Salvation Society. Our interests are highly overlapping.” “That’s good. The Salvation Society will welcome you at any time, Sir Ying.”Jack smiled arrogantly. “Oh right, Sir Ying, remember not to make a big fuss. This matter needs to be carried out quietly, and strive to annihilate the ice race elites in one fell swoop!” After saying that, he put on his mask, turned around, and walked out. “How arrogant. If it weren’t for you stopping him, according to this king’s character, I would have chopped him with a knife.” A shadow flashed behind Shadow, and the majestic name of Wei King walked out with an icy expression. “King, the reason why he is so arrogant is because the salvation society has a dark descendant behind them. With King’s current strength, it’s still not right for him to clash directly with a dark descendant.”Shadow lowered his eyes. King Wei’s gaze was cold. “Ying! What do you mean? Do you think that I’m not enough to protect you and protect the Highland Plains?” “I don’t dare.” King Wei sneered. “Don’t worry! I have the secret techniques of the Wei Ming royal family. As long as I kill a few ice clansmen, my strength will quickly recover.” “Ying never dares to question the King’s strength.”Ying still lowered his eyes, not showing any strange expression. .. Truth Knights, Truth City. At this moment, a grand coronation ceremony was being held. The new Pope was appointed! Bruno clenched his fists and stared at the face on the Pope’s throne, his expression indignant. “Why should he be the Pope? !” He growled in a low voice. The first regiment commander covered his mouth and shook his head lightly, “Be careful with your words and actions.” The new pope had obviously noticed the small actions of the first regiment commander and Bruno, but he only smiled faintly. The grand master sighed in his heart. After the death of the old pope, he served as the acting Pope for a period of time, leading the reconstruction of Dragon City. Under such internal and external troubles, he forcibly maintained the status of the Knights of truth. The small and medium-sized organizations around naturally did not find the opportunity to bite down on a large chunk of flesh and blood. Many people thought that the head commander would definitely become the new pope. However, the truth was that the god of Holy Light personally gave a divine order, naming one of the cardinals who was at the top of the Cardinals to become the new pope. His strength was originally only at the 8th rank or 9th rank. However, in one night, with the blessing of the Holy Light, his strength increased by leaps and bounds, reaching the 9th rank or 7th rank. This blessing of the holy light was itself very energy-consuming. In the past, it was level nine warriors who received the blessing of the Holy Light. Now, level eight warriors received the blessing of the Holy Light, and the energy consumption was countless. The head commander could not figure it out. How could the god of holy light give such precise divine orders and directly interfere with the Pope’s election. At this moment, a voice suddenly sounded in his mind. “Mortals...; hear...; My Voice?” The head commander was stunned. This voice was ethereal and distant, like the voice of the god of holy light that he had heard before. But compared to the god of Holy Light, it seemed to be less imposing and more approachable. “Mortals...; This place...; is not suitable...; take the child by your side...; and Change...; to another place.” The voice sounded again. The first regimental commander’s eyes suddenly became sharp and he immediately pulled Bruno over. “Your holiness, we are not feeling well, we will take our leave first.”The first regimental commander walked to the front of the new pope’s throne and said in a low voice. The Voice of the first regimental commander immediately quieted the noisy crowd around him. The members of the pivotal council and the Knights all looked at him with complicated expressions, as well as Bruno who was beside him. They had all witnessed the contribution that the head of the college had made to the Knights recently. Now that the head of the college had failed to be elected, he had no chance of becoming the pope. No matter who it was, they couldn’t help but feel sympathy for him. The members of the Knights felt even more sympathy for Bruno. Not long ago, this young man had been the Holy Son appointed by the old Pope, the number one person in the new generation of the Knights of truth. However, before the new pope took office, he had already removed Bruno’s title of holy son because he was not strong enough. Because of this, Bruno had lost a large amount of cultivation resources. When the new pope heard this, he revealed a warm smile. “The head commander has made great contributions to our Knights of truth. You should pay more attention to your body. Go and rest.” “Yes.” The head commander pulled Bruno and left quickly under everyone’s sympathetic gazes. After a short period of silence, the Pope’s coronation banquet continued to sing and dance. It was extremely lively. Bruno looked puzzled. “Why...;” “Shh, Follow Me. Don’t ask too many questions.” The first regiment commander pulled Bruno all the way to the underground heroic Spirit Hall of the Knights of truth. Here, the heroic spirits who had fought for the Knights of truth all their lives were worshipped. Only those with outstanding achievements could enter the heroic spirit hall. But because of this, few people usually came to the heroic spirit hall. “This should be enough...;”the first regimental commander said in a low voice. Bruno said in puzzlement, “Why did we come...;” A voice sounded in their minds at the same time. “Gentlemen, my name is Atlas, my fellow clansmen of the god of Holy Light.” Bruno was shocked. The first regimental commander’s reaction was slightly better. He had guessed a point just now, and now what the other party said confirmed his guess. However, the god of Holy Light actually had a member of his race? Could it be that there were many of the God of Holy Light? “Sir, why are you calling us?”The first leader asked in a deep voice. “Actually, according to the ancestral teachings of the Holy Spirit race, we shouldn’t tell our believers about this, but I can’t just watch the Holy See bring our race into the Abyss.” Atlas’voice was the same as before, but it was heavy. “Holy See? Holy Spirit Race?”The head commander’s brain was a mess. “Your so-called God of Holy Light is just a name, a code name. Actually, our true name to the outside world is the Holy Spirit Race.” “The Holy Spirit Race is one of the three ruling races in the elemental world, ruling over one hundred and five worlds. Due to its vast territory, the Holy Spirit race has different factions within it, but in general, it can be divided into the battle court and the Holy See.” “The war court is responsible for conquering the four directions while the Holy See is responsible for educating the believers. Usually, the ones who come into contact with you mortals are almost all the Holy See. I am from the war court.” Atlas said seriously, “The war court has many enemies. Among them are the other two ruling races in the elemental world, the dark descendants and the ice race.” “The dark descendants are the forces behind the Salvation Society.” The head commander was shocked. In an instant, many questions in his heart were answered. No wonder the Salvation Society’s forces had expanded so much. No wonder the old Pope wanted to cooperate and form an alliance with the Salvation Society no matter what. He did not hesitate to become enemies with the construction division and the Arctic army. “The previous Pope and the current Pope of your truth knights were promoted by the Holy See. The Holy See does not understand the Dark Ones’ambitions at all! They think that by cooperating with the Dark Ones, they can gain a lot of benefits. They are stupid!” Atlas scolded his own kind mercilessly. The chief commander said seriously, “Speaking of cooperation, the new pope did mention to me that the Salvation Society sent another invitation a day ago, but he didn’t explain the details.” “Do you want me to interfere with the cooperation between the organization and The Salvation Society?” Atlas shook his head. “No, it’s not. It’s not wise to interfere directly. I need you to play along.” “Now all you need to know is that the Dark Ones are not a good ally, and the ice tribe is not an enemy. That’s enough.” “I can’t go on...; I’ve already left a mark on both of you, and there’s still the power of the Holy Light. If you encounter...; Danger, you can move...; use, my power...; to protect you.” After Atlas said that, his voice quickly fell silent. No matter how the head commander and Bruno called out, there was no more movement. The two looked at each other and saw the shock in each other’s eyes. The head commander laughed bitterly. “In the organization, my position is only second to the pope, but I actually don’t know anything about these things...;” Bruno said seriously, “Teacher, what should we do?” “Let’s take it one step at a time. It’s enough to remember Sir Atlas’s words.”The head commander sighed softly. “Understood.” .. In the early morning, the alarm clock set by Lin Xuan rang in the quiet room. He suddenly opened his eyes. [ current region: Drowning City (100 Essence/minute)] [ armored snapping turtle has been training for 10 hours, obtained 600,000 essence, 40 secret realm pearls, ...; Do You Harvest? ] [ deep sea octopus has been training for 10 hours, obtained 600,000 essence, 25 secret realm pearls, ...; Do You Harvest? ] [ ...; ] [ current region: Jie Ri City (80 essence/minute)] [ blood fury elephant has been training for 10 hours, obtained 480,000 essence, 10 secret realm pearls, ...; Do you have any gains? ] [ current region: Dragon Mountain Range (90 essence/minute)] [ lightning dragon has been training for 10 hours, obtained 540,000 essence, 29 secret realm pearls, ...; Do you have any gains? ] [ ...; ] A series of information appeared in Lin Xuan’s mind. He was satisfied as he thought about the rewards. “Not bad. The omniscient bone armor, ancient tree bark, flame blast, blazing city, and other skills have all been upgraded to tier 8, Tier 3.” “Most of the skills on my body have reached the quality of dark gold legendary.” Lin Xuan glanced at his level again. After a night of absorption, his level had risen another level, reaching level 8 and Level 5. “In this state, it shouldn’t be a problem to go to the permafrost tundra.” Lin Xuan quietly walked out of the door and followed the planned route to the gathering point. The gathering point was the secret room under the market of Xijing City. Few people would have guessed that there was such a place hidden under the biggest market of Xijing city that few people knew about. When Lin Xuan arrived, most of the people had already arrived. Lu Pinghai glanced at him and nodded slightly, indicating for him to sit down. Not long after, everyone had arrived. “Everyone, follow me. The Arctic Army’s transport plane has arrived,”Lu Pinghai called out. Everyone followed the passage in the basement all the way out of Xijing City. They got on an off-road vehicle in a deserted village on the outskirts of the city and drove for dozens of miles before stopping. There were already three large transport planes waiting here. Two old acquaintances were also waiting here. Old Ivan and Trident. Old Ivan and Trident smiled happily when they saw Lin Xuan and the others. “Everyone, please board the plane!” City of winter. Like the Dragon City and the Angel City, the city of winter was built by relying on the light gate of the secret realm of the permafrost tundra. After decades of time, it became the unique grand city and giant city under the control of the Arctic army. Most of the seventh and eighth rank warriors gathered here. Many warriors from small and medium-sized organizations often came here to fight for the right to enter the permafrost tundra. When Lin Xuan and the others’transport planes landed, there were still many transport planes parked at the airport. Those who got off these transport planes were all small and medium-sized organizations near the Arctic army. They had also received an invitation from the Arctic army to come and help. However, the Arctic army did not tell them the secrets of the ice clan. They only mentioned that the permafrost tundra’s monsters were moving strangely and needed manpower. For these small and medium-sized organizations, as long as they could enter the super-large arcane realm, it would be a good thing. After all, with their strength, they had no way of controlling the super-large arcane realm. A super-large arcane realm like the permafrost tundra had always been in the hands of the six major organizations and would not be easily opened to the outside world. “Everyone, just board the SUV. There’s no need to get off the plane,”Trident said with a smile. “Later, the SUV will drive directly into the light gate of the secret realm. In this way, no one will know that you have come to the permafrost tundra.”Old Ivan smiled like an old fox. The people of the construction division nodded slightly. They were also thinking just now that if they got off the transport plane so openly, wouldn’t they be directly exposed to outsiders. In this way, wouldn’t it be a waste for the construction division to act so stealthily. From the looks of it now, the Arctic army was indeed well prepared. “I don’t need it. Besides, I have a way to prevent ordinary people from seeing me.” Ji Ruyue shook her head. She did not like crowded and narrow environments, and she did not like to be squeezed in a car with others. Old Ivan frowned. Lu Pinghai gave him a look. “Our man is very strong. He’s even stronger than sister Ye. Don’t worry.” When they were in drowning city, he had witnessed the battle between Ji Ruyue and AOR. Ji Ruyue had that kind of strength. He was not surprised that she had a few concealment skills or even invisibility skills. Old Ivan was shocked when he heard Lu Pinghai’s words. Stronger Than Ye Lijiang? Since when did the construction department have such a person? Trident was immediately interested. He could not help but ask, “Lady, can you show us the method you mentioned?” Ji Ruyue glanced at him. The next moment, her body suddenly disappeared, as if she had really disappeared from the world in that instant. Trident stared at the spot with his eyes wide open. He did not see anything. Lin Xuan also let out a soft exclamation and carefully looked at the space inside the transport plane. There was really no sign of Ji Ruyue. “Don’t doubt me.” Ji Ruyue’s voice slowly sounded from behind Trident. Trident was shocked. When he looked back, this classical woman in white clothes and black sword was really standing behind him! Sweat beaded on his forehead. If it had been a life-and-death battle just now, he would have already died! Old Ivan looked deeply at Ji Ruyue. “Alright, then please get into the SUV.” Everyone boarded the SUV in the belly of the transport plane and drove into the permafrost tundra in batches. Even the windows of the SUV were specially made. They could only look out from the inside. The people outside could not see the passengers inside. After a short drive, Lin Xuan felt the vehicle stop. “You can get off now. This is a hidden shelter for us in the permafrost tundra. Other than a few corps commanders, no one knows about it.” Old Ivan nodded. Lin Xuan pushed open the car door. The biting cold wind immediately poured in unceremoniously. They flowed along the gap between the neck, wrists, ankles, and clothes, rushing into the clothes and quickly taking away the people’s remaining body temperature. Just as he got off the SUV, Lin Xuan felt that his body temperature had dropped by at least one degree. For someone with such a high physique to be able to feel the cold, one could only imagine. Lu Luo and Xiang Tianxiu shivered as soon as they got off the SUV. Xiang tianxiu, who was wrapped in a thin mage robe, sneezed on the spot. “Fortunately, I brought a few more clothes...;”he muttered. Even Wan youxi, a level-nine warrior, began to blow his nose in a few minutes, feeling very helpless. Trident laughed heartily, “This is the situation when we first came to the permafrost tundra. It will be fine as long as you get used to it. Moreover, this is only the outer area of the permafrost tundra. If we go deeper, the temperature will be even lower. Everyone, you must be prepared.” Old Ivan, on the other hand, became serious. “You have three days to rest. During these three days, we and the small and medium-sized organizations will be responsible for dealing with the monsters.” “After three days, regardless of whether you have adapted to the environment of the permafrost tundra, you have to fight.” Lu Pinghai nodded slightly. “Don’t worry. Since we have been invited here, we can’t stay here as guests forever. Naturally, we have to do something.” “Okay, then we will come back in three days.”Old Ivan and Trident bowed to them and turned to leave. “Three days isn’t bad. Maybe I can complete the tier 8 promotion mission here.”Xiang Tianxiu chuckled. Just as he finished laughing, he sneezed again, almost losing his balance and falling to the ground. “What’s Your Tier 8 promotion mission?”Lu Luo asked. “All of your lightning attribute skills, use them 50,000 times in ten days.”Xiang Tianxiu coughed lightly. Lu Luo was slightly surprised. “How tired are you? How many more do you need now?” Xiang Tianxiu took out a small notebook. “I’m still short of 30,000 lightning shackles and 10,000 lightning storms. I’m only short of these two skills. It shouldn’t be difficult to finish them in three days.” “When I think about how many more times I have to go, I feel like I’ve been squeezed dry. My Mana...;” “Ai, I remember that Ye Yuqiu is also level 7 or 9. What’s her quest?”Xiang Tianxiu suddenly remembered something. “Yuqiu...; Yuqiu seems to have gone out.”Lu Luo glanced around, but didn’t see ye Yuqiu. Lu Pinghai coughed lightly, “Ye Yuqiu’s mission is the same as yours, but she still has a prerequisite. She needs to release these skills when the temperature is below-10 degrees Celsius.” “And as far as I know, she’s only missing the last 10,000 times.” Xiang Tianxiu suddenly fell silent, ”...; No, why are all of them so curly? Lin Xuan’s level was a little lower than mine before, but now he’s at level 8. I thought I could still compete with Ye Yuqiu, but I didn’t expect her to almost finish her promotion mission...;” “She’s losing her mind!” Xiang Tianxiu looked helpless. Lin Xuan couldn’t help but laugh. He didn’t think that this would involve him. His training avatar worked so hard every day. Compared to him, Xiang Tianxiu really couldn’t be compared. However, he was a little surprised that ye Yuqiu’s improvement was so fast. “Ye Yuqiu, is it that white-clothed short-haired girl? That Girl has good talent. If I didn’t see you in Kunlun ruins, I might have had a good chat with that girl.”Ji Ruyue smiled. “Let’s go out for a walk?” “That’s good too. There’s a small ice pond nearby. Let’s go take a look.”Lin Xuan nodded. Since they had nothing to do, they might as well go out for a walk. The two walked out of the shelter. More than ten kilometers away from the shelter was the ice pond. When the two came here, Ye Yuqiu was also here. However, she wasn’t standing at the edge of the ice pond, but directly soaking in it. Of course, she didn’t take off her clothes or anything else. Ye Yuqiu stood in the pool, enduring the low temperature while casting her skills. One, two, three.. Even though her skin was blue and blue from the cold, she didn’t make a sound. Instead, she continued to cast her skills diligently, working hard to complete the tier 8 promotion mission. She noticed Lin Xuan and Ji Ruyue’s arrival, but she didn’t stop. Ji Ruyue looked at her with admiration. “If this girl were in my Kunlun Palace, I would definitely take her in as my disciple and raise her as the next palace master.” Lin Xuan coughed lightly. “But Senior Ji, you’re Only the Young Palace Master...;” Ji Ruyue coughed lightly as well.”...; who knows if master is still here? If she passes away, won’t I be the current Palace Master?” Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. Too filial. “Eh, this ice pond, I keep feeling that there’s something strange about it, but I can’t see what’s strange about it...;”Ji Ruyue stared at the ice pond and circled it a few times, exclaiming softly. “Lin Xuan, why don’t you use your...; all-seeing eye to take a look?”She asked. Lin Xuan nodded and used his skill to look at the ice pond. Text messages really appeared above the ice pond. —— Name: Ice Race’s small child-rearing bed Quality: dark gold legend Effect: gives birth to an ordinary child of the ice race. —— Lin Xuan was surprised. You call this ice pool with a diameter of ten meters a small child-rearing bed? How Big was the child of the Ice Race? After hearing Lin Xuan’s description of the ice pool, Ji Ruyue was also shocked. “This...; could it be that this so-called ice race creature is also a giant similar to the drowning city’s Sea Race?” “I’ve been to the areas under the jurisdiction of the Kunlun Palace and the Heavenly Dragon Temple, but the mortals there look similar to us. There have never been giants that are too huge.” Ji Ruyue frowned at such a thing that was beyond her understanding. “However, since there are ordinary babies, maybe there are elite babies “The ice pools should be large and located in the depths of the frozen tundra.” Lin Xuan deduced more from the information he saw. “Maybe so.” “Huh? Wait, there seems to be energy surging out from the bottom of the pool.” Ji Ruyue suddenly stared at the bottom of the pool without blinking. Ye Yuqiu was completely immersed in cultivation at this moment. She did not notice that the temperature of the ice pool had dropped by a notch. Moreover, Boundless Ice Energy appeared out of nowhere and slowly surrounded her. Before long, a dot of light appeared at the bottom of the pond. As soon as the dot of light appeared, it attracted the attention of Lin Xuan and Ji Ruyue. This was because it was too eye-catching and possessed astonishing vitality. It was as if a tiny life lived within that tiny dot of light that was only the size of a finger. As soon as the dot of light appeared, the energy in the ice pool immediately gathered towards it. In the blink of an eye, a large amount of cold air gathered around the dot of light and turned into an ice ball the size of a human brain. After forming an ice ball the size of a human brain, it slowly fell into the pool and floated above the ice water. Only then did it slow down in its absorption of the cold air. Lin Xuan used the all-seeing eye to look again and immediately saw a new text message. —— Name: Skaya Level: Tier 9, Level 1 Race: Ice Race (normal infant) Class: Frost Hunter Attributes: Physique 100, Strength 1, Spirit 1, agility 1(infant state, congenital disability) Skill: ice mastery (seven-colored immortality) Equipment: Ice Shield —— Lin Xuan looked at the data panel and was deep in thought. The way the ice race came to the permafrost tundra seemed to be different from the dark ones. The Dark Ones forced a dark one through the connection between the drowned city and the Black Sea. However, because the number of black eggs was much less than what was planned, only the weaker unlucky ORR came. However, Lin Xuan combined the ice race nursery bed and this Skaya’s data panel and roughly guessed the way the ice race came to the permafrost tundra. Reincarnation! This Skaya might have been an adult ice race member in the Elemental World, which was why she had a job. After thinking for a short while, Lin Xuan soon figured out the pros and cons of this method. Compared to the Dark Ones, the energy consumption of reincarnation should be much lower. Therefore, it might be possible for a large number of ice race members to be reincarnated to the permafrost tundra. This was also in line with the “Appearance of a large number of ice pools”. The large number of ice pools proved that there were also many ice clansmen who were reincarnated into the permafrost tundra. The shortcomings of reincarnation were also very obvious. They were very weak when they were just reincarnated! Especially now, in this “Egg”-like state, only the ice barrier could withstand the attacks from the outside world. Once the ice barrier broke, they would almost become meat on the chopping board, waiting to be slaughtered. Presumably, it was because of this that the ice race had given the commander of the Arctic Army a dream, hoping that they could help the ice race successfully complete their reincarnation. After listening to Lin Xuan’s analysis, Ji Ruyue also nodded. “Your guess should be fine.” “But...; why did the ice race come to Earth?”Ji Ruyue looked puzzled. “And the Dark Ones, why did they come to Earth?”Ji Ruyue was even more puzzled. “The spiritual energy in this place is pitifully low, and mortals don’t have spiritual roots, so they can’t cultivate...;” At this point, she coughed lightly. “I don’t Mean to belittle you.” Lin Xuan nodded, indicating that he understood. Ji Ruyue’s doubt had always been his doubt. What Charm did earth have that could attract such a powerful ruling race from the elemental world to rush here? Rare Treasure? Source of power? Lin Xuan shook his head repeatedly, unable to figure it out. “It can’t be because of me, right?”He shook his head and immediately dismissed this thought. He had never interacted with the ice race and dark descendants in the past. How could they come to Earth because of him. “This ice race person...; seems to be a bit lacking in innate ability?”Ji Ruyue sensed something and said casually. Lin Xuan nodded regretfully, “Yes, a disabled innate ability. I don’t know if it happened before or during the reincarnation process.” “Eh? That child from the ice tribe has communicated with Ye Yuqiu.”Ji Ruyue suddenly laughed. Lin Xuan looked over and found that the ice ball had already floated to ye Yuqiu’s side. Her power had even begun to surge into ye Yuqiu’s body. “How Strange. Skaya seems to like ye Yuqiu very much. Could This Be Fate?”He couldn’t help but laugh. In the next moment, Lin Xuan was shocked to find that Skaya had actually begun to fuse into Ye Yuqiu’s body! He was about to rush down immediately. But Ye Yuqiu stretched out her hand and shook her head, “She...; she said that she thought that she could reincarnate and gain a new life. She didn’t expect that the broken part of her soul would still exist. She wanted to give it one last try and live on my body so that the two of us could grow together.” Lin Xuan frowned slightly. Live on? Or live on? Without knowing the ice tribe’s intentions, this kind of behavior was very dangerous. At this time, Wolf howls suddenly sounded in the vast tundra. Immediately after, wolf howls sounded from all directions. Ji Ruyue chuckled. “The monsters are here. I’m too lazy to do anything to these little things. I’ll leave them to you.” Lin Xuan nodded and welcomed the several giant wolves that walked out of the snow storm. The strength of these huge wolves was very average. The highest was only tier 8 or Tier 3. Lin Xuan did not think much of monsters of this level. He easily killed them with a few skills. However, just as he killed these huge wolves, more figures appeared in the vast wind and snow. Lin Xuan’s heart skipped a beat, and he immediately used his five senses to sense the situation around him. He suddenly realized that more and more monsters were appearing in his perception range. And more and more of them were gathering! Ji Ruyue had no intention of helping at all. She smiled slyly and said, “Of course, there can’t be only these few giant wolves. The monsters attracted by this small nursery bed are at least a hundred or more. I’ll leave them all to you.” Lin Xuan could not help but laugh. It seemed that Ji Ruyue had sensed the approaching monsters long ago and intended to let him deal with them alone. “Alright, let my clones come out and fight too.” Lin Xuan used his avatar and all five clones appeared. In addition, the sparking dragon that Lin Xuan had tamed in the dragon mountain range also flew out of the space of consciousness and appeared beside him. It was just a baby dragon before, but now it had grown into a four-meter-long baby dragon. Lin Xuan named it “Sparking”and even fed it the bloodline fruit from Jieji City. Since it had saved a lot of bloodline fruits during this period of time, it would be a waste not to eat them. He did not expect the little guy to grow to be so strong, so he did not mind teasing it like a puppy. Life should not be all about fighting and killing, scheming and scheming. There should always be some fun. The main body, five doppelgangers, and Sparks stood at the edge of the ice pool, facing the monsters that were charging at them from all directions. Flame burst released raging flames, and lightning spewed out of the cold field staff. Poisonous blades shuttled among the monsters, and blood splattered from the blades. The shield ghost was like a giant wall, blocking any monsters that tried to rush into the ice pool. A large white light rose from brother Milk’s palm, adding all kinds of buffs to the other clones. In addition to the main body that was omnipotent. Six people, but at this moment, they had the combat strength of more than a dozen people, like a small army. Ji Ruyue was amazed in her heart. Her master’s attainment in the incarnation was also the highest among the past palace masters of Kunlun Palace. She had defeated the sea beasts from the endless sea many times by herself, which made the people under the protection of the Kunlun Palace and the Heavenly Dragon Temple grateful. Looking at Lin Xuan and his clones, she even had the feeling that she had returned to the Kunlun Palace. At the same time. In the middle circle of the frozen tundra. The middle circle was between the outer circle and the inner circle. The monsters living in it were naturally not high or low in strength, at least level eight or level four. However, there were six ice pools here. They were named as the first, second, and sixth ice pools from the inside to the outside. Because of this, the Arctic army assigned many warriors to guard the six ice pools here, including veteran level eight warriors. After old Ivan and Trident sent Lin Xuan and the others to the hidden shelter in the outer circle, they went straight to the first ice pool in the middle circle. “How are the people in the construction department?”A woman in red tights with a hot figure came up to them and asked with a smile. Trident chuckled. “Yelena, we are long-term strategic partners after all. The construction department won’t do anything to harm us. Don’t worry.” Old Ivan nodded. “The three directors of the construction department are also very cooperative.” Yelena smiled. “That’s good. I’m quite worried that they don’t understand the situation in the permafrost tundra and cause any accidents.” THUMP THUMP THUMP! A warrior walked in and immediately reported, “My Lords, the No. 1, No. 4, and No. 6 ice pools in the middle circle have all experienced cold air fluctuations. In a short period of time, they formed an ice mass the size of a human brain.” The three of them looked at each other and were immediately shocked. This scene was exactly what the grand marshal had described to them. Those ice balls were not natural scenery, but ice race infants! However, the time was not right! Didn’t they say that there were still three days left? Ivan frowned deeply and was about to order to strengthen the security around the ice pool so that the monsters would not take advantage of it. In the next moment, they heard a piercing and urgent alarm sound! Woo Woo Woo! After the alarm sound, there was a fierce battle cry! A martial artist with blood on his body rushed in quickly. “My Lords, many monsters suddenly appeared outside the No. 1 Ice Pool! Some of our people are seriously injured!”The martial artist said anxiously. Old Ivan looked at his injuries. “The claw marks on his chest are very deep. Three of his ribs are broken, and his internal organs are also damaged. It seems that he is a level eight or level nine monster. It is very likely that he is a king of the mystic realm. He needs our help.” “I’ll go. He is just a king of a mystical realm.”Trident patted his muscular chest proudly. The heavily wounded warrior spat out a mouthful of blood and stretched out four fingers. “Sir Trident, there are a total of four such monsters...;” Trident’s expression froze.”...;” Elena patted his shoulder. “Let’s attack together. Now is not the time to show off.” The three of them took a deep breath when they arrived at the battlefield. Under the leadership of the four kings of the mystery land, these monsters were as fierce as if they had taken drugs. Even if they were injured, they still had to rush to the ice pond. The Warriors of the Arctic army were shocked by this crazy attack. They could only rely on the defensive fortifications to fight while retreating. “The ice race’s young children actually made them so greedy...;” Yelena was shocked. “Do it. This will be a bloody battle.” <b>?</b>Old Ivan’s eyes were sharp. He pulled out his weapon and faced the two kings of the arcane realm at the same time. Among the three, he was the oldest and the strongest. One against two, only he could do it. .. Outside the frozen tundra. Lin Xuan’s battle here continued. As time passed, he also felt some pressure. These monsters were too reckless. Even he felt that it was very difficult to deal with these monsters that traded their lives for injuries. Seeing this, Ji Ruyue casually shot out a stream of spiritual energy into his body. Lin Xuan immediately felt refreshed, and the anxiety and impatience in his heart disappeared without a trace. “Your strength is not bad, and you are also among the top among the eighth-level warriors. But in my opinion, your state of mind is still lacking.” Ji ruyue said casually, “A truly strong warrior doesn’t care about the good things and doesn’t care about the bad things. Even when facing an enemy that blots out the sky, he won’t be anxious, impatient, or scared to retreat.” “I hope you can do that too.” Lin Xuan nodded seriously. Ji Ruyue was right. Relying on his experience clone, he could obtain resources too quickly. He had also crushed almost all his opponents of the same level. Now, the monsters that filled the mountains and plains were a good opportunity for him to temper himself. “Come on!” Lin Xuan took a deep breath and once again threw himself into the battle. He was far more focused than before. Seeing that his master was so tenacious, spark also roared with all his strength. He spat out flames and burned the enemy in front of him. “This kid...;” Ji Ruyue muttered in her heart, “I was just saying it casually. I’m really getting serious now.” Then, her face turned slightly red. “Actually, even master and I haven’t reached the level where we don’t care about the good things and don’t care about the bad things...; However, master used this kind of words to deceive me back then. It’s not wrong for me to use this kind of words to deceive him again, right?” Half an hour, one hour! Roar! An earth-shaking wolf howl sounded. The monster suddenly stopped attacking and separated on its own. A level eight and level nine giant white-maned wolf walked over. When this giant wolf appeared, all the monsters bowed respectfully as if they were welcoming their king. Spark also felt a trace of fear and almost forgot to flap his wings. However, when he saw that his master was not afraid, he suddenly felt confident. He circled around Lin Xuan and bared his teeth at the giant wolf. “The king of the Battle Mystic Realm!” Lin Xuan was slightly shocked. Level eight and level nine, the King of the Battle Mystic Realm! He could completely suppress two level eight and level nine warriors and beat them up. He was only at level eight and level five. Although his attributes were much higher than normal warriors, he still felt that he was still a little lacking when dealing with the king of the battle mystic realm who was four levels higher than him. “Look at the data panel...;” “My vitality...; is not as high as mine. It’s normal. After all, my vitality is higher than some level nine warriors.” “My spirit, agility...; is not as high as mine. This...; is normal. After all, my job skills have too many buffs.” “My strength is higher than mine, right?” Lin Xuan saw that the white-maned Wolf’s strength was more than 30 points higher than his, so he nodded slightly. This was normal. However, since when did level eight and level nine battle Mystic Realm Kings become so powerful. “Let’s attack together!” With a thought, Lin Xuan’s clones quickly formed a battle group and attacked the white-maned wolf in an orderly manner. .. “Phew...; I finally got rid of these four Mystic Realm Kings.”Yelena let out a long breath. The durability of the red tights on her body had almost reached zero, and they had been torn to pieces by the monsters. She simply tore them off casually. There was only a white elastic vest on her upper body, which outlined a soul-stirring arc. The warriors who were cleaning up the battlefield around them were immediately stunned. Trident’s eyes also lit up. He could not help but exclaim, “This elastic vest, its elasticity...; is really good.” Yelena patted his shoulder and licked her red lips. “Come to my room tonight?” The Warriors shuddered and hurriedly retreated. Trident’s expression changed when he heard that. “No, no, no...; I’m going to...; Go fishing with teacher Ivan Tonight! Yes, fishing!” Old Ivan rolled his eyes. Yelena snorted. “Lecherous heart, no guts, you’re really useless!” After saying that, she twisted her plump waist and buttocks to return to the shelter to change into a new set of equipment. Trident smiled bitterly. This sister had worshipped countless men under her skirt, and people gave her the nickname ‘Hundred Men Executioner’. Many muscular men could not get out of bed the next day. For the sake of his old waist, Trident felt that...; he should just admit defeat. At this time, another warrior rushed over and reported quickly, “My Lords, according to our observations, the Monster Horde that had been entrenched in a canyon on the outskirts of the permafrost tundra suddenly disappeared. Its leader is an eighth-grade or ninth-grade monster. We suspect that they are preparing to attack the No. 6 ice pool in the middle circle.” Old Ivan’s heart sank when he heard that. He immediately took out the map of the permafrost tundra from his pocket. “Point out, where is the canyon that the Monster Horde was previously entrenched in?” The warrior immediately pointed to an ordinary place. Old Ivan followed his finger and looked to the side, his heart thumping. Because not far away was the secret shelter they had arranged for the construction division and the others! There was a small ice pool nearby. As it had only appeared yesterday, there was no time to assign warriors to guard it! He quickly pulled the trident and Yelena into the shelter and said in a low voice. “Oh no, a lot of monsters have appeared near the shelter where the construction department is resting. They have just arrived and are unable to adapt to the environment of the permafrost. Their strength will be greatly suppressed. I’m afraid we have to rush over immediately to help.” After hearing that, Yelena said seriously, “Then let’s move quickly.” Trident scratched his head. “Aren’t the three chief executives of the construction division there too? Do You Need Our Help?” Old Ivan glared at him, “The construction division is under attack on our territory. It’s up to them whether the three chief executives will help or not. But if we don’t go over to help, it will appear that we are heartless and lack the courtesy of the host.” Trident immediately reacted and nodded awkwardly, “Understood, understood.” .. Half an hour later, they arrived here. However, there was no sign of the large number of monsters attacking the ice pool as expected. Trident looked at the corpses of the monsters on the ground with a shocked expression. Meanwhile, Yelena looked at Lin Xuan who was standing beside the corpse of the level-eight and level-nine king of the arcane realm. Her beautiful eyes flashed with a strange light. Trident exclaimed, “Lin Xuan, you killed all these monsters by yourself?” After saying that, he could not help but look at Ji Ruyue, who was dressed in white and standing beside Lin Xuan. “Isn’t this person beside you helping?” Old Ivan frowned. “Look at the wounds on the monster’s corpse before you speak. Don’t always make us Arctic army people look bad.” Trident was stunned for a moment and quickly squatted down to examine the corpses carefully. The corpses died in different ways. Some died from burning, some died from lightning strikes, some died from poison splattering, and some died from freezing. These wounds were extremely incompatible with the woman in white and the woman in black. As for the methods of death where the short swords slit the throat and pierced the heart and other vital parts of the body. They were also incompatible with the long and wide black sword at the waist of the woman in white. After careful analysis, one would understand that it was impossible for the woman in white and the woman in black to have done it. Yelena clicked her tongue in admiration. “A young genius indeed.” “I’ve long heard that Lin Xuan of the construction division has risen to prominence recently. Shield ghost, flame explosion, Poison Blade, and other new generation experts of the construction division are all his clones. Only after witnessing such battle results with my own eyes today will I know that it’s true!” Lin Xuan let out a long breath and smiled. “However...; to kill a level eight or nine battle mystic realm king with his own strength, such strength...; is really rare.”Old Ivan nodded seriously, and his love for talent also rose. Lin Xuan cleaned up the blood and flesh on his body slightly before approaching them. “The three of you, the appearance of the ice race infants has been brought forward. I wonder if you have noticed?” Old Ivan immediately became serious when he heard that, “We have. Just now, the No. 1, No. 4, and No. 6 ice pools in the middle circle were also attacked. According to our observation, it was also because of the appearance of the ice race infants that those monsters attacked.” Ye Lina continued, “It’s very likely that the ice race children contain a lot of energy, which caused the monsters to be greedy.” Old Ivan continued, “We will immediately tell all the warriors guarding the shelter about this situation.” “There’s one more thing I have to mention. This ice pool is a bit special. Our people and the Ice Race People’s souls merged.”Lin Xuan pointed at Ye Yuqiu, who was still soaking in the ice pool. At this moment, he shockingly discovered that ye Yuqiu had already completed the level eight promotion mission and officially became a level eight martial artist. Moreover, her four-dimensional attributes had increased quite a bit. It must have been the result of the ice clansman’s soul fusing with hers. Old Ivan noticed ye Yuqiu’s change and was also very surprised. “This...; I’m afraid we’ll need our grand marshal and your presidents to come over and take a look. I don’t know if the ice clansman’s soul fusing with a human’s is good or bad...;” Lin Xuan nodded. “It’s good to be cautious. Then I’ll have to trouble senior Ivan to invite the grand marshal over.” Outside the permafrost tundra, in a small ice pond. After hearing the situation, Wan youxi, Lu Pingjiang, and Lu Pinghai immediately rushed over. The Arctic Army’s grand marshal also arrived not long after. Hall, Kodo, and the other tier 8 warriors also surrounded the ice pond, staring at Ye Yuqiu. As they looked, they clicked their tongues in wonder. No one had expected that such a situation would occur. The four level 9 warriors also stared at Ye Yuqiu. Compared to level 8 warriors, they could directly feel more information. For example, Ye Yuqiu was very strong now! “My initial perception shows that her four-dimensional attributes have increased by at least 5% . This doesn’t include the skills provided to her after she fused with the ice clansman’s soul,”Wan youxi said seriously. The grand marshal said in a deep voice, “I can feel the power of the ice bear on her body. After using this power, it will be greatly strengthened in a short period of time.” “Right now, she is a rank 8, rank 1 warrior. However, if she absorbs enough ice energy and allows that ice clansman’s soul to reach adulthood, her four-dimensional attributes will probably increase by 20% !” “Level 8, Level 1. She might be able to display the combat strength of level 8, Level 4, or even level 5!” Lu Pingjiang and Lu Pinghai were both shocked. Damn, this increase was too great! “However, will there be any problems with this kind of soul fusion?”Lin Xuan could not help but ask. As soon as he said this, everyone fell silent. No matter how friendly the Ice clan was with the Arctic army, they were still alien races. Who knew if the ice race would harbor evil intentions in such matters. On the surface, it was a fusion of souls, helping each other. But in reality, it was replacing them! Ye Yuqiu, who had been silent all this time, said at this moment, “Everyone, don’t worry. I’ve been conversing with Skaya for a long time. She told me about her experiences in the ice race.” “Although we are two races with different languages and appearances, the emotions in the depths of our souls are interlinked.” Ye Yuqiu said in a low voice, “Skaya is the daughter of the ice clan leader. She also has a brother, but her brother is the most talented genius of the ice clan, while she is born with a lack of talent and a crippled soul.” “Even though father and brother don’t care about these things, she does.” “She didn’t need to participate in this reincarnation, but she heard that there was a small chance that the reincarnation could replenish her soul, so she worked hard to hone her skills and fought for a spot.” Ye yuqiu sighed, “Unfortunately, she still failed. However, she met me. She felt that our compatibility was very high. The two of US might be able to complement each other.” At this point, she paused and couldn’t help but say. “And I also feel that ever since I saw her, I had a strange feeling, as if we were sisters in my previous life.” Wan youxi coughed lightly, “I don’t dare to say that. Your Mother will be angry.” Ye Yuqiu smiled, “Four, I’m communicating with Skaya in my soul state. Neither side can lie. Their true intentions will be displayed in front of each other without any reservations.” The Grand Marshall nodded his head, “If that’s the case, then I can rest assured.” He was also worried about what problems would arise. Compared to the ice race whose background was unknown, it was clear that the construction division was a staunch ally that was worth befriending. Ye Yuqiu was the daughter of Ye Lijiang. If anything happened to Ye Yuqiu, the relationship between the two organizations would definitely crack. “Everyone, the ice race infants appeared earlier than scheduled. We were caught off guard and have already suffered some losses.” “Next, I’m afraid that the children of the ice clan will appear in the ice pools. According to the agreement between US and the ice clan, we must guard them as soon as possible. We must not let the monsters attack the children of the ice clan.” After saying that, the grand marshal said helplessly, “I’m really sorry. You should have three days to get used to the environment of the permafrost tundra.” Lu Pinghai waved his hand. “Don’t feel guilty, grand marshal. It happened so suddenly. No one expected it.” The commander-in-chief nodded his head, feeling touched. “Okay, then someone will send over the details of the guards tonight. The three commanders-in-chief are the most powerful, so they will enter the inner circle of the frozen tundra to guard the large ice pools.” “The rank eight warriors will guard the medium-sized ice pools in the middle circle.” “The rank seven warriors will join the ranks of the rank seven warriors of our Arctic army and stay in the outer circle to guard the small ice pools.” “Okay.”Wan youxi and the other two nodded in agreement. .. The night filled the frozen tundra. Ye Yuqiu was still soaking in the ice pool. Originally, the biting cold here made her extremely uncomfortable, but after merging with Skaya’s soul, she felt that it was warm inside. It was not like soaking in the ice pool, but more like soaking in a hot spring. Lin Xuan had nothing to do, so he also stayed here. The process of Skaya absorbing the ice energy was bound to attract many monsters. Among all the construction department agents, he was the only one who could adapt to the environment of the permafrost tundra. It was understandable that he came out to guard this small ice pool. After defeating a wave of monsters, Lin Xuan sat down cross-legged and continued to absorb the purified dark-descendant energy left by Ji Ruyue. At this moment, a message suddenly appeared in front of him. [ news from the permafrost tundra: the permafrost tundra is connecting to Angel Fortress. Estimated time: 6 hours and 11 minutes. ] Lin Xuan was shocked. Angel Fortress? Wasn’t that the Super Mystic Realm controlled by the Salvation Society? What did this mean? How could these two mystic realms connect without any warning? Lin Xuan immediately thought that it was very likely that the dark descendants behind the Salvation Society were playing tricks! “The Salvation Society and the dark descendants secretly came to the permafrost tundra at this time. What do they want?” “Are they here for the ice clan as well?” “11 minutes...; it’s too short. We can’t notify everyone.” Lin Xuan Thought for a while and quickly returned to the shelter to explain the situation. However, he only said that it was a guess. He thought that the situation in the permafrost tundra could be spread by spies. If the Salvation Society found out about the situation, they might add insult to injury. Wan youxi and the other two listened to his description and nodded slightly. “Although what you said is just a guess, it is reasonable. We should indeed be vigilant.”Lu Pinghai thought for a moment and nodded in agreement. “Oh right, sister ye said that we should reward you. We will split up to guard the ice pools at dawn. We Can’t take care of you. Keep this. It’s a good substitute for life.”Wan youxi took out a white item from the storage compartment and handed it to Lin Xuan. Lin Xuan took it and immediately felt that his hand was slippery, and there was a fishy smell coming from it. Upon closer inspection, it was actually a piece of clothing. The surface of the clothing was covered with white fish scales, but these fish scales were bigger than ordinary fish scales. They were as big as half a palm. Moreover, there were many mysterious patterns on the surface of the fish scales. “The white fish dragon costume is the most difficult life substitute item in drowning city. You Don’t need to use it. As long as you carry it with you, it will automatically be used when you encounter a fatal attack,”Wan youxi said in a deep voice. Lu Pingjiang said enviously, “Currently, we only have three white fish dragon costumes. Sister Ye, Brother Wan, and you have one.” Lin Xuan immediately felt the heavy weight of the white fish dragon costume. He nodded solemnly. “Thank you!” Wan youxi patted his shoulder. “Your survival is the greatest reward for our organization.” “Go back and rest. I’ll guard ye Yuqiu’s side.” .. In the early morning, in a natural canyon on the outskirts of the permafrost tundra. The resources here were poor and monsters were rampant. The Arctic army did not set up a shelter here and arrange for guards. At this time, the space suddenly distorted. It was like the air above the flames being burned. A moment later, the space was torn apart by a black light and instantly became a three-meter-long gash. More than ten warriors fell to the ground. The members of the Salvation Society, Simon, Jack, Adamson, and a black-spotted old man, “Two.”. Among them, Jack was at level 8 or 9. Adamson had just advanced to level 8 not long ago, but after advancing, he immediately obtained a large amount of essence from the Salvation Society, advancing to level 8 or 3 in one go. The members of the Knights of Truth, the new pope, the chief commander, the new Cardinal Bishop, and so on. Among them, the new pope, the Grand Commander, and the new Cardinal Bishop were tier 9 warriors. In addition, there were also Bruno, Bernie, and other tier 8 warriors. The Indian members included the leader and the deputy leader, two tier 9 warriors, as well as Darte and the other two tier 8 warriors. As for the Highland Plains, only shadow came. “Jack, you take all the tier 8 warriors to clean up the ice pools on the outer and middle circles of the permafrost tundra,”Simon said seriously, “The mission I gave you is to destroy the ice pools. Don’t hold back when you see the Arctic army. Kill them if you can.” Jack nodded. “Don’t worry, Deputy Leader!” After that, he quickly left with Adams, Bruno, and the other rank 8 warriors. “Everyone, our target is the large ice pools on the inner ring of the tundra. Those are the core elites of the ice clan. If we kill them, the ice clan will suffer heavy losses. In the future, they won’t be able to fight against the Dark Ones.” Simon looked at the new pope, Ying, and the others. Ying nodded slightly, indicating that she understood. A cold wind blew, and the tier 9 warriors disappeared in the snowstorm. .. The next day, Dawn. Lin Xuan had just woken up when he saw Ji Ruyue standing in front of his bed. Ji Ruyue’s face was serious. “I can feel the Dark Ones’Aura. Your guess is correct.” Lin Xuan raised his eyebrows. Good heavens, it really came! “I’ll give this to you. As long as you have enough energy, you can even hurt a so-called level 10 martial artist. However, after using it, you’ll have to absorb energy for a very long time. Use It sparingly.” Ji Ruyue threw something over. Lin Xuan used the eye of omniscience to take a look and was pleasantly surprised. —— Name: Great Dao Talisman, Lightning Dao Child Talisman Level: level 10, Level 1 Quality: dark gold legendary Effect 1: will absorb the Lightning Energy in the air and charge it at all times. When the charge reaches 20% , a lightning talisman will be released. When the charge reaches 40% , 60% , 80% , 100% , two, three, four, five lightning talismans will be released respectively. Effect 2: will absorb the Lightning Energy in the air and charge it at all times. When the charge reaches 20% , a lightning shield will be released. When the charge reaches 40% , 60% , 80% , 100% , it will release two, three, four, and five lightning shields respectively. Effect 3: there is a high probability of being struck by lightning after wearing it. Description: it is one of the nine son talismans of the Great Dao talisman of the Kunlun Palace. It is powerful and is favored by many elders and disciples of the Kunlun Palace. However, the person who wears it is often favored by lightning.. —— The corner of Lin Xuan’s mouth twitched. You call being struck by lightning often favored by lightning? However, excluding the side effect of attracting the Lightning’s hatred, this Thunder Dao son Talisman could both attack and defend. It was obviously a rare treasure. “Protect your life well. Don’t Wait for me to kill a few dark ones and need the super purifying potion before you are gone.”Ji Ruyue smiled and disappeared in the blink of an eye. Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. The tools belonged to him. “Gather! Go to the corresponding ice pool according to the plan and guard it!”Wan youxi shouted and woke up all the construction agents who were sleeping. Xiang tianxiu, Lu Luo, and the others walked out of the room, quickly washed up, and rushed to the corresponding location. As a level 8 warrior, Lin Xuan was assigned to the No. 4 Ice Pool in the middle circle of the permafrost tundra. As for Hall, Kodo, and other level 8 warriors, they were assigned to the No. 1, No. 2, and No. 3 Ice Pond in the middle circle. Just as he was about to move forward, a gust of cold air suddenly rushed to his side. He turned around and saw that it was ye Yuqiu who had suddenly walked to his side. “I’m also a level 8 warrior now. I’ll go with you.” Lin Xuan was startled. “You don’t need to continue absorbing the ice energy?” Lu Luo also said in surprise, “Yes, Yuqiu. Don’t the ice clansmen in your body still need to absorb the ice energy to grow?” Ye Yuqiu shook her head. “After I fused with her soul and absorbed 10% of the ice energy, I can leave the ice pond and directly absorb the ice energy in the air of the frozen tundra.” “The other ice clansmen children can’t. They have to stay in the nursery bed.” Everyone nodded. Wan youxi said, “Then go to the No. 4 Ice Pond in the middle circle. You two can take care of each other.” Soon, the two arrived at the No. 4 Ice Pond in the middle circle. Guarding here were a level eight and five level seven warriors of the Arctic army. The arrival of Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu made the guards several times stronger. This level 8 fighter, codenamed “Grizzly”, was a standard middle-aged man from the Arctic army. He had a nose full of wine, a bald head, a big belly, and a bear-like figure. One person was equal to the encirclement of Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu. “Lin Xuan? I have an impression of you! You have many clones, and every one of them is a genius. They are all on the global tier 7 list.”Grizzly laughed and patted Lin Xuan’s shoulder cheerfully. “Oh right, do you know that you are now very famous on the global tier 8 list! You are already in the top 20!” As grizzly spoke, he pulled out a list from the bracelet on his wrist and projected it on the wall. Lin Xuan glanced at it and was quite surprised. Because the top 20 were almost all veteran tier 8 warriors. Hall, Kodo, Li Weiguo, and others were all on this list. Kodo was ranked first on the global tier 8 list because of his unpredictable and vicious skills. There was also a line of small words after that: “Suspected to be about to become a tier 9 warrior.”. Lin Xuan’s name happened to be ranked 20th. “Who is this lady?”Grizzly Bear looked at Ye Yuqiu. “Ye Yuqiu, nice to meet you.” Grizzly bear shook her hand. “Please come in first. Don’t let the cold wind blow outside. There are no ice race children in the ice pond at the moment, so there’s nothing going on. How about this? We’ll take turns to watch the shift once every two hours. What do you think?” Grizzly was very kind. Although he was much older than Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu, he did not disrespect them. “We agree.”Lin Xuan nodded. Ye Yuqiu paused and suddenly said, “My situation is quite special. I want to enter the ice pool. Does senior grizzly agree?” Grizzly was stunned for a moment. “Little girl, are you joking? The temperature of this ice pool is at least minus ten degrees Celsius. If you soak in the ice pool for a long time, your limbs will die.” Ye Yuqiu shook her head. “You don’t have to worry about that. My body is special. Soaking in the ice pool can speed up my level rise.” “Also, I can sense whether or not a monster is attacking when I’m in the Ice Pool.” Lin Xuan also helped ye Yuqiu explain. Seeing how persistent the two were, grizzly bear scratched his head. “This is the first time I’ve seen such a strange request. Okay, if you want to go in, then go in.” Grizzly bear waved his hand and returned to the shelter. As long as a warrior in the permafrost tundra had not reached Level 9, they would have to drink hot drinks every once in a while. Otherwise, if too much cold air accumulated in their bodies, their strength would drop. Now that there were no monsters attacking, grizzly bear would not waste time outside. He immediately hid in the shelter. Lin Xuan also entered the shelter and carefully absorbed the purified dark-descendant energy in the arranged room. Two hours later, it was time for the shift change. Grizzly Bear walked out of the shelter and saw ye Yuqiu soaking in the ice pond as if nothing had happened. He clicked his tongue in wonder. “Eh, a light spot has appeared. It seems that the grand marshal was right. There really is some so-called ice race infant.”Grizzly bear suddenly noticed a blue light spot appearing out of thin air. The blue light spot quickly absorbed the surrounding ice energy and formed an ice ball the size of a human brain. Then, it floated in the ice pool. Lin Xuan walked out and used his five senses to take a look. His data panel was no different from Skaya’s. However, his race was an elite child of the ice race, which was quite different from Skaya’s ordinary child of the ice race. “It’s similar to my guess. A small nursery bed corresponds to an ordinary child, and a medium nursery bed corresponds to an elite child. Then, the large nursery beds in the inner circle of the permafrost tundra should correspond to the core geniuses of the ice race.” Lin Xuan was deep in thought. Buzz Buzz. The communication device on the grizzly bear’s waist vibrated slightly. He quickly picked up the call, and a series of rapid and urgent voice messages with a large number of tongues were transmitted from it. Before Lin Xuan came to the permafrost tundra, he had already learned the language of the Arctic army. As long as there were no strange words or slang in their conversation, he could understand them. “Grizzly Bear of Ice Pond No. 4, this is Trident of Ice Pond No. 1. Please respond if you receive!”A familiar voice came through the communication device. “Grizzly Bear receives!” Hearing the affirmative reply, the voice came through the communication device again. “Please report the information.” Grizzly bear replied, “The construction department, Lin Xuan, and Ye Yuqiu have arrived at Ice Pond No. 4. The first ice race infant has appeared in the ice pond. So far, no monsters have attacked.” “Trident received. The next communication will be in two hours. Please be ready.” “Yes.” The Communicator hung up. Lin Xuan asked curiously, “Is this the contact method you agreed on?” Grizzly bear nodded, “The No. 1 Ice Pool in the outer, middle, and inner circles is responsible for the communication of all the ice pools in the area. As the area of the permafrost tundra is very large, the distance between each ice pool is very far, and there are frequent snowstorms, we must contact each other every two hours in case some of the ice pools fall and the rest of the ice pools don’t know.” Lin Xuan nodded. It seemed that the Arctic army was really well prepared this time. “Boys, Keep Your Spirits Up! The monsters are coming!”Grizzly bear shouted. “Yes!” The five rank 7 warriors of the Arctic army replied in unison. Not long after, Lin Xuan, who was sitting cross-legged on the bed, raised his eyebrows and immediately walked out of the room. He said to grizzly bear in a low voice, “To the east, there are 26 monsters. To the west, there are 30 monsters. Their strength ranges from Tier 7, Tier 4, to tier 8, Tier 4. The strongest one is a Tier 8, tier 4 arcane realm king.” Grizzly Bear was stunned. I haven’t even seen the shadow of a monster, and you’ve already described it in such detail. Grizzly Bear took out his binoculars and looked out of the ice wall doubtfully. There was no wind and snow right now, so he could clearly see the situation on the tundra. He tried hard to identify it, but he really saw dozens of monsters appear in the east. Counting carefully, it was exactly twenty-six. “Young man, is this your skill? Awesome!”Grizzly gave him a thumbs up, not stingy with his praise. Grizzly gave the order, and the five tier 7 warriors climbed up the ice wall, using the equipment that had already been set up on the ice wall to start preparing. Ye Yuqiu heard the sound and walked out of the ice pool. Lin Xuan also came to the city wall and was a little familiar with these equipment. However, when he looked at the equipment carefully, he smiled. Wasn’t this the modification of the most famous Thunder Tower of the Wanyou Gap? The energy that was stimulated here was no longer thunder but fire. Or should he call it the flame tower? Grizzly noticed his gaze and did not feel embarrassed. Instead, he smiled generously. “We are not good at making city defense equipment. Most of these flame towers were bought from your construction company and have been modified.” Lin Xuan smiled. “That’s good. It reduces my learning cost.” After saying that, he immediately opened the back cover of the flame tower and filled it with energy. While filling it with energy, Lin Xuan was also looking at the other defensive equipment. He found that in addition to the flame tower, the Arctic army had another thing. It looked like a cannon, but it was bigger and rougher. Grizzly noticed his gaze and smiled proudly, “This is called the Vulcan cannon. It’s a self-developed weapon of our Arctic army. However, it’s too heavy and can only be used to defend the city. Originally, I wanted to carry this thing onto the battlefield.” “As for its use, you will know soon enough!” Very soon, a series of wolf howls sounded. Dozens of giant wolves appeared in sight. After the giant wolves appeared, there was another earth-shattering Tiger Howl. Following that, a huge white tiger suddenly appeared. The bulging muscles all over its body made people unable to help but wonder if this guy was working out every day. “Let’s Fight!” Grizzly Bear was in high spirits. He took up the Vulcan cannon with a rough shape and shot out rockets at the bottom of the ice wall! Boom! Boom! Boom! The fierce and scalding cannon fire poured out of the barrel, blowing away the giant wolves one by one. The giant wolves whimpered, and many of their fur was burnt. Lin Xuan was surprised. As expected of the Arctic army’s self-made, sturdy and powerful firepower. If it could be further optimized, it might be able to be used as a single weapon, turning into a portable equipment to carry around. The other five tier 7 warriors also began to bombard the invading monsters with the help of the cannons. With this cannon, a tier 7 warrior could at least display the strength of a Tier 7 or Tier 9 warrior. Moreover, the cannon kept spitting and did not know how to tire. The only thing that could limit it was the amount of ammunition and the temperature of the barrel. This was much more useful than people. While the No. 4 Ice Pool in the middle circle was in full swing fighting against the monsters, Jack and the others were also moving in the outer circle. No. 1 Ice Pool in the outer circle. The shelter here was currently shrouded in flames. The four tier 7 warriors guarding this place had all died. “YOU...; You...; damn...; The Salvation Society...;” The person in charge of this place was a rank 8, rank 2 martial artist. He was covered in wounds, and Jack had grabbed his hair and lifted him up with one hand. Blood was dripping from his mouth, and he couldn’t speak completely. But even so, he still barely raised his fist and smashed it on Jack’s body. “Weakling.” Jack Snickered, and with a casual slap, his opponent’s head was smashed like a watermelon, red and white splattering everywhere. This person in charge was completely helpless against the level 8 and Level 9 jack. He couldn’t even use his communicator to send out an alarm. Jack laughed disdainfully, “Pathetically weak! Killing such people is really meaningless.” Adamson laughed, “Lord Jack was a level 9 fighter after all, and he has rich battle experience. Naturally, they aren’t his match.” Bruno looked at the corpses with pity and could only sigh. He did not participate in the entire battle, only watching from behind. Adamson noticed his gaze and smiled. “Bruno, you used to be the saint of the Knights of truth. How can you treat your enemies so kindly? At a critical moment, such emotions will kill you.” Ronnie also tried to persuade him. “Yeah, we’re allies with the Salvation Society. The Arctic army is our enemy. What do you have to pity them for?” Bruno shook his head. He didn’t want to talk to them anymore. Jack snorted. “Little Thing from the Knights of Truth, just don’t Mess Things Up!” “Sir Jack, it’s time to go to the middle circle,”Adamson reminded him. “I know.”Jack spread out a map. This was the information from their informant in the Arctic army. Almost all the ice pools in the permafrost tundra were located on it. Even Jack did not know the identity of this informant. However, the other party actually knew the exact location of the large ice pools in the inner circle. It was obvious that his status was not low. “Next, let’s go to the sixth ice pool in the middle circle. It’s the closest to us.”Jack pointed to a location. “Okay, everyone, quickly clean up the battlefield and prepare to move out,”Adamson ordered. “Unfortunately, the opponent this time is not the construction division. I really want Lin Xuan’s life.”A young figure suddenly appeared in Jack’s mind, and he laughed sinisterly. Adamson said, “I heard that Sir Shadow said that Lin Xuan can switch between his main body and his clones. Unless we chase him and his five clones at the same time, it’s extremely difficult to kill him...;” Jack laughed strangely and said in a low voice, “I’ve already found a way. As long as I can get in touch with one of his clones, I can temporarily imprison him. During the period of imprisonment, he won’t be able to remove the clone.” “Next, as long as I imprison more clones, he’ll only be left with his main body. When that time comes, killing him will be as easy as flipping over his palm!” Adamson was shocked. He did not expect that Jack would be able to get his hands on such a thing. However, he quickly reacted and said excitedly, “It was given by the Ambassador?” Jack said proudly, “That’s right. One of the ambassadors thought that I was pretty good. After hearing about my situation, he gave me this thing.” Adamson looked forward to it. “If only I could get the recognition of the ambassadors.” Jack patted his shoulder. “Don’t worry. With your potential, you will be placed in an important position sooner or later. The leader once told me in secret that he will groom you as the next leader.” Adamson was extremely happy to hear that. “Let’s go to the next place.”Jack smiled cruelly. Previously, he had fallen from a level nine fighter to a level eight fighter. He was filled with anger. Now, he could finally kill without restraint. It was so comfortable. .. Ice Pond No. 4 in the Middle Circle. The battle had ended. Lin Xuan, Grizzly Bear, and the others were not injured. Adhering to the principle of saving ammunition, they used the least amount of ammunition to cause the greatest damage. Ye Yuqiu also played an important role in this battle. Originally, those monsters had high ice resistance. But once ye Yuqiu appeared, the ice resistance of these monsters seemed to disappear, allowing the Arctic army warriors to use ice skills to attack the monsters. One had to know that due to the geographical environment, the Arctic Army warriors almost all had three or four ice skills. And this was what they were best at. Ye Yuqiu was actually able to take away the ice resistance of these monsters, which was a great help to them. The more grizzly bear looked at this little girl, the happier he became. His previous doubts about ye Yuqiu had long been thrown into the clouds. Weng Weng. At this moment, the communicator on his waist vibrated again. “Grizzly Bear of Ice Pond No. 4, this is Trident of Ice Pond No. 1. Please report your situation.”Trident’s voice came through. “Grizzly Bear received. We have just repelled the invading monsters.”Grizzly bear laughed, “There shouldn’t be any monsters in the near future.” “Very good! Don’t let your guard down.” With that, Trident hung up the communication. “Alright, it’s time to rest. The monsters won’t invade the ice pool again in the short term,”grizzly bear laughed loudly. “Lin Xuan, come, come, let’s play a bottle of vodka.” Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. Before he could say anything, the communication device on grizzly bear’s waist vibrated again. Grizzly Bear was stunned. What was going on. There were two communications in just one minute? After the call was connected, Trident’s serious voice came from the other side. “Grizzly Bear from Ice Pond No. 4, this is Trident from Ice Pond No. 1. I’ve contacted all six ice ponds in the middle circle, but there’s no response from Ice Pond No. 6.” “Ice Pond No. 4 is the closest to Ice Pond No. 6. Now, I need you to head to Ice Pond No. 6 to investigate the situation.” “If you run into danger, you can turn back quickly, but you still need to report the situation.” Grizzly Bear and Lin Xuan’s hearts sank. No Response? There was a high probability that something had happened. “Roger, I’ll go now,”grizzly bear replied seriously. After hanging up, grizzly bear scratched his head. “I have to go to Ice Pond No. 6. It will take at least three hours to go back and forth like this. Brother Lin Xuan, I’ll leave this place to you.” Lin Xuan waved his hand and said, “No need. I have a way.” After saying that, he used his avatar and the doppelganger of the poison blade appeared beside him. Grizzly patted his head and said in surprise, “Yes! I forgot that you have a very powerful doppelganger!” He quickly took out a map and marked the location of the No. 6 Ice Pool in the middle circle. “The No. 6 Ice Pool is here. The SUV is right outside. Ask your doppelganger to investigate and see if they were...; attacked by monsters.”Grizzly sighed. Lin Xuan nodded and multitasked. He controlled the poison blade doppelganger to drive the SUV toward the No. 6 Ice Pool. The journey to the No. 6 Ice Pool in the central circle wasn’t short. On the way, Lin Xuan’s poison blade avatar encountered a small snowstorm. However, the faster the snowstorm came, the faster it went. He only lost some HP in the snowstorm before he successfully drove the off-road vehicle out of it. “The quality of this off-road vehicle of the Arctic army is really good. Even after such a fierce snowstorm, it didn’t suffer much damage.”Lin Xuan was surprised. Two hours later, Poison Blade’s doppelganger arrived at the No. 6 Ice Pool in the middle circle. However, what greeted his eyes was a scene of ruins. The ice wall had collapsed, and blood covered the ground. There were also strange laughs and screams mixed in. Lin Xuan’s expression turned cold, and he immediately controlled the poison blade to approach carefully. With the addition of the malicious set, shadow cloak, and Assassin’s ring, the presence of the poison blade was almost zero. He silently approached the edge of the ice pool and saw a tragic scene. Puchi. The head of a Tier 8 martial artist was crushed by Jack. Brain matter and blood exploded everywhere. Jack did not Dodge. Instead, he allowed the liquid to splash onto his body with an expression of enjoyment. Bruno dodged far away. When he saw this scene, he felt a chill in his heart. He had heard of the Salvation Society’s Jack before. It was just that he was a little violent. It was not to the extent of being so cruel and violent. How did he become a human-shaped devil after dropping his level to become a rank 8 or rank 9 fighter. It was as if the dark side of his heart had been magnified countless times. “Jack, Adamson, Bernie...;” Lin Xuan frowned deeply when he saw these people. When there was good news, there were only about twenty people on the other side. When there was bad news, the other side was all level eight warriors. Lin Xuan believed that he could deal with three to five people at the same time. However, the other side had experienced warriors like Jack, and there were so many level eight warriors. He really could not defeat them. “Retreat first and tell grizzly about the situation here.”Lin Xuan immediately wanted to recall his poison blade avatar. At this time, he suddenly saw a black gas rising from Jack’s body. The black gas formed a huge cage in the blink of an eye. Before Lin Xuan could react, the black cage had already covered the poison blade. Lin Xuan wanted to use flash to let the poison blade escape, but he realized that his skill seemed to be suppressed, and he couldn’t use it. Boom! The cage crashed down, binding the poison blade avatar. Jack exclaimed and turned his head. Only then did Adamson, Bernie, Bruno, and the others react. There was someone behind them! Jack looked at the person in the cage and was instantly ecstatic. “Poison Blade! Lin Xuan’s clone! It’s really you! Why are you in the permafrost tundra? The people from the construction department are here too?” He laughed without restraint, his voice filled with malevolence. “You didn’t expect it, right? As long as you appear beside me, you’ll be captured by the cage! You’ll never be able to take back this clone of yours!” Jack stared into Poison Blade’s eyes, as if he could see Lin Xuan behind him through those eyes, and see the embarrassed and furious expression on Lin Xuan’s face. But he was disappointed. Poison Blade was expressionless. There was not a hint of fear in his eyes. Lin Xuan kept quiet. He knew that the more afraid he was at this time, the happier the other party would be. He calmed down and immediately let poison blade look at the information of the black net with his all-seeing eye. —— Name: dark element binding cage Level: level 10, Level 3 Quality: dark gold legendary Effect 1: Remember the aura of a creature. As long as the creature appears within 100 meters of you, immediately bind and capture it. Effect 2: during the binding process, suppress all skills of lower quality than yourself. If the quality of the skill is the same, suppress it according to the level. —— Lin Xuan’s expression changed slightly. Suppression Skill! This dark element binding cage was very strong! Unsurprisingly, it should be something that the dark one gave to Jack. However, it could only suppress skills of lower quality than the dark element binding cage. The dark gold legendary quality skills on Lin Xuan were also suppressed because their level was lower than the dark element binding cage. Flash was one of them. However, Lin Xuan still had three seven-colored immortal skills! Avatar, five senses, all-seeing eye. He tried it and found that he could immediately remove the avatar, so he was relieved. “Why aren’t you afraid? You should be afraid!” Jack roared. Bruno looked at poison blade with a complicated expression. He wanted to help, but if he went up to help now, he might be torn to pieces by Jack. Poison blade then said slowly, “Only when you are in despair will you be afraid.” Jack was stunned and laughed strangely, “Your clones can no longer be retrieved. It is equivalent to you losing one clone completely! If I remember correctly, you only have five clones. Now that I have bound one, there are only four left!” “Those clones of yours, I will also capture them one by one! In the end, it will be your main body!” Jack laughed sinisterly. “I’ve said it long ago when I drowned the city. I will remember you! I will definitely make your life a living hell!” “Hurry up and say it. Other than you, are there people from the construction division here? where is the head of Your Construction Division? Is He here too? !” Jack questioned loudly. “The people from the construction division are all here. The six heads and tens of thousands of construction division agents are all hiding somewhere, waiting to ambush you. Are You Afraid?”Poison blade laughed softly. Jack,”...;” Adamson,”...;” You’re F * cking lying to me! “Where are you going to attack next?”Poison Blade suddenly asked. Jack sneered, “I won’t tell you!” Poison blade immediately said, “There are six ice pools in the middle circle. The one closest to the No. 6 Ice Pool is the No. 4 Ice Pool. Your next target will definitely be there.” After saying that, he saw the expressions of Jack, Adamson, and the others change slightly. It was very difficult for anyone to hide their micro expressions. Obviously, Lin Xuan had guessed correctly. “So what if I guessed correctly? The permafrost tundra often causes snowstorms. We will soon arrive at Ice Pool No. 4. No one will be able to assist us there!”Jack sneered. Poison blade said, “My main body is at Ice Pool No. 4. I will wait for you.” Jack was stunned. “Impossible! You are not stupid enough to tell me the location of your main body.” Poison blade said, “Believe it or not, I’m in the fourth ice pool in the middle circle. Come and kill me if you can.” After saying that, he closed his eyes. Jack looked at poison blade suspiciously and pulled Adamson and the others to a secret place. “Regardless of whether Lin Xuan’s main body is there or not, we’re going to attack the fourth ice pool next.” “However, Lin Xuan found out about our existence through his doppelganger. He will definitely call for help from the other ice pools.” “You guys go to the other ice pools separately and use the dark element energy in your bodies to create chaos. The bigger the matter, the better. As for Ice Pool No. 4, I will handle it alone!” Jack patted his chest. He was very confident in his own strength. Adamson could not help but say, “You alone...;” Jack sneered, “I still have the dark element energy bestowed by the High Ambassador on me. Ordinary level eight fighters are no different from pigs and dogs in my eyes! “Moreover, one of Lin Xuan’s avatars has already been imprisoned by me. His strength has decreased by at least one-sixth!” Adamson nodded. “Alright, then let’s split up and attack the other ice pools.” The dark elemental energy in their bodies was bestowed by the dark descendants. They could protect their lives or use it to attack. Adamson was now a level 8 and level 3 fighter. However, when he fully activated the dark elemental energy, his strength was comparable to a level 8 and Level 7 fighter! This was also the reason why they dared to venture deep into the permafrost tundra alone and Massacre Everyone! “Let’s go.” Jack returned to poison blade and threw him directly into the SUV. At this time, Adamson and the others had already left according to their plan. .. Ice Pond No. 4 in the Middle Circle. Lin Xuan quickly walked in front of Grizzly Bear and told him everything he saw. Grizzly Bear was greatly shocked. “The Salvation Society? How is that possible! The permafrost tundra is strictly sealed off from other organizations. It’s impossible for them to get in.” Lin Xuan shook his head, “For some reason, the permafrost tundra is connected to the angel fortress. They came in through the mystic realm connection. All the members of the No. 6 Ice Pool in the middle circle have been killed. Their next target is here, No. 4 Ice Pool.” Grizzly’s face twitched. “I’ll call for help immediately!” He took out his communicator and quickly sent a message to Trident. Trident listened to his report and immediately became serious, “Okay, I’ll immediately transfer people from the nearby ice pools to the No. 4 Ice Pool. However, you have to be mentally prepared. Our ice pools are basically nurtured by ice race infants. It’s going to be difficult to pull people out when the monsters are about to attack.” Grizzly replied in a deep voice, “I understand.” After hanging up the communication device, he immediately began to arrange for the inspection of the city defense equipment. “Jack...; was once a level 9, Level 1 fighter. Now, even if he dropped to level 8 or level 9, he’s still very strong, right?” Grizzly’s face twitched as he sighed. Lin Xuan smiled, “Maybe.” Ye Yuqiu was still absorbing the ice energy in the ice pool at the moment. Hearing this, she said in a clear voice, “I have a way to restrain his movements, but I’m afraid the time is very short.” Grizzly’s eyes lit up. “If we can restrain him, it’ll be a great advantage. If we gather all our firepower in a short time, we might be able to seriously injure him.” Lin Xuan also nodded slightly. He had never used the Thunder Dao child talisman that Ji Ruyue had given him. Now that it had reached 40% charge, it could burst out with powerful battle strength in a short time. “Moreover, he thinks that the poison blade avatar is already restrained and can’t use any skills. He definitely won’t be wary of the poison blade.” Lin Xuan suddenly laughed in his heart. If he grasped this point well, he might be able to catch poison blade off guard. .. A few hours later, an SUV appeared outside the No. 4 Ice Pool in the middle circle. Jack jumped out of the car. He casually threw the cage on the snow. He allowed the cold snow to gradually cover poison blade’s body. Grizzly bear stood on the ice wall and saw this scene, and his pupils constricted. He knew very well that the poison blade was Lin Xuan’s clone, but it was ultimately a product of a skill. As long as he wanted to take it back, he should be able to take it back at any time. What method did Jack use to actually restrain Lin Xuan’s clone. “I know what you’re thinking. Your reinforcements won’t come,”Jack laughed arrogantly. “The Guardians of the ice pool are already too busy to take care of themselves. It’s impossible for them to send reinforcements.” As soon as he finished speaking, the communicator on Grizzly’s waist vibrated. Trident’s anxious voice came from within. “The ice pools in the Middle Circle No. 1, No. 2, No. 3, and No. 5 have all been attacked by unknown enemies. In addition, the monsters have also attacked. We have to guard these ice pools. We Can’t deploy manpower for the time being! “Please guard the ice pools No. 4 and wait for reinforcements.” Grizzly took a deep breath and said, “Understood!” His heart was heavy. On their side, there were only three tier 8 fighters, five tier 7 fighters, and the defensive equipment on the ice walls. However, the opponent was a Tier 9 fighter who had been through hundreds of battles. Even though he was now a Tier 8 or Tier 9 fighter and some of his equipment could not be used, his skills were still there. Could the huge gap in numbers make up for it? “Let’s begin, massacre!” Jack laughed wantonly, and a large amount of black gas suddenly surged out of his body. The black gas actually formed two heads and four arms on his body. Three heads and six arms! Moreover, these black arms held different weapons. A huge sword, a huge spear, a huge bow, and a human head staff. When the Arctic Army warriors guarding the city saw this scene, they were instantly terrified. What the hell! It was beyond comprehension! Lin Xuan looked at Jack again and found that there was a huge change in his information. —— Name: Jack Level: Tier 8, Level 9 Race: Half-dark descendant Class: Blood Slayer Attributes: Vitality 401, strength 399, agility 411, Spirit 209 Skills: dark element affinity, slaughter absorption, dark element strengthening.. Equipment: dark element binding cage, Slaughter Greatsword.. —— “Strange...; he actually obtained a dark descendant’s race skill.” Lin Xuan was stunned. Previously, he had seen Orr’s data panel. [ dark element affinity ] was a skill that all dark descendants possessed. As for [ slaughter absorption ] on Jack, it was the class skill of his class, Blood Slayer. Killing people could restore HP. And the [ dark elemental strengthening ] was the reason why Jack suddenly had three heads and six arms. “His race has also changed from a human to a half-dark descendant. Could it be that...; it’s difficult to turn him into a body that carries the soul of a dark descendant?” Lin Xuan felt a chill run down his spine. It seemed that even the so-called dark descendants did not treat their so-called allies equally. “Kill!” Jack let out a strange laugh. He shot out a giant spear from his black arm and smashed it into the ice wall. With just one strike, a big hole was created in the ice wall. A rank 7 warrior of the Arctic army lost his balance and almost fell from the top of the wall. Jack raised his human-headed staff again. A huge pitch-black skull slowly rose up and pressed down on Grizzly Bear and the others! “Blow it up!” Grizzly Bear was filled with fear, but he gritted his teeth, trying his best not to show any signs of panic. He immediately raised his Vulcan cannon. A large number of rockets shot out from the cannon barrel, aiming for the pitch-black skull. The other 5 Type 7 martial artists followed suit, trying their best to use the rockets to slow down the pitch-black skull. Hong! The strength of both sides finally reached an equilibrium in mid-air. The pitch-black skull and the rockets were annihilated and exploded in the air at the same time! The terrifying shockwave caused everyone to fall off the ice wall. The ice wall also shattered into pieces, completely losing its ability to protect. The flame tower that was placed on the ice wall also lost its effectiveness. Lin Xuan, Grizzly Bear, and Ye Yuqiu landed steadily on the ground, vigilantly staring at Jack who was striding over. Behind him, wolf howls could be heard from all directions! Jack was stunned for a moment, but then he laughed out loud. “When monsters attack the ice pond, even the heavens will kill you!” “It’s time to go!” He laughed maniacally and swung his huge sword fiercely! Grizzly took a deep breath, taking out a large shield from his storage compartment, and went up to meet it. Dang! The sound of metal colliding rang out. Kacha! The large shield grizzly held in both hands had no effect at all, and actually lost its durability at the moment of collision, shattering on the spot! Grizzly’s sturdy body seemed to have been rammed head on by a mammoth, and he was sent flying dozens of meters like a doll, spitting out blood in mid-air! The 5 Arctic Army Type 7 warriors were terrified. One strike had caused the grizzly bear to lose its fighting strength! What kind of terrifying fighting strength was this? The grizzly bear took out a bottle of great life potion and gulped it down, forcing itself to stand up. Jack’s sinister smile was reflected in its eyes, as well as the swarms of monsters attacking from behind him. Boom! Just as Jack was about to charge over once more, a large number of fireballs descended from the sky! These fireballs were more than five meters in diameter. Looking at the sky, one would even have the illusion that a small meteorite was falling. Grizzly Bear looked over and saw that Lin Xuan’s flame burst avatar was taking out a burning codex and casting a skill. Burning City! The torrential flames fell, forcing Jack to slow down. Many monsters had no choice but to go around the Sea of fire. Jack advanced in the Sea of fire, but he kept laughing strangely. “Burn, Burn, how long will your mana last?” Lin Xuan did not stop. He released his avatar again, and a clone of the Frost region appeared beside him. A huge and sharp icicle suddenly appeared. Great Ice sealing spell! Jack’s feet were covered in frost, and his speed was further reduced. His expression did not change, but his face was still full of confidence. All of this was useless to him. With the power given by the Dark One in his body, he was now like a god of War! Lin Xuan took half a step back. “How much longer do you need to prepare?” Ye Yuqiu said in a low voice, “One minute, give me another minute. When he gets within 100 meters, I can guarantee that I will hold him in place for about a second.” “Okay, I will buy time!”Lin Xuan nodded seriously. He also summoned his shield demon and milk bro doppelgangers. Both of them took out their long-range skills and bombarded Jack. Jack’s speed decreased again and again, and his HP also decreased a lot. The monsters that came from all directions were also heavily injured. Seeing this, grizzly bear and the five level 7 warriors of the Arctic army hurriedly attacked the heavily injured monsters, not letting them rush to Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu’s side. Grizzly Bear clenched his fists and said in a low voice, “Prepare the Vulcan cannons.” Hearing this, the five level 7 warriors nodded. They seemed to be shaken by Jack’s power, but in fact, they had already approached the Vulcan cannons scattered on the ground and even replaced them with new ammunition. As long as there was a chance, the Vulcan cannons would once again pour out boiling flames! Jack seemed to enjoy this kind of cat-and-mouse pleasure. Especially when he appeared with an unstoppable momentum. The other side racked their brains to think of a way to deal with it, but in the end, only death was left. The despair and grief on the opponent’s face made him feel even more excited and infatuated than when his life was at its peak during intercourse! “Now!” Ye Yuqiu suddenly let out a low shout and slammed his hands on the ground. The ice spread like a spider web towards Jack’s feet. In the blink of an eye, Jack’s feet were frozen solid. No matter how he struggled, he was shocked to find that he would be frozen for at least one second! “What skill is this? It can actually bind me for one second?” Jack was shocked and doubtful, but the powerful feeling from his limbs and bones immediately made him quickly throw these doubts out of his mind. It was only binding him for one second. What use could it be? With these people’s strength, they could not kill him in one second! “Attack!” Grizzly roared and took the lead to open the Vulcan cannon. The five tier 7 martial artists followed suit and fired. Boom! Boom! Boom! The six crude cannon barrels spat out raging flames! However, although it looked impressive, it had little effect. Jack’s HP only decreased by 8% . At this moment, Lin Xuan took out the item that Ji Ruyue had given him. He flipped his palm and took out the Thunder Dao child amulet from his storage compartment. This was a purple amulet the size of a palm. The blood-stained cinnabar on it outlined an obscure and ancient pattern. If one looked closely, they would be unable to extricate themselves from these strange patterns. Lin Xuan had long known how powerful the Thunder Dao Child amulet was. As soon as he took it out, he raised his palm and aimed it at Jack. “Go!” He gave the order. Four huge purple thunder talismans suddenly appeared outside of the Thunder Dao Child Talisman. The Lightning in the Thunder Talisman surged, as if it was cut from heaven and earth. The terrifying lightning, no matter who saw it, everyone would feel terrified. Jack was the same. It was the first time he had seen such lightning! This was a terrifying lightning that no lightning skill could release! Dodge! He had to dodge! Jack roared in his heart. This was his instinctive decision. However, he wanted to move, but found that his feet were still firmly locked in place! There was still half a second! He still had half a second to get rid of this damn freeze! Jack cursed. He could only mobilize all the dark elements in his body in front of him, forming a black light shield. Grizzly Bear, Ye Yuqiu, and the five tier 7 warriors were shocked. Lin Xuan was holding such a terrifying equipment? In the next moment, four lightning talismans flew out of his hands and shot toward Jack. Boom! The dazzling lightning covered everything in the world. Everyone couldn’t help but close their eyes, tears falling from the corners of their eyes. It was too bright. So Bright that their eyes couldn’t bear it. It seemed like only a brief moment had passed. It seemed to last for a long time. When Ye Yuqiu, Grizzly Bear, and the others opened their eyes, Jack was no longer there. His body disappeared without a trace under the monstrous lightning. Only his two feet, which were covered in frost, and some of his toes remained, showing that this person was the last proof that he was alive. The monsters that were charging at Jack were evaporated like Steam. Only some of the monsters that were the furthest managed to retain a part of their limbs, but they were already dead. “Level-8, level-9, three heads and six arms, just like that?” The grizzly bear gulped. The five Level-7 warriors of the Arctic army were also dumbfounded. Jack was almost insufferably arrogant just now, like a six-armed demon god who had crawled out of Hell. He was gone just like that? Ye Yuqiu was the most shocked one. Among the people present, she had spent the longest time with Lin Xuan. She knew that Lin Xuan’s strength was very strong, and he was also at the top among level 8 warriors. But...; where did such a terrifying equipment come from? This item had already completely exceeded the scope of a level 8 warrior. Ye Yuqiu estimated that if it was a fighter who had just advanced to tier 9 not long ago, he would have died on the spot if he had taken this attack without moving! “Could it be that the woman in white and the woman with the black sword gave it to him?”Ye Yuqiu was a little envious. “Hu...;” Seeing that Jack did not even have much ash left, Lin Xuan finally let out a long breath and put away the Thunder Talisman that had already dimmed. This thing was really powerful. Moreover, because he was worried that Jack wouldn’t die completely, Lin Xuan didn’t only cast one thunder talisman. Instead, he simply used up all the energy in one go and cast four Thunder Talismans. Now, the Thunder Talisman had to start absorbing energy from zero again. “During the time when the Thunder Talisman is absorbing energy, it will be a little awkward if we encounter any danger,”Lin Xuan smiled helplessly. “However, I have the white arowana costume, so it shouldn’t be a problem for me to sacrifice my life.” At this moment, grizzly bear walked over and sighed. “Lin Xuan, thank you. If it weren’t for you, we would all be dead.” The five level seven warriors were also very grateful. It was really their luck that Lin Xuan could come to their No. 4 Ice Pond. Lin Xuan smiled and walked to Jack’s few remaining corpses and took a few things. Jack dropped three things. A large amount of essence, a blood-red greatsword, and a small cage that was glowing with black light. The blood-red Greatsword was Jack’s signature weapon. Since Lin Xuan couldn’t use it, he gave it to grizzly bear. Grizzly Bear was full of smiles. He was so happy that he was about to burst into laughter. This weapon was too suitable for his unrestrained attack style. Lin Xuan was a good kid. He knew how to use it! Lin Xuan glanced at the small cage, deep in thought. “This is the dark element binding cage. It can only be used twice at most. It’s not bad. It’s the best choice whether to kill the enemy or escape.” Lin Xuan put it into his bag. At this moment, hurried footsteps came from afar. Trident and his men finally arrived. However, the situation they had imagined did not happen. Lin Xuan, Grizzly Bear, and the others stood there calmly. Trident was stunned. “We have already found out that the Salvation Society is playing tricks, you guys...;” They had captured Bernie, and Bernie was the last to confess. Jack had personally attacked the No. 4 Ice Pond in the middle circle, wanting to capture Lin Xuan alive and torture him. Hearing this news, Trident finished dealing with the monster’s attack and rushed over. Lin Xuan could not die! Hearing this, Grizzly laughed and was extremely excited. “You can’t imagine what just happened! No one can!” Grizzly’s face was full of red light. He wanted to pour out everything that just happened. After Trident heard Grizzly’s exaggerated description, he was greatly shocked. In his heart, he was even more certain of Lin Xuan’s position in the construction department. Wan youxi personally admitted that the woman in white and black sword was extremely strong and was not from Earth. Lin Xuan was able to kill Jack because the woman in white and black sword had given him an extremely strong trump card. This young man was really awesome! He was actually chosen by such a strong person. “It’s good that you guys are okay...;”trident patted Lin Xuan’s shoulder with appreciation. “We still have to go back to defend, so we won’t stay any longer. See you guys later!” After saying that, Trident left without stopping. In the ice pool, during the incubation period of the ice race’s infants, the monsters could not withstand the huge energy, so they would definitely attack again and again. As the person-in-charge of the No. 1 Ice Pool in the middle circle, Trident could not leave for a long time. At the same time. In the depths of the permafrost tundra. There was only one ice pool here. The Grand Marshal of the Arctic army, two commanders of the Arctic army, Wan youxi, Lu Pinghai, and Lu Pingjiang were all stationed here. The magnificent lineup of six tier 9 warriors had completely annihilated the invading monsters. They could not even touch the edge of this large ice pool. “Commander-in-chief Wan, Where’s the one from your construction division...;”the commander-in-chief asked. Wan youxi scratched his head. “I don’t know either...;” They were talking about Ji Ruyue. Ji Ruyue had followed them here before, but she did not stay for long before she disappeared into the snowstorm. Boom! Boom! Boom! Just as the two of them were about to continue their conversation, the sound of a fierce battle suddenly came from the snowstorm in the distance. In the next moment, a powerful black sword Qi that was 100 meters long shot out. It was so powerful that it almost tore apart the snowstorm. At the same time, the roars of several ferocious beasts were heard. The six level nine martial artists stood up instinctively. The situation over there seemed to be very dangerous. Each of them felt the threat of death. Lu Pinghai said seriously, “I’m afraid it’s that one who’s fighting...;” The grand marshal nodded his head in agreement. From the black sword aura, he felt a familiar scent. As expected, it should be the attack of the woman in white and black sword. Then, what was the roar of a beast? When did a monster that could rival that monster appear in the permafrost tundra? The six of them felt an itch in their hearts and wanted to get closer to watch the battle with their own eyes. However, a figure walked out of the snowstorm and Strode towards them. “Senior Ji?” Wan youxi was stunned for a moment and looked at the person who came. The person who came was Ji Ruyue, dressed in white and carrying a black sword. Her entire body was unharmed and her expression was one of ease. However, blood dripped from the black sword in her hand. “You Little Brat, you’ve already been heavily injured by me,”Ji Ruyue said casually. Just now, she had sensed the other party’s powerful and strange power. She had left the vicinity of the ice pond to look for him. The grand marshal was stunned. “Who is it?” Ji Ruyue thought for a moment. “When I was in the Kunlun ruins, this person once ordered humans to attack Kunlun City.” Lu Pinghai immediately reacted. “India!” Ji Ruyue nodded. “Yeah, I didn’t remember the name of their organization. It should be India.” “I took one of that person’s arms. I remember his scent.” “He joined forces with a dark descendant to attack me and try to take my body to absorb energy.” The Grand Marshal, Wan youxi, and the others looked at each other in shock and anger. Dark descendant? Wasn’t that the power behind the Salvation Society? India and the Salvation Society had joined forces and sent people into the permafrost tundra? They really came in? “But now, he should have run away.”Ji Ruyue shook her head. “Take a short nap. Don’t disturb me if there’s nothing.” After saying that, she walked into the shelter next to the ice pool and rested in the room the grand marshal had arranged for her. “This person from your construction division is really strong.”The grand marshal praised sincerely. Previously, he had chatted with Wan youxi and the others and had already learned a lot about Ji Ruyue. Wan youxi said seriously, “Grand Marshal, we have to raise our vigilance. We can’t guarantee that the Salvation Society will launch a surprise attack on US later.” “I understand that.”The grand marshal nodded. He had already realized that the situation was not right. Logically speaking, it was impossible for outsiders to sneak into the permafrost tundra. However, the people from the Salvation Society and India had come. They had even brought the dark ones in. .. On the other side. The Indian leader was lying in a cave, on the verge of death. His waist had completely disappeared, and the cross-section was extremely smooth. Beside him was Simon. As for the new pope, Shadow, and the others, they were in the other direction. These tier 9 warriors were divided into two groups, wanting to surround the grand marshal and the others from two different directions. The Indian leader gritted his teeth, “I was careless!” His tone was different from usual, and his voice was very ancient and heavy. Simon sized up his wound without leaving a trace. A black light flashed in his eyes, but he still comforted him, “It’s okay. I understand King Jie Ri’s ability. He must have been careless.” The Indian leader nodded slightly. Simon said casually, “King Jie Ri, do you still have a way to recover? If you can’t recover, I’m afraid you’ll have to rest here. But this way, we can’t give you the reward we agreed on in advance.” The Indian leader became anxious when he heard that. “No! I must get that woman’s flesh and blood! I’ll definitely recover to my peak condition after eating her!” Simon lowered his eyes. “As long as you can recover some HP, you can join the battle. We will naturally recognize your contribution.” The Indian leader was furious. “At the moment, I can only help you from the rear.” Simon suddenly stared straight into the Indian leader’s eyes. After a long while, he laughed strangely. “King Jie RI, did you use all your trump cards against that woman?” His voice became hoarse and obscure, as if he had just learned human language. The Indian leader was stunned. “You...; You’re not the human from before.” Simon laughed strangely. “Of course, how can I enjoy a good meal without revealing my true body?” The Indian leader was shocked. “We’re allies! We agreed!” King Jie Ri’s facial features suddenly appeared on his face. The facial features of the two of them strangely overlapped. Black gas gushed out of Simon’s body and quickly formed a cage that enveloped the Indian leader and himself. “An ally? An ally is to be sold.”A strange laughter sounded in the cage. The Scream of the Indian leader came to an abrupt end. At this moment, Lin Xuan was resting in his room. The No. 4 Ice Pond in the middle circle had experienced a monster attack, so there wouldn’t be any more monsters attacking for a while. He could also take advantage of this time to continue absorbing the energy ball that Ji Ruyue gave him. “I’ve leveled up two levels in a row. I’ve reached level 8.” After more than an hour, Lin Xuan opened his eyes happily, his face full of smiles. Jack was indeed a level 9 fighter, he had accumulated a lot of essence. The essence obtained from killing Jack, together with the energy ball after the Dark One’s death, actually pushed his level up to level 8. “One more step and I’ll be able to break through to level 9!” Lin Xuan was slightly happy. At this moment, the Thunder Dao Child Talisman on his body suddenly vibrated. He was stunned for a moment. This thing could still vibrate? He took out the Thunder Dao Child Talisman and immediately felt a thought. “I feel something. It’s very likely to be able to refine an even stronger ice dao child talisman. Bring the Thunder Dao Child Talisman to this location. I’ll meet you there.” Following this thought, there was a guide. As long as Lin Xuan followed the guide, he could reach the destination. Lin Xuan clicked his tongue in wonder. The Thunder Dao Child Talisman actually had such a function. Ji Ruyue must have sent him a message through the Great Dao Talisman. Lin Xuan found Grizzly Bear and ye Yuqiu and explained the situation to them. Grizzly bear nodded. Ye Yuqiu was not worried. After seeing Lin Xuan’s previous strength, they weren’t worried that anything would happen to Lin Xuan. Grizzly bear even felt that as long as he didn’t meet a Tier 9 warrior, Lin Xuan could do whatever he wanted. On the other side. The new pope of the Knights of truth advanced in the Blizzard with Shadow, deep into the permafrost tundra. At this time, King Wei’s voice suddenly sounded in shadow’s mind. “I feel something very important. It can be refined into the puppet’s heart and rapidly increase my strength. Stop for now and Go There!” King Wei Ming said anxiously. Shadow frowned. “King, if we stop to take that thing now, it might very well ruin our plan.” King Wei Ming snorted coldly. “This king’s interests are the most important!” Shadow was silent for a moment and immediately explained this matter to the pope. The pope was stunned. “Sir Ying, what do you mean by this?” Ying shook his head. “I’m only informing you and not discussing it with you.” “Attacking the Arctic army and killing the ice race is our agreement. I will naturally abide by it. But right now, I have more important things to do.” “Your choice is either to go alone or to wait for me at the predetermined location.” After saying that, he turned around and walked into the snowstorm, leaving the pope alone in the wind. F * ck. You actually put aside such a huge plan and went to do other things first? The pope gritted his teeth and could only continue to move forward. .. At the junction of the inner circle of the permafrost tundra, there was a huge ice cave. The ice cave was more than a hundred meters in diameter, and its entire body was like a funnel that pierced straight into the earth. “It’s actually here. I heard that this is the place where the ores are produced in the permafrost tundra. However, the ores are almost all covered with the ice attribute.” Lin Xuan came here, deep in thought. “The thing we’re looking for is in the deepest part of this ice cave. Let’s go.”Ji Ruyue suddenly appeared behind him. Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. He didn’t know who taught him this habit of appearing and disappearing mysteriously. Could It Be Ji Ruyue’s unknown master? Not long after the two of them entered the Ice Cave, Shadow also arrived. The air around him distorted, and King name Reed appeared on his own. “Wait, this familiar aura...; !” King name Reed was stunned. The Aura in the air reminded him of some distant and reverent memories. Shadow was stunned. King name Reed had always been the supreme ruler in the world, but this was the first time he was stunned. He probed, “King, who is it? An old friend of yours?” King Wei quickly retracted his expression and quickly returned to his original state. He said in a deep voice, “It might be an old friend of this king...; but I don’t know if we are enemies or friends now. Let’s move forward. When we meet her, this king will know.” After saying that, he returned to shadow’s body. Shadow lowered his eyes. He didn’t know if it was just his imagination. He felt...; fear from King Wei Ming! That’s right, it was fear. Although it was just a flash, for the shadow who was proficient in the human heart, he could feel many things in this flash. “Who exactly is the person who can make him fear?” With such doubts, the shadow went deep into the ice cave. .. The process of Lin Xuan and Ji Ruyue going deep into the ice cave couldn’t be said to be ups and downs, at least there were no ripples. All the monsters they encountered along the way would be intimidated by Ji Ruyue’s aura and run away with their tails between their legs. Soon, they arrived at the deepest part of the Ice Cave. It was like a Crystal Palace, with crystal-clear ice ridges everywhere. If one ignored the minus-ten-degree temperature here, this place would definitely become a tourist attraction. Lin Xuan also saw that almost everything was sealed in the ice ridges here. Some were equipment, some were rare minerals. Some even had blue crystals that looked like hearts. It was the specialty of the permafrost tundra, the Polar Ice Heart. After using the polar ice heart, one could block the next attack. Of course, the highest one could block was level nine or level seven. An attack higher than level nine or level seven could still ignore the polar ice heart. Even so, the extreme frost ice heart was an extremely rare treasure. The Warriors of the Arctic army were desperately trying to find it. As for the more important eternal winter ice heart, no one had found it for a year or two. On the contrary, not many people had high hopes. Lin Xuan and Ji Ruyue took a few steps closer. They saw that in the center of these icicle crystals floated an irregular ice-blue crystal the size of a human head. Lin Xuan took a glance and got all the information about it. —— Name: Eternal Frozen origin Quality: seven-colored immortality Level: Level 10, Level 1 Effects: permanently increases ice damage by 30% and ice resistance by 20% after consumption. Description: The Essence of the eternal frozen tundra can only be produced once every few decades. —— “This is it!” Ji Ruyue smiled and was about to take it away. However, her footsteps suddenly stopped and she looked behind her. Behind her was a figure walking towards her. Lin Xuan turned around and saw the other party. His eyebrows immediately shot up. Ying! Ying was also very shocked. He didn’t expect it to be these two people. “Lin Xuan, we meet again.”The corners of Ying’s mouth curled up. However, Ji Ruyue said, “King Wei Ming?” The air around Ying distorted and the well-built Wei Ming kingdom suddenly appeared. His expression was unnatural. He didn’t expect the other party to see through him at a glance. “Young Palace Master.”Wei Ming king nodded slightly, and at the same time, he sized up Ji Ruyue. Ying and Lin Xuan were both stunned. These two actually knew each other? And it seemed that Ji Ruyue was the one in charge. The information that Ji Ruyue had told him appeared in Lin Xuan’s mind. The country named Wei...; seemed to be a mortal dynasty under Kunlun Palace and Heavenly Dragon Temple! “King named Wei, I didn’t expect you to appear on Earth as well. We are quite fated.”Ji Ruyue said with a faint smile. King named Wei said, “Young Palace master, I don’t know either. I appeared on Earth as soon as I woke up.” “But...;”king named Wei looked Ji Ruyue up and down. “Young Palace Master’s strength seems to be damaged?” Ji Ruyue shook the Great Dao Talisman in her palm. Lin Xuan felt the vibration of the Thunder Dao Child Talisman and immediately understood ji Ruyue’s signal. His muscles immediately tensed up. “It’s indeed damaged. Why? King Wei wants to attack me?”Ji Ruyue said indifferently. King Wei laughed strangely. “I’ve long heard that Young Palace Master has the heaven-destroying sword and the Great Dao Talisman of Kunlun. If I can get these two things, my strength will definitely increase greatly and I’ll be able to stand firm in this strange world!” “Young Palace master, since your strength has been damaged, why don’t you hand those two items over to me!” As soon as he finished speaking, he pounced forward like a fierce tiger descending from the mountain. His hands were like claws, pointing straight at Ji Ruyue’s throat and heart. Shadow pounced out at the same time, and the black tachi slashed down explosively at Lin Xuan! One second ago, he was still smiling warmly. The next second, he attacked explosively! Lin Xuan activated the Thunder Dao Child Talisman, and a thunder shield appeared beside him. Boom! The Black Saber Light and the Thunder Shield collided. The black saber light vanished without a sound. Lin Xuan looked behind him, and the icicles behind him shattered on the spot! Ying frowned. King Wei saw this scene from the corner of his eye. “Young Palace Master, you even gave the Thunder Dao Child Talisman to an outsider? Aren’t you afraid that the Kunlun Palace master will punish you if he finds out?” Ji Ruyue evaded his attack lightly and said indifferently, “I don’t know if Master is Dead or alive. If he dies, I’ll be the new palace master. I can give the Thunder Dao child talisman to anyone.” After saying that, she actually took out another ice-blue Talisman and threw it at Lin Xuan. “Take it.” Lin Xuan’s hands were quick. With the help of the rebound force formed from the shadow strike, he grabbed the talisman. Ice Dao Child Talisman! And it was fully charged! Lin Xuan was overjoyed. After killing Jack, his Thunder Dao Child Talisman only managed to absorb 20% of the energy. He could only release one thunder shield before it quickly dimmed. He was just worried about how to deal with Shadow. Ji Ruyue’s Ice Dao child talisman immediately boosted his confidence. “Asura Cut!” Shadow growled and the Black Tachi fought again. In the blink of an eye, the black saber light transformed into the image of a green-faced, fanged, and evil ghost as it pounced at him. Lin Xuan had just grabbed the ice dao child charm, and he was still in midair. He had no choice but to take this attack head-on, and he was sent flying dozens of meters. “There’s something strange on your body. Is it a piece of equipment or a skill?” Shadow frowned deeply. It was the same back in drowning city. This attack was clearly fatal against any tier 8 martial artist. Only Lin Xuan was able to take this attack head-on, and his HP only decreased by about half. This was too strange. Lin Xuan rolled a few times on the ground and quickly gulped down a bottle of great HP Potion. Before Shadow’s second slash landed, he finally activated the ice path child amulet. Ice Wall! Asura slash, which seemed capable of shattering everything, was blocked by the ice wall released by the Ice Path Child Amulet. After the ice wall shattered, three huge ice blades slashed horizontally! Shadow’s pupils suddenly contracted. He could feel a strong killing intent from these ice blades. He could not block them, so he could only Dodge. However, he had just moved forward, and his displacement skill was on Cooldown. Helpless, he had no choice but to use his trump card. “Dolls!” Five dolls flew out from Shadow’s storage box in succession. These puppets were all made of Diamond Wood. Moreover, they were all given basic intelligence by the great development thousand machine technique. They did not need to be controlled to complete operations that were not too complicated. Originally, he had planned to use them to plant spies. But now, he had no choice but to use them to block the knives. Boom Boom Boom. The five diamond wood puppets shattered on the spot. One ice blade exhausted its power and was also annihilated. “There are still two more!” Ying gritted his teeth and retreated rapidly. At the same time, he took out the yellow leaf, extreme frost ice heart, and other items from his bosom. Although these items could not completely block this attack, they could still dissipate a portion of its power. After throwing out a large number of life-saving trump cards, the second ice blade had also used up all its power. “There’s still one last ice blade!” Ying gritted his teeth. Even if it was just this ice blade, he could still feel a sharp killing intent. If he could not weaken it, he would still die without a doubt. Ying took a deep breath and finally decided to use the thing that the Salvation Society had given him. “This thing might change my will, but now I have no choice but to use it!” A thick black gas suddenly erupted from Ying’s chest. The black gas surged into his eyes, ears, mouth, nose, and mouth, making his eyes as black as ink. However, the black gas quickly formed a black gas barrier, as hard as obsidian to shake. Boom! The third ice blade clashed with the black gas barrier. Ice shards flew everywhere. Shadow was sent flying back nearly a hundred meters, his equipment almost completely shattered. His HP had also dropped to an extremely dangerous level! Boom! At this time, Ji Ruyue had also found a flaw in King Wei’s defense. She pulled out the heaven-destroying sword and chopped off one of his arms. King Wei screamed in pain and ran away frantically. “Let’s Go!” King Wei grabbed shadow, who was heavily injured, and the two of them suddenly fell to the ground with a thud. Lin Xuan took a closer look. There were only two rough-carved puppets left on the ground, but there were no traces of King Wei and shadow. “Spring comes to the withered tree...; interesting. King Wei actually learned this substitution secret technique from the Heavenly Dragon Temple. No wonder he dared to compete with me.”Ji Ruyue chuckled. Lin Xuan shook his head slightly. What a pity. Just now, when Ying was the closest to death, they had still run away. “So be it. He’s just a headstrong and arrogant King Wei. He’s nothing.” Ji Ruyue smiled and shook her head. “You don’t know what the last King Wei did. You’ll laugh your head off if you tell me everything.” Lin Xuan nodded. He could guess it without Ji Ruyue saying it. “King Wei was infused with spiritual Qi by the Kunlun Palace. They are stronger than mortals and think highly of themselves. They don’t know that all their power comes from the Kunlun Palace.” Ji Ruyue’s beautiful eyes flashed. “You’re right. I know his ability very well. However, his body is made of wood and stone, which makes it a bit stronger than the previous mortal body.” Lin Xuan also reacted. A wood and stone body...; wasn’t that a mannequin. No Wonder King Wei Ming didn’t forget to bring shadow with him when he ran away. Shadow was proficient in puppetry and could certainly repair his body quickly. “Don’t worry about them. We’ll use this object here to refine the ice dao child talisman.” Ji Ruyue stepped forward and took out the frigid eternal frozen essence. She sighed emotionally, “Master has always wanted to use something like the essence to refine the ice dao child talisman. Unfortunately, he didn’t find the best one in the end, so he could only settle for the second best. Now that I’ve found the essence, I wonder what master’s expression will be like when he finds out.” Not long after, a brand-new Ice Dao child talisman appeared in Ji Ruyue’s palm. The cold qi emanating from it was far more intense than the previous one. It was as if one’s soul would freeze at a single glance. “I’ll give this to you.”Ji Ruyue handed the Ice Dao Child Talisman to Lin Xuan. Lin Xuan was rather surprised. “Give it to me? Aren’t you afraid of Master’s Punishment?” Ji Ruyue raised her eyebrows. “I’m the Palace Master of Kunlun Palace Now! I’ll give it to whoever I want!” Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. Ji ruyue asked again, “By the way, What’s your level now?” Lin Xuan answered truthfully, “Level eight.” “I have something here that needs your super-purifying medicine.” As Ji Ruyue spoke, she took out an arm. This arm was completely devoid of flesh and blood. Its entire body was as clear as jade. The bones and blood vessels in it were all fine and delicate, as if it was a perfect sculpture. Lin Xuan glanced at it with the eye of omniscience and was stunned. “King Jie Ri’s right hand?” Ji ruyue asked curiously, “I didn’t even tell you, but you actually saw through it.” “That’s right. Not long ago, the large ice pond in the inner circle of the frozen tundra was attacked. King Jie Ri was one of them. I believe he must have come from the Jie ri region that master mentioned.” “Whether he is an enemy or a friend, as long as he attacks me, he is an enemy.” “However, there is resentment on it. If I absorb it directly, there might be inner demons. Although it’s not difficult to kill the inner demons, I don’t want to face them either.” Lin Xuan said, “Inner demons...; are all kinds of fears in my heart? Illusions?” Ji Ruyue smiled awkwardly. “No...; they are high-level inner demons. The inner demons on King Jie Ri’s right hand can only remind me of some embarrassing things when I was young.” Lin Xuan Thought for a while. “For example...; Bed-wetting?” The atmosphere instantly turned stiff. Lin Xuan coughed dryly and quickly took out the super-purifying potion. “You can use it directly by adding a bit of spirit qi.” Ji Ruyue used the super-purifying potion and successfully removed the remaining resentment on King Jie Ri’s right hand. Then, the jade-like right hand quickly softened under the effect of her spirit qi and finally turned into two jade beads. One was the size of a fist, and the other was only half the size of the previous one. “This one is yours. Your strength has grown very fast. I’m looking forward to the moment when you become a level nine warrior.” Ji Ruyue handed the smaller one to Lin Xuan. “Let’s go.” After saying that, her figure quickly disappeared without a trace. It was astonishingly fast. Lin Xuan nodded in satisfaction and accepted the jade bead. After a trip, he obtained the Ice Dao Child Talisman of the Great Dao Talisman and another jade bead. The dark descendant from before still had some energy left. These two things added together would definitely be enough for him to level up and wait for the ninth-tier advancement mission! Lin Xuan also quickly returned to the No. 4 Ice Pond in the middle circle. .. Not far away, in a cave, Shadow and Lord Wei hid inside. Lord Wei panted heavily, his heart still palpitating. Blood was also flowing all over Shadow’s body. It was a terrible sight, but his breathing was much less intense. And his gaze kept shifting to King Wei. “King, your strength is severely damaged now. We’d better give up.”Shadow lowered his eyes. King Wei’s expression was angry, but he couldn’t refute. He misjudged ji Ruyue’s strength, thinking that her strength was damaged like his, and hadn’t recovered yet. However, he did not expect that he was not a match for Ji Ruyue at all. In the current situation, he could not blame anyone but himself. “You’re right. If you leave temporarily, there will be a chance for you to make a comeback in the future.”King Wei gnashed his teeth. His hatred for Ji Ruyue was almost overwhelming, and he did not pay any attention to what was behind him. Puchi. A strange short knife stabbed into the back of his head and twisted it violently! The intense pain assaulted his mind and almost made him faint. Famous King Wei was furious. “You!” Puchi. The short knife churned again and famous King Wei immediately felt that he had lost consciousness below his head. He was shocked and furious. “Why did you attack me? Are you crazy? !” Shadow did not say a word. He pressed his palm on famous King Wei’s chest and activated the great development thousand machine technique. Purple light enveloped him. In Shadow’s mind, he quickly formed a relationship with this body. He casually gave the command to jump, and the body immediately followed. As the brain, the name King Wei could only watch as his body was being manipulated by others. At this moment, his eyes were overflowing with anger. “King, your strength is actually not inferior to that woman. It’s just that you lack an intelligent brain to lead. It’s a pity that you are not an intelligent brain.” Ying looked straight into his eyes, his expression indifferent. He had already seen the stupidity of this Lord Wei many times. The previous groveling was just a pretense. Now, he had finally found an opportunity to turn the tables. Lord Wei was furious. “Follow this king’s will and we will revive the Wei Ming country here. You will become the number one person under this king! Why are you...;” Ying Wei shook his head slightly. He could not be bothered to waste his breath on this stubborn and arrogant King Wei Ming. The short knife stabbed into King Wei Ming’s throat, completely separating his head from his body. The last knife stabbed into the center of his brows, destroying his brain from the soul level. King Wei Ming did not react until his death. Why did his subjects and servants betray him. His thoughts were still stuck in the era of Wei Ming kingdom. He thought that he was still the King Wei Ming who was above tens of thousands of people. Little did he know that this was not the famous Reed Kingdom, and Ying was not his servant. “This body is a bit too much of a waste to use as a puppet.” “And the strength of the puppet is not my own strength.” Ying stared at the headless body, deep in thought. “I need to find a way to transplant my soul into this body!” .. Two days passed. There were no changes in the past two days. The people of the Salvation Society and the Knights of Truth seemed to have quieted down. Lin Xuan was also happy to be free. He had been absorbing energy in the room. As for the essence of the eight training clones, they were all used to level up their skills. With this, his warrior level continued to rise, reaching tier 8 and tier 9. His skill levels also kept up. A series of powerful skills also reached Tier 8 and tier 7. “My Tier 9 promotion mission, what is it?” Lin Xuan opened the data panel and immediately saw the promotion mission. “Kill a Tier 9 creature on your own, and you will have at least 50% of the contribution points, including but not limited to humans and monsters.” Lin Xuan was speechless He stood up silently and walked around the room twice. After a long while, he said, “You don’t have to give me a mission if you don’t know how to do it, Big Brother.” This mission was very shrewd. It directly stated that he had to kill it on his own. Moreover, if he found a dying tier 9 monster on the way, he could easily finish it. The mission stated that he had to have more than 50% of the contribution points. “It seems that I really have to think of a way to kill a Tier 9 monster.” Lin Xuan scratched his head. Compared to a Tier 9 warrior, a Tier 9 monster was obviously easier to kill. “It’s a pity. If Jack was still alive and was a tier 9 warrior, he would definitely be the weakest among the tier 9 warriors.” “If we are prepared, the success rate of killing him is the highest.” Lin Xuan smacked his lips and felt a little regretful. Jack! Why are you so useless and died so early! At this moment, the ice path child talisman on his body started to vibrate. “Lin Xuan, something big may be related to your five senses. Get Ready. I will bring you and Ye Yuqiu to the inner circle.” Ji Ruyue’s voice rang in his mind. Lin Xuan was stunned. Something to do with the five senses? Wasn’t this his seven-colored skill? Soon, Ji Ruyue arrived at the No. 6 Ice Pond in the middle circle. Lin Xuan communicated with grizzly bear for a moment. Grizzly Bear looked regretful, but he couldn’t disobey the orders of his superiors. He could only watch Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu leave. Under Ji Ruyue’s escort, the three of them didn’t encounter any accidents along the way and successfully arrived at the large ice pond in the inner circle of the permafrost tundra. As soon as Lin Xuan arrived, he was surrounded by level six and level nine warriors. The grand marshal, the two commanders of the Arctic army, Wan youxi, Lu Pinghai, and Lu Pingjiang all stared at Lin Xuan up and down as if it was their first time seeing him. “Ahem...; I didn’t expect you to be a disciple of the Heavenly Dragon Temple,”Wan youxi laughed dryly. Lin Xuan was stunned. “This...;” Ji Ruyue waved her hand. “Come with me.” Lin Xuan followed her to the edge of the ice pool. In this huge ice pool, there were three ice balls in the process of being born. One of the ice balls was much larger than the other two, and its body was emitting a powerful aura. Lin Xuan also saw that this ice ball was flickering with Buddhist light and some faint Buddhist sounds. For these two things to appear on an ice clansman seemed very out of place. More importantly, Lin Xuan also felt that the Buddhist light and Buddhist sounds were very familiar! At this moment, as if sensing some sort of aura, the ice ball suddenly began to shake violently. Ye Yuqiu suddenly took a step forward, her expression changing slightly. “Skaya said that she sensed her brother’s aura.” The Grand Marshal, Wan youxi, and the others looked at each other in surprise. “Then you can go down. Make some contact and let him feel at ease.”Ji Ruyue nodded. Ye Yuqiu jumped into the ice pond and placed her palm on the ice ball. The ice ball instantly stopped shaking. Everyone saw that ye Yuqiu’s body condensed a large amount of cold air and quickly took the shape of a girl. This girl was similar to a human, but her entire body was sickly pale. She also had four hands, not two like a human. “Big Brother...;”the girl was Skaya. She lightly touched the ice ball. A strange sound came from within the ice ball. The two seemed to be communicating. After a long time, the voice within the ice ball gradually began to change. It was similar to a human. “Is he here?” Ji ruyue said, “He’s here. Let him come out.” The ice ball shook slightly. Then, a seed that was shining with Buddhist light flew out. It seemed to have intelligence. It moved around the crowd and finally sensed Lin Xuan’s existence. It seemed to have found its home and landed in Lin Xuan’s palm obediently. Lin Xuan looked at the message and was shocked. The seed of the mountain and sea tree! The seed of the mountain and sea realm will mountain and sea tree! Level 10, Level 7! Seven-colored immortality! It even contained the soul of the eminent monk of Heavenly Dragon Temple, Yuan Tong! “So much information. Let me take a break...;” Lin Xuan rubbed his temples. “Eh, Ru Yue is right. There really are disciples here who have learned the secret of our Heavenly Dragon Temple.” At this moment, the seed of the mountain and sea tree in his palm suddenly spoke. Then, the Buddhist light was like a dense fog, and in the blink of an eye, it condensed into the appearance of a big bald head with a charmingly naive and fat body. The Big Bald Head looked at Lin Xuan carefully and was very surprised. Ji ruyue introduced, “This is Master Yuan Tong. Kunlun Palace and Heavenly Dragon Temple have a close relationship, so in terms of seniority, he can be considered my martial uncle.” Yuan tong chuckled and said, “Ruyue, when I met you in the past, you always called me by my dharma name. Why are you starting to get close to me now?” “Don’t worry. I didn’t sense the half of the Heavenly Dragon Soul Stone on you.” Ji Ruyue said,”...; Old Bald Donkey, you found out about it.” The Grand Marshal, Wan youxi, and the others were confused, but they didn’t dare to say anything. These two were obviously from the same era and were big shots. They couldn’t say anything. The grand marshal knew about the Heavenly Dragon Temple, but he couldn’t figure out how the Heavenly Dragon Temple was related to the ice clan. Ji Ruyue rubbed her temples. “Old Bald Donkey, tell me about your experience. How did the Heavenly Dragon Temple disappear? How did you meet the ice clansmen by chance? And how did you put your soul in this...; tree seed?” Yuan Tong was still as innocent as ever. He didn’t feel sad at all because he only had his soul left. “It’s a long story. Let this penniless monk explain it slowly...;” Everyone gathered around him and listened to Yuan Tong’s three-hour-long nagging. Everyone was silent. Their minds quickly digested Yuan Tong’s story and tried to clear their heads. “I see...; the world we live in is called the mountain and sea realm? The will of the mountain and sea realm is the mountain and sea tree, but I never knew about it.”Ji Ruyue was stunned. Yuan Tong smiled kindly. “Your master, you, and all the other geniuses of our Heavenly Dragon Temple have had many fortuitous encounters ever since they were born. It’s all thanks to the mountain and sea tree.” “It’s all thanks to the remnant will of the mountain and sea tree that I survived, leaving behind a Wisp of life force brought by the seed of the mountain and sea tree.” “Why didn’t the mountain and sea tree appear when the extraterrestrial heavenly devil attacked Kunlun Palace and Heavenly Dragon Temple? Why was it willing to watch us die?”Ji Ruyue said seriously. This was also a rare time when she had a serious expression. Yuan Tong sighed, “Ruyue doesn’t know this. We are fighting against the extraterrestrial devils, while the mountain and sea tree is fighting against an even more terrifying powerful will. If the extraterrestrial devils can charge in, it means that the mountain and sea tree has been severely injured and is unable to fight against the powerful will from outside.” Ji Ruyue was stunned. “Master Yuan Tong means that behind the extraterrestrial devils, there is an even more powerful...; leader?”Lin Xuan reacted. Yuan Tong nodded. “As expected of a disciple of our heavenly dragon temple. He has the wisdom root.” Ji ruyue hurriedly interrupted, “Stop, stop. This is my last disciple, Ji Ruyue!” Yuan Tong waved his hand. “It’s okay. Since he has learned the five senses of the heavens, it means that he is fated with our Heavenly Dragon Temple. You know, our Buddha likes fated people...;” Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. He quickly said, “It’s still important.” Yuan Tong chanted a Buddhist name and smiled. “It’s not appropriate to describe it as a leader. It’s better to describe it as an immortal god.” “The remnant will of the mountain sea tree told me that the extraterrestrial devils are called the dark fog race. They serve the great mother they speak of.” “I don’t know why, but the remnant will of the mountain sea tree told me that only existences at the same level can mention its real name. For the sake of their own safety, it’s best for weak creatures to not probe too deeply into the root of the matter.” Everyone was shocked. An existence that couldn’t even be mentioned by name? Was it that terrifying? “I don’t need to tell you what happened after that. The remnant will of the mountain and sea tree guided my soul to host the seed of the mountain and sea tree. I drifted around the world, and I don’t know when or when, but I finally landed on the territory of the ice race.” “I had a good chat with the Ice King, the leader of the ice race, and stayed there for a while.” Yuan Tong continued. “Then? Why did the ice race come to Earth?”Ji Ru Yue asked. Yuan Tong sighed. “Because the ice race...; also sensed the appearance of the outer-realm heavenly devil, the dark fog race.” Everyone sucked in a breath of cold air when they heard that. The Ice Prince Andrey — that was the ice mass — floated forward for a distance and let out a low voice. “Father felt an increasingly urgent threat. I’m afraid that the elemental world is not a place to stay for long, especially when he prayed to the elemental sea but was unable to get any reply. He became more and more certain of his guess.” “Elemental Sea?”Everyone heard a new term. “The will of the elemental world, the destination of all the elements after death, the elemental sea,”Yuan Tong said with a smile, “The elemental sea is like the mother of all the elements, but it is similar to the mountain sea tree. Only the extremely powerful and extremely talented elemental creatures can sense its existence.” The Ice Prince Andrey was shocked, “The three leaders of the ice race, the Holy Spirit Race, and the Dark Ones, as long as they enter the holy region of their respective races to pray devoutly, they will almost certainly receive a response from the elemental sea. “No matter what, the elemental sea will always patiently respond to its children.” “But father prayed for more than ten times, but he still couldn’t get a response. He vaguely guessed that something was wrong, so he began to transfer the members of his race outside.” Ye Yuqiu was puzzled, “Then why Earth?” Ice Prince Andrey smiled awkwardly, “Our ice race doesn’t like to expand like the Holy Spirit race or the Dark Ones. The number of worlds we’ve occupied outside the elemental world can be counted on one hand. The path to Earth was also discovered by accident.” “After father found that this place was barely enough for the ice race to live, he decided to send some people over, while the rest continued to search for other worlds.” Barely.. The Grand Marshal, Wan youxi, and the others twitched their lips. Is this how Earth is in your eyes. “Now there’s a problem. Your ice race is here, and the Dark Ones are here as well,”the grand marshal said helplessly. “In addition, the Truth Knights also have the support of a powerful race. They believe in the God of Holy Light. If I’m not wrong, it’s probably the Holy Spirit race, right?”Wan youxi followed up. The Ice Prince Andrey was stunned and could not speak for a long time. “The relationship between the three races is still good. There shouldn’t be a fight.”After a long time, he finally spoke. Lin Xuan said meaningfully, “You can go out from the elemental world and plunder the resources of other worlds. Since you’re both children of the Elemental Sea, there shouldn’t be a fight.” “But now, facing the threat of the dark fog race, facing fewer and fewer worlds of heavens and fewer and fewer resources, it’s unknown whether they will fight or not.” Ji ruyue also said, “When you were still pregnant, I was attacked. One of them has dark descendant energy. I can’t tell if they’re targeting the Earthlings or the ice race.” Ice Prince Andrey fell silent once more. “Brother...; I think he’s right. We should be wary of the Holy Spirit race and Dark-type. Can you still communicate with father? Remind him.”Skaya could not help but say. Andrey was helpless, “My soul is already on Earth, I can’t communicate.” Wuuuuuu! An ear-piercing alarm sounded out. The grand marshal and the other tier 9 martial artists’hearts sank. Immediately, they heard the cries of the tier 8 martial artists coming from the ice wall. “Grand Marshal! A large number of monsters are attacking! These monsters are very strange, there are large black spots on their bodies!” The grand marshal took a deep breath and shouted solemnly, “Everyone, climb up the ice wall. The six tier 9 martial artists are responsible for one wall each!” Whoosh! Whoosh! Whoosh. The Grand Marshal, Wan youxi, and the other three all climbed up the top of the ice wall. With a Tier 9 warrior in charge, the tier 8 warriors of the Arctic army suddenly had some confidence. Lin Xuan also climbed up the top of an ice wall and looked ahead. Looking ahead, the densely packed monsters rushed over like crazy. At first glance, these monsters looked no different from the other monsters in the permafrost tundra. However, upon closer inspection, one could see that they all had strange black spots on their bodies. Some black spots appeared on their heads, some on their backs, and some on their claws. There were all sorts of strange spots. Lin Xuan immediately used his all-seeing eye to observe their information. To his surprise, he discovered that the names of these monsters had changed. For example, a “Frost wolf”had become a “Dark element frost wolf”. Almost all the monsters had the word “Dark element”in front of their names. “They were all modified by dark descendants.” Lin Xuan’s heart sank. The other party not only came to the permafrost tundra, but also came prepared. Their goal was probably not just to kill quickly, accurately, and ruthlessly. If they could kill the Arctic army and the construction division, these tier 9 warriors, they would not be polite. In the snowstorm in the distance, on a high mountain. Simon, the black-spotted old man, and the chief commander stood there, looking at the large number of monsters besieging the large ice pool. Behind them were Adam, Bruno, and the others. Not long after, the new pope of the Knights of truth came to the top of the mountain, facing the snowstorm. “Where’s Shadow?” Simon frowned. The new pope was helpless. “He said that he had something to improve his strength, so he went there first. I waited for a long time, but I couldn’t wait for him, so I came first.” Simon rebuked angrily, “Stupid! Our plan is just one last step away. If we can kill the white-clothed, black-sword woman and the three tier 9 martial artists from the construction department together, that would be a huge victory! He actually left at such a critical time? !” The new pope shrugged and realized that someone was not there. He asked casually, “Where’s the Indian leader? Is He as disobedient as Shadow?” Simon looked away. “He’s dead. He was killed by a woman in white and a woman with a black sword.” The new pope was confused. “He died so easily?” “Don’t ask too much.”Simon shook his head. The new pope was deep in thought. “I’m Coming.”At this moment, Shadow’s voice sounded. Simon was about to berate him, but when he sensed shadow’s aura, his expression changed slightly. “You...; changed your body?”Simon said subconsciously. Shadow sized him up. “Your perception is very sharp. It was the one on you who told you, right?” Simon nodded. The new pope, the chief commander, the black-spotted old man, and the others all took half a step back. Without exception, they all felt a powerful pressure from shadow. The previous shadow did not have this kind of pressure. What had happened to him? “From now on, I am the leader of this plan. Who agrees and who disagrees?”Shadow said lightly. Everyone else looked at Simon. Simon hesitated for a moment before he agreed readily. “You are the strongest person here. I am in favor of it.” The new pope coughed lightly. “Then I am in favor of it too.” Everyone present approved it unanimously. No one objected. Ying Dan nodded slightly. “Let’s waste their strength first. In an hour, Simon, you will lead the charge.” Simon frowned. “Ying, our plan isn’t like this.” Ying said indifferently, “I’ve changed it. Is there a problem?” Simon suppressed the anger in his heart. “Alright, I’ll take the lead.” Ying laughed coldly in his heart. In the previous plan, Simon had planned to let Ying take the lead. However, Ying was very clear that Simon had a dark descendant. As long as this dark descendant completely released his power, he would definitely have the strength of a 10th rank martial artist. In addition, in order to wipe out the entire ice clansmen, the dark descendants definitely had a backup plan. Who knows, there might be other dark descendants hiding somewhere. These dark descendants didn’t make a move themselves, yet they still wanted him to be cannon fodder. He wasn’t stupid. Since it was King Wei Ming’s body now, with the strength of a level 10 martial artist, Ying would no longer be subservient to others. He wanted to turn the tables! After Shadow finished speaking, he walked to a place where no one was around and sat down cross-legged. He continued to familiarize himself with his body. Simon looked at him from afar and said in a low voice, “Lord Darhk, what did he do? His strength suddenly rose to level 10.” A sharp voice sounded in his mind. “If I’m not wrong, he cut off his own head and sewed it into a powerful body.” “This body is not made of flesh and blood, but is made of various minerals.” “It’s precisely because of this that his strength rose so quickly.” Simon was stunned and his heart was greatly shaken. What a good fellow. In order to become stronger, shadow would really do anything. He actually didn’t even want his own body. Wouldn’t that mean that he wouldn’t be able to enjoy the pleasures of his stomach and bed? As if he could feel what he was thinking, Darhk sneered in his heart. “Only lowly creatures would pursue the desire of eating and mating. Compared to this person, that shadow is more suitable to be the spokesperson for US Dark Ones on Earth. What a pity.” The intense battle in the large ice pond was in full swing. Lin Xuan couldn’t remember how many monsters he had killed. Thirty? Fifty? A hundred? He was not sure. He only knew that any monster that appeared in his sight would be immediately smacked in the face by a flame blast. With Lin Xuan’s current mental strength, level 8 level 1 to Level 3 monsters, even if they had been strengthened by dark elements, would generally not be able to withstand a flame blast. If they could withstand it and did not die, then it was fine. He would just do two! Moreover, the Monsters of the permafrost tundra generally had high frost resistance and low flame resistance. Flame Blast, blazing city, these large-scale flame skills could shine brilliantly! More importantly, Lin Xuan was not alone. He had five clones! It was equivalent to six of the strongest mage professionals below Tier 9, crazily spitting flames! Lin Xuan’s killing efficiency against Tier 8 monsters was even higher than the grand marshal’s. This efficiency made the six tier 9 warriors speechless. Damn, those who didn’t know would think you were a tier 9 warrior. Roar! At this time, an earth-shaking roar came from behind the monsters. “Be careful, the tier 9 monsters are coming!” The grand marshal shouted. Then, under the ice wall guarded by Lin Xuan, the level eight monsters spread out on their own to make a wide passage. In the next moment, more than ten huge elephants appeared in Lin Xuan’s sight. These elephants were ten meters tall, almost on par with the ice wall. The huge tusks were curved upward, full of battle marks, which made people not doubt its sharpness. Like other monsters, these elephants had black spots on their bodies, and they had also been strengthened by dark elements. Among them, there was a giant elephant that was even a king of a secret realm. It had reached level 9, and its strength was extremely terrifying. The grand marshal roared, “I’ll stop them, you guys take the opportunity to attack!” As soon as he finished speaking, he jumped down from the ice wall that was more than ten meters high, immediately activating the ice bear power in his body. A roar came out from his mouth. In everyone’s sight, the grand marshal’s body expanded rapidly like he was blowing air. In the blink of an eye, he had reached more than four meters high and had more than doubled in size. Not only that, his close-fitting clothes had completely shattered. His lush hair almost covered his entire body. It made the grand marshal look even more like a giant bear. “Fortunately, I put the equipment into the storage box before jumping down. Otherwise, it would all be broken.” The grand marshal cursed in his heart. The two commanders of the Arctic army also jumped down and stood on both sides of the Grand Marshal. They also activated the power of the Ice Bear and also transformed into the shape of a giant human bear. Bang Bang Bang! The three tier 9 martial artists collided with more than ten giant elephants. The muffled sound of flesh entering flesh suddenly rang out, causing everyone present to feel their teeth ache. What surprised Lin Xuan was that the grand marshal and the other two only took Ten-odd steps back and did not take another step back. The power of the ice bear seemed to provide them with an endless stream of fighting strength! The grand marshal and the other two’s actions of fighting against the monsters immediately made everyone’s spirits rise and their confidence greatly increased. “Kill!” Lu Pinghai roared and drew a sword light that was more than 30 meters long. Lu Pingjiang bent his bow and shot arrows. A rain of arrows with a diameter of 30 meters suddenly appeared in the air above the monsters! The ten thousand travel gap command mechanism charged into the battlefield and self-destructed! The monsters fell one after another. The rank nine monsters in the lead were also heavily injured. Ji Ruyue stood at the highest point with her hands behind her back and watched coldly. She could not make a move before her opponent made a move. Boom! Forty minutes later, all the elephants were almost dead. Only the strongest king of the mystic realm was left. At this time, the ice bear power of the grand marshal and the other two had been used up. Their bodies recovered at an extremely fast speed. The grand marshal’s expression changed slightly. “Retreat!” At this moment, Shadow, who had been watching the battle, quickly stood up. “Simon, it’s your turn. After you attract the attack of the woman in white and the woman with the black sword, I will come down and kill her.” Simon gritted his teeth and said, “Alright!” After saying that, he directly jumped down from the top of the mountain and rapidly approached the battle. Shadow, Pope, and the others also displayed their divine abilities and approached as fast as they could. When Simon got close to the furthest range of his attack, black gas crazily gushed out from his body! In the blink of an eye, the black gas covered a hundred meters of saber light! This attack was not Simon’s own strength, but Darhk’s technique! The blade light slashed straight at the grand marshal. The grand marshal had just exhausted the ice bear’s strength, so his HP, mana, and stamina were not at their best. The grand marshal immediately felt the threat of death. He instinctively dodged in one direction. However, a fatal threat came from behind him. The sharp short blade pierced straight into his palm! If not for the first marshal subconsciously clamping the muscles on his back and trapping the short knife between the muscles and bones, this short knife would have pierced into his heart. “You...; !”The first marshal turned around, his eyes filled with pain and anger. He had long felt that someone in the upper echelons of the Arctic army had leaked the secret, but he did not expect that the mole had already reached such a high position. It was one of his commanders! The other party laughed sinisterly, his figure shrouded in smoke as he quickly pulled away. At this moment, the Black Saber Light had also arrived. The giant elephant had originally wanted to raise its feet and stomp down viciously. The black saber light directly split it into two, splitting it into two! After killing the ninth level ninth level mystic realm king, the black saber light’s momentum did not decrease, and it headed straight for the Grand Marshal. Ji Ruyue’s eyes flashed, and her figure disappeared from where she was. When she reappeared, she was already standing behind the grand marshal. The black sword on her waist was unsheathed! It was also a black sword light! The blade light and the sword light clashed in mid-air. In an instant, it was like a black hole, absorbing all the light in the world! Boom! A violent explosion sounded. A terrifying airwave swept in all directions. It blew up a blizzard. Amidst the endless falling snowflakes, Lin Xuan saw that the blade light had silently shattered. The black gas had merged into the snowflakes, causing a few hundred meters around Ji Ruyue to be contaminated by the black gas. Almost all the monsters within this distance died in the aftermath of the sword light and the blade light. However, a few monsters survived. When the Black Snowflakes fell, the three surviving monsters began to twitch violently, as if something was about to come out of their bodies. Crack! Their skin exploded, and blood and flesh splattered everywhere. Dark and deep black creatures came out of the bodies of these giant wolves. Just like the Dark Ones, they had no facial features, only a bald face. They were not as tall as humans. At most, they only reached Lin Xuan’s chest, as if they were halflings. There were a total of three black creatures. Their entire bodies were emitting a terrifying aura. The aura of the leader was even more terrifying. It was obvious that it had reached level 9. In the distance, the head commander who was running towards the battlefield was shocked. Because he heard the voice that had been silent for a long time in his mind. “Dark demon...; The Dark Ones actually brought this thing here,”Atlas said in surprise. “Lord Atlas, who is Dark Demon?” Atlas said, “There is a small chance that an accident will occur during the birth of Twin Dark Ones. Dark demons are the accidental products of the birth of Dark Ones. They are short and agile, and they are bloodthirsty.” “Other than their twin brothers, dark demons will kill all living things. Only their twin brothers can command them.” “The one in the lead is dark demon, and the other two are dark demon beasts. They are relatively weak.” The head commander was shocked. “What should I do?” Atlas’voice became weaker. “Wait, wait for the people of the Holy See to make a move. Only then can I make a move.” “Understood.”The head commander looked doubtful, but he still nodded. Where were the people of the Holy See? “Don’t go near this black snow,”Ji Ruyue said loudly. Invisible spiritual energy was activated on the surface of her body, and the black snowflakes that fell on it instantly disappeared without a sound. At this time, Simon had already rushed to three hundred meters in front of Ji Ruyue. The commander of the Arctic Army who had assassinated the grand marshal on his back used the smoke to increase the distance between them, and also appeared beside Simon. Simon’s eyes were now completely black, and he no longer looked like a human. “White-clothed black sword, you are very strong.”Simon laughed strangely. Ji Ruyue frowned. “I have a name. What white-clothed Black Sword?” Simon laughed coldly. “We dark descendants will not deliberately remember the names of people who are about to die.” After saying that, the black gas in his body exploded further, and he directly transformed his hands. His left hand turned into a big shield and his right hand into a huge axe. Simon jumped up high and attacked fiercely. Ji Ruyue drew her sword again and welcomed him. The rebel commander was fighting fiercely with another commander. Wan youxi, Lu Pingjiang, and Lu Pinghai also rushed out when they saw this. They wanted to join Ji Ruyue and kill Simon as soon as possible. However, before they could join the battle, a few more powerful auras rushed out from the snow. Shadow, Pope, Black Spot Elder, and chief commander! The four of them arrived and quickly rushed towards their targets. Shadow and Simon fought together as Ji Ruyue. Pope, Black Spot Elder, and chief commander faced Lu Pingjiang, Lu Pinghai, and Wanyou Gap respectively. But at this moment, there was no one who could stop the Dark Demon. Under Darhk’s order, it directly rushed towards the large ice pool! On the ice wall, the Arctic Army warriors fired their Vulcan cannons crazily. However, it was extremely agile. It easily dodged all the Rockets and flew up to the top of the city wall. Under the shocked gazes of the Arctic Army warriors, it changed its claws into spikes and stabbed into the chest of an eighth rank warrior. Puchi! The black spikes entered its body and instantly killed it. The tier 8 warrior collapsed to the ground, and the energy in his body was sucked out on the spot. Lin Xuan used his five senses to sense that the strength of this dark demon had increased a little. “Darkseer, Tier 9, Level 1, Dark Demon, seven-colored skill, dark element affinity, dark gold skill, dark element absorption, dark element transformation, Shadow Jump...;” Lin Xuan used his all-seeing eye to see all kinds of information about the other party and frowned slightly. The other clones had to deal with the Dark Demon Beasts and the level eight warriors like Adamson. It was not good for him to deal with the dark demon alone. He needed help. “I’ll go with you.” Ye Yuqiu suddenly appeared beside him and said in a deep voice. “Okay!”Lin Xuan nodded heavily. After killing a level eight warrior of the Arctic army, the dark demon tasted something new and wanted to kill another person. But before it could rush out, Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu appeared beside it. The dark demon glanced around and couldn’t sense any overly powerful aura from these two people. In the Ice Pond. The eminent monk of the Heavenly Dragon Temple, Yuan Tong, floated beside the ice prince, Andre, and chanted the name of Buddha. Andre said in a deep voice, “Master Yuan Tong, those two aren’t strong. Can they stop the Dark Demon?” Yuan tong smiled, “Ji Ruyue’s vision has never been wrong. As for that short-haired woman...; Do you believe in your sister’s Vision?” Andre was stunned for a moment and said seriously, “I do!” “It’s good that you believe in them. We don’t have any battle strength. Believing in them is the greatest support for them.”Yuan Tong nodded. Under the gaze of Andre and Yuan Tong, Dark Demon Darkseer did not hesitate and directly rushed towards the weaker ye Yuqiu. In mid-air, its claws turned into black thorns and pointed straight at ye Yuqiu’s throat and chest. In the hundreds of worlds that the Dark Ones had conquered, the throats and hearts of humanoid creatures had always been their weaknesses. Dark Demon Darkseer had fought in many worlds with his twin brother darkseer, which he was very familiar with. He had hit his target. But he had also failed. Because the opponent’s throat and heart weren’t vital points right now. Standing in front of the Dark Demon wasn’t the pure human ye Yuqiu, but the combination of an ice race and a human. When Ye Yuqiu was in the lead, she was a human. When Skaya was in the lead, she was an ice race member. And an ice race member had no vital points. Because Skaya didn’t have an innate soul, she rarely fought outside, but she had learned many battle techniques. One of them was her battle techniques with the Dark Demon. Her entire body was elementalized. As she dodged the Dark Demon’s attack, Frost rapidly gathered from all directions, freezing the dark demon’s black thorns in the blink of an eye. The Dark Demon’s black thorns were its claws. However, after using this move, the cold air around ye Yuqiu’s body visibly decreased. The light in her eyes also dimmed. After all, she had just stepped into level 8 not long ago. Even with Skaya and their souls being extremely compatible, it would still take a huge price to control a level 9, Level 1 dark demon. “One second!”Ye Yuqiu said reluctantly. Lin Xuan stomped on the ground and suddenly burst out. The Ice Dao Child Talisman in his palm flickered with cold air. “Kill!” Cold light surged on the Ice Dao Child Talisman. In an instant, four ice spears that were ten meters long were formed. They were huge and majestic, and they were bone-piercing cold. Darkfiend Darkfiend Darkfiend felt the fear of death. It instinctively wanted to break free, but it was unable to break free from the shackles of the frost. Boom! The first ice spear and the second ice spear smashed into its body without any hindrance. The ice spears that entered its body seemed to have a life of their own as they exploded within the DARKFIEND’s body. In a moment of desperation, the dark demon turned its left foot into a sharp knife and sliced through its arms, cutting off both of its arms! Dark elements sprayed out from the wounds crazily. The Dark Demon used all of its strength to roll, barely dodging the third and fourth ice spears. It only took the edge of the damage from the ice spears. Even so, its HP had been reduced to 10% , almost dying. Ye Yuqiu exhausted her mana points and fell to the ground. The Dark Demon Roared soundlessly. It stared at Lin Xuan for a second without any facial features, then turned around and charged at the nearest tier 8 warrior. It wanted to plunder the dark elements in these people’s bodies as soon as possible and quickly recover. “You want to recover?” Lin Xuan did not hesitate and directly chased after it. Even though the Dark Demon was a Tier 9 level 1, it did not dare to be careless when facing Lin Xuan’s attack with its current HP. It had no choice but to stop its attacks and turn around to defend itself. Meanwhile, the two cunning and agile dark demon beasts had been defeated by Lin Xuan’s five doppelgangers. Meanwhile, Adamson and the others were temporarily forced back. “It’s time to go!” Frost domain’s doppelganger cast the Great Ice Seal. The great ice seal was relatively weak and could only control the dark demon for a quarter of a second. However, this quarter of a second was enough for Lin Xuan and his four doppelgangers to deal full damage! Flame Burst! Moreover, it was five flame bursts! Boom! Boom! Boom! Boom! Boom! It was like a meteor shower, like a meteor falling from the sky. The Dark Demon’s pitiful 10% hp was also completely wiped out by Lin Xuan’s five flame bursts! “Single-handedly killed a tier 9 creature and caused over 50% of its damage contribution.” Lin Xuan glanced at the data panel and let out a long sigh. Tier 9 promotion mission, completed! Darkfiend darkseer slowly fell backwards. On the ice wall, the Arctic Army warriors hugged each other and wept with joy, celebrating this small victory. They could not interfere in the battle between tier 9 warriors. As long as they could kill Darkfiend and darkfiend, it would be a huge success! The moment Darkseer died, Simon, who was fighting Ji Ruyue, suddenly felt a sharp pain. Simon could not control his body, and a hoarse and angry roar came out of his mouth. “My Brother is dead!” Darkseer was beyond furious, and directly seized the complete control of Simon’s body. He directly gave up Ji Ruyue and attacked Lin Xuan explosively. Ji Ruyue’s expression changed slightly, and she wanted to turn around and save him. However, Ying was tightly entangled with her. Once Ji Ruyue turned around, she would definitely reveal a huge flaw. Ying was now a level 10 fighter, and his strength was almost on par with Ji Ruyue’s. This flaw might be the deciding factor. Lin Xuan, who had just been feeling happy, also felt the surging threat of death. But before he could react, Darhk’s attack had already arrived. A huge black palm descended from the sky! An area of ten meters above the ice wall was completely enveloped. Ye Yuqiu barely managed to roll over and dodge the attack range of the black palm. But the Arctic Army warriors who were cheering were not so lucky. Before they could react, they were smashed into meat paste from head to toe! Crack. Lin Xuan’s indestructible overlord set barely reduced his damage to 50% . The durability of his equipment was completely depleted and shattered on the spot! Lin Xuan also coughed up blood and flew back more than ten meters. “Still not dead? !” Darhk roared and slapped down with his black palm again. Lin Xuan wanted to use Flash to escape, but as a tier 10 creature, Darhk was still too fast. Before he could use Flash, the second black palm had already slapped down. He could only use ice path child talisman as soon as possible. Boom! With Lin Xuan as the center, a huge hole appeared in the ice wall. All kinds of defensive equipment were sent flying everywhere. Crack. The ice shield protecting Lin Xuan also shattered. This was the last bit of energy stored in the Ice Daozi Talisman. Previously, 80% of the energy was used to deal with the Dark Demon. The remaining 20% of the energy was left in the Ice Daozi Talisman in case of emergency. Just now, he had used 20% of his energy to form an ice shield, barely blocking the attack. However, a portion of the energy still invaded Lin Xuan’s body, causing him to spurt out blood. Moreover, the invasion of the aging energy had caused his maximum HP to temporarily drop by quite a bit. “He’s not dead yet? !” Darke was a little dumbfounded. He was so furious that if he attacked with all his strength, not to mention a tier 8 warrior, even a Tier 9 warrior would die on the spot. He really did not expect Lin Xuan to have so many life-saving things! Darke wanted to launch a third attack. The sharp black sword light had already come down from all directions. “You have harmed my Kunlun Palace disciples. You must be killed!” Ji Ruyue was full of killing intent. She slashed three black sword lights straight at Simon’s back. Meanwhile, Ying was trapped on the spot by the Ice Daozi Talisman, unable to move. Ji Ruyue had used the eternal frozen essence to create a new ice dao child talisman. Its power was greatly increased, and the binding energy was even stronger than before. This was how she was able to barely trap shadow, who was at the same level as her, and escape to deal with Simon. Rip! Simon’s Back was deeply cut by the sword light. However, what flowed out of it was not fresh blood, but black gas. “This body has restricted my ability to perform. It’s time to abandon it.” Darhk roared. A moment of clarity appeared in his eyes. Simon screamed, “Lord Darhk, don’t!” Rip! Simon’s body was torn in half with the wound as the center. A two-meter-tall humanoid creature walked out from Simon’s body. Faceless and pitch-black, it was the Dark Ones! The head commander saw this scene from afar and was shocked. Atlas said in a low voice, “That’s the most common way for Dark Ones to conquer the various worlds. They occupy the body and descend directly. To them, the body is just a container, and they will definitely abandon it when it’s time to abandon it.” “That’s why I said that Dark Ones are not reliable allies. As long as the benefits are in place, they will definitely stab the Holy Spirit clan in the back.” The leader nodded his head heavily. He could also feel the Dark Ones’unscrupulous methods and ambition. Lin Xuan let out a long breath and quickly took out a great health potion to recover his health. At the same time, he picked up ye Yuqiu and opened his mouth to gulp down two bottles of great health potion. “Almond, don’t hold back. Kill this white-clothed black sword, and our cooperation can continue.”Darhk roared. “Didn’t I just make my move?” The new pope’s voice was completely different from before. Then, his body split open on the spot. A figure flashing with golden light rushed out from within. Lu Pingjiang, who was fighting with him, felt a great sense of danger and subconsciously retreated. However, his left side was still penetrated by the terrifying light. His left arm was shattered on the spot, and most of his chest was exposed. One could see the ghastly white bones and his still beating heart. Lu Pingjiang lost his fighting strength on the spot and fell to the ground. At this moment, Ying had also broken free from the bindings of the Ice Daozi Talisman. Darhk, Amund, and Ying, the three level 10 attackers, surrounded Ji Ruyue! The death of the new pope of the Knights of Truth, and the appearance of a figure shrouded in holy light, shocked everyone present. Ji Ruyue was somewhat on guard, but she did not expect the other party to be so strong. Lin Xuan immediately looked at Amund’s information. —— Name: Amund Level: tier 10, Level 4 Race: Holy Spirit clan Class: Holy Light Prayer Skills: light element affinity (seven-colored immortality) , light element transformation, light healing, holy light giant hammer.. Equipment: none —— “Tier 10, Level 4...;” Lin Xuan’s expression darkened. Now that three tier 10 players had surrounded Ji Ruyue, would ji Ruyue be able to withstand them? It wasn’t just him. The others, such as the Grand Marshal, Wan youxi, and Lu Pinghai, all had the same thoughts in their minds. A battle at Ji Ruyue’s level was not something they could participate in. They were clearly at a huge disadvantage. At this moment, Atlas’voice sounded in the head of the Grand Marshal. “Get closer and wait for the opportunity to attack. I Can’t tear your body apart and rush out like Amund, but I will temporarily take over your body. This way, I can barely reach level 10 and Level 1.” The head commander took a deep breath and nodded heavily. With his current body carrying level 10 and level 1 strength, there would obviously be serious aftereffects. But he was still willing. Not to mention other things, he had always remembered the construction division’s assistance to the Knights of truth when the monsters in the Dragon Mountain Range rebelled. Others could choose to forget, they could turn hostile, but he could not. If he lost even this basic morality, he would no longer be him. Black Qi, Black Blade, Holy Light, black sword. Four different kinds of auras surged in the air. Each aftershock was able to shatter this solid ice wall. The martial artists hurriedly retreated to their surroundings, afraid that they would become collateral damage from the aftershock of the battle. Bang Bang Bang! Ji Ruyue was besieged by three level 10 cultivators. She retreated as she fought, frowning deeply. She was only using the heaven-destroying sword to fight with the three of them, so she was at a slight disadvantage. As for the more powerful Great Dao Talisman, she had only taken out the Ice Dao Child Talisman. The reason why she was so cautious was that she had sensed another aura. It was not too strong, but it was still in the range of level 10. It was precisely because of the existence of this aura that she didn’t attack with all her strength. Instead, she was constantly on guard. Darhk and Amund didn’t sense Ji Ruyue’s strangeness. Instead, they attacked with all their strength. Only Ying felt it. This white-clothed, black-sword woman seemed to be at ease even when facing the three of them at the same time. She was just slightly at a disadvantage. It was hard to imagine what the situation would be like if the three of them were to face her alone. At this moment, after defending for dozens of times, Amund finally caught a flaw in Ji Ruyue. In the blink of an eye, the holy light condensed into a huge hammer and smashed down. Ji Ruyue was hit in the left arm. She grunted and retreated more than ten steps. Darke and shadow immediately chased after her. The black gas and black blade slashed over. The head commander shouted, “I’ll help!” Amund was stunned for a moment, but when he saw that it was a member of the truth knights, he did not pay much attention to it. The battle situation was changing rapidly. He did not think too much about why a rank 9 martial artist would be so muddle-headed and want to come over to help. He initially thought that the other party was just here to take some credit. However, in the next moment, an aura that was almost of the same origin as Amund erupted crazily from the head commander’s body. The first regiment commander’s eyes glistened with blazing holy light, and his entire person seemed to be bathed in light. “This aura...;” Amund was stunned for a moment. “Amund, the war court does not agree to your battle on Earth. I demand that you immediately stop the battle and return to the Holy Spirit clan with me.” A hoarse voice came from the first regiment commander’s mouth, and it was completely different from his usual voice. “Who are you?”Almond was still in a confused state. “War Court, Atlas,”the first regimental commander said in a deep voice. Almond finally reacted, “Atlas? This is an order from the Holy See! The battle is coming to an end, we can kill that woman in white and black sword immediately!” The first regimental commander firmly blocked his way, “War Court’s philosophy has always been like this. Dark descendants are not trustworthy allies, and the woman in white and black sword is not someone we should kill!” Amund cursed, “You...; !” Before he could finish his words, the first regimental commander rushed up and directly stopped Amund. At the same time, he shouted at Ji ruyue, “End the battle quickly. I know you didn’t use your full strength just now.” Ji Ruyue’s eyes flashed. Interesting, this was all seen through. Darke and Ying were shocked by this sudden situation. What was going on? was there an internal conflict within the Holy Spirit Clan? Hearing Atlas’words, Darke became even more furious. “Zhan Ting, a bunch of idiots!” Shadow noticed atlas’so-called “Not using his full strength”. The other party’s words just happened to confirm his perception. He glanced at Ji Ruyue with a slightly profound meaning. He indiscernibly took half a step back and let Darke go first. “Attack with all your might and destroy her in one strike!” Darke let out a low growl as black qi burst out from his entire body. In the blink of an eye, it took the shape of a giant axe. The giant axe was shrouded in black qi and was at least a hundred meters long. It was as if it was the punishment of the heavens! Shadow pulled out his black tachi once again and filled it with saber light. Ji Ruyue smiled faintly and took out five talismans. Gold Dao Child Talismans, wood dao child talismans, water dao child talismans, fire dao child talismans, and Earth Dao child talismans. These five child talismans could be combined to form the Great Dao Talisman of the five elements. This was also the limit that Ji Ruyue could use all her spiritual energy at the moment. She actually wanted to take out the Thunder Dao Child Talismans, ice dao child talismans, and wind dao child talismans as well. Unfortunately, the spiritual energy didn’t allow it. The moment the five sub-talismans appeared, they immediately caused the world to change color. Five different colors formed a cloud that floated behind Ji Ruyue. Sensing this terrifying power, Darhk and Ying’s expressions changed slightly. They seemed to have underestimated ji ruyue. But at this point, there was no room for retreat. Darhk had used up almost 99% of his black Qi for this attack. This attack had to heavily injure or even kill the opponent! It was to avenge the deaths of his compatriots, and also to clear the obstacles for the Dark Ones to occupy earth! Boom! The three powers collided. The blinding light made everyone’s eyes feel a burning pain, and they had no choice but to close their eyes. Lin Xuan also closed his eyes. After a long time, he slowly opened them. He saw that Ji Ruyue was still floating in the air. The Shadow had disappeared without a trace. There was a big pit on the ground, and in the middle of the pit lay the remaining half of a black shadow. “He won? !” Wan youxi was shocked. Darke climbed out of the Big Pit with great effort and stared at Ji Ruyue in the air in horror. “Your strength...;” Ji Ruyue drew her sword and sheathed it again. This extremely fast and powerful sword quickly took Darhk’s life. This was not the elemental world, but Earth. The Dark Ones were essentially the condensation of elements. After they died, they could not return to the elemental sea. They could only disintegrate their bodies and turn into a pool of mud that flowed on the ground. Amund was dumbfounded. What kind of strength was this. Atlas said calmly, “See, she’s not someone we can kill.” “Moreover, when Zhan Ting explored the universe, he made two important discoveries. One of them is related to the woman in white and the woman with the Black Sword. I’m asking you to return to the clan as soon as possible, or else I’ll use force.” After saying that, he took out a pair of shackles. “You probably don’t like being bound by this thing, right?” Amund was stunned for a moment before he cried out in shock, “The war court actually asked you to take this thing out as well? !” This thing had been specially created to capture the Holy Spirit clan. Unless one’s strength reached the level of the patriarch, the Holy Church’s patriarch, or the war court’s patriarch, they would definitely be captured. Amund gritted his teeth. After a long while, he nodded. “Alright...;” Under Ji Ruyue’s indifferent gaze, he turned around and left. At this moment, the first regiment commander slowly regained the clarity in his eyes. His entire body seemed to fall apart as he collapsed on the ground. Bruno quickly rushed out from his hiding place and helped him up. “Where’s Shadow?”Wan youxi looked around, but he did not see anyone. “He ran away. He’s very fast.”Ji Ruyue shook her head slightly. Shadow was very shrewd. He took half a step back at the start, allowing Darke to take almost 80% of the damage. Later on, he realized that he was no match for him, so he decided to just run away. In the blink of an eye, he had already rushed a few thousand meters and could no longer catch up. Yuan Tong chuckled as he floated over. “Ruyue is still as strong and fierce as before. This penniless monk is very gratified.” Ji Ruyue rolled her eyes. Using the word ‘strong and fierce’to describe me, a beautiful young palace master of Kunlun Palace, was a little low eq. At this moment, Lin Xuan finally let out a long sigh. The situation just now was not something he could get involved in. Although he had completed the Rank-9 promotion mission, he still had no promotion materials and was still a rank-8 and Rank-9 warrior. Then, the black-spotted old man was killed, and the commander who betrayed the Arctic army was killed. Adamson and the others had no choice but to surrender. “We won this battle!” “Everyone, let’s clean up the battlefield!” The grand marshal struggled to stand up and shouted. The whole place was cheering! Every warrior was sighing from the bottom of their hearts. Everyone couldn’t help but look at the figure in white clothes and black sword in the air. That woman was too strong! “Super purifying potion.” Ji Ruyue gathered Darke’s remains together and found Lin Xuan. Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. He quickly took out a super-purifying potion and handed it to her. After Ji Ruyue poured spiritual energy into it, she quickly used it to purify the remains, turning them into pure energy. “These are yours...;”Ji Ruyue took a fifth and handed it to Lin Xuan. At this time, she noticed the strangeness on Lin Xuan’s body. “Eh...; you seem to be a little stronger, but not too strong.” Lin Xuan told her about his situation. “So that’s how it is. For A level nine promotion mission, you still need promotion materials? How Strange.” Ji Ruyue thought for a moment. “However, it’s not difficult to get five promotion materials. Just you wait.” After saying that, she suddenly disappeared. After more than ten minutes, Ji Ruyue returned to him and took out a few materials that were still stained with blood. Almost all of them were materials like giant wolf teeth, giant wolf eyes, and giant wolf claws. Lin Xuan did not know whether to laugh or cry. Damn it, he did not even have to do it himself. “Then I’ll go and advance.” He coughed lightly and told Wan youxi, the Grand Marshal, and the others. He called a room to adjust his state of mind and prepare to advance. Wan youxi was naturally extremely happy. The grand marshal and the others were extremely shocked. Good heavens, he was so young, and he was about to advance to tier 9? ! Three hours later, Lin Xuan slowly opened his eyes, his expression satisfied. —— Name: Lin Xuan Level: Tier 9, Level 1 Race: Human Class: Overlord Attributes: Vitality 649, strength 517, spirit 525, agility 517 Skills: Avatar, five senses, all-seeing eye, attribute bestowing, blood of the Overlord, might of the Overlord, Emperor engine, all-rounded bone armor.. Equipment: Flame Lord set, Everwinter set, Girl’s tears set, Lionheart Tower Shield.. —— “After advancing to tier 9, the attribute bestowal has increased from 40% to 50% ! “My vitality is 649 points, which is 650 points. In other words, my strength, spirit, and agility have received an additional 325 points. This is too strong!” Lin Xuan clicked his tongue in wonder. His strength, spirit, and agility were all comparable to a true tier 9 martial artist. He was an all-rounder with no weaknesses! “When I advanced to tier 8, I obtained the blood of the Dominator, the second class skill. My HP increased by five times. When I advanced to Tier 9, I obtained the might of the Dominator, the third class skill. All damage increased by 50% !” Lin Xuan beamed with joy. This was all damage. It included physical damage, magic damage, and four types of elemental damage! “Although I’ve just become a Tier 9 martial artist, I’m afraid that I can face three to four tier 9 martial artists head-on without being at a disadvantage “With these clones of mine...; I can face more than ten tier 9 martial artists at the same time!” Lin Xuan was happy just thinking about it. His strength was enough to fight against all the level-nine warriors of a large organization! “However...; I can’t interfere in the battle between Ji Ruyue, the Dark Ones, and the Holy Spirits. Level-ten is the strongest now.” Lin Xuan thought of the battle just now and his heart moved. After cleaning up the battlefield, the Arctic army held a grand banquet for everyone. Of course, this banquet was not held in the permafrost tundra, but in the city of everwinter outside. During the celebratory banquet, tens of thousands of people filled the streets. Everyone walked out of their homes and onto the streets to celebrate this great victory. At night, the first regimental commander found Wan youxi and the first marshal. The three of them walked into the room. The first regimental commander said in a deep voice, “The two of you, I have been entrusted by Sir Atlas to represent the Knights of truth to form an alliance with the construction division and the Arctic Army.” Wan youxi was a little confused. Although they had already learned the names of the war court, the Holy See, Atlas, Almond, and so on from their conversation during the banquet, the first regimental commander inexplicably wanted to form an alliance right away, this caught him a little off guard. The first regimental commander said in a deep voice, “Not only do we three Earth forces form an alliance, the Holy Spirit clan also wants to form an alliance with the ice clan, the Kunlun Palace, and the Heavenly Dragon Temple to fight against the Dark Ones together.” “This...;”Wan youxi and the commander were stunned. “Please invite the Young Palace Master of Kunlun Palace, the Ice Prince of the ice clan, Master Yuantong of Heavenly Dragon Temple, and the other level 9 warriors in. The great discovery of the Battle Court is a disaster that will engulf the universe. Our Earth can not be alone,”the commander said seriously. “Okay.”The two nodded. Not long after, all the invited people came. At this moment, Andre hadn’t been fully born yet. He was still a big ice mass. It took up a bit of space, but it didn’t prevent him from attending. As a rank 9 warrior who had just advanced, Lin Xuan could also attend this temporary meeting. However, when he saw the chief commander’s serious expression and felt the oppressive and silent atmosphere in the room, he suddenly felt that something was wrong. Three minutes of silence. Ten minutes of silence. Half an hour had passed, and there was still silence. “Say something.”Wan youxi coughed lightly. The head commander scratched his head. “Wait, Sir Atlas isn’t here yet...;” Everyone,”...;” “I’m sorry, I’m late.”The head commander suddenly spoke again. This time, his voice had completely changed, and it was exactly the same as atlas in the previous battle. Everyone’s spirits were lifted. They all wanted to hear what Atlas had said about the disaster that would engulf the universe. “Let me first tell everyone about the two major discoveries of our battle court.” “The first major discovery is the Kunlun Palace.” The head commander turned to Ji Ruyue. Ji Ruyue was stunned for a moment. Then, she said in surprise, “Master? There are also disciples of the Kunlun Palace?” “We found three people who looked similar to you. The leader called himself the palace master of Kunlun Palace while the other two called themselves the elders of Kunlun Palace.” “After some probing and communication, the three of them told me that the rest of the people from Kunlun Palace were attacked by the dark descendants for no reason and were taken away by the dark descendants.” “Currently, these three people are temporarily staying in a world conquered by our battle court. The news has not been leaked. Only Our clan leader and the Battle Court Leader Know About It.” After saying that, Atlas looked at Ji Ruyue. Ji Ruyue’s heart sank. “Dark descendants...;” “Next is the second major discovery. The palace master of Kunlun Palace said that the dark descendants are in collusion with the extraterrestrial heavenly devil that destroyed Kunlun Palace. After our secret investigation, we can conclude that the dark descendants are in contact with the dark fog race!” Atlas said firmly. “The dark fog race...;”everyone’s expression changed immediately. Now, everyone knew that it was the dark fog race that destroyed the Kunlun Palace, the Heavenly Dragon Temple, and the mountain and sea realm. It was also possible that the mountain and sea tree of the mountain and sea realm was killed as well. Ji Ruyue was so powerful, and the Kunlun Palace she was in was definitely not weak. But even so, the dark fog race still destroyed the Kunlun Palace. It was hard to imagine how powerful the dark fog clan was. And what was the relationship between the dark descendants and the dark fog clan. An alliance? No one dared to think about it. “The palace master of Kunlun Palace also told us something.” Atlas said seriously, “The mountain and sea realm might reunite with Earth.” “This...;” Everyone present was stunned. Reuniting meant that the creatures of the mountain and sea realm could come to Earth unhindered. What the Dark Ones had done before was also to lead the elemental world to overlap with Earth. “This overlap was not intentional, but formed naturally,”Atlas said seriously. “The actions of the Dark Ones and the destruction of the mountain and sea realm by the dark fog race only accelerated this process.” “Everything seems to have a set pattern.” Atlas continued, “We will find an excuse to restrain the Dark Ones, and at the same time, we will bring our clansmen to earth as soon as possible. The Dark Ones will not directly shed all pretense of cordiality with us. It is expected that there will be a stalemate for a period of time.” “But no matter what, the large-scale overlap between the elemental world and earth is inevitable. It is estimated that it will happen within half a month. Everyone, be prepared.” After saying that, Atlas withdrew his strength. The eyes of the head commander regained their clarity, and he regained control of his body. Everyone was worried at this moment, and their minds were full of thoughts. Atlas had provided too much information, and the impact was too great. “General, we can not stay for long. We must return to Xijing city as soon as possible,”Wan youxi said in a deep voice. “Understood.”The commander-in-chief nodded. Wan youxi would definitely report such an important matter to ye Lijiang as soon as possible. Out of the six chiefs of the construction department, Ye Lijiang was the most powerful fighter and the most powerful brain. “We have to go back and reorganize the internal affairs,”the commander-in-chief said seriously. The commander-in-chief nodded once again. He was not clear about the twists and turns between the Holy Spirit Church and the Battle Court. But she was clear about the internal conflicts between the Cardinal Group and the Truth Knight Group. Since the humans were now united to fight against the Dark Ones, and even the dark fog tribe behind them. Then, a United Truth Knight Group was what everyone needed. Soon, everyone said their goodbyes. Lin Xuan also boarded the transport plane with Wan youxi and the others and returned to the construction division. Ye Yuqiu’s situation was a bit special. Skaya still needed to continue absorbing the power of the ice, so she had to stay in the frozen tundra’s ice pool for the time being. Just like the ice race, she continued to breed. Moreover, because the strongest battle mystic realm kings in the frozen tundra had all died, the strongest batch of mystic realm kings had also been killed. The remaining monsters were leaderless and didn’t have a leader. The environment for the ice clan was much better than before, at least they didn’t have to worry about being attacked by monsters all the time. .. Construction division, Xijing City. As a newly promoted tier 9 warrior, Lin Xuan also participated in the meeting of the highest level. Ji Ruyue and Yuan Tong joined the meeting as special members. At the beginning, Gao Qianchi and Xiang Shantou were shocked when they saw Lin Xuan. They wondered why Lin Xuan came to attend the meeting of a level nine warrior. When Wan youxi reported the good news that Lin Xuan had successfully completed the level nine promotion mission in the permafrost tundra and became a level nine warrior, Gao Qianchi and Xiang Qianyu finally reacted and were overjoyed. “Such a young level nine warrior. It’s the first time he has appeared in the entire world, let alone our construction department!”Gao Qianchi patted Lin Xuan’s shoulder cheerfully and exclaimed. “I’m Lin Xuan!”Xiang Qianyi said happily, “From now on, Lin Xuan will be the seventh chief of our construction department!” Lin Xuan didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. The chief was not only a symbol of strength, but also a corresponding qualification. Although he was qualified, he was still inexperienced, and it was difficult to convince the public. If he was appointed as the seventh chief, it would easily arouse the dissatisfaction of some veteran warriors. Ye Lijiang nodded. “The seventh chief is temporarily vacant, waiting for Lin Xuan to make a great contribution.” “We need to discuss more important things now. Let Wan youxi say it.” Wan youxi immediately repeated what Atlas had said. He even made a powerpoint to show the names of the Holy Spirit clan, Ice clan, dark descendant, dark fog clan, mother dark fog clan, Mountain and sea realm, elemental world, and so on. Ye Lijiang, Gao Qianchi, and Xiang Shensi were not stupid. They quickly formed a clear pattern. “The Holy Spirit clan, Ice Clan, and dark descendant are the three ruling races in the elemental world. The three races are friends as well as enemies “Dark descendant and Dark Mist clan have some connections, but it is still unclear how far their connections have gone “The mountain and sea realm has been destroyed by the Dark Mist clan. The mountain and sea tree may be in a state of death or semi-death “The elemental world will reunite with Earth in a few days.” Everyone was deep in thought. Yuan Tong chanted a Buddhist name and said calmly, “Let me tell you. The elemental world will reunite with Earth. There will definitely be a large number of elemental creatures attacking Earth.” “You need to prepare a large number of resources that can deal with the elemental creatures.” Lu Pinghai immediately said, “All kinds of elemental resistance drugs, all kinds of elemental damage drugs!” “We also need to store a lot of food and water to ensure people’s lives.”Gao Qianchi tapped the table. “Find the place where the elemental world overlaps with Earth in advance, evacuate the people there, and make sure there are no people in the overlapped area. This way, we can reduce the casualties.”After thinking for a moment, shallow view Xiang also immediately spoke up. Everyone put together their ideas and quickly came up with many plans. Li Jiang nodded in satisfaction. “Very good, then follow these plans. Meeting adjourned!” “I’m more sensitive to energy fluctuations. Let me look for the overlap area,”Ji Ruyue said casually. “Alright, then I’ll have to trouble senior Ji.”Ye Lijiang nodded. “Lin Xuan, you have five senses. Come with me,”Ji Ruyue said again. Lin Xuan was stunned for a moment and nodded as well. Yuan tong laughed and said, “See, the secret of our heavenly dragon temple is very useful, isn’t it? You still won’t admit that Lin Xuan is a disciple of the Heavenly Dragon Temple?” Ji Ruyue sneered and didn’t comment. She also understood that Yuan Tong was just trying to liven up the atmosphere so that she wouldn’t be too anxious. After all, Kunlun Palace and Heavenly Dragon Temple had been destroyed a long time ago. There was no point in worrying about which family Lin Xuan was a disciple of. In the next few days, Lin Xuan ran around with Ji Ruyue to sense the changes in the energy. At the same time, two big pieces of news came. The moment King Jie Ri died, there was a sudden riot in India’s secret realm of Jie Ri City. All kinds of monsters rushed out of the ground like crazy, attacking the living. Before this, India’s secret realm of Jie Ri City had always been the safest of the few super-large secret realms. It was so safe that some warriors chose to live in it with their families. The result was obvious. A large number of warriors above Tier 7 were massacred by monsters. India’s strength plummeted. In addition, the leader also died in the permafrost tundra. The huge organization fell apart within a few days, completely becoming a second-rate organization. Another piece of news came from Takama-ga-hara. Shadow, who had saved his life under Ji Ruyue, suddenly announced that takama-ga-hara was completely merged into the Salvation Society, becoming a subsidiary organization of the Salvation Society. When this news came out, the whole world was in an uproar. You’re the leader of a big organization after all, yet you’re acting like a dog for someone else’s big organization. Big Brother, have some face! When many Takama-ga-hara warriors heard this news, they were very angry and decided to withdraw from Takama-ga-hara. Shimada long and Hirano sunta were among them. Shimada long was actually not that surprised. He knew what kind of person shadow was. He would do anything to achieve his goal. His face was nothing. As long as he could win with the winner, it didn’t matter if he became a dog. Shimada long and Hirano Suntai also took a boat to the construction department. After revealing their identities, they became interns of the construction department. After a period of assessment, they could become official agents. The two of them were quite shocked when they learned that Lin Xuan had advanced to a level nine warrior. Shimada long also smiled bitterly. “This guy...; his growth speed is too terrifying. I just advanced to level eight not long ago, and he has already become a level nine warrior.” Fourteen days later. The elemental world descended. On this day, no matter what everyone on Earth was doing, they instinctively raised their heads and looked at the sky. It was as if something big was coming. “Our senses are right. It is indeed here.” Ji Ruyue and Lin Xuan raised their heads and looked at the sky, nodding slightly. The two of them ran around the entire territory of the construction department, from the northernmost to the southernmost, from the easternmost to the westernmost. In the end, they discovered that the energy fluctuations here were somewhat abnormal in the southwest primitive forest. Ji Ruyue was a little hesitant, but Lin Xuan was certain that this was the place. After ye Lijiang and the other level nine warriors nodded together, they finally evacuated all the people living here. Fortunately, this was not a densely populated area, and not many people lived here. Otherwise, just evacuating the people would take a few days. Lin Xuan looked at the sky and saw a huge shadow that blotted out the sky and the sun rapidly approaching the ground. For a few seconds, all the sunlight was blocked, like a solar eclipse. The wind in the air began to flow rapidly, and soon, it changed from no wind to a violent gale. Lin Xuan felt his face hurt from the wind. “The aura of the wind element,”Lin Xuan said seriously. Ji Ruyue nodded. “It seems that the land that overlaps with this place is the territory of the wind element.” After listening to Atlas’description, the Holy Spirit Clan had gained a basic understanding of the elemental world. The Holy Spirit clan, the ice clan, and the dark descendants had three largest territories in the elemental world, which were filled with light element, ice element, and dark element respectively. Of course, there were other elements in the elemental world, such as the wind element, thunder element, and earth element. However, none of them could form ruling races like the Holy Spirit clan, the ice clan, and the dark descendants. They were just some small races. Some elements were even suppressed by the Holy Spirit clan and dark descendant clan. They were unable to form intelligent creatures. At this time, the space not far away from Lin Xuan and Ji Ruyue suddenly distorted. Then, clusters of white elemental creatures squeezed through the small gap and came to Earth from the elemental world. These wind elemental creatures quickly changed their appearance. Some became lions, wolves, tigers, leopards, and other beasts, while others became eagles, eagles, falcons, and birds. The wind elemental creatures were very curious when they first came to this world. They wanted to touch everything. Soon, they found that this world was also rich in wind elements. Wherever the wind elemental creatures passed, trees were broken, and animals ran away. Soon, these wind elemental creatures met two humans. They were very curious and wanted to know if there was any wind element in the human body, so they rushed over. “Very weak wind elemental creatures, only level eight.”Ji Ruyue smiled. “I’ll leave it to you.” Lin Xuan nodded and went up to them. Because the construction department had made preparations beforehand, when the elemental world and Earth overlapped, there were almost no casualties. On the other hand, the rest of the world was not the same. India had now split into seven or eight second-rate forces. The wind element also appeared in the region where India was located. The appearance of the wind element creature caused a panic among low-level warriors, and a large number of low-level warriors died! This made the already much weaker little India suffer even more. A thunder elemental creature had appeared in the Takama-ga-hara. Moreover, there weren’t many rank 9 warriors under shadow that could be trusted. Sato was killed by him, Yamamoto Xuanxin died at the hands of Ye Lijiang, the Sky Feather Craftsman left the Takama-ga-hara on his own, and Ghost Shadow was proven to be Shadow’s puppet. Therefore, after the Thunder elemental creature appeared, even if shadow did it himself and ran around, it was still difficult to deal with the Thunder elemental creatures that frequently appeared everywhere. He could only let the Thunder elemental creatures do whatever they wanted. Many low-level fighters from the first to the third stage could not resist at all. They could only watch as they were electrocuted into ashes by the Thunder elemental creatures. On the Arctic Army’s side, many earth elements appeared, causing some casualties. The elemental world overlapped with Earth. In the end, only the construction division, the Salvation Society, and the Knights of truth were not greatly affected. The Salvation Society and the Knights of Truth corresponded to the Dark Ones and the Holy Spirits respectively. With their protection, it was easy to put an end to the elemental creatures’misdeeds. The construction division relied on Ji Ruyue and Lin Xuan to move the people ahead of time to minimize the losses. After learning about this, many warriors from other organizations were very envious, especially those from India and the highlands. After comparing the construction division with their own organizations, they were all very envious. “Something’s wrong...; look at the sky over there. The elemental fluctuations are very intense, as if something is fighting.”Ji Ruyue suddenly noticed the sky to the east and frowned deeply. Lin Xuan used his five senses to sense the sky and also felt a deep sense of crisis, but he still couldn’t tell what exactly the crisis was. At this time, a big crack suddenly appeared in the eastern sky. Two irregular crystals glittering with golden light were suddenly thrown out of the crack and fell toward the ground of the construction division! Ji Ruyue’s eyes sparkled. “I don’t know what they are, but I have a feeling that they are very precious!” Lin Xuan nodded heavily. His five senses made him feel the same way. “Let’s go and take a look!” Ji Ruyue pulled Lin Xuan and hurried to the landing spot. The two glittering crystals streaked across the sky, which not only attracted the attention of the construction department, but also attracted the interest of the Warriors of the Salvation Society, the Takama-ga-hara, the Arctic army, and the Knights of truth. “Kasius, we must get those two elemental essences at all costs! Those are the essences torn from the body of the ocean of elements! We must get them!” “The ruler of the deep sea needs them!”The Dark One in Kasius’head roared crazily, extremely excited. “I understand!”The leader of the Salvation Society, Kasius, nodded heavily. When Lin Xuan and Ji Ruyue arrived at the landing site, there were two huge pits. A large number of trees had collapsed at the edge of the pit, and the ground around the pit was extremely hot. The diameter of the pit was more than 300 meters. The two of them stood at the edge and looked down. They found that the bottom of the pit was at least 50 meters deep. However, even so, the two of them could still see something flickering with golden light at the bottom of the pit. It seemed to be the condensation of some kind of supreme power. “Can you see what it is?”Ji Ruyue asked. Lin Xuan focused his attention and looked over. —— Name: Origin of the Elemental Sea Level: level 10, Level 9 Quality: seven-colored immortal Effect: necessary material to advance to level 11. Description: this is a part of the body that was torn off when the Elemental Sea was fighting the mother of dark fog. —— Lin Xuan was stunned when he saw this message. The Ice Prince Andrey’s guess was indeed correct. The reason why the Elemental Sea did not respond to the Ice King’s prayer was precisely because it could not be in two places at once. At this moment, the Elemental Sea was fighting the mother of dark fog. And now, the elemental world had been guided by multiple factors and had already overlapped with Earth. The origin that had been torn off the body of the elemental sea would naturally fall to earth as well. After Lin Xuan told her about this item, Ji Ruyue was also surprised. This item was indeed precious, but neither she nor Lin Xuan could use it. Moreover, this item was a part of the will of the elemental world! If they really used it, the elemental sea would not go all out against them. “Let’s take it first and wait and see.” Ji Ruyue thought for a while and decided to take this thing away first. At the very least, she could not let the enemy get it. “I’ll keep one, and you keep the other.” Ji Ruyue handed one of the pills to Lin Xuan. Lin Xuan weighed it carefully and suddenly felt absent-minded. He felt as if there was something talking in his ears. However, after calming his mind, there was nothing. “Strange...;” Lin Xuan didn’t think too much and put away the origin of the sea of elements. However, just as the two of them put it into their pockets, a figure appeared beside them. “You Again?”Ji Ruyue saw the other party and frowned slightly. The only one who could arrive here in such a short time was the leader of the Gaotian Plains, Ying. The Gaotian Plains was the closest to this place. Among all the powerhouses in the organization, he was the first to arrive. Ying said indifferently, “I’m not your match, but I’m your match together with this person in my body.” “Moreover, my mission is not to kill you, but to stall for time.” After saying that, he threw out his most precious black tachi. The black tachi emitted thick black smoke, which quickly gathered into the appearance of the Faceless Man. “He actually let the dark descendant stay in his most precious weapon...;”Lin Xuan was shocked. Ying Huanzhen was really willing to do anything in order to become stronger. This black tachi could be said to be his most powerful weapon, and it was always successful. In the end, he said he didn’t want it anymore. The dark descendant held the tachi and grinned hideously as he pounced towards Ji Ruyue. Lin Xuan glanced at him. The other party’s level was one level higher than Ji Ruyue’s! Ji Ruyue also felt the other party’s strength. She threw a talisman and the seed of the mountain sea tree to Lin Xuan and immediately frowned. The two of them immediately stood together. “Lin Xuan, I’ve wanted to kill you for a long time.” Ying rubbed his wrist and smiled. Lin Xuan glanced at the talisman in his hand. The Wind Dao Child Talisman. Its effect was not like the ice dao child talisman or the Thunder Dao Child Talisman, which could both attack and defend. After it was charged, it could provide two abilities, wind speed and wind flash. One was to speed up, and the other was similar to flash. However, compared to flash, the distance could not be said to be on par. It could only be said to be the difference between heaven and earth. A flash was only a few dozen meters. But a wind flash was a thousand meters! Facing the shadow that was rapidly approaching like lightning, Lin Xuan also laughed. “I’ll run!” After saying that, he directly activated the wind flash of the Wind Dao Child Talisman. Whoosh! In an instant, a thousand meters of distance was pulled apart. At the same time, he directly activated the wind speed and his own lightning speed. All the way north! The few leaders of the construction division were only tier 9 warriors, and they were not a match for shadow. Now, they could only ask the Arctic army for help. One day ago, Ye Lijiang informed him through the communication device. Over the past ten days, Andre and the other ice clansmen had absorbed enough ice energy and left the ice pond one after another. The strength of the Arctic army had soared. The grand marshal personally told ye Lijiang the good news and said that he was going to send two commanders to the construction division to help. They should have arrived in Xijing city by now. His only chance of survival was these two commanders of the Arctic army. “Such fast speed.” “Was it provided by that Talisman?” Ying also noticed Lin Xuan’s astonishing speed. He did not look like a warrior who had just advanced to level nine. He was not much different from a level ten warrior like him. “External energy is limited after all. Let’s see how long you can last.” Ying sneered and sped up, chasing after him. Lin Xuan was running wildly while communicating with ye Lijiang through his communication device. Ye Lijiang took this matter very seriously and quickly attacked together with the two commanders of the Arctic army. Then, she dialed a person’s communication device. “Yuqiu, are you in Longhai City?” “Yes.” “Lin Xuan is being chased by Ying. The route is sent to you. Quickly support and stall for time. Wait for us to arrive.” “Lin Xuan? Okay, I’ll go now.” Skaya’s situation was special. She absorbed ice energy much faster than Andre and the others. Three days ago, Ye Yuqiu had already left the permafrost tundra and returned to the construction division. Coincidentally, they encountered another explosion of dark elements in the drowning city. Many monsters were contaminated by the dark elements, and many dark element creatures crawled out of the passage. Their desire to attack was extremely strong. Ye Yuqiu went to the drowning city without saying a word and suppressed many dark element creatures by herself. Her current strength was very strange. She was at level eight, while Skaya was close to level ten. As long as the ice energy was sufficient, she could barely display the strength of level ten, but the duration was short. “I hope the Wind Dao Child Talisman’s energy can still hold on.” Lin Xuan gritted his teeth and dodged Shadow’s attack, accelerating forward. Whoosh! A black light slashed past. Lin Xuan subconsciously dodged. However, after dodging, the black light suddenly exploded and turned into numerous black thorns, enveloping Lin Xuan’s path. Lin Xuan could not slow down, so he could only clench his teeth and move forward. PFFT! PFFT! PFFT! Without exception, these black thorns pierced into his body. In an instant, he was bleeding profusely. Lin Xuan glanced at his HP. In that instant, his HP had been reduced by 35% . However, he quickly recovered at a speed visible to the naked eye. Shadow deeply frowned. This kid’s HP...; was a little ridiculous. He had specially tested the power of this skill. Even a Tier 9, Level 7 puppet would lose over 70% of its HP. In the end, this kid acted as if nothing had happened! A few hours later, Lin Xuan had exhausted all the energy in the Wind Dao Child Talisman. At this moment, he suddenly heard a low and gentle voice. “The destined person...;” ”...; all...; training clones...; return to one body...; restart...;” “Mountain sea tree seed...; absorb...; Memories...;” The voice gradually became intermittent again. Lin Xuan immediately reacted. Ever since he had obtained the Sea of elements origin, this voice had been intermittently ringing. However, the voice just now had been very weak and he could not hear it. “The destined person?” “The sea of elements, the will of the elemental world. How did he know that I have a training avatar?” “The seeds of the mountain sea tree...; absorb? Does that mean that I have to find the tree seed and absorb it?” Lin Xuan was greatly surprised. Boom! At this time, the attack from the self-shadow came again. The Wind Dao Child Talisman’s energy had been used up, and its flash was still on Cooldown. Lin Xuan could only take this attack head-on. Boom! He was sent flying hundreds of meters. His HP dropped by 70% on the spot! “You’re still alive? You’re so tough.” Shadow sneered and moved forward, intending to give Lin Xuan one last blow. At this moment, a giant arrow condensed from ice shot out from the distant horizon, aiming straight for Shadow’s heart! This attack made him feel the threat of death. Shadow had no choice but to retreat and Dodge the giant arrow. In the blink of an eye, a beautiful figure stood by Lin Xuan’s side. It was ye Yuqiu who had rushed over first. Lin Xuan was quite surprised. Even he felt that the giant arrow had the power to threaten a level 10. When did ye Yuqiu have this kind of power. But when he saw the cold air emitting from ye Yuqiu’s body, as well as the Skaya’s shadow formed by the ice energy around ye Yuqiu, he immediately understood. “Skaya absorbed enough ice energy and now has a very strong power. The two of them combined their strength and displayed a power that even the shadow could feel his heart palpitating.”Lin Xuan’s heart calmed down. Needless to say, those chief executives must have communicated in advance and asked ye Yuqiu to come over and help. “I don’t have much time. We’ll retreat as we fight,”ye Yuqiu said in a low voice. Lin Xuan nodded to show that he understood. The two of them fought and retreated. Ying was extremely angry. He had already exhausted the energy in the strange talisman in Lin Xuan’s hand and almost killed him in an instant. What the hell was this short-haired woman that came out of nowhere! As he retreated, Lin Xuan could not help but recall the words of the elemental sea in his mind. “Absorb the seed of the mountain and sea tree?” Lin Xuan could not help but wake up Yuan Tong, who was staying in the seed of the tree. “HMM? Why are you looking for me?”Yuan Tong said lazily. He did not have the slightest worry because he was being chased. Lin Xuan told him the truth, but he did not tell him about the experience clone. Yuan Tong was silent for a moment, “The will of the Elemental Sea? “You are not an elemental creature. How can you get the will of the Elemental Sea to communicate with you personally? Moreover, even if you are an elemental creature, you must be a deep sea ruler, a sacred light overlord, or an Ice King. Only then can you get the attention of the elemental sea.” After saying that, Yuan Tong said seriously, “It can’t be that some evil God is bewitching you, right?” Lin Xuan shook his head firmly. He was 100% sure that it was definitely the will of the elemental sea. Training clones were his biggest secret. Only the will of a world was so powerful that it was possible to see the clues on his body and see the biggest secret. “Alright, this penniless monk trusts you.” Yuan Tong nodded slightly. “However, without the tree seed, this penniless monk has no place to live. You have to find something for this penniless monk to rely on. According to your standards, it has to be a level ten item.” Lin Xuansi thought for a while and took out the Ice Dao Child Talisman. “Is this item feasible?” The only level ten items he had on him were these two great dao child talismans. Among them, the Wind Dao Talisman son Talisman was lent to him by Ji Ruyue, so he naturally couldn’t use it recklessly. The only thing he could use was this ice dao talisman son Talisman. “Great Dao Talisman Son Talisman? Ji Ruyue actually gave this to you?”Yuan Tong clicked his tongue in wonder. “That works too. This item is enough to entrust my soul.” With that said, he quickly moved from the tree seed to the ice dao talisman son Talisman. This transfer process wasn’t difficult. It could even be completed at high speed. Very quickly, Lin Xuan’s palm was an original mountain and sea tree seed. When he observed it again, its information had changed. —— Name: Mountain and sea tree seed Level: rank 10, rank 3 Quality: seven-colored immortal Effect 1: after eating it, one’s level can be greatly increased. It is effective on rank 9 martial artists. Effect 2: recall the memories of the previous life. Description: The Seed of the mountain and sea realm will mountain and sea tree, suitable for carrying souls. —— “There was no effect 2 just now.” Lin Xuan was deep in thought. But what memories of his previous life could he recall? This was strange. Wasn’t he on Earth in his previous life? He had transmigrated here the moment he woke up. With doubt, Lin Xuan ate the seed of the mountain and sea tree. Buzz! An astonishing power surged through his body. His level directly rose from Tier 9 level 1 to Tier 9 level 4. This was tier 9! A huge amount of essence was required to raise a level. Many tier 9 fighters used five years as a unit to raise a level. The further one advanced, the more difficult it became. Unless one could obtain a large amount of resources within a short period of time. Even for Lin Xuan, all of his training avatars would need to accumulate a lot of time to train day and night. However, a mountain and sea tree seed helped him skip this long process! Feeling the leap in his level, Lin Xuan was stunned. This was too much of a bug. As expected of the seed of the mountain and sea realm’s will! Then, in the next moment, a distant memory emerged from the depths of his soul. Lin Xuan was shocked to see the birth of his other self. He had the same appearance and personality as himself. He was also an earthling. After waking up, he inexplicably transmigrated to this world. However, he was not as unlucky as Lin Xuan. After transmigrating, he was a pioneer of the germinal organization. Instead, he directly became a member of the construction department. This person also had a “Training avatar”like Lin Xuan, and he used it to grow rapidly. Soon, this person became a level seven martial artist, and was famous around the world for his astonishing physique and defense. In addition, he liked to wear an evil ghost mask. The martial artists gave him a nickname, “Shield Ghost.”. His memory was not complete, but fragmented and intermittent. After this person advanced to level nine, his memory disappeared and became completely dull. “This seems to be the other me. If I’m lucky enough to transmigrate and land in the construction department’s territory, there’s a high chance that it will develop like this.”Lin Xuan was deep in thought. At this time, he had already reacted from the memories of his previous life. He looked at the time, and only a few seconds had passed. “I transmigrated to this world...; my previous life also transmigrated to this world...; if I eat more mountain and sea tree seeds, I might be able to see more memories.”Lin Xuan’s spirits rose. He instinctively felt that he seemed to have come into contact with a huge secret that was related to why he had transmigrated. Sou Sou Sou! At this moment, two figures appeared in front of him. They were the two commanders of the Arctic army. The moment they appeared, they immediately made the two ice race experts who had temporarily stayed in their bodies appear. These two ice race experts immediately displayed their rank 10 strength. Ying gritted his teeth, knowing that he would not be able to kill Lin Xuan this time. “Just wait, there will come a time when you won’t have anyone to protect you.”Ying took a deep breath and quickly turned around to leave. Ye Yuqiu let out a sigh of relief as she watched the shadow leave. She quickly turned around to check on Lin Xuan’s condition. “It’s good that you’re alright.”She was relieved to find that Lin Xuan’s HP had only decreased a little. However, she did not know whether to laugh or cry at Lin Xuan’s amazing recovery ability. If they continued fighting for a while longer, his HP would probably be full again. “Senior JI is still fighting. Two commanders, please hurry to support us,”Lin Xuan said in a deep voice. “Don’t worry. This is our mission.”The two Arctic army commanders nodded and quickly rushed in the direction of the battle. “I keep having the feeling...; that there are more people than these people.”Lin Xuan’s heart pounded wildly. He felt as if he had been locked onto by someone. No matter where he escaped to, he would be caught up. “Your feeling is right. Our informant reported that many elders of the Salvation Society have been mobilized. Even the leader, Caos, has personally boarded a transport plane and is heading straight for our construction department’s hinterland.” Ye Yuqiu glanced at the communicator and said seriously, “Now, President Ye and the others have already gone to counterattack, but we don’t have the advantage in numbers. We have to wait for reinforcements from the Knights of Truth.” “We should also do something...;”Lin Xuan thought hard. “You are at level nine. I can display the power of level ten in a short period of time. Normally, I can only display the power of level nine. If Skaya uses too much strength and falls into a deep sleep, or even only has the power of level eight...; what can we do?”Ye Yuqiu sighed softly. She felt more powerless than ever. She was clearly very strong. In the previous world, she was definitely a first-class expert. But now, the elemental world had descended. The Holy Spirit clan, Ice Clan, dark descendants, and all sorts of evil spirits had come. A mere level nine was really not enough. “There...; There must be.” Lin Xuan suddenly raised his head and looked at drowning city. “Drowning city is connected to the Black Sea of Angel Fortress, right?” Ye Yuqiu was stunned, “Yes, I have been cleaning up the dark elemental creatures over there for the past few days.” “Why don’t we go through drowning city and go straight to angel fortress to severely injure the rear of the Salvation Society?”A dangerous look flashed through Lin Xuan’s eyes, “If we can threaten the important strategic targets, I don’t believe that the Salvation Society won’t come back to help!” “This way, we can help the front battlefield!” Ye Yuqiu was pleasantly surprised. “That’s right!” “Call some tier 8 fighters and keep it a secret. We’ll go straight to the rear of the Salvation Society!”Lin Xuan said in a deep voice. “Okay!” Ye Yuqiu immediately reported Lin Xuan’s plan to Ye Lijiang. Ye Lijiang gave him high praise and immediately decided to let Lin Xuan do it. As for who he wanted, it was up to Lin Xuan to choose. “I know him. He’s a reliable level eight fighter. He’s quite far away from here...; Kodo is the closest to Here!”Ye Yuqiu looked at the information. “Kodo. He used to be a member of the Salvation Society. He must be very familiar with Angel Fortress.”Lin Xuan nodded. “Tell him that we’ll meet in Drowning City.” The two messaged each other as they rushed towards drowning city. In the sky above the Pacific Ocean, on a transport plane with a double-headed eagle on it. “Leader, I have sensed the location of the origin of the Sea of elements. One of them is not moving, and the other one is heading toward the ocean.” A thin, pale-faced young man beside Kasius spoke. “The one who is not moving should be the woman in white and with a black sword who is entangled. She has one on her. News has come from the other side.”Kasius nodded. “As for the one who is moving at a high speed, it should be Lin Xuan. Blood King, go and kill him and take back the origin of the Sea of elements,”Kasius ordered. “Yes.” The young man with a frighteningly pale face laughed strangely. He opened the door of the transport plane and jumped down directly. In mid-air, thin blood-colored wings grew between his arms and waist. He actually slowed down the high-speed descent and began to glide. Half an hour after the blood king left, a bearded man walked to Kasius’side and said in a deep voice, “Leader, the construction department’s transport aircraft has appeared in front.” “It seems that our opponent’s intelligence network is very developed. We have only just moved out, and they already knew.”Kasius sneered. “You want to make a move?”The bearded man laughed strangely. “Since you’re here to die, of course we have to make a move!”Kasius waved his hand. “Don’t hold back this time. Treat it as a final battle!” The two huge transport planes met in midair. Neither side showed any intention of slowing down. They actually collided in midair! At the moment before the transport planes collided, many tier 9 martial artists jumped out of the cabin like dumplings and fought in midair. Some tier 9 martial artists could fly, so they fought in midair. Some couldn’t fly, so they fought on the surface of the water. In an instant, thousands of huge waves were stirred up in the vast ocean! On the Nameless Island, the light gate of the secret realm of the drowned city. Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu arrived here first. The construction staff stationed here had just experienced an attack from a dark elemental creature, so they were resting. Seeing ye Yuqiu, the people here were very respectful, so they all stood up and saluted. It was ye Yuqiu’s appearance that saved these workers from being in danger. Otherwise, they would have been buried in the hands of the dark elemental creatures. “I’ve been away for more than a day. What’s the situation?”Ye Yuqiu looked for the person in charge and asked. “Most of the dark elemental creatures have been killed by you. We are constantly monitoring the entrance. There’s no situation.”The person in charge solemnly replied. “Okay.”Ye Yuqiu nodded. The two waited for about twenty minutes before Kodo rushed over from the north. “Kill my way back to the Salvation Army? I’m really good at it!”Kodo’s eyes sparkled with excitement. Damn, Lin Xuan’s move was simply marvelous. When he thought about how he could kill his old boss and cause chaos at the back of the Salvation Army, he trembled with excitement. “There’s no time to lose. Let’s Go!” Lin Xuan was the first to rush into drowning city. Ye Yuqiu and Kodo followed closely behind. The monsters in drowning city had been killed once, and the dark elemental creatures had been killed once more. There was almost no obstruction. The three of them soon arrived at the imperial city area of drowning city. The deep pit had been there for a long time. At the bottom of the pit, a black tide surged, emitting a terrifying black light. “What is Angel Fortress?”Lin Xuan asked. Angel fortress was the rear of the Salvation Army. It was the absolute core, just like the Kunlun ruins of the construction division, the dragon mountain range of the Knights of Truth, the Ring Sun City of India, and the reeds of the Highland Plains, its intelligence was rarely revealed to the public. This caused Lin Xuan to have almost no knowledge of Angel Fortress. Kodo sighed. “To tell you the truth, I don’t know either.” Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu were stunned. What was that? “Those who leave the Angel Fortress will be brainwashed and their memories will be completely erased within a week. This way, no one will know what the angel fortress looks like.” Kodo smiled bitterly, “The Salvation Society will not be polite to their own people, and I will also be brainwashed. Only those who have reached the level of an elder can freely enter and leave the Angel Fortress without having to be brainwashed.” “Many people also try to carry all kinds of tools to avoid brainwashing, but unfortunately, none of them succeed.” Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu,”...;” “Awesome.”Lin Xuan gave a helpless thumbs up. “However, I have my own way.”Kodo smiled mysteriously and took out some strange things. A pocket watch with a broken minute hand. A Cup without a lid. Chopsticks that were broken from a third of the body. A portrait of a woman who had lost both her hands. .. These things were illogical and clueless. Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu looked at each other, confused. “Before entering the angel fortress, these things were intact. After leaving the Angel Fortress, I went through brainwashing, and these things were also damaged “Obviously, at that time, I saw something in the angel fortress and used my own method to leave a mark on these items. These damaged items are the marks.” Kodo said seriously. “After we enter the Angel Fortress, as long as a corresponding incident occurs and these damaged items appear, I should be able to recall it very quickly.” “I see, you actually thought of such a strange method. In this way, the person in charge of brainwashing can’t say anything. After all, you didn’t leave any extremely direct marks.”Ye Yuqiu clicked her tongue in wonder. “Since that’s the case, just jump.” Lin Xuan nodded, took a deep breath, and jumped! Black light enveloped him, and black air swirled around him. The scenery changed drastically. When Lin Xuan came back to his senses, he was already in a black ocean. The surrounding Black Sea water seemed to be dead, wrapping around his body. It made people feel endless discomfort. Ye Yuqiu and Kodo also quickly appeared. Ye Yuqiu looked shocked. “This is the Black Sea under the Angel Fortress? It’s like a Dead Sea.” Kodo scratched his head. “It seems like this wasn’t the case when I came in before. However, after being brainwashed, I can’t remember clearly...;” Lin Xuan noticed a small boat quietly drifting on the sea not far away, so he immediately swam over. “Guys, follow me.” There was no living person on the boat, only a corpse. Judging from the degree of dryness of the corpse, it had been dead for some time. “This person...; I remember him. He was a level eight warrior. Why did he die here alone?”Kodo looked puzzled. “You Know Him?” “I met him once and gave him an order, but I’m not familiar with him.”Kodo frowned. “Could it be that the Salvation Society doesn’t even need a level eight warrior anymore?” Lin Xuan thought of something. “Do you still remember those old men with black spots? They must have been forced into their bodies by the Dark Ones to suddenly gain that kind of power.” “This method of suddenly becoming stronger obviously has a price to pay.” Ye Yuqiu was smart and quickly guessed, “They lost their mind and completely worshipped the dark ones. In addition...; there might be a chance of success.” “If a level nine warrior was put on the surface, it would be impossible for them to be used as a vessel to carry the dark ones. Then the unlucky ones would only be level eight.” “The Salvation Society might have secretly instigated many level eight warriors to be used as vessels to carry the Dark Ones, but in the end, there were only a few black-spotted old men.”Lin Xuan nodded. Kodo was shocked and angry, “In other words, many level eight warriors died in this process.” “This warrior who died alone on the small boat was probably trying to escape from being forced to be used as a vessel.”Ye Yuqiu sighed. “Let’s go. There seems to be an outline of the ground over there.”Lin Xuan pointed in a direction. The three picked up the oars on the small boat and started sailing. Not long after, they approached the outline of the shadow. However, this was not the ground. It was a bigger boat. “It’s more than a hundred meters long. It’s comparable to a small warship.”Kodo exclaimed. “This big boat is also parked here...;”ye Yuqiu wanted to say something but stopped. “Maybe it’s also escaping...;”before Lin Xuan could finish, his heart jumped. His five senses were so sensitive that he felt threatened. “There’s something on the ship...; let’s board the ship and act carefully,”Lin Xuan said in a deep voice. Ye Yuqiu and Kodo nodded their heads. The three carefully climbed up the gangway to the deck. When they reached the deck, they saw several shriveled corpses. Just like the corpses on the small boat, the water had almost been lost and the dark elements in their bodies had been extracted. At this moment, Lin Xuan suddenly noticed that there seemed to be something hidden in the shadows beside him. In the next moment, the warning was suddenly magnified! “Get Down!” Lin Xuan shouted in a low voice and instinctively crouched down. Although ye Yuqiu and Kodo’s reactions were slower by half a beat, they also quickly crouched down. Whoosh! A giant black arrow as thick as an infant’s arm flew past the three people’s scalps. Then, two grotesque and ferocious black creatures jumped out and pounced on ye Yuqiu and Kodo. Lin Xuan observed them with his all-seeing eye and quickly got their information. “Dark elemental aberrations, level eight or nine, half-flesh and half-elemental creatures that failed to evolve after pouring dark elements into their flesh and blood.” Lin Xuan felt a chill in his heart. He had made such a guess before. He did not expect that he would actually guess correctly, and it was not wrong at all. The Salvation Society was really experimenting on their own people. Kodo quickly dodged the attack of the dark elemental aberrations, but at the same time, he also reacted. “When we were captured by the Takama-ga-hara, could it be that they wanted to use us as an experiment too?” He was both shocked and angry, and attacked continuously. His fierce attacks forced the dark elemental aberrations to retreat continuously. Three against two. Lin Xuan’s strength had even reached level nine. Ye Yuqiu and Kodo’s strength were not ordinary either. The three of them worked together and quickly finished off the two dark elemental aberrations. The sound of the fight wasn’t loud. Fortunately, there weren’t many dark elemental aberrations on the deck. The three’s battle attracted the attention of the other three dark elemental aberrations. In the end, they still succeeded in taking them down. “This thing...;”Kodo picked up a thumb-sized, irregular black crystal. Lin Xuan was deep in thought. This thing was somewhat similar to the energy ball that Ji Ruyue condensed after killing the Dark Ones. He looked at the item description. It was really the condensation of the energy in these dark element aberrations. “Keep it for now. When there are more of them, I can directly purify them with super-purifying potions in one go. We can absorb them. They are the same as essence,”Lin Xuan said in a low voice. Kodo looked excited. “Good, good, good!” The three of them walked around the deck again. After making sure that there were no other dark element abnormals on the deck, they carefully pushed open the cabin and entered the interior. As soon as they opened it, an ear-piercing roar was heard in the darkness. Then, a large number of hurried footsteps were heard in the cabin! Lin Xuan used his five senses to quickly sense that there were thirty dark element abnormals rushing out of various rooms in the cabin and coming straight for them. These dark elemental aberrations were very fast. In the blink of an eye, they appeared in front of the three of them. They had different shapes. Some had four legs, some had three hands, some had two heads, and some did not even have the shape of a human anymore. But they had one thing in common — they were all equally ferocious and terrifying. Ye Yuqiu’s expression suddenly changed. “I’ll control them!” With that, Skaya appeared. A large amount of cold air erupted from her body, freezing the floor completely. The charging momentum of these dark element aberrations slowed down rapidly. Lin Xuan immediately used his avatar, and five clones appeared beside him. The main body and the clones simultaneously used the flame blast spell! Boom! A terrifying heat wave that covered the sky and earth enveloped all the dark element aberrations in front of him. Now that they were faced with so many dark element aberrations besieging them, they did not care about being exposed. Even if the commotion was huge, they had to do their best to deal with it! An hour later, Ye Yuqiu and Kodo collapsed on the deck. They didn’t even want to move, their bodies aching. Because Lin Xuan’s constitution was high, his condition was much better than theirs. He could barely stand. In this one hour, they had killed a total of 51 dark elemental aberrations. It couldn’t be said to be an easy task. At the very least, it was fraught with difficulties. Skaya’s energy had been exhausted, and she had no choice but to enter a short hibernation. Kodo’s Mana had been depleted twice. Thanks to Lin Xuan’s mana potion support, they were able to continue fighting. It was not until they confirmed that there were no more dark elemental aberrations on the ship that the three of them let out a long sigh and relaxed. However, when Lin Xuan gathered all the irregular crystals together, ye Yuqiu and Kodo perked up and half sat up. “Quick, quick, quick, how are we going to purify them?”Kodo was very excited. Lin Xuan took out a bottle of super-purifying medicine, uncorked the bottle, and poured it on the crystals. Sizzle. It was like ice water being poured on a raging fire. The grayish-black gas gushed out. Ye Yuqiu and Kodo hurriedly avoided it. When all the grayish-black gas disappeared, the crystals actually changed color. From the black before, they were now spotlessly white. They shone like diamonds. Under Lin Xuan’s observation, their names had changed from “Deformed crystals”to “Purified deformed crystals”. “You can absorb them now. The three of us will split them equally.” Lin Xuan divided the crystals into three parts. Kodo was a little embarrassed. He knew that in this battle, his own strength could not be compared to ye Yuqiu’s, much less Lin Xuan’s. After all, Lin Xuan was now a genuine level nine. And Ye Yuqiu and Skaya could even match a level ten when they fully activated their strength. But seeing Lin Xuan’s serious expression, Kodo did not hypocritically refuse, but calmly accepted it. Thus, the three of them each received seventeen crystals. Ye Yuqiu picked up a crystal and placed it in her palm. The crystal quickly transformed into pure energy and surged into her body, quickly filling up her fighter level. After one crystal was absorbed by the purified deformed body, the progress bar of level eight and level three increased by a third. Another half an hour passed. Ye Yuqiu’s level soared to level eight and level five. Lin Xuan’s level did not increase. After all, once he reached level nine, it was very difficult to increase his level once, but it still rose quite a bit. He was still about two-thirds away from level nine and level five. Kodo’s aura gradually became denser, as if a quantitative change had caused a complete qualitative change. “The progress bar for tier 8 or Tier 9 is finally full?”Lin Xuan laughed. Kodo laughed heartily, “Yes! It’s finally full.” “What is a Tier 9 advancement quest?”Ye Yuqiu asked. “In an environment full of dark elements, persist for 30 minutes. The density of dark elements can not be lower than 30% ,”Kodo said seriously. “This...; is a bit dangerous.”Lin Xuan stroked his chin. After all, humans were flesh and blood beings. After being in an elemental environment for a long time, their bodies would be corroded by the elements. This was how these dark element aberrations came about. Of course, their origins were even more tragic. It could be that something filled with large amounts of dark elements was stuffed directly into their mouths. That method was more brutal and more dangerous. “Pay more attention. There must be such a place in the Angel Fortress. When we get out, you’ll be a level-nine warrior,”Lin Xuan said with a smile. Kodo looked excited. “Okay!” “Let’s go to the captain’s room and see if the ship can still be operated. It’s best if we can find something like a map.”Lin Xuan was the first to stand up. They were very lucky. Although they didn’t find a map in the captain’s cabin, they found a broken map stained with blood in one of the crew’s rooms. Kodo saw a location on the map, and his mind suddenly flashed like lightning. “I remember this place!” He hurriedly took out the portrait without hands from the storage compartment and enunciated each word, “Chopped Hand Island! That place is a prison, and it’s also the closest island to us. All the prisoners there will have their hands chopped off. I have a very deep memory of that place.” “Prison? Who are they holding?”Ye Yuqiu’s interest was piqued. Lin Xuan thought for a while, “No matter who they are, they will definitely be enemies with the Salvation Society. Under such circumstances, they are our allies.” “That’s right! We must completely mess up Angel stronghold. Let’s Go There!”Ye Yuqiu nodded. With the three’s hard work, the ship that had been drifting on the Black Sea for a long time finally began to move again, relying on the small amount of fuel in it. An hour and a half later, they found the land in front of them. Chopped Hand Island. The guards here also noticed them at the first moment. “Isn’t that the peace ship? It disappeared for so long, but it’s back?”One of the guards was shocked. “They’re all traitors anyway. When they get off the ship, capture them all and use them as containers.”Another guard sneered. At this moment, they saw three people jump down from the deck. They even remembered one of them. Blood Demon Kodo! He used to have a high position in the Salvation Society. Lin Xuan quickly used his five senses to sense the situation on the island. There were more than a hundred guards. But their strength was worrisome. Most of them were at level seven. The strongest one was only at level eight or nine. “This strength is not enough.”Lin Xuan laughed. “Why are there two yellow people?”More and more guards gathered. They looked puzzled. “That person...; I’ve seen that person before. It’s Lin Xuan! Lin Xuan from the construction department!”One of the guards suddenly pointed at Lin Xuan and cried out involuntarily. When the other guards heard this name, they instantly went crazy. Lin Xuan! That was the person they had been longing for! As long as they could kill him, the reward from the salvation society would be enough to let them live comfortably for the rest of their lives! “Kill!” The Guards’eyes were all red as they directly rushed over. They didn’t care at all. Lin Xuan and the other two showed no fear. They even wanted to laugh. Lin Xuan used his avatar and five clones appeared beside him. In this way, it was equivalent to six level nine warriors. What kind of scene was it when a level nine warrior charged into a level seven warrior? It was not an exaggeration to describe it as a tiger entering a flock of sheep. Wherever Lin Xuan and the five clones passed, blood and flesh flew everywhere! Ye Yuqiu and Kodo also displayed their skills and charged towards the guards. Kodo looked envious. Lin Xuan was too fierce. Once this doppelganger appeared, it was equivalent to six times the combat power. The guards on Chopped Hand Island were quickly cleared out. The head guard was even doing push-ups on the woman’s stomach. Before he could react, Lin Xuan had cut off his head with a spear. Then, they came to the prison. What surprised Lin Xuan was that these people’s hands were intact. “Eh...; isn’t it called Chopped Hand Island?”Kodo was stunned. In the prison, an old man slowly approached them. “You killed all the guards here. Can you let us out?”His turbid eyes lit up. “Let us out. We just want to kill the Salvation Society!” “The hatred between me and the Salvation Society is irreconcilable!” The others in the prison also roared angrily. They were imprisoned here like slaves. Now they finally had a chance to strike the Salvation Society hard! “Of course, the Salvation Society is our enemy.”Lin Xuan directly shot open the prison gate and said, “There are many ships at the port, and there is fuel here. You can go anywhere you want.” “Thank you!”The old man looked excited and was the first to rush out. Then came the second, the third.. Many prisoners in black prison uniforms rushed out of the prison like birds chasing freedom. Lin Xuan saw that their backs were covered in blood. Some people had something shaking on their backs. Ye Yuqiu’s eyes focused. “I know...; What hand was cut off.” Kodo felt a chill in his heart, “They might have been eroded by a small amount of dark elements, causing their bodies to mutate.” “These mutations are concentrated on the back. These hands are useless, but they will compete for body nutrients and have to be cut off...;” Kodo gritted his teeth, “I’ve served the Salvation Society for more than 30 years, how many evil deeds have I done behind their backs? ! They even f * cking saved the world!” “Their lifespans...; are running out.” “The only thing they want to do now is to return the evil deeds that the Salvation Society has done to them tenfold and hundredfold.”Lin Xuan sighed softly. The three of them searched around chopped hand island and found a large amount of resources in the warehouse here. There were essences, mystical realm jewels, equipment, and skill books. However, the three of them did not take them. It was obvious that these resources were obtained from the prisoners forced by the Salvation Society. These things were dirty! Lin Xuan didn’t think that he was a saint, but he could obtain clean resources with his ability, so he wouldn’t take these dirty things. “Let’s go to the next island. We have to find Angel Fortress as soon as possible.”Lin Xuan pointed to the next location on the broken map. The secret realm of Angel fortress was called Angel Fortress. It was precisely because there was a mighty pass and fortress here! At the edge of the broken map, where the dried blood covered, one could vaguely see the words “Angel”. That was obviously Angel Fortress. The second island. Lin Xuan and the other two didn’t know the name of this island. When they arrived here, the place was already in the midst of an intense battle. The prisoners on the chopping hand island were filled with anger. The first thing they did after obtaining their freedom was to sail to the nearest island, which was this place. Therefore, when Lin Xuan and the other two arrived, the prisoners had already arrived. Although the prisoners were bloodthirsty, they respected Lin Xuan and the other two very much and made way for them. Lin Xuan was about to search for the map in the building when the old man walked over and coughed a few times. He seemed to be very weak. “I don’t know your name, but I might know the purpose of your trip.” The old man walked over with a complete map in his hands. “Angel Fortress. There is an important passage for the dark ones to pass through. Many Dark Ones arrived on Earth through that passage “If we destroy it, the Dark Ones’speed of sending power will be reduced by 70-80% in a short time!” Lin Xuan was shocked. The old man in front of him actually knew so much? He wanted to ask the old man about his identity. However, the old man had already collapsed. When he looked at the old man again, he was already dead. “He’s dead...;”Kodo let out a long sigh and tidied up the old man’s clothes. “He’s the former chief of the Angel Fortress...;”a prisoner beside him suddenly said. Lin Xuan was stunned. Chief of the fortress? Wasn’t he just below the elders? How could such a person become a prisoner? “In order to save people, the chief of the fortress was contaminated with a small amount of dark elements and mutated.” “Later, because he didn’t agree to be enemies with the construction division, he gradually withdrew from the high-level decision-making circle of the Salvation Society.” “His political enemy added insult to injury and fabricated crimes, so he was thrown to the chopped-off hand island,”the prisoner said in a low voice. Lin Xuan and the other two were silent. He was obviously a very good person, but unfortunately, he ended up like this. “We will bury the body of the chief of the fortress,”the prisoner said angrily. “The three of you, go and destroy that passage!” Lin Xuan shook his hand heavily, and the three of them quickly drove to the next island. Time waited for no man. The faster they moved, the better, and the greater the damage they would cause. Only in this way would the Salvation Society and the Dark Ones realize that the backyard was on fire and turn back to rescue them. The prisoner looked in the direction they had left and sighed in his heart. If only I hadn’t chosen the Salvation Society and joined the construction division.. .. Pain and terror. Lin Xuan only had these two feelings after passing through the islands. Pain was the mutation of those who had been eroded by the dark elements. Terror was the way the Salvation Society treated these people. Even though these people used to be members of the Salvation Society and even held high positions. The Salvation Society didn’t treat them. Instead, they were directly thrown here and treated as slaves. “I didn’t know how the Salvation Society had so many resources, as if they could never be used up. Now I know.”Kodo stood on the deck with a sorrowful expression. He had also helped the tiger for more than thirty years! Lin Xuan could only pat him on the shoulder, but he did not know how to comfort him. Ye Yuqiu pointed ahead and said in a low voice, “We’re here, Angel Fortress.” Kodo wiped his slightly red eyes and looked ahead. As expected, a majestic fortress stood above the black seawater. This fortress was pure white and flawless, as if it was made of a large amount of beautiful jade. It was more than a hundred meters tall and majestic. Anyone who took a glance at it would be amazed by its grandeur and feel a sense of insignificance. There was also a giant grating gate in the fortress. It was thick and majestic, and could not be opened by ordinary methods. “Angel fortress...; how ironic.”Lin Xuan shook his head repeatedly. The flawless white jade fortress and the black and filthy sea water were actually the same thing. “Who is it? !” On the city wall, a bright light from a searchlight quickly shot over and shouted. “Your father!” Kodo directly roared and took the lead to rush out! He was as fast as flying, and his feet actually grew roots as he ran wildly on the city wall. In the blink of an eye, he had reached the city wall. Lin Xuan and Ye Yuqiu followed closely behind. The three of them quickly rushed to the top of the city wall. The level seven warriors guarding the city wall were all stunned. What kind of strength was this. This was a city wall that was 90 degrees! It wasn’t flat ground! What followed was a one-sided massacre. The level seven warriors on the city wall were no match for the three of them. After washing this place with blood, the three of them directly opened the giant gate. Rumble. With a loud noise, the giant gate opened. On the surface of the sea not far away, more and more prisoners were already rushing here by boat. Lin Xuan and the other two killed along the way, freeing many prisoners. These prisoners had the same goal as them. Lin Xuan opened the giant gate to make it easier for them to pass through. “There’s a black light shooting up to the sky over there. It should be the passage between the two worlds. Let’s Go!”Lin Xuan looked at the black light column that shot up to the sky a hundred meters in front of him and said seriously. Angel fortress, in a secret room. There were four beds in the room. There were three people lying motionless on the beds. There was another person sitting on the bed, not moving at all. Hearing the shouting outside, this person seemed to have received some kind of signal. His stiff neck turned a little. A face without facial features was revealed. Dark descendant! “Sneak attack the passage of the two worlds?” He laughed weirdly, and an obscure voice suddenly came out of his mouth. Then, the three motionless people suddenly moved slightly and got up. These three people had large black spots on their bodies, which were very similar to the old man with black spots that Lin Xuan had seen before. However, their auras were weaker than the old man with black spots, and there were mutated limbs on their bodies. “Let’s go and see who has the audacity to attack the passage of the two worlds.”The dark-skinned man sneered and took the lead to walk out. The three of them followed behind him silently like machines. .. On the other side, Lin Xuan and the other two had already rushed into the angel fortress. A large group of prisoners followed them and also rushed in. The cries of killing shook the sky and Earth. The entire Angel fortress was engulfed in blood and fire. When the prisoners rushed in, many of the martial artists of the Salvation Army were still resting. Even there were not many guards on the city wall. No one had expected that there would be capable people rushing in from Angel Fortress, which was extremely safe behind the Salvation Army! In addition, most of the Salvation Society’s higher-ups had been evacuated, and they were engaged in an unprecedented battle with the construction department and the Arctic Army. There were almost no high-end combat forces in the Angel Fortress. When they suddenly encountered such fierce combat forces from Lin Xuan and the other two, the Warriors were all very panicked and could only retreat continuously. Lin Xuan and the other two advanced rapidly, and soon they were within a thousand meters of the towering light pillar. The remaining guards of Angel Fortress gathered here and formed the last line of defense. A large number of prisoners who were suffering from the corrosion of the dark elements also held their weapons and fiercely confronted these guards. These prisoners’lifespans were almost over. They were truly outlaws who only wanted revenge. Guards of the same level were naturally not their opponents. “I didn’t expect it to be so smooth.”Ye Yuqiu was puzzled. “It’s impossible for the Salvation Society to not have a backup plan. Be careful.”Lin Xuan’s expression was cautious. Even if the Salvation Society went all out to seize the origin of the Sea of elements, they would probably leave behind enough high-end combat power to guard Angel stronghold. Lin Xuan didn’t believe that the salvation society would be so stupid that there wasn’t even a level 9 behind them. “As expected of an earthling that even the ruler would remember. You’re very different.” A hoarse and unpleasant voice suddenly sounded from the distant tower. Lin Xuan’s pupils constricted as he looked at the other party. It was a completely black faceless creature. It was a dark descendant! “And a dark descendant!”Kodo’s expression tensed. Even the weakest dark descendant had the strength of a level 10. And among the three, only ye Yuqiu could temporarily display the strength of level 10. But if he exhausted Skaya’s ice energy, he would fall back to level 8. “Lin Xuan, you can be proud of yourself.” “On this planet, there are not many humans worthy of being remembered by the ruler of the deep sea. You are one of them.” The Dark Ones said faintly. Three figures silently appeared behind him, moving quickly with the help of the shadows. Lin Xuan remained calm. In fact, he could sense the three figures through his five senses. “Three dark element parasites, level nine, level four.” Lin Xuan thought to himself. “Actually, everything you’ve done is in vain. The entire Angel Fortress doesn’t even need so many guards. I alone will be enough to defend it.” This dark descendant seemed to be very confident. He laughed wantonly, not taking anyone seriously at all. Lin Xuan frowned. Could it be that the other party had some powerful killer move? Otherwise, how could he be so confident. “Let’s begin!” The dark descendant waved his hand. The three figures suddenly appeared. Lin Xuan’s entire body tensed up. He was already prepared. Regardless of whether the other party was launching a surprise attack or what, he would be able to react at the first moment. However, his guess was wrong. The three dark element parasites did not rush towards them. Instead, they directly jumped into the two worlds passage. The 3 of them did not cause any ripples in the realm passageway that was a few hundred meters in diameter. They were like unremarkable fleas that were casually crushed. But in the next moment, the realm passageway that had been stable all along suddenly began to shake violently. It was like a bucket of boiling hot water! The liquid within could spill out at any moment. The density of dark elements in the air was also rising at a terrifying speed! The first ones to suffer were the guards of Angel Fortress who were closest to the realm passage. “Ah!” The innermost guard suddenly screamed. The rest of the Warriors turned around. They were shocked to see that the guard’s back was eroded by a drop of dark elements. His body quickly underwent all kinds of strange changes. A baby-like hand grew out from his ribs. The position of his eyes and nose gradually changed. The guard screamed continuously and rushed towards the people beside him. “Save me, save me!” The martial artists beside him were scared out of their wits. “Dark element erosion! Don’t touch him!” The martial artists of the Salvation Army screamed and dodged. People who were eroded by the dark element would undergo all sorts of changes due to the compatibility between their bodies and the dark element. If the compatibility was high, they would be able to stabilize themselves and become like the black-spotted old man, causing their strength to soar. If the compatibility was low, they would continue to mutate. It was common for people to have crooked eyes, crooked mouths, and long hands under their ribs. If the compatibility was too low, it would be unable to withstand the dark elements and explode! The first martial artist of the Salvation Army who was corroded by the dark elements clearly had a low compatibility with him. Due to the changes in his vocal cords, he was gradually unable to make any sound. Under his skin, it was as if it had turned into a liquid substance. Moreover, his body was rapidly expanding. In the next moment, this unlucky guy exploded like a bomb. A large amount of purple-black liquid splashed onto the bodies of the surrounding warriors. These warriors were stunned for a moment before they started to scream in pain. Their bodies also started to change. “This is only the beginning, it’s only the beginning.”The Dark One on the tower laughed strangely. The passage between the two worlds was boiling. Large amounts of dark elements were expelled and filled the air. “Dark One...; Lord Dark One, save us, save...;”a warrior of the Salvation Convention screamed and ran towards the Dark One. The Dark One was only laughing wildly, but he did not take their cries seriously at all. In essence, elemental creatures were high-level creatures in the eyes of the Dark One. As for Earthlings, they were born to be containers. If they were not suitable to be containers, they could be used as a moving human-shaped trap. They could be considered to have dedicated their lives to the dark ones. The expressions of Lin Xuan and the other two changed. The opponent’s move was too ruthless! No wonder he said that he could guard the realm passage alone. This Dark One did not care about human lives at all. Whether it was criminals or members of the Salvation Society. In his eyes, they were all low-level creatures! “Retreat, quickly retreat!” Lin Xuan immediately turned on the lightning speed and returned to the original path. However, they crashed into the invisible wall. Lin Xuan was stunned. Invisible Wall? When did it appear? He immediately threw a punch at it. But with his level nine and level five strength, the invisible wall did not move at all. On Ye Yuqiu’s body, Skaya suddenly appeared. “I saw an invisible wall formed by the gathering of elements. There are all kinds of elements in the wall, forming a balance, so it’s transparent and invisible.” Lin Xuan hurriedly asked, “Then how do we break it?” Skaya said, “Either we use level ten brute force to break it open, or we use a large amount of elements to break it open.” “Aren’t you just level 10...;”Kodo was about to speak. Skaya shook her head, “The level 10 that rainy and I forcefully raised can only be considered a pseudo-level 10. We can’t break it open.” Kodo looked anxious, “What should we do...;” Ye Yuqiu’s expression was serious, “Then we’ll grit our teeth and persevere. It will definitely consume a large amount of energy for him to condense an invisible wall, and the boiling of the realm passageway can’t last forever.” Lin Xuan nodded. “As long as we can persevere, then it’s fine.” Ye Yuqiu continued, “Kodo, isn’t this the same as your tier 9 promotion mission?” Kodo was stunned. He laughed loudly and gritted his teeth. “You’re right!” Lin Xuan immediately took out the great life potion from his space of consciousness and handed it to the two of them. “Let’s begin. Persevere.” The three of them found a corner and sat down, trying their best to resist the dark elements in the air. The Warriors and prisoners of the Salvation Army did not continue to fight. Under such circumstances, it was useless to fight anymore. The erosion of the dark elements would kill everyone in the invisible wall. Everyone leaned against the wall and sat down, trying their best to stay away from the passage between the two worlds. Every once in a while, a warrior would fall down with a scream. Their bodies had a strange mutation. Humans did not look like humans, and ghosts did not look like ghosts. Those warriors whose bodies were expanding would be kicked far away immediately. Then, like an inflated balloon, they would explode. The Dark One stood on the tower. Hearing the screams and wails from all directions, he felt happy instead. “Persevere? Stupid Persevere, useless struggle.” He laughed wantonly and did not make a move. He just watched. He wanted to watch Lin Xuan being eroded, mutated, and killed by the dark elements! Lin Xuan stared at his data panel. There was a “Dark element erosion state”behind his health, and it was steadily decreasing. His constitution was so noble. Ye Yuqiu and Kodo’s health decreased even faster. Only ten minutes had passed, and the two of them had no choice but to drink a large health potion to increase their health. Lin Xuan also saw that the flesh under Kodo’s ribs had begun to grow. This was clearly a sign of mutation. Ten minutes, fifteen minutes, twenty minutes.. Time ticked by. A large number of people died. Some of the Warriors of the Salvation Army even rushed over to attack the Dark Ones like crazy. They never thought that the dark ones, whom they respected as gods, would actually abandon them like trash. Of course, these people could not be compared to the dark one at all. They would even be casually blown up by the Dark One before they even got close to the tower. “You’re still holding on...; your vitality has indeed exceeded my expectations,”the Dark One stared at Lin Xuan and muttered. “Fine, I’ll just do it myself and send you on your way!” The Dark One suddenly stood up, jumped down from the top of the tower, and slowly walked toward Lin Xuan. Lin Xuan directly used his avatar and summoned five clones to meet the opponent. Ye Yuqiu also wanted to fight. But Lin Xuan gave her a look. Ye Yuqiu was stunned. Even though it was just a look, she understood a lot. Among the three of them, only ye Yuqiu had the ability to fight against a level 10 for a short time. But now, Ye Yuqiu was being eroded by the dark elements, and her health was rapidly losing. If he went up to fight now, he would definitely be the first to be killed by that dark descendant. So what Lin Xuan had to do was to weaken this dark descendant as much as possible. It was best to give ye Yuqiu a chance to kill him in one hit. Ye Yuqiu nodded and cheered Lin Xuan on in his heart. “I know you have a very powerful ice elemental treasure on you. What is that thing called, a Talisman?” The dark-robed man suddenly laughed strangely. “That thing is useless against me. You can try it out.”The dark-robed man laughed strangely. “We dark-robed men are not fools who don’t remember our lessons.” Lin Xuan’s expression remained the same. Some time had passed since Ji Ruyue gave him the ice dao child talisman. During this period of time, he had used the ice dao child talisman to escape from the dark-robed man and shadow many times. No matter how stupid the dark-robed person was, he knew that he had such a treasure in his hands. He must have made preparations to counter-attack. Lin Xuan had already expected this. Bang! The two of them did not test each other. From the beginning, they attacked with all their strength. Lin Xuan stomped on the ground and instantly jumped up. The sharp poison-dipped short sword was aimed straight at the dark-robed person’s heart. The dark-robed person’s arm turned into a huge spiral spike and aimed straight at Lin Xuan’s heart. Clang! The shield ghost doppelganger appeared in a flash. The Lionheart Tower Shield blocked in front of Lin Xuan, blocking the attack for him. However, the Lionheart Tower Shield’s durability had dropped by 90% . Cracks covered the shield ghost doppelganger’s body, threatening to shatter at any moment. The Shield Ghost Doppelganger’s HP also dropped by 50% , sending it flying dozens of meters away. Boom! The dark-robed man’s chest was slashed by a jade-green sword light, splitting into two. However, the Dark One laughed out loud. His body reassembled in the blink of an eye. “Earthling, you know too little about elemental creatures!”The Dark One laughed out loud and attacked again. The two of them exchanged blows rapidly. In the blink of an eye, they exchanged seven to eight rounds. Every time they exchanged blows, Lin Xuan had to use his clones to block them. After seven to eight rounds, all five of his clones died. For a short period of time, his doppelganger could no longer be used. As a result, a lot of his equipment was also broken. However, Lin Xuan’s training doppelganger was now hacking in all the secret realms, so he had accumulated a lot of equipment. He could change into new equipment at any time, but the effect would be slightly worse. After the doppelganger died, Lin Xuan used the ice path child talisman to block. While defending, he did not forget to use his all-seeing eye to observe the opponent’s condition. He kept an eye on this dark descendant’s health and Mana at all times. At the same time, he tried his best to keep the dark descendant’s back facing ye Yuqiu and Kodo. Clang! The last bit of Ice Path Child Talisman’s energy was used up. Lin Xuan was no longer in front of him, and he was instantly sent flying dozens of meters. He violently coughed up blood, and his health rapidly decreased! The dark descendant’s right arm once again formed a spiral spike, and was about to ruthlessly stab at Lin Xuan’s head. At this time, a gust of wind suddenly appeared in front of Lin Xuan to block it. Lin Xuan looked closely and saw that it was Kodo, whose aura had greatly increased. “Your Body...;”the Dark One was stunned for a moment. Kodo laughed loudly. “I should thank you! I completed the tier 9 promotion mission in this environment and obtained the third class skill, elemental body! The Dark Element’s damage to me is only 50% !” After saying that, he used his chest to block in front of Lin Xuan, blocking the spiral spikes without any fear! Boom! Kodo’s body was hit by the Spiraling Black Thorn, and he was sent flying. His chest was caved in, and a few of his ribs were clearly broken. Lin Xuan took a look and heaved a sigh of relief. Kodo had only lost 40% of his HP, so it was not a big deal. The Dark One’s face, which had no facial features, seemed a little angry. “You blocked the first attack, but you can still block the second?” “Let’s see who can save you this time!” After saying that, he gathered all the dark elements in his right arm and attacked with all his might. Lin Xuan looked behind the dark descendant and laughed. “Here, it’s coming.” A bone-piercing cold crazily swept over. Skaya appeared behind ye Yuqiu. The two were like Frost War Gods, pointing straight at the dark descendant’s heart. Although Lin Xuan’s attack did not heavily injure the dark descendant, it also reduced his health to around 60% . This line was the line that ye Yuqiu could instantly kill! “Die!” Ye Yuqiu and Skaya shouted at the same time. Their voices resonated. The Dark One was incomparably terrified. He quickly changed his move and used the dark element to turn around and defend. But he had clearly lost the opportunity. From the moment he had been arrogant and chased after Lin Xuan, he had already lost. Among the three, the only one who could deal fatal damage to him was actually ye Yuqiu. Boom! The piercing cold air pierced through the dark-robed man’s chest. It completely froze his entire body! “Break!” Ye Yuqiu’s voice fell. The dark-robed man’s body instantly exploded into pieces! Everyone let out a long breath and relaxed. Kodo struggled to get up and laughed wantonly, “We won!” The prisoners also shouted loudly, “We won!” “Let’s not waste any more time. Destroy the realm passage immediately!” Lin Xuan quickly came to the side of the realm passage. Then, he was in a dilemma. How could he destroy it. This realm passage had a diameter of several hundred meters. Just now, the dark descendant had thrown three dark element parasites into it, which caused the realm passage to boil for a moment. “This penniless monk might have a way.”Yuan Tong’s voice suddenly sounded. Lin Xuan hurriedly took out the Ice Daozi Talisman. Yuan Tong immediately condensed it and smiled kindly. “Speak quickly,”kodo hurriedly said. “The dark elements in the two worlds passage are dense. If a higher concentration of elements is put in, it will gradually collapse due to the loss of purity and eventually completely close.”Yuan Tong looked at Lin Xuan with a faint smile. Lin Xuan also reacted and immediately took out the origin of the elemental sea from the storage compartment. This was the will of the elemental world, the origin that had fallen from the body of the elemental sea. The elements contained in it were definitely much purer than those in the passage between the two worlds. “Go.” Lin Xuan took a deep breath and threw it far away. The origin of the Elemental Sea was only the size of a palm. It fell into the passage between the two worlds like a stone falling into a lake. Just when Lin Xuan and the other two thought that there was no reaction...; The passage of two worlds suddenly began to churn violently. It was as if something was stirring below! Boom Boom Boom! A muffled explosion came from the depths of the passage. Ah! At the same time, there were even screams. “Wait...; the screams, are they dark ones?”Kodo froze for a moment. Ye Yuqiu said strangely, “Could they be dark ones who are about to pass through the passage of Two Worlds?” “They were about to pass through, but they realized that the two worlds passage was already starting to collapse. Some Dark Ones were directly stuck in the middle of the passage and were stuck to death!” Lin Xuan nodded, “It’s very possible.” Boom Boom Boom! In the passage, the dull sounds of explosions became more and more frequent. The black light that soared to the sky also began to rapidly shrink. In less than half an hour, the magnificent two worlds passage had turned into a huge deep pit. There was nothing at the bottom of the pit. “We did it!”The three people were excited. “Hey, there’s something at the bottom of the pit.”Ye Yuqiu suddenly noticed that something was wrong. Lin Xuan looked over and was also stunned. It was a very familiar thing. Another seed of the mountain and sea tree! He quickly jumped to the bottom of the pit and picked up the seed of the mountain and sea tree. After a little cleaning, the seed revealed its original appearance. “There’s actually one here?”Yuan Tong was also stunned. Logically speaking, this thing should not be in the passage between the two worlds. Lin Xuan did not hesitate and immediately ate the seed of the mountain and sea tree. Memories flooded out like a tide. In this life, Lin Xuan was a member of the Knights of Truth. Because he was proficient in healing divine arts, he was ridiculed by others and was nicknamed “Brother Milk.”. Subsequently, Brother Milk became famous around the world for his powerful healing ability. Many people wanted to build a good relationship with brother milk and did not dare to offend him. This was because many times, brother Milk’s skill could be the distance between life and death. In the end, the Knights of Truth and the Salvation Society broke off a war. The construction division, the Arctic Army, India, and the Highland Plains all joined the two sides. Brother-in-law died at the hands of the dark-robed leader, the ruler of the deep sea. Crack. The memory was shattered. Lin Xuan gasped for breath and recovered. Ye Yuqiu was puzzled. “What’s Wrong?” “I saw...; a lot of things.”Lin Xuan already had some thoughts in his heart, but he couldn’t think clearly because there were too many thoughts in his head. However, he was still very happy because his level had risen from level nine, level five, to level nine, level seven. It was a huge leap again. At the same time. In the Pacific Ocean. The construction department, the Arctic Army, and the Truth Knights were joining forces to fight against the Salvation Army and the Highland Plains. Both sides had already sent out their top forces. Everyone knew that the origin of the Elemental Sea was a first-class treasure. No matter which side obtained it, they would receive a huge boost. This thing was especially suitable for elemental creatures. Ji Ruyue was a flesh-and-blood life form, so her absorption rate was actually inferior to that of elemental creatures. The ownership of that piece of elemental sea origin would completely change the structure of Earth, deciding who would be the winner and who would be the loser. However, just as both sides were fighting to the death...; The voice in Kasius’mind suddenly roared crazily. “The realm passageway...; is closed! Damn it! Damn it!” Kasius was stunned for a moment, and Ji Ruyue immediately seized the opportunity to strike fiercely. Kacha! His left arm was directly chopped down by the heaven-destroying sword! Ji Ruyue seized the opportunity to pursue and kill the dark descendant beside Kasius. The eyes of the grand marshal and the others who had rushed over after seeing the situation lit up, and they immediately chased after him. The collapse of the passageway between the two worlds caused the dark descendant army’s morale to weaken, and their combat strength to plummet. Ye Lijiang and the others who were fighting sensed the changes in them and had a slight change in their hearts. “It’s very likely that Lin Xuan and the others succeeded,”ye Lijiang said in a low voice. Ji Ruyue raised her eyebrows. “Good! As expected of the disciples of Kunlun Palace!” “Chase! Don’t let them escape!” The grand marshal also said in a low voice, “Ice Prince Andre told me that after the realm passage of the dark-robed is closed, the concentration of dark elements will gradually decrease, and their strength will also gradually decrease. Now is a good time for us to counterattack!” The morale of the construction division, the Arctic Army, and the Truth Knights immediately soared! Crack. A crack suddenly opened in the sky above Kasius and the others. A few golden figures suddenly appeared. “Atlas? !”The voice in Kasius’mind cried out in surprise. “Not only that, there’s also us!” A clear laughter was heard, and three figures flew over on swords! Ji Ruyue’s heart skipped a beat as she looked towards the source of the laughter. She saw three men dressed in the attire of the Kunlun Palace. The person in the lead had the demeanor of a celestial being. He was solemn yet approachable. wasn’t he her master, the Palace Master of Kunlun Palace! “Ruyue, long time no see. Killing the enemy is the priority now!”The palace master of Kunlun Palace laughed heartily. His longsword was like a long dragon as it pointed straight at the leader of the Salvation Society, Caius. “Good!” Ji Ruyue’s eyes were slightly red. She also waved her heaven-destroying sword and rushed over. Karos roared, “Retreat! Retreat as much as you can!” “No, we are already surrounded. The only way now is to open the passage closest to the throne of the ruler and let the ruler descend. Only he can save us!”The dark descendant beside him roared. “Open where?”Kasius asked. “There!”The dark-robed man pointed at the city in the distance. Kasius was stunned. “That’s old bronze mountain.” “That’s it. Sacrificing a city of humans is enough to forcefully open the passage and let the ruler descend at the fastest speed.” The dark-robed man slapped Kasius on his body and used the rebound force to quickly rush towards old bronze mountain. CAOS was pushed towards Ji Ruyue and the rest. CAOS widened his eyes. “You...;” Puchi. The heaven-destroying sword pierced through his heart. Ji Ruyue shook her head. “Look, your so-called ambassador is just an elemental creature that specializes in betrayal.” Caos turned around and saw that he was not the only one. The other members of the Salvation Society were also pushed away mercilessly by the dark one in his body. They were used as human shields to stall for time. He would never have thought that the dark ones who had made so many promises to him, such as making him the king of Earth, would end up mercilessly tearing him apart! On the other side. Lin Xuan and the other two had already left the angel fortress, and they had walked out of the light gate of the arcane realm. No one could stop them, and no one dared to stop them. “HMM...; what a strange feeling.” Lin Xuan looked at the sky and was slightly shocked. He found that the sky darkened a little faster. However, it was only three o’clock in the afternoon, and it was bright. Yuan Tong suddenly appeared and stared at the sky. “This penniless monk also sensed it.” “Is...; The mountain and sea realm going to reunite with earth?”Lin Xuan was shocked. “So Fast?” Yuan Tong chanted a Buddhist name. “I’m afraid so.” “The mountain and sea realm has been swallowed by the mother of the dark fog. I’m afraid that the mountain and sea realm is now filled with the dark fog race.” “That’s a more terrifying...; demon than the Dark Ones!” “I want to become stronger as soon as possible.”Lin Xuan frowned deeply. The only way to become stronger quickly was to use the seed of the mountain and sea tree! “If we want to reunite, let’s Do It!”Lin Xuan’s expression was determined. Old Copper Mountain. Kasius and the others were stalling for time so that these dark descendants could sacrifice a city. There were two secret realms in old copper mountain that were suitable for growing crops, so hundreds of thousands of people had gathered here. But now, these hundreds of thousands of people had become surging energy. The energy gathered and bombarded the space. The crack expanded rapidly. The dark descendants greedily sniffed this familiar smell. “You actually want to call out to me directly?”A hoarse, dignified voice rang out from within the rift. The dark-robed men’s faces turned solemn. “Lord Hegemon, the realm passageway to Angel stronghold has been destroyed, and the dark elements within our bodies are being drained. Without your help, I’m afraid we won’t be able to fight against the combined forces of the ice race and the Holy Spirit Race.” “HMPH. Trash, just you wait.”The ruler of the deep sea let out a cold snort, taking the lead to extend a tentacle over. The dark-robed experts felt their hearts calm. It seemed as though the ruler himself had decided to act. A terrifying thousand meter long shadow slowly appeared. He had many tentacles. He was like an octopus, but also like a squid. No one dared to look directly at him. However, just as he was about to completely reveal himself, a pitch-black fog appeared behind him, completely engulfing him. “Dark fog mother, I helped you defeat the Mountain Sea Tree and then betrayed the Elemental Sea to help you eat it. Why did you...;”the ruler of the deep sea was incomparably shocked. “The mountain sea tree and the elemental sea are food. Everything in this universe is my food. Naturally, you are my food as well.”A blurry voice rang out from within the Black Fog. The dark descendants were completely stunned. This.. Creak, creak.. An ear-piercing chewing sound rang out. The ruler of the deep sea’s body quickly disappeared into the darkness. After finishing his meal, the black fog suddenly burst out of a crack and swept away all of the dark descendants. The leader of one of the three dominant races in the elemental world, the Dark Ones, had died without a sound. Rumble. Outside of Earth, a huge shadow was rapidly merging with this blue planet. Everyone on Earth felt an indescribably terrifying aura slowly appear. It was as if a huge rock was pressing down on everyone’s chest, making them unable to breathe. Everyone couldn’t help but raise their heads and look at the huge shadow on the horizon. It seemed like a natural disaster was about to descend. Ji Ruyue, the Kunlun Palace Lord, Yuan Tong, and the others who were born and raised in the mountain and sea realm were even more sensitive. The moment the huge shadow appeared, they seemed to be inspired. Rumble! The sky seemed to split open. Spider web-like cracks spread in all directions. Black fog seeped out of the cracks and surged toward all parts of the Earth. At the same time, huge pieces of debris fell toward the ground. Boom! Every piece of debris that landed on the ground would cause huge damage. If it landed on a mountain, it would raze the mountain to the ground. If it landed in rivers, lakes, and seas, it would cause a huge tsunami. If it landed in a city, it would instantly crush countless people to death. Lin Xuan and the other two also saw a large piece of debris fall from the sky and land in the city not far away from them. “Let’s leave quickly. The people of the Salvation Society have probably started to return to help,”Kodo said in a deep voice. Lin Xuan stared at the land debris in the distance, but his heart was moved. It was as if something was calling him. “Master Yuan Tong, can you feel it?”He asked. Yuantong frowned slightly. “I feel it too. It’s a familiar aura.” The two of them said almost at the same time, “The seed of the mountain and sea tree!” Ye Yuqiu and Kodo were also stunned. Lin Xuan immediately ran over there. No matter what was there, he had to go. The Secret of the seed of the mountain and sea tree was very important. Lin Xuan really wanted to know what had happened in his previous life, his previous life...; Why did he have a training avatar, and even why did he transmigrate. Ye Yuqiu and Kodo saw that Lin Xuan was so anxious, so they followed him. The land fragment was not far from them. In about ten minutes, they arrived at the crater where the land fragment had smashed into. This small city had long been razed to the ground. Even the secret realm light door here had been smashed into pieces. After all, that was an entire piece of land. However, Lin Xuan still saw survivors. Moreover, there were even more survivors using his five senses to sense the sky. However, almost all of them were pressed down, with broken arms and legs. Lin Xuan sensed seriously and immediately felt the existence of the seed of the mountain and sea tree within the land fragment. The life force of the seed of the mountain and sea tree was already very weak. If he did not take it away now, it would probably be completely eroded by the black fog in a few hours. “Don’t come close.”Lin Xuan pulled ye Yuqiu and Kodo, lowered his body, and said in a low voice. Ye Yuqiu and Kodo looked in the direction of their line of sight and saw the pitch-black land fragment. The land was not green at all, only the bare surface. There was no vegetation on the surface, only the squirming black fog. That’s right, the fog was squirming like a worm. As if sensing the presence of a living person, the black fog slowly left the land debris and floated towards the injured person below. A wounded person barely crawled out of the ruins and was about to run out of the area of the giant pit. But behind him, the black fog pounced like a wild beast and poured into the wound on the wounded person’s facial features! The man screamed crazily and waved desperately, trying to disperse the black fog. But it was useless. The Black Fog had no form at all. After a slight separation, it would reunite again. Soon, the Black Fog had all entered the man’s body. The man’s movements suddenly stopped. Then, the flesh on his body disappeared inch by inch. His body gradually peeled off and split apart. Only about two-thirds of his body still had skin and flesh. The rest of his body could only see the black fog. Lin Xuan looked over again with the all-seeing eye and shockingly found that the information of the other party had changed. —— Name: dark fog parasite Level: Tier 9, Level 1 Race: dark fog race Occupation: None Attributes: Vitality 209, strength 123, Spirit 781, agility 592 Skills: dark mist body, formless body, dark mist parasite.. Equipment: none Description: the most common result of the Dark Mist tribe transforming other tribes. —— “The Dark Mist tribe is here!” Lin Xuan took a deep breath and suppressed the fear in his heart. The Dark Mist tribe was a tribe that was stronger than the dark descendants, the Holy Spirit tribe, and the ice tribe. Ji Ruyue and Master Yuantong’s Mountain and sea realm had been destroyed by thousands of dark mist tribes. Even the mountain and sea tree of the mountain and sea realm had been devoured by the mother of the dark fog. Such a terrifying race had come in the end. It was much faster than he had expected. At this moment, under the watchful eyes of the three people, the rest of the dark fog had also recovered from its lazy state and began to fuse with and transform the injured. “Those things always feel very dangerous.”Kodo’s eyebrows jumped wildly. Lin Xuan nodded. “They are the dark fog race. They have two skills, one is called the dark fog body, and the other is called the formless body “The dark fog body allows them to freely change into all kinds of forms. One second, they are shields, and the next second, they may be swords, similar to dark descendants. Moreover, they can fuse with each other and become stronger “And the formless body allows them to be immune to physical skills.” Kodo widened his eyes, “Immune?” His skills were mainly based on physics, with lightning as a support. The Dark Mist tribe was too much of a threat to him. Lin Xuan smiled bitterly, “Yes, completely immune.” “No Wonder Senior Ji, the people of Kunlun Palace, and Heavenly Dragon Temple couldn’t stop the Dark Mist tribe. Being immune to physical skills is too terrifying.”Ye Yuqiu sighed lightly. “But I must get that seed of the mountain and sea tree, even if I’m in Danger!”Lin Xuan took a deep breath and used his avatar to reveal all five of his avatars. KE duo nodded, “Okay, we’ll cover you.” Lin Xuan stomped on the ground and rushed out. The Black Fog was still lazily devouring the injured. Lin Xuan blew past them like a gale. They didn’t even have time to react. When the Black Fog finally reacted, Lin Xuan was only about 300 meters away from the mountain sea tree seed. “Attack!”Ye Yuqiu’s gaze was sharp. She saw a cloud of black fog drifting toward Lin Xuan, and it was increasing in speed. She immediately shouted in a low voice. She, Kodo, and flame burst opened fire. Frost, lightning, and five flame bursts exploded. The fierce flames accurately hit the black fog. But the black fog was only scattered, not killed. What was worse was that these attacks made the black fog shriek. In an instant, all the black fog seemed to have lost its laziness. They quickly gathered and rushed toward ye Yuqiu and the others. Under Lin Xuan’s control, the five clones ran in five directions, successfully attracting most of the black fog. Lin Xuan once again ran at full speed, and very quickly, following the guidance of his five senses, he found the seed of the mountain and sea tree in a rotten stump. And there was not one, but two! However, these two seeds of the mountain and sea tree were shriveled and thin compared to the previous ones. They were pitifully small. A lot of their vitality had been lost, and most of their effects had also been lost. However, what Lin Xuan cared about was not the life force, but his memory. He washed the mountain sea tree seed with clean water and immediately ate one of them. Crash. His memory shattered like a mirror, and pieces of it appeared in front of his eyes. In this life, he was not born on Earth, but in a small mountain village. The small mountain village was located under a misty mountain range. There was a top sect in the mountain range, the Kunlun Palace. When he was young, Lin Xuan’s dream had always been to become a high and mighty immortal and become a disciple of the Kunlun Palace. Soon, when it was time to test his talent, Lin Xuan barely passed and became an outer disciple of the Kunlun Palace. On the night he joined the sect, Lin Xuan suddenly had a training avatar. After that, every time he raised his realm, the number of training avatars would increase. He used these training avatars to search for treasures and quickly raised his realm. Even his innate talent had been raised. His battle strength rose steadily, and his long sword reached perfection. He gradually became a core disciple of the Kunlun Palace and was highly regarded by the palace master. He was even appointed as the Young Palace Master. In one night, the small village where he was born was destroyed. The murderer was found to be the work of several core disciples of the Heavenly Dragon Temple. They were training outside and passed by the small village. One of them saw a beautiful woman and suddenly had an evil desire to kidnap her back to be a secular wife. The woman refused to comply, and the disciples of the Heavenly Dragon Temple accidentally killed her. Then, in order to hide the truth, they simply massacred the entire small mountain village to prevent future trouble. After learning of this, Lin Xuan didn’t show any emotion on the surface, but he sneaked into the Heavenly Dragon Temple and used a poisonous sword to assassinate all the core disciples. After that, the Kunlun Palace locked him up and protected him. The Heavenly Dragon Temple was furious. The Kunlun Palace protected him. Both sides fought. At this moment, the world shook, the mountain and sea realm changed, and the dark fog tribe invaded. That Lin Xuan didn’t die in the first line of battle against the dark fog tribe. Instead, he died in the prison of the Kunlun Palace. His memories receded like a tide. Lin Xuan was in a trance. He was still standing where he was. “Poison sword...; Poison Blade?” He murmured a few times as if he remembered something. The names of the five clones that he had manifested in his incarnation could actually correspond to his previous life? Was there a fate in all of this? Lin Xuan looked at the other seed of the mountain and sea tree and quickly ate it. Memories appeared again. This was a vast mountain range that stretched for hundreds of thousands of miles. At the top of a giant cloud tree, there was a huge nest. In the nest, there were three golden dragon eggs. At this time, a crack suddenly appeared on the largest dragon egg. Soon, the young Lin Xuan directly tore open the eggshell and faced the New World. He opened his mouth and let out a shocking dragon roar. It even alarmed father and mother dragon. Under the careful nurturing of father and mother dragon, Lin Xuan gradually became a powerful giant sun dragon. Not long after, he awakened the training avatar. With the help of the training avatar, his strength increased extremely quickly and soon surpassed that of his parents. He was awe-inspiring and shone thousands of miles! Wherever he went, the wind and clouds shook and the Lions and Tigers retreated. He was the strongest overlord of this world. But all of this did not last long. A boundless black fog suddenly appeared at the edge of the mountain range. The dragon father and mother went to meet the enemy, and in the blink of an eye, they were swallowed by the Black Fog. Lin Xuan led all the Dragons, lions, tigers, and leopards, and fought to the death against the invading enemy. They were completely defeated. A mouth of black fog that was taller than the sky and wider than the ground descended from the sky and swallowed all the monsters. The memory disappeared quickly. Lin Xuan shook his head and suddenly realized that he was still standing in the same place. Only a few seconds had passed. “Sun Dragon...; Dragon mountain range...; I actually became a sun dragon in one of my previous lifetimes? Wait, my training avatar once possessed a sun dragon.” Lin Xuan was stunned. “Lin Xuan, your strength seems to be...; ?”Kodo suddenly said in surprise. Lin Xuan carefully sensed and was also shocked. It was actually tier 9? Suddenly, the requirement for tier 10 promotion popped up before his eyes. —— Promotion Requirements: 1. At least one secret realm king promotion material, and at most five secret realm king promotion materials. 2. Overlord’s testimony: Kill 100 dark fog parasites of the same level without using any potions when HP is below 50% . Promotion Preview: 1. Class skill [ attribute bestowal ] has been upgraded: 50% of the highest attributes will be added to the other three attributes. 2. New class skill [ True Dominator ] : when activated, consumes 1% of mana per second, replacing all attacks with real attacks, ignoring physical, magic, and elemental resistances, lasts for 15 minutes. —— Lin Xuan’s heart skipped a beat. The bonus after leveling up was too great! The attribute bonus was directly increased from the previous 40% to 50% . He would gain a lot of attribute points out of thin air. As for the new class skill, the true dominator, the effect of this skill was simply invincible. Real Attack! As long as this skill was activated, the so-called physical immunity of the dark fog race would be nothing in front of Lin Xuan. Real damage with a knife, break through the defense with a knife! “However, I have to kill the dark fog race of the same level. There are not many level nine dark fog race at the moment.” Lin Xuan’s gaze scanned the dark fog race and soon found a few enemies that fit the conditions. Without hesitation, he immediately rushed over. Because these dark fog parasites were physically immune, Lin Xuan did not use any physical skills. Instead, he used magic skills or elemental skills to attack. Ye Yuqiu and Kodo originally thought that Lin Xuan was going to retreat. They did not expect him to charge towards the dark fog tribe instead. The two smiled helplessly and followed. Lin Xuan’s strength had increased tremendously. If he really wanted to fight against the Dark Fog clan, it was not certain who would survive. More than an hour later, the dark fog clan on this piece of land was completely wiped out. However, Lin Xuan and his five avatars had also exhausted their mana points and drank a few bottles of precious super mana potions before they were able to kill the dark fog clan. “Not only are they physically immune, but I’m afraid their magic resistance and elemental resistance are also very high.”Kodo could not play much of a role in this battle and could only smile bitterly. Ye yuqiu nodded helplessly, “Indeed. When my frost skill hit them, the effect was not good.” “Let’s go. Let’s continue to the place where the land fragments landed.”Lin Xuan’s eyes shone brightly. Ye Yuqiu couldn’t help but ask, “Could it be...; a promotion quest?” Kodo was stunned, “No way. You want to advance to level 10? That’s too ridiculous!” Lin Xuan smiled, “It’s all thanks to the mountain sea tree seed that my level rose so quickly.” After saying that, he looked at the shadow that blotted out the sky and muttered, “I even feel that this was arranged in advance. These mountain sea tree seeds have been waiting for me.” Ye Yuqiu and Kodo looked at each other, puzzled. The mountain and sea tree was the will of the mountain and sea realm. If you were an earthling, why would the seeds of the mountain and sea tree wait for you. This didn’t make sense. “Let’s go. Continue to kill the dark fog tribe. You Don’t have to worry about your HP and Mana. I’ll provide the potions.”Lin Xuan waved his hand and strode towards the city in front of him. His ten experience clones were currently training in various secret realms, and the materials they had accumulated had long since piled up like a mountain. He was also in the midst of refining the super-life potion and super-mana potion. It could not be said that there were as many as hairs on a cow’s back. At the very least, there was enough supply. As long as he could complete the tier 10 promotion quest, Lin Xuan would not hesitate. While Lin Xuan was working hard to complete the tier 10 promotion quest, the Dark Fog clan was spreading like a virus around the world. Wherever the pieces of land fell, the dark fog tribe would corrode birds, beasts, and humans everywhere. Wherever they went, any living creature would be transformed into dark fog parasites. They were either parasites or parasites. These parasites were completely subservient to the dark fog mother. They had only one goal, which was to transform the entire earth and transform it into the world of the dark fog tribe. Lin Xuan and the others could fight against the dark fog clan, but the other weaklings couldn’t. The Dark Fog clan was like a demon to them. They were immune to physical skills, but had high resistance to magic skills and elemental skills. The powerful skills that they were proud of were like scraping marks. Who Didn’t feel despair? Only warriors above rank 8 could fight against the Dark Fog clan. But only those at rank nine could fight against the dark fog tribe. Atlas was fighting with the chief commander, Grand Marshal, Ye Lijiang, and the others when his heart suddenly trembled. “Everyone...; our elemental world has also been invaded by the dark fog tribe.” “Moreover, the periphery of the elemental world has begun to rapidly desert. Our leader guessed that the elemental sea has been seriously injured or even started to die.” Everyone’s heart sank to the bottom. The mountain sea tree was dead. Now even the Elemental Sea was about to die? Atlas paused, as if listening to something. “The leader said that more than a hundred worlds under the control of the Holy Spirit race have been completely occupied by the dark fog race. The planet Wills there have been killed and devoured, and the remaining planets are also being invaded by the dark fog race.” “The only place we can stay now is Earth.” “The leader has already begun to move a large number of our clansmen to Earth. The only place we can defend is here.” Ye lijiang frowned deeply. “Earth...; where is Earth’s will?” Atlas shook his head. “I don’t know. You Earthlings don’t even know the existence of Earth’s will, so how would we know? After all, we are still outsiders.” The grand marshal sighed softly, “He’s right. The mountain and sea realm has the mountain and sea tree, the elemental realm has the elemental sea, and the planets and worlds controlled by the Holy Spirit race have their own wills, regardless of whether they are strong or weak. Only Earth...; doesn’t have one.” The grand marshal seemed to have thought of something. “Perhaps the Earth’s will has been sleeping?” “Perhaps...; no one can guess.”Wan youxi was helpless. “Everyone, there is another piece of news.” Atlas said solemnly, “The dark descendants’ancestral land was suddenly destroyed. I heard from those dark descendants that the leader of the dark descendants, the ruler of the deep sea, was eaten by the mother of the dark fog.” “The dark descendants directly admitted that the dark descendants were the soldiers of the dark fog race and had been working in secret for the dark fog race. Many worlds’wills were killed by the dark descendants and the dark fog race.” “The Holy Spirit Race’s Battle Court and holy church heard about this. They had an emergency meeting and decided to unite with the ice race and your Earth.” “The leader has sent me the coordinates. He is going to open a passage between the two worlds. He needs us to clean up the dark fog race there,”Atlas suddenly shouted, “In addition, this passage was opened by the Holy Spirit Race and the ice race. The Ice King will also appear.” The ninth rank warriors present were excited. Good! The Holy Light Leader of the Holy Spirit Race and the Ice King of the ice race had all come. The more power they had against the dark fog race, the better. The stronger, the better. However, a terrifying thought arose in their minds. The ruler of the deep sea...; had actually been eaten by the dark fog mother. The ruler of the deep sea was the leader of the dark descendants, an extremely powerful elemental creature! What did this mean. It meant that the dark fog mother was so powerful that it could not be matched. Could This battle really be fought? .. “Seventy-two!” Lin Xuan stuck his face close to his face and cast a flame blast, directly blowing a dark fog parasite into ashes. He let out a long breath. He had already killed seventy-two level nine dark fog clansmen. These dark fog clansmen needed at least three to four flame blast spells to kill. Moreover, they couldn’t make any mistakes or miss. Otherwise, they would need five or six flame bursts. How could a normal mage have such an endless amount of mana. Only with such high spirit and so much mana potion storage could he squander it all. Even ye Yuqiu and Kodo felt very refreshed as they threw skills all the way. Because they didn’t need to worry about running out of Mana. They just needed to throw skills and it would be over. At this moment, Lin Xuan suddenly saw a crack appear in the space in front of him. The crack expanded rapidly, and in the blink of an eye, golden light burst out from it. Then, the golden light condensed into a pillar of light! Even the huge shadow in the sky seemed to have lost its luster. There was only this pillar of light in the world. “It seems to be the aura of the Holy Spirit Race.”Lin Xuan felt a little familiar. “It might be the Holy Spirit clan coming over to help. However, this light pillar will definitely attract the destruction of the dark fog clan. We might as well go over and help.”Ye Yuqiu said seriously. “Well said.”Kodo nodded his head. “Alright, we’ll go over now.” Lin Xuan took large strides and together with the two of them, they quickly rushed towards the light pillar. However, although the light pillar looked very close, it was actually quite far away. As the saying goes, a horse dies while looking at a mountain. The three of them ran for more than an hour before they finally saw the situation at the foot of the Pillar of light. Just as they had expected, there were many dark fog clansmen swarming over here. However, at this time, there were many level nine warriors in front of the pillar of light, struggling to resist these dark fog parasites. Many of them were familiar faces. “Chief Ye! Grand Marshal! Grand Marshal!”Lin Xuan shouted in surprise. Ye Lijiang was stunned. “You guys are here? I was going to look for you guys!” Gao Qianchi laughed heartily. “You guys destroyed the Dark Ones’realm passage and helped us too much. It almost changed the situation of the Battle!” The Dark Ones’realm passage was completely closed. It could not be opened for a short period of time, which directly reduced the dark element concentration in the air. Under such circumstances, the Dark Ones would continue to lose their strength and would definitely not be a match for the Earthlings. It was not an exaggeration to say that Lin Xuan and the others had directly changed the battle situation. “Everyone, this is?”Lin Xuan pointed at the light pillar. Floating in the air, Atlas, who was more than two meters tall, said solemnly, “This is the realm passage. After it is opened, the leader of my Holy Spirit clan, the leader of the ice clan, as well as many Holy Spirit clan and ice clan members, can quickly come to Earth to fight.” Lin Xuan was surprised. As expected of the two ruling races in the elemental world. They were quite decisive. “Lin Xuan, your current strength...;”Ji Ruyue cut off the dark fog parasite in front of her with one sword strike and glanced at him. She was puzzled. When Ji Ruyue said this, the others immediately felt it. Lin Xuan’s strength was not quite right. Before this, they could all see Lin Xuan’s strength, but now they felt that his strength was as unfathomable as a mountain or a deep sea. He was even stronger than them. “He’s become much stronger. Now he’s doing a level ten promotion mission.”Lin Xuan scratched his head. “Oh, promotion mission...; wait a minute, f * cking level ten promotion mission?”The grand marshal almost choked himself to death in one breath. The grand marshal, Ye Lijiang, Gao Qianchi, and the others were also shocked. Oh My God. All the level 9 warriors present were veteran warriors. However, only ye Lijiang was at full level 9. It was just that the level 10 promotion mission was harder to complete, so he had been stuck at this level. The others had not reached it yet. Either it was level 9 or level 8, or the progress bar of Level 9 was not full yet. Lin Xuan’s sudden appearance of a level nine caught them off guard. “The new wave is pushing the new wave, and the new wave is dying on the beach.”The commander did not know whether to laugh or cry. “Since you’re already here, join the battle. We can’t let the Dark Fog clan get close to the passage between the two worlds,”Atlas said in a clear voice. “Okay!”Lin Xuan and the other two quickly joined the battle. At the same time. The extremely high sky did not seem to exist in the Earth’s sky. An ancient evil will was watching this place. The black fog conveyed a sense of mockery. “Still...; struggling...;” “Find someone...; to break...; the passage...;” This ancient evil will paced around the earth and finally stopped at the Gaotian Plain. “This body...; not bad...; I’ll take you...;” Ying was pacing back and forth in his office, not knowing where to go. However, at this moment, a human figure formed by a black fog appeared in front of him without any warning. Ying did not even have the chance to struggle before this black fog human figure directly embraced him. After a short period of stiffness, a strange smile appeared on Ying’s face. He was completely different from the cautious and cautious Ying before, as if he had completely changed into a different person. “This body is not bad.” “Don’t resist. It’s your honor to be a part of the Great Mother.” Ying let out a few strange laughs and actually directly broke through the roof of the office, flying towards the direction of the passage between the two worlds. The warriors of the Gaotian plains all had astonished expressions. Where was the leader going? Moreover, why was there black smoke behind their leader’s butt. Could it be that he had eaten something bad? Or was it the fart-powered flight of Legends? .. The territory of the Salvation Society, the Pacific Coast. Lin Xuan and the others had already withstood the attacks of the dark fog parasites here several times. They had even killed some of the kings of the mystic realm and obtained some materials to advance. He was only one step away from killing 100 dark fog clansmen of the same level. As for ye Lijiang, the Grand Marshal, and the others, they felt relaxed after Lin Xuan joined the battle. Lin Xuan had the ability to throw potions. Many potions could be thrown on the ground and take effect as long as they covered the people nearby. In this way, a bottle of potions could be used as three or four bottles. Moreover, Lin Xuan’s potions seemed to be endless and could never be used up. He was also changing ways to produce all kinds of novel potions. Jumping potions that increased the height of the jump. Poison potions that directly acted on the mind. Or reaction potions that increased the reaction speed. They were full of imaginative ideas. Ye Lijiang, the Grand Marshal, the Grand Commander, and the others were all amazed. Even Atlas was slightly surprised. Elemental creatures didn’t need potions, but they could also feel the wonderful ideas contained in the potions. “Good, everyone, the two-realm passage is about to open!”Atlas looked back at the passage and sighed. Everyone nodded slightly. It was finally about to open. When the Lord of Holy Light, the Ice King, the elite soldiers of the Holy Spirit clan, and the ice clan arrived, they should be able to fight against the dark fog clan more easily. At this moment, a black dot suddenly flew toward them from afar. Ji Ruyue was the first to notice it. The Kunlun Palace Master and Atlas raised their heads at the same time and looked at the Black Shadow. Then, ye Lijiang, the Grand Marshal, the Grand Commander, and the others also felt something, and their hearts instinctively tightened. Why did they feel that a huge threat was approaching? Lin Xuan used his five senses to immediately detect the other party’s identity. Shadow! That face was the leader of the Gaotian Plains, shadow! However, the shadow now seemed to be completely different from before. In the past, shadow was ambitious, cautious, and planned before taking action. At one time, in Lin Xuan’s heart, he was the most dangerous person. But now, shadow was arrogant and unbridled, completely lacking the temperament from before. The shadow hovered in the air and black fog rose behind him. He looked down at everyone from above. “The leader of the Holy Spirit clan, the leader of the ice clan, and the elites of the two clans are about to be teleported over, right?” The shadow put his hands behind his back and smiled strangely. Atlas was speechless. He only felt that his body was being pressed down by a huge rock. The movement of the light elements became extremely difficult. The others also had the same feeling. Lin Xuan used his all-seeing eye to observe and saw the information of the other party. —— Name: Shadow Race: the parasite of the mother of the dark fog Level: Tier 10, Level 9 Class: Great Yin Yang Master Skills: False Master of the Dark Fog, Yin Yang spell, Great Yan thousand machine technique, half-dark fog body, shadow stream sword drawing technique.. Equipment: Straight Death Black Blade, secret armor of the martial repository.. —— Lin Xuan was shocked. Did he see wrongly. The dark mist parasite? And not the dark mist parasite? Buzz Buzz Buzz. At this moment, a large number of shadows suddenly appeared in the passage between the two worlds. These were the projections of the Holy Spirit race and the ice race. When these projections turned from illusory to real, the Holy Spirit Race and the ice race had truly arrived on Earth. “Oh, they’re here.”The shadow monster laughed. He did not move, as if he was leisurely observing this world. After a few minutes, the shadow gradually became real. At the moment when all the Holy Spirit Race and the ice race were completely real and had completely appeared on Earth, the shadow suddenly attacked. Endless Black fog surged rapidly from all directions. In the blink of an eye, it formed a large black fog hand that was a hundred meters wide. The speed of the black fog hand was extremely fast, and it immediately grabbed onto the realm passageway. “Has anyone told you before?” “Any living being that uses the realm passageway to teleport is extremely weak.” “At this time, as long as we destroy the realm passageway, these living beings will die inside.” Shadow wantonly laughed loudly. Kacha. The black fog hand suddenly tightened. The realm passage shattered like glass. The bodies of the Lord of Holy Light and the Ice King were like small creatures sealed in amber. In the blink of an eye, they broke into countless pieces. Atlas stared at the Shattered Realm Passage and the many clansmen. He opened his mouth to speak, but he could not say anything. “Father...; Father...;” Skaya appeared from ye Yuqiu’s body and looked at Ice King’s disappearing body with a stunned expression. She had been waiting for Ice King to come to Earth and tell him the good news of her and Ye Yuqiu’s growth. But now, Ice King was easily crushed to death. He couldn’t even speak. “It’s your turn now.” Shadow looked down at everyone. “Dark fog race, Charge!” Shadow waved his hand, and the black fog surged wildly in all directions. Dark fog races from all over the world seemed to have been injected with stimulants as they surged madly toward this place. Crush everything! Destroy everything! Shadow quietly floated in the air, seemingly enjoying the feeling of people struggling to survive. The more the natives of the planet struggled, the happier he was. It was as if he could enjoy a delicious meal from this negative emotion. “However, this planet is a little strange. Why doesn’t it have a planet’s will?”Ying muttered. “Counterattack!” Ji Ruyue struggled to get rid of the powerful pressure on her body and swung her sword at the dark fog tribe that was crazily surging toward her! Under her call, everyone rose to resist. Even if they had to die, they had to fight and Fall! Lin Xuan took a deep breath and used a face-to-face flame blast to kill the level 9 dark fog parasite in front of him. Under such circumstances, he had no choice but to reveal his biggest secret. Moreover, he also wanted to know if his ability to possess a dead body as a training clone would be effective against the dark fog tribe, which did not have a physical body. He directly slapped the head of the parasite, and before the black fog in its body completely dissipated, he silently thought of possessing it. In the next moment, the dark fog parasite that had just died stood up again. Its eyes were full of loyalty! “It’s possible!” Lin Xuan immediately instructed it to fight the enemy. He was still short of the last two tasks to advance to rank 10. Even if he had to die, he would be promoted to a level-10 warrior before he died. The scene of him coming back from the dead shocked ye Lijiang and the others. They were even more confused when they saw that the resurrected parasite was charging towards his former clansmen. However, the current situation was so intense that they could not ask. They could only suppress their doubts in their hearts. The Shadow in the air was thinking about why earth did not have a planet’s will. At this moment, his heart suddenly trembled. “One of my children...; is missing?” He looked down and immediately saw that a dark fog race parasite was actually attacking his clansmen. Ying frowned deeply and flew directly to this person’s side. “Child, you...; No, you’re not my child.”Ying’s expression was stunned. At this moment, Lin Xuan consecutively cast three flame bursts and killed a level 9 dark fog race parasite in front of him. This was also the 100th dark fog parasite of the same level that he had killed. Level 10 promotion mission, completed! “Promotion!” The materials for the promotion had long been prepared on Lin Xuan’s body. He was just waiting for now. Boom! A powerful aura suddenly erupted from his body. Level 10! The first level 10 on Earth! His aura directly broke through the clouds and dispersed the black fog that would never melt. This pillar of light made Ying du stunned. “This...; this aura is very weak. Why Do I Feel Nervous?” Ye Lijiang, the Grand Marshal, the Grand Commander, Ji Ruyue, the Kunlun Palace Master, and the others widened their eyes. “Level 10?” “Breakthrough at the last minute! Earth’s first level 10!” “What a pity...;” The moment Lin Xuan broke through to level 10, he suddenly felt that his mind was clear. It was as if all the sounds of fighting had disappeared. The world was clear and white. A gentle voice sounded in his mind. “Destined person, you have finally reached this level.” Lin Xuan was stunned. “Who are you?” “Me? I have always been on you.”His other self suddenly appeared in front of him. The other party had no facial features, but there were data flowing on his body. On a closer look, it was both 0 and 1. “A digitized body?”Lin Xuan frowned. “Actually, you’ve been thinking about this question for a long time. Why did digitization come?”The other person laughed. “But you couldn’t find the answer, and you were too lazy to think about it.” “You know?” “I know, because digitization was initiated by me.” Lin Xuan was even more stunned. Digitization seemed to have appeared in the entire universe. Who had the ability to digitize the entire universe? “Let me introduce myself. I’m the 10th generation AI of the human alliance, codenamed Tinder.” The other party smiled. “Before the 10th reboot, this universe was young and prosperous. Various races explored and advanced in the chaos. The earthlings had endless internal conflicts and disputes, and they had yet to break through to the interstellar era “Until one day, Great Xia’s technology advanced by leaps and bounds, and they mastered controllable nuclear fusion technology, completely changing the structure of Earth. Under such a premise, the humans on Earth quickly eliminated their differences and formed a human fate association to explore the stars and oceans together “After a thousand years of development, the humans scattered the seeds all over the endless galaxies. There were traces of humans everywhere. We brought the seeds of civilization to the weaker races and persuaded the violent races to do good. We even started to build this universe to make it more suitable for humans to live in.” The other party sighed. “That was really the golden era of the Human Alliance.” “And then...;”Lin Xuan was deep in thought. “And then, the Human Alliance encountered another universe that broke through the crystal wall system and came to this universe.” “Black gas.” “They brought death, darkness, and were as unpredictable as fog.” “The human alliance eventually named it the Dark Fog clan.” “The dark fog clan didn’t come with good intentions. They were born with the malicious intent of destruction, destruction, and annexation.” “From the beginning to the end of the war, the Human Alliance’s battle with the Dark Fog clan collapsed upon contact. They were simply no match for them.” The other party shook his head helplessly. “There’s nothing we can do. Compared to the dark fog race, humans have too many shortcomings. Their bodies are weak, and they have too many vital organs. They need to eat, defecate, and breathe.” “The idea of digitizing humans also began to have a concept from that time, and it was successfully put into practice in the end.” “That human alliance...;”Lin Xuan was stunned. “The Human Alliance is gone.” The Tinder shook its head. “But we used the huge amount of energy accumulated during the golden era to restart the universe before the dark fog clan broke into the core of the Human Alliance.” “We were wrong. We thought that the dark fog clan was not a product of this universe. After restarting the universe, it should have completely disappeared. However, after restarting, they also blended into all the basic particles.” “Their existence led to the appearance of monsters. The higher the level of monsters, the more dark fog race particles in their bodies.” “Every reboot, humans had to fight against a large number of monsters. As a result, in the end, they still did not have enough strength to face the dark fog race.” “Many times, you fell under the claws and teeth of these monsters.” “There were even deviations after that. There were two restarts where you actually turned into a monster. Fortunately, the particles of human nature still had the upper hand. Even as a monster, you still united the Earthlings, elemental creatures, Sea tribes, mountain sea people, and other creatures to fight against the dark fog tribe together.” Only then did Lin Xuan come back to his senses. After eating the mountain sea tree seed, the memories he saw in his previous life were indeed real. “But...; I clearly transmigrated to this universe,”Lin Xuan could not help but say. The Tinder laughed. “That Earth was simulated by me. It was the earth before great Xia completely mastered the nuclear fusion technology. HMM, the places outside the solar system are all maps, so I can’t go there.” “The purpose of that Earth’s existence is to give me enough time to adjust your information flow, so that you can match with the information flow every time you restart, so that you won’t be lost and scattered.” Lin Xuan,”...;” “By the way, because the main person in charge of project kindling likes Xianxia and fantasy novels very much, the mountain and sea realm and the elemental world have always been very strong during the previous restarts. When the main person in charge left a back door, he simply put the memories of each reboot at the mountain and sea tree and the elemental sea. You should have seen them all,”kindling said with a smile. “So now, how do I deal with...;”Lin Xuan asked. Tinder shook his head. “Don’t worry, I’m not done yet.” “This universe has been rebooted ten times. The energy accumulated during the golden era of the human alliance is no longer enough to support the eleventh reboot.” “However, in this reboot, the dark fog clan actually gave birth to an ultimate fusion body, the dark fog mother. This is beyond our expectations, because the estimated probability of its birth is only one in ten million.” “The only human in the Human Alliance, go and summon your ten training clones. The only hope now is on you “When you reach level 10, it’s time for them to show their true form from the previous reboot.” The Tinder smiled. “I believe that the humans will eventually expel this creature from another universe.” Lin Xuanxin was moved. Just as she was about to speak, the pure white world suddenly collapsed. He reappeared on the spot, surrounded by an overwhelming dark fog clan. In mid-air, there were...; Shadows that were staring at him! Ying quietly looked at Lin Xuan. Lin Xuan also stared at Ying, or rather, at the part of the dark fog mother in Ying’s body. Only then did he realize that only a tenth of a second had passed since he advanced to level 10. The conversation between him and the Tinder seemed long, but in reality, it was like a flash of lightning. It was only now that he realized that he was actually shouldering such a heavy responsibility. No wonder he had these ten experience clones. So these ten experience clones were all him who failed every time the universe restarted. So he had already failed ten times! “You made me feel fear. This is very wrong.” Ying suddenly spoke. Lin Xuan did not say anything. Instead, he called out to all his training clones in his heart. Then, a blinding stream of light appeared on the horizon! Everyone instinctively raised their heads and looked at the sky. Upon closer inspection, those streams of light were actually monsters. There were dragons, lions, crocodiles.. There were no living people anyway. However, while these monsters were flying, the flesh and skin on their bodies disintegrated one after another, revealing the purest and most core strength. They were all human figures burning with flames. They did not look like flesh and blood, but rather, they looked like a combination of pure energy. What shocked ye Lijiang, the grand marshal, the Grand Commander, and the others even more was that although the human figures’faces were very blurry, they actually looked somewhat similar to Lin Xuan. “What on Earth is this...;”Kodo looked at the sky and muttered to himself. Whoosh! Whoosh! Whoosh! The flaming human-shaped faces flew toward Lin Xuan at an extremely fast speed. Then, they crashed straight into his body. At this moment, Lin Xuan’s body was like a huge furnace that was emitting light and heat. His clothes were burning. Light also spewed out from his facial features. At this moment, his aura also rose crazily. Level 10, Level 2, Level 10, Level 3, Level 10, Level 4.. Until the tenth experience clone entered his body, his level also directly achieved a huge leap from level 10, Level 9. He rose to level 11, Level 4! Ji Ruyue, Atlas, Karakorum Polaris, and the others could feel it. At this moment, Lin Xuan almost became the Sun on the Earth! Boundless light! All the dark fog parasites within a range of 10,000 meters screamed and directly collapsed! The Dark Fog on Ying’s body also peeled off inch by inch in the fierce and hot light. “Kill me...; kill me...; !” Ying finally managed to regain control of his body at this moment. He looked at Lin Xuan, at this person who seemed to be made of pure light and heat, and begged earnestly. To him, being used as a vessel in such a muddle-headed manner was better than death. Even though the Dark Ones were powerful, he had never knelt down and begged to become a vessel for them. In his eyes, the Salvation Society and the Dark Ones were just external forces that he could borrow, not his master. Lin Xuan looked at him and slowly floated away. He raised his hand and placed it on Ying’s chest. Boom. Ying’s body was burned into ashes in the blink of an eye. “Thank...; You.” Ying said the last two words and disappeared completely. Ying, who had crushed the two worlds passage with one palm and killed the Lord of Holy Light, the Ice King, and a group of elite clansmen in the passage, died so easily. The power of Level 11 was far from what level 10 could resist. The black fog that was on Ying’s body also let out an indescribable shrill cry under the blazing light of Lin Xuan. “It’s you...; It’s You! I remember!” The shrill cry only lasted for a moment before slowly dissipating. Lin Xuan raised his head and looked up into the sky. His gaze seemed to pierce through the sky and see the huge, evil shadow. “Everyone, he’s coming soon. Get Ready.” Lin Xuan spoke slowly. His voice was not loud, but it spread across the entire earth. Everyone instinctively mobilized. Taking medicine, repairing equipment, restoring life.. In less than an hour. Everyone saw that the black sky was sinking toward the ground. It was filled with a sense of oppression. Upon closer inspection, it was not the sky, but a thick and majestic black fog. That fog was completely different from what had appeared before. The black fog that had appeared now could no longer be described with words. It was a black that carried pure malice and destruction. “Ah!” The eyes of many weaker people turned pure black, exploded, and fell to the ground. Not long after, black fog appeared within their bodies. In the blink of an eye, they became dark fog parasites. Dark fog parasites also appeared beneath Lin Xuan’s feet. Under the leadership of Ji Ruyue, Atlas, and the others, everyone began to grit their teeth and clean up these dark fog clan’s lackeys. Lin Xuan floated higher. After a short period of darkness, he suddenly shone brightly. Endless Light shot out from Lin Xuan’s body and shot out in all directions. In an instant, it went from the extreme north to the extreme south, from the extreme east to the extreme west. The light illuminated the entire earth. The dark fog that grew out of nowhere once again screamed and burned away in the light. Boom Boom Boom. The Dark Sky continued to sink. A huge face appeared in the sky. The nose was the nose, and the eyes were the eyes. However, when the five features were combined, they were filled with the most bizarre malice in the world. It made people feel terrified just by looking at it. They turned their backs and didn’t dare to look at it again. Under such a powerful pressure, Ji Ruyue, the palace master of Kunlun, Atlas, and the other most powerful warriors did not dare to look at it directly. The heads of those who were weak and tried to look at the face of the black fog immediately exploded like bombs. However, after the explosion, it was not red and white that splashed everywhere, but faint black fog. The fog would be burned into ashes under the blazing light that Lin Xuan was emitting. “I remember you...; I’ve always remembered you...;” “Those ancient memories reappeared in my mind.” “I’ve killed you ten times, why aren’t You Dead Yet? !” The huge facial features formed by the Black Fog roared angrily. The Black Fog in the sky surged like an angry tide along with its roar. Lin Xuan stared at it in silence. Using the all-seeing eye, he saw the information of the dark fog mother. —— Name: dark fog mother Race: Dark Fog clan Level: level 11, Level 8 Occupation: None Skills: illusory body, eternal body, Mist body, devouring, spiritual pressure.. Equipment: none Description: The strongest person gathered by the Dark Fog clan during the tenth reboot of the universe. —— “However...; I can kill you 10 times, so I can kill you 11 times.” “I can feel it. You are as weak as the previous 10 times!” The dark fog mother roared. Lin Xuan shook his head. “You are wrong.” “The reason why this universe rebooted 10 times is to search for the possibility of defeating you amidst the endless possibilities.” “I couldn’t find it the previous 10 times, but this time, I found it and gathered all these possibilities together.” This time, he found three things in the reboot of the universe. Avatar, five senses, and all-seeing eye. In the previous ten reboots, he had only obtained one or two of these three skills, but he had never obtained all three. The black mist-faced man stopped in his tracks. As if he was thinking, Lin Xuan found something. Lin Xuan waved his hand. In the next moment, five human figures that were also burning with flames and spitting fire appeared beside him. The dark fog mother was stunned. But after sensing for a while, she quickly reacted. The five human figures were obviously weaker than Lin Xuan. “You are deliberately mystifying!”The dark fog mother sneered. Lin Xuan’s expression was normal. Avatar, this was the secret of the Kunlun Palace in the mountain and sea realm. It allowed the user to form five avatars that were 100% capable of inheriting their own attributes and skills. However, it naturally had its own upper limit. After all, the mountain and sea realm was only one world in the universe, not the entire universe. And now, he could absorb all of his training avatars back into his own body and obtain the strength of ten of his previous lives. This ability was something that an avatar could not imitate. Therefore, the clones formed by the clones were weaker than Lin Xuan, and much weaker. “Although the five of them combined are not as strong as me, these are enough to suppress you.” Lin Xuan took a deep breath and merged the clones formed by the five clones into his body. Buzz, Buzz, Buzz. After the five clones rushed into his body, the light and flames around his body grew stronger again. It was this insignificant portion that allowed Lin Xuan’s strength to overpower the dark fog mother. Level 11, Level 9! “Destroy.” Lin Xuan raised his hand, and a blinding light appeared in his hand. The light instantly expanded, expanded, and expanded again. Ten meters, 100 meters, 1,000 meters, 10,000 meters! A terrifying and pure blazing pillar of light appeared in Lin Xuan’s hand. The next moment, it struck towards the dark sky. Boom! With one strike, the dark and malicious sky was shattered into pieces! The black fog that covered the sky and the Earth was burnt into ashes under the blazing and scalding flame that symbolized life! In the air, the mother of the dark fog’s ear-piercing screech filled the air! “Just you wait...; Just You Wait!” “My race is in another universe. They will definitely find this place, definitely!” The shrill screech of the dark fog mother did not last long before it was completely annihilated. In the sky, small black dots drifted down. Before they even landed, they had already completely vanished. The last remaining existence of the dark fog race in this universe had also been completely wiped out. After doing all this, Lin Xuan descended from the sky. His HP, Mana, and stamina were almost completely exhausted because of that attack just now. The light around his body was so dim that he couldn’t even sense it. Ji Ruyue, Ye Lijiang, Ye Yuqiu, and the others immediately rushed forward to support him. “We won! We won!” Ji Ruyue couldn’t help but shout. “We won!” Everyone cheered. The sound of enthusiastic celebration resounded throughout every corner of the Earth. The haze that had always shrouded the heart finally disappeared without a trace! “Everyone, it’s time to rebuild the universe.” “The Flame of humanity’s fated union, rekindled from my hands.” Lin Xuan was supported by them as he stood up and smiled seriously. .. More than ten years later. Lin Xuan floated above a planet more than a hundred light years away from Earth, silently watching this planet. This planet had already become the habitat of the fire element. Under deliberate guidance, this planet built a huge and sturdy fortress, constantly preparing for battle. Moreover, the construction standard of the fortress was suitable for Earthlings, mountain and sea people, elemental creatures, Sea tribes, and other known creatures in the universe. No creature would be unable to survive on this scalding hot planet because of the high temperature. No one knew why they had to do this. At this moment, in the starry sky, beside Lin Xuan were Ji Ruyue, the Kunlun Palace Master, Ye Lijiang, the grand marshal, the Grand Commander, and the other big shots. “It’s here.” Lin Xuan’s eyes were hollow as he looked at the void. It was as if he could see the surging dark malice through the void. “The malice from another universe discovered this place,”Lin Xuan said seriously. “Lin Xuan, what are your thoughts?”Ji Ruyue asked. Lin Xuan had thought about it for a long time. “I think your thoughts are the same as mine.” “Kill, kill our way in!” “Until the last dark fog clan falls, until the threat to this universe is completely eliminated!” Ji Ruyue, Kunlun Palace Master, and the others were slightly shocked. “Okay!” “Issue a mobilization order to the entire universe. The war between the two universes...; has begun!” The end.